
 
 
 
 Produced by Sigal Alon, Turgut Dincer, R. Cedron and the
 Online Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 OEDIPUS
 
 KING OF THEBES
 
 BY
 
 SOPHOCLES
 
 
 TRANSLATED INTO ENGLISH RHYMING VERSE
 
  WITH EXPLANATORY NOTES BY
 
 GILBERT MURRAY
 
 LL.D., D.LITT., F.B.A.
 
 REGIUS PROFESSOR OF GREEK IN THE UNIVERSITY OF OXFORD
 
 
 FOURTEENTH THOUSAND
 
 
  LONDON: GEORGE ALLEN & UNWIN LTD.
  RUSKIN HOUSE 40 MUSEUM STREET, W.C.1
 
 
 
  _First published_      _February 1911_
  _Reprinted_            _January  1912_
      "                  _   "     1912_
      "                  _February 1912_
      "                  _July     1917_
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 
 If I have turned aside from Euripides for a moment and attempted a
 translation of the great stage masterpiece of Sophocles, my excuse must
 be the fascination of this play, which has thrown its spell on me as on
 many other translators. Yet I may plead also that as a rule every
 diligent student of these great works can add something to the
 discoveries of his predecessors, and I think I have been able to bring
 out a few new points in the old and much-studied _Oedipus_, chiefly
 points connected with the dramatic technique and the religious
 atmosphere.
 
 Mythologists tell us that Oedipus was originally a daemon haunting Mount
 Kithairon, and Jocasta a form of that Earth-Mother who, as Aeschylus
 puts it, "bringeth all things to being, and when she hath reared them
 receiveth again their seed into her body" (_Choephori_, 127: cf.
 Crusius, _Beitraege z. Gr. Myth_, 21). That stage of the story lies very
 far behind the consciousness of Sophocles. But there does cling about
 both his hero and his heroine a great deal of very primitive atmosphere.
 There are traces in Oedipus of the pre-hellenic Medicine King, the
 _Basileus_ who is also a _Theos_, and can make rain or blue sky,
 pestilence or fertility. This explains many things in the Priest's first
 speech, in the attitude of the Chorus, and in Oedipus' own language
 after the discovery. It partly explains the hostility of Apollo, who is
 not a mere motiveless Destroyer but a true Olympian crushing his
 Earth-born rival. And in the same way the peculiar royalty of Jocasta,
 which makes Oedipus at times seem not the King but the Consort of the
 Queen, brings her near to that class of consecrated queens described in
 Dr. Frazer's _Lectures on the Kingship_, who are "honoured as no woman
 now living on the earth."
 
 The story itself, and the whole spirit in which Sophocles has treated
 it, belong not to the fifth century but to that terrible and romantic
 past from which the fifth century poets usually drew their material. The
 atmosphere of brooding dread, the pollution, the curses; the "insane and
 beastlike cruelty," as an ancient Greek commentator calls it, of
 piercing the exposed child's feet in order to ensure its death and yet
 avoid having actually murdered it (_Schol. Eur. Phoen._, 26); the whole
 treatment of the parricide and incest, not as moral offences capable of
 being rationally judged or even excused as unintentional, but as
 monstrous and inhuman pollutions, the last limit of imaginable horror:
 all these things take us back to dark regions of pre-classical and even
 pre-homeric belief. We have no right to suppose that Sophocles thought
 of the involuntary parricide and metrogamy as the people in his play do.
 Indeed, considering the general tone of his contemporaries and friends,
 we may safely assume that he did not. But at any rate he has allowed no
 breath of later enlightenment to disturb the primaeval gloom of his
 atmosphere.
 
 Does this in any way make the tragedy insincere? I think not. We know
 that people did feel and think about "pollution" in the way which
 Sophocles represents; and if they so felt, then the tragedy was there.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I think these considerations explain the remarkable absence from this
 play of any criticism of life or any definite moral judgment. I know
 that some commentators have found in it a "humble and unquestioning
 piety," but I cannot help suspecting that what they saw was only a
 reflection from their own pious and unquestioning minds. Man is indeed
 shown as a "plaything of Gods," but of Gods strangely and
 incomprehensibly malignant, whose ways there is no attempt to explain or
 justify. The original story, indeed, may have had one of its roots in a
 Theban "moral tale." Aelian (_Varia Historia_, 2, 7) tells us that the
 exposure of a child was forbidden by Theban Law. The state of feeling
 which produced this law, against the immensely strong conception of the
 _patria potestas_, may also have produced a folklore story telling how a
 boy once was exposed, in a peculiarly cruel way, by his wicked parents,
 and how Heaven preserved him to take upon both of them a vengeance which
 showed that the unnatural father had no longer a father's sanctity nor
 the unnatural mother a mother's. But, as far as Sophocles is concerned,
 if anything in the nature of a criticism of life has been admitted into
 the play at all, it seems to be only a flash or two of that profound and
 pessimistic arraignment of the ruling powers which in other plays also
 opens at times like a sudden abyss across the smooth surface of his art.
 
 There is not much philosophy in the _Oedipus_. There is not, in
 comparison with other Greek plays, much pure poetry. What there is, is
 drama; drama of amazing grandeur and power. In respect of plot no Greek
 play comes near it. It contains no doubt a few points of unsophisticated
 technique such as can be found in all ancient and nearly all modern
 drama; for instance, the supposition that Oedipus has never inquired
 into the death of his predecessor on the throne. But such flaws are
 external, not essential. On the whole, I can only say that the work of
 translation has made me feel even more strongly than before the
 extraordinary grip and reality of the dialogue, the deftness of the
 construction, and, except perhaps for a slight drop in the Creon scene,
 the unbroken crescendo of tragedy from the opening to the close.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Where plot-interest is as strong as it is in the _Oedipus_,
 character-interest is apt to be comparatively weak. Yet in this play
 every character is interesting, vital, and distinct. Oedipus himself is
 selected by Aristotle as the most effective kind of tragic hero,
 because, first, he has been great and glorious, and secondly he has not
 been "pre-eminently virtuous or just." This is true in its way. Oedipus
 is too passionate to be just; but he is at least noble in his
 impetuosity, his devotion, and his absolute truthfulness. It is
 important to realise that at the beginning of the play he is prepared
 for an oracle commanding him to die for his people (pp. 6, 7). And he
 never thinks of refusing that "task" any more than he tries to elude the
 doom that actually comes, or to conceal any fact that tells against him.
 If Oedipus had been an ordinary man the play would have been a very
 different and a much poorer thing.
 
 Jocasta is a wonderful study. Euripides might have brought her character
 out more explicitly and more at length, but even he could not have made
 her more living or more tragic, or represented more subtly in her
 relation to Oedipus both the mother's protecting love and the mother's
 authority. As for her "impiety," of which the old commentaries used to
 speak with much disapproval, the essential fact in her life is that both
 her innocence and her happiness have, as she believes, been poisoned by
 the craft of priests. She and Laius both "believed a bad oracle": her
 terror and her love for her husband made her consent to an infamous act
 of cruelty to her own child, an act of which the thought sickens her
 still, and about which she cannot, when she tries, speak the whole
 truth. (See note on p. 42.) And after all her crime was for nothing! The
 oracle proved to be a lie. Never again will she believe a priest.
 
 As to Tiresias, I wish to ask forgiveness for an unintelligent criticism
 made twelve years ago in my _Ancient Greek Literature_, p. 240. I
 assumed then, what I fancy was a common assumption, that Tiresias was a
 "sympathetic" prophet, compact of wisdom and sanctity and all the
 qualities which beseem that calling; and I complained that he did not
 consistently act as such. I was quite wrong. Tiresias is not anything so
 insipid. He is a study of a real type, and a type which all the
 tragedians knew. The character of the professional seer or "man of God"
 has in the imagination of most ages fluctuated between two poles. At one
 extreme are sanctity and superhuman wisdom; at the other fraud and
 mental disease, self-worship aping humility and personal malignity in
 the guise of obedience to God. There is a touch of all these qualities,
 good and bad alike, in Tiresias. He seems to me a most life-like as well
 as a most dramatic figure.
 
 As to the Chorus, it generally plays a smaller part in Sophocles than in
 Euripides and Aeschylus, and the _Oedipus_ forms no exception to that
 rule. It seems to me that Sophocles was feeling his way towards a
 technique which would have approached that of the New Comedy or even the
 Elizabethan stage, and would perhaps have done without a Chorus
 altogether. In Aeschylus Greek tragedy had been a thing of traditional
 forms and clear-cut divisions; the religious ritual showed through, and
 the visible gods and the disguised dancers were allowed their full
 value. And Euripides in the matter of outward formalism went back to the
 Aeschylean type and even beyond it: prologue, chorus, messenger, visible
 god, all the traditional forms were left clear-cut and undisguised and
 all developed to full effectiveness on separate and specific lines. But
 Sophocles worked by blurring his structural outlines just as he blurs
 the ends of his verses. In him the traditional divisions are all made
 less distinct, all worked over in the direction of greater naturalness,
 at any rate in externals. This was a very great gain, but of course some
 price had to be paid for it. Part of the price was that Sophocles could
 never attempt the tremendous choric effects which Euripides achieves in
 such plays as the _Bacchae_ and the _Trojan Women_. His lyrics, great as
 they sometimes are, move their wings less boldly. They seem somehow tied
 to their particular place in the tragedy, and they have not quite the
 strength to lift the whole drama bodily aloft with them.... At least
 that is my feeling. But I realise that this may be only the complaint of
 an unskilful translator, blaming his material for his own defects of
 vision.
 
 In general, both in lyrics and in dialogue, I believe I have allowed
 myself rather less freedom than in translating Euripides. This is partly
 because the writing of Euripides, being less business-like and more
 penetrated by philosophic reflections and by subtleties of technique,
 actually needs more thorough re-casting to express it at all adequately;
 partly because there is in Sophocles, amid all his passion and all his
 naturalness, a certain severe and classic reticence, which, though
 impossible really to reproduce by any method, is less misrepresented by
 occasional insufficiency than by habitual redundance.
 
 I have asked pardon for an ill deed done twelve years ago. I should like
 to end by speaking of a benefit older still, and express something of
 the gratitude I feel to my old master, Francis Storr, whose teaching is
 still vivid in my mind and who first opened my eyes to the grandeur of
 the _Oedipus_.
 
 G. M.
 
 
 
 
  CHARACTERS IN THE PLAY
 
 
  OEDIPUS, _supposed son of Polybus, King of Corinth; now elected King of
    Thebes._
 
  JOCASTA, _Queen of Thebes; widow of Laius, the late King, and now wife
    to Oedipus._
 
  CREON, _a Prince of Thebes, brother to Jocasta._
 
  TIRESIAS, _an old blind seer._
 
  PRIEST OF ZEUS.
 
  A STRANGER _from Corinth._
 
  A SHEPHERD _of King Laius._
 
  A MESSENGER _from the Palace._
 
  CHORUS of the Elders of Thebes.
 
  A Crowd of Suppliants, men, women, and children.
 
 
  The following do not appear in the play but are frequently mentioned:--
 
  LAIUS (_pronounced as three syllables, La-i-us_), _the last King of Thebes
    before Oedipus._
 
  CADMUS, _the founder of Thebes; son of Agenor, King of Sidon._
 
  POLYBUS AND MEROPE, _King and Queen of Corinth, supposed to be the
    father and mother of Oedipus._
 
  APOLLO, _the God specially presiding over the oracle of Delphi and the
    island Delos: he is also called_ PHOEBUS, _the pure;_ LOXIAS,
    _supposed to mean "He of the Crooked Words"; and_ LYKEIOS, _supposed
    to mean "Wolf-God." He is also the great Averter of Evil, and has
    names from the cries "I-e" (pronounced "Ee-ay") and "Paian," cries
    for healing or for the frightening away of evil influences._
 
  KITHAIRON, _a mass of wild mountain south-west of Thebes._
 
 
 
 
 ARGUMENT
 
 While Thebes was under the rule of LAIUS and JOCASTA there appeared a
 strange and monstrous creature, "the riddling Sphinx," "the She-Wolf of
 the woven song," who in some unexplained way sang riddles of death and
 slew the people of Thebes. LAIUS went to ask aid of the oracle of
 Delphi, but was slain mysteriously on the road. Soon afterwards there
 came to Thebes a young Prince of Corinth, OEDIPUS, who had left his home
 and was wandering. He faced the Sphinx and read her riddle, whereupon
 she flung herself from her rock and died. The throne being vacant was
 offered to OEDIPUS, and with it the hand of the Queen, JOCASTA.
 
 Some ten or twelve years afterwards a pestilence has fallen on Thebes.
 At this point the play begins.
 
 
 _The date of the first production of the play is not known, but was
 probably about the year 425 B.C._
 
 
 
 
 OEDIPUS, KING OF THEBES
 
 
 SCENE.--_Before the Palace of_ OEDIPUS _at Thebes. A crowd of suppliants
 of all ages are waiting by the altar in front and on the steps of the
 Palace; among them the_ PRIEST OF ZEUS. _As the Palace door opens and_
 OEDIPUS _comes out all the suppliants with a cry move towards him in
 attitudes of prayer, holding out their olive branches, and then become
 still again as he speaks._
 
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   My children, fruit of Cadmus' ancient tree
   New springing, wherefore thus with bended knee
   Press ye upon us, laden all with wreaths
   And suppliant branches? And the city breathes
   Heavy with incense, heavy with dim prayer
   And shrieks to affright the Slayer.--Children, care
   For this so moves me, I have scorned withal
   Message or writing: seeing 'tis I ye call,
   'Tis I am come, world-honoured Oedipus.
     Old Man, do thou declare--the rest have thus
   Their champion--in what mood stand ye so still,
   In dread or sure hope? Know ye not, my will
   Is yours for aid 'gainst all? Stern were indeed
   The heart that felt not for so dire a need.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 15-39]
 
 PRIEST.
 
   O Oedipus, who holdest in thy hand
   My city, thou canst see what ages stand
   At these thine altars; some whose little wing
   Scarce flieth yet, and some with long living
   O'erburdened; priests, as I of Zeus am priest,
   And chosen youths: and wailing hath not ceased
   Of thousands in the market-place, and by
   Athena's two-fold temples and the dry
   Ash of Ismenus' portent-breathing shore.
     For all our ship, thou see'st, is weak and sore
   Shaken with storms, and no more lighteneth
   Her head above the waves whose trough is death.
   She wasteth in the fruitless buds of earth,
   In parched herds and travail without birth
   Of dying women: yea, and midst of it
   A burning and a loathly god hath lit
   Sudden, and sweeps our land, this Plague of power;
   Till Cadmus' house grows empty, hour by hour,
   And Hell's house rich with steam of tears and blood.
     O King, not God indeed nor peer to God
   We deem thee, that we kneel before thine hearth,
   Children and old men, praying; but of earth
   A thing consummate by thy star confessed
   Thou walkest and by converse with the blest;
   Who came to Thebes so swift, and swept away
   The Sphinx's song, the tribute of dismay,
   That all were bowed beneath, and made us free.
   A stranger, thou, naught knowing more than we,
   Nor taught of any man, but by God's breath
   Filled, thou didst raise our life. So the world saith;
   So we say.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 40-69]
 
              Therefore now, O Lord and Chief,
   We come to thee again; we lay our grief
   On thy head, if thou find us not some aid.
   Perchance thou hast heard Gods talking in the shade
   Of night, or eke some man: to him that knows,
   Men say, each chance that falls, each wind that blows
   Hath life, when he seeks counsel. Up, O chief
   Of men, and lift thy city from its grief;
   Face thine own peril! All our land doth hold
   Thee still our saviour, for that help of old:
   Shall they that tell of thee hereafter tell
   "By him was Thebes raised up, and after fell!"
   Nay, lift us till we slip no more. Oh, let
   That bird of old that made us fortunate
   Wing back; be thou our Oedipus again.
   And let thy kingdom be a land of men,
   Not emptiness. Walls, towers, and ships, they all
   Are nothing with no men to keep the wall.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   My poor, poor children! Surely long ago
   I have read your trouble. Stricken, well I know,
   Ye all are, stricken sore: yet verily
   Not one so stricken to the heart as I.
   Your grief, it cometh to each man apart
   For his own loss, none other's; but this heart
   For thee and me and all of us doth weep.
   Wherefore it is not to one sunk in sleep
   Ye come with waking. Many tears these days
   For your sake I have wept, and many ways
   Have wandered on the beating wings of thought.
   And, finding but one hope, that I have sought
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 70-86]
 
   And followed. I have sent Menoikeus' son,
   Creon, my own wife's brother, forth alone
   To Apollo's House in Delphi, there to ask
   What word, what deed of mine, what bitter task,
   May save my city.
                     And the lapse of days
   Reckoned, I can but marvel what delays
   His journey. 'Tis beyond all thought that thus
   He comes not, beyond need. But when he does,
   Then call me false and traitor, if I flee
   Back from whatever task God sheweth me.
 
 PRIEST.
 
   At point of time thou speakest. Mark the cheer
   Yonder. Is that not Creon drawing near?
 
     [_They all crowd to gaze where_ CREON _is
         approaching in the distance._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   O Lord Apollo, help! And be the star
   That guides him joyous as his seemings are!
 
   PRIEST.
 
   Oh! surely joyous! How else should he bear
   That fruited laurel wreathed about his hair?
 
   OEDIPUS.
 
   We soon shall know.--'Tis not too far for one
   Clear-voiced.
 
     (_Shouting_) Ho, brother! Prince! Menoikeus' son,
   What message from the God?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 87-99]
 
 CREON (from a distance).
 
                                Message of joy!
 
 _Enter_ CREON
 
   I tell thee, what is now our worst annoy,
   If the right deed be done, shall turn to good.
 
     [_The crowd, which has been full of excited
         hope, falls to doubt and disappointment._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Nay, but what is the message? For my blood
   Runs neither hot nor cold for words like those.
 
 CREON.
 
   Shall I speak now, with all these pressing close,
   Or pass within?--To me both ways are fair.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Speak forth to all! The grief that these men bear
   Is more than any fear for mine own death.
 
 CREON.
 
   I speak then what I heard from God.--Thus saith
   Phoebus, our Lord and Seer, in clear command.
   An unclean thing there is, hid in our land,
   Eating the soil thereof: this ye shall cast
   Out, and not foster till all help be past.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   How cast it out? What was the evil deed?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 100-113]
 
 CREON.
 
   Hunt the men out from Thebes, or make them bleed
   Who slew. For blood it is that stirs to-day.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Who was the man they killed? Doth Phoebus say?
 
 CREON.
 
   O King, there was of old King Laius
   In Thebes, ere thou didst come to pilot us.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   I know: not that I ever saw his face.
 
 CREON.
 
  'Twas he. And Loxias now bids us trace
   And smite the unknown workers of his fall.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Where in God's earth are they? Or how withal
   Find the blurred trail of such an ancient stain?
 
 CREON.
 
   In Thebes, he said.--That which men seek amain
   They find. 'Tis things forgotten that go by.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   And where did Laius meet them? Did he die
   In Thebes, or in the hills, or some far land?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 114-127]
 
 CREON.
 
   To ask God's will in Delphi he had planned
   His journey. Started and returned no more.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   And came there nothing back? No message, nor
   None of his company, that ye might hear?
 
 CREON.
 
   They all were slain, save one man; blind with fear
   He came, remembering naught--or almost naught.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   And what was that? One thing has often brought
   Others, could we but catch one little clue.
 
 CREON.
 
  'Twas not one man, 'twas robbers--that he knew--
   Who barred the road and slew him: a great band.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Robbers?... What robber, save the work was planned
   By treason here, would dare a risk so plain?
 
 CREON.
 
   So some men thought. But Laius lay slain,
   And none to avenge him in his evil day.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 128-148]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   And what strange mischief, when your master lay
   Thus fallen, held you back from search and deed?
 
 CREON.
 
   The dark-songed Sphinx was here. We had no heed
   Of distant sorrows, having death so near.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   It falls on me then. I will search and clear
   This darkness.--Well hath Phoebus done, and thou
   Too, to recall that dead king, even now,
   And with you for the right I also stand,
   To obey the God and succour this dear land.
   Nor is it as for one that touches me
   Far off; 'tis for mine own sake I must see
   This sin cast out. Whoe'er it was that slew
   Laius, the same wild hand may seek me too:
   And caring thus for Laius, is but care
   For mine own blood.--Up! Leave this altar-stair,
   Children. Take from it every suppliant bough.
   Then call the folk of Thebes. Say, 'tis my vow
   To uphold them to the end. So God shall crown
   Our greatness, or for ever cast us down.
 
     [_He goes in to the Palace._
 
 PRIEST.
 
   My children, rise.--The King most lovingly
   Hath promised all we came for. And may He
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 149-161]
 
   Who sent this answer, Phoebus, come confessed
   Helper to Thebes, and strong to stay the pest.
 
     [_The suppliants gather up their boughs and
         stand at the side. The chorus of Theban
         elders enter._
 
 CHORUS.
 
     [_They speak of the Oracle which they have not
         yet heard, and cry to_ APOLLO _by his
         special cry "I-e."_
 
     A Voice, a Voice, that is borne on the Holy Way!
   What art thou, O Heavenly One, O Word of the Houses of Gold?
   Thebes is bright with thee, and my heart it leapeth; yet is it cold,
         And my spirit faints as I pray.
             I-e! I-e!
   What task, O Affrighter of Evil, what task shall thy people essay?
         One new as our new-come affliction,
           Or an old toil returned with the years?
         Unveil thee, thou dread benediction,
           Hope's daughter and Fear's.
 
     [_They pray to_ ATHENA, ARTEMIS, _and_
         APOLLO.
 
     Zeus-Child that knowest not death, to thee I pray,
   O Pallas; next to thy Sister, who calleth Thebes her own,
   Artemis, named of Fair Voices, who sitteth her orbed throne
       In the throng of the market way:
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 162-189]
 
             And I-e! I-e!
   Apollo, the Pure, the Far-smiter; O Three that keep evil away,
       If of old for our city's desire,
         When the death-cloud hung close to her brow,
       Ye have banished the wound and the fire,
         Oh! come to us now!
 
     [_They tell of the Pestilence._
 
   Wounds beyond telling; my people sick unto death;
     And where is the counsellor, where is the sword of thought?
   And Holy Earth in her increase perisheth:
     The child dies and the mother awaketh not.
             I-e! I-e!
   We have seen them, one on another, gone as a bird is gone,
     Souls that are flame; yea, higher,
     Swifter they pass than fire,
       To the rocks of the dying Sun.
 
     [_They end by a prayer to_ ATHENA,
 
   Their city wasteth unnumbered; their children lie
     Where death hath cast them, unpitied, unwept upon.
   The altars stand, as in seas of storm a high
     Rock standeth, and wives and mothers grey thereon
             Weep, weep and pray.
   Lo, joy-cries to fright the Destroyer; a flash in the dark they rise,
       Then die by the sobs overladen.
       Send help, O heaven-born Maiden,
         Let us look on the light of her eyes!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 190-217]
 
     [_To_ ZEUS, _that he drive out the Slayer,_
 
       And Ares, the abhorred
       Slayer, who bears no sword,
   But shrieking, wrapped in fire, stands over me,
       Make that he turn, yea, fly
       Broken, wind-wasted, high
   Down the vexed hollow of the Vaster Sea;
       Or back to his own Thrace,
       To harbour shelterless.
   Where Night hath spared, he bringeth end by day.
       Him, Him, O thou whose hand
       Beareth the lightning brand,
   O Father Zeus, now with thy thunder, slay and slay!
 
     [_To_ APOLLO, ARTEMIS, _and_ DIONYSUS.
 
       Where is thy gold-strung bow,
       O Wolf-god, where the flow
   Of living shafts unconquered, from all ills
       Our helpers? Where the white
       Spears of thy Sister's light,
   Far-flashing as she walks the wolf-wild hills?
       And thou, O Golden-crown,
       Theban and named our own,
   O Wine-gleam, Voice of Joy, for ever more
     Ringed with thy Maenads white,
     Bacchus, draw near and smite,
   Smite with thy glad-eyed flame the God whom Gods abhor.
 
     [_During the last lines_ OEDIPUS _has
         come out from the Palace._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou prayest: but my words if thou wilt hear
   And bow thee to their judgement, strength is near
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 218-245]
 
   For help, and a great lightening of ill.
   Thereof I come to speak, a stranger still
   To all this tale, a stranger to the deed:
   (Else, save that I were clueless, little need
   Had I to cast my net so wide and far:)
   Howbeit, I, being now as all ye are,
   A Theban, to all Thebans high and low
   Do make proclaim: if any here doth know
   By what man's hand died Laius, your King,
   Labdacus' son, I charge him that he bring
   To me his knowledge. Let him feel no fear
   If on a townsman's body he must clear
   Our guilt: the man shall suffer no great ill,
   But pass from Thebes, and live where else he will.
 
     [_No answer._
 
   Is it some alien from an alien shore
   Ye know to have done the deed, screen him no more!
   Good guerdon waits you now and a King's love
   Hereafter.
              Hah! If still ye will not move
   But, fearing for yourselves or some near friend,
   Reject my charge, then hearken to what end
   Ye drive me.--If in this place men there be
   Who know and speak not, lo, I make decree
   That, while in Thebes I bear the diadem,
   No man shall greet, no man shall shelter them,
   Nor give them water in their thirst, nor share
   In sacrifice nor shrift nor dying prayer,
   But thrust them from our doors, the thing they hide
   Being this land's curse. Thus hath the God replied
   This day to me from Delphi, and my sword
   I draw thus for the dead and for God's word.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 246-273]
 
     And lastly for the murderer, be it one
   Hiding alone or more in unison,
   I speak on him this curse: even as his soul
   Is foul within him let his days be foul,
   And life unfriended grind him till he die.
   More: if he ever tread my hearth and I
   Know it, be every curse upon my head
   That I have spoke this day.
                               All I have said
   I charge ye strictly to fulfil and make
   Perfect, for my sake, for Apollo's sake,
   And this land's sake, deserted of her fruit
   And cast out from her gods. Nay, were all mute
   At Delphi, still 'twere strange to leave the thing
   Unfollowed, when a true man and a King
   Lay murdered. All should search. But I, as now
   Our fortunes fall--his crown is on my brow,
   His wife lies in my arms, and common fate,
   Had but his issue been more fortunate,
   Might well have joined our children--since this red
   Chance hath so stamped its heel on Laius' head,
   I am his champion left, and, as I would
   For mine own father, choose for ill or good
   This quest, to find the man who slew of yore
   Labdacus' son, the son of Polydore,
   Son of great Cadmus whom Agenor old
   Begat, of Thebes first master. And, behold,
   For them that aid me not, I pray no root
   Nor seed in earth may bear them corn nor fruit,
   No wife bear children, but this present curse
   Cleave to them close and other woes yet worse.
     Enough: ye other people of the land,
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 274-289]
 
   Whose will is one with mine, may Justice stand
   Your helper, and all gods for evermore.
 
     [_The crowd disperses._
 
 LEADER.
 
   O King, even while thy curse yet hovers o'er
   My head, I answer thee. I slew him not,
   Nor can I shew the slayer. But, God wot,
   If Phoebus sends this charge, let Phoebus read
   Its meaning and reveal who did the deed.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Aye, that were just, if of his grace he would
   Reveal it. How shall man compel his God?
 
 LEADER.
 
   Second to that, methinks, 'twould help us most ...
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Though it be third, speak! Nothing should be lost.
 
 LEADER.
 
   To our High Seer on earth vision is given
   Most like to that High Phoebus hath in heaven.
   Ask of Tiresias: he could tell thee true.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   That also have I thought for. Aye, and two
   Heralds have sent ere now. 'Twas Creon set
   Me on.--I marvel that he comes not yet.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 290-301]
 
 LEADER.
 
   Our other clues are weak, old signs and far.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   What signs? I needs must question all that are.
 
 LEADER.
 
   Some travellers slew him, the tale used to be.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   The tale, yes: but the witness, where is he?
 
 LEADER.
 
   The man hath heard thy curses. If he knows
   The taste of fear, he will not long stay close.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   He fear my words, who never feared the deed?
 
 LEADER.
 
   Well, there is one shall find him.--See, they lead
   Hither our Lord Tiresias, in whose mind
   All truth is born, alone of human kind.
 
    [_Enter_ TIRESIAS _led by a young disciple. He is an old
       blind man in a prophet's robe, dark, unkempt and
       sinister in appearance._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Tiresias, thou whose mind divineth well
   All Truth, the spoken and the unspeakable,
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 302-321]
 
   The things of heaven and them that walk the earth;
   Our city ... thou canst see, for all thy dearth
   Of outward eyes, what clouds are over her.
   In which, O gracious Lord, no minister
   Of help, no champion, can we find at all
   Save thee. For Phoebus--thou hast heard withal
   His message--to our envoy hath decreed
   One only way of help in this great need:
   To find and smite with death or banishing,
   Him who smote Laius, our ancient King.
   Oh, grudge us nothing! Question every cry
   Of birds, and all roads else of prophecy
   Thou knowest. Save our city: save thine own
   Greatness: save me; save all that yet doth groan
   Under the dead man's wrong! Lo, in thy hand
   We lay us. And, methinks, no work so grand
   Hath man yet compassed, as, with all he can
   Of chance or power, to help his fellow man.
 
 TIRESIAS (_to himself_).
 
   Ah me!
   A fearful thing is knowledge, when to know
   Helpeth no end. I knew this long ago,
   But crushed it dead. Else had I never come.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   What means this? Comest thou so deep in gloom?
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Let me go back! Thy work shall weigh on thee
   The less, if thou consent, and mine on me.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 322-336]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Prophet, this is not lawful; nay, nor kind
   To Thebes, who feeds thee, thus to veil thy mind.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   'Tis that I like not thy mind, nor the way
   It goeth. Therefore, lest I also stray....
 
     [_He moves to go off._ OEDIPUS _bars his road._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou shalt not, knowing, turn and leave us! See,
   We all implore thee, all, on bended knee.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   All without light!--And never light shall shine
   On this dark evil that is mine ... and thine.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   What wilt thou? Know and speak not? In my need
   Be false to me, and let thy city bleed?
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   I will not wound myself nor thee. Why seek
   To trap and question me? I will not speak.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou devil!
 
     [_Movement of_ LEADER _to check him._
 
                Nay; the wrath of any stone
   Would rise at him. It lies with thee to have done
   And speak. Is there no melting in thine eyes!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 337-351]
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Naught lies with me! With thee, with thee there lies,
   I warrant, what thou ne'er hast seen nor guessed.
 
 OEDIPUS (_to_ LEADER, _who tries to calm him._)
 
   How can I hear such talk?--he maketh jest
   Of the land's woe--and keep mine anger dumb?
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Howe'er I hold it back, 'twill come, 'twill come.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   The more shouldst thou declare it to thy King.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   I speak no more. For thee, if passioning
   Doth comfort thee, on, passion to thy fill!
 
     [_He moves to go._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   'Fore God, I am in wrath; and speak I will,
   Nor stint what I see clear. 'Twas thou, 'twas thou,
   Didst plan this murder; aye, and, save the blow,
   Wrought it.--I know thou art blind; else I could swear
   Thou, and thou only, art the murderer.
 
 TIRESIAS (_returning_).
 
   So?--I command thee by thine own word's power,
   To stand accurst, and never from this hour
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 352-363]
 
   Speak word to me, nor yet to these who ring
   Thy throne. Thou art thyself the unclean thing.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou front of brass, to fling out injury
   So wild! Dost think to bate me and go free?
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   I am free. The strong truth is in this heart.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   What prompted thee? I swear 'twas not thine art.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   'Twas thou. I spoke not, save for thy command.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Spoke what? What was it? Let me understand.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Dost tempt me? Were my words before not plain!
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Scarce thy full meaning. Speak the words again.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Thou seek'st this man of blood: Thyself art he.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   'Twill cost thee dear, twice to have stabbed at me!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 364-377]
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Shall I say more, to see thee rage again?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Oh, take thy fill of speech: 'twill all be vain.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Thou livest with those near to thee in shame
   Most deadly, seeing not thyself nor them.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou think'st 'twill help thee, thus to speak and speak?
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Surely, until the strength of Truth be weak.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
  'Tis weak to none save thee. Thou hast no part
   In truth, thou blind man, blind eyes, ears and heart.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   More blind, more sad thy words of scorn, which none
   Who hears but shall cast back on thee: soon, soon.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou spawn of Night, not I nor any free
   And seeing man would hurt a thing like thee.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   God is enough.--'Tis not my doom to fall
   By thee. He knows and shall accomplish all.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 378-402]
 
 OEDIPUS (_with a flash of discovery_).
 
   Ha! Creon!--Is it his or thine, this plot?
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
  'Tis thyself hates thee. Creon hates thee not.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   O wealth and majesty, O conquering skill
   That carved life's rebel pathways to my will,
   What is your heart but bitterness, if now
   For this poor crown Thebes bound upon my brow,
   A gift, a thing I sought not--for this crown
   Creon the stern and true, Creon mine own
   Comrade, comes creeping in the dark to ban
   And slay me; sending first this magic-man
   And schemer, this false beggar-priest, whose eye
   Is bright for gold and blind for prophecy?
   Speak, thou. When hast thou ever shown thee strong
   For aid? The She-Wolf of the woven song
   Came, and thy art could find no word, no breath,
   To save thy people from her riddling death.
   'Twas scarce a secret, that, for common men
   To unravel. There was need of Seer-craft then.
   And thou hadst none to show. No fowl, no flame,
   No God revealed it thee. 'Twas I that came,
   Rude Oedipus, unlearned in wizard's lore,
   And read her secret, and she spoke no more.
   Whom now thou thinkest to hunt out, and stand
   Foremost in honour at King Creon's hand.
   I think ye will be sorry, thou and he
   That shares thy sin-hunt. Thou dost look to me
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 403-424]
 
   An old man; else, I swear this day should bring
   On thee the death thou plottest for thy King.
 
 LEADER.
 
   Lord Oedipus, these be but words of wrath,
   All thou hast spoke and all the Prophet hath.
   Which skills not. We must join, for ill or well,
   In search how best to obey God's oracle.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   King though thou art, thou needs must bear the right
   Of equal answer. Even in me is might
   For thus much, seeing I live no thrall of thine,
   But Lord Apollo's; neither do I sign
   Where Creon bids me.
                           I am blind, and thou
   Hast mocked my blindness. Yea, I will speak now.
   Eyes hast thou, but thy deeds thou canst not see
   Nor where thou art, nor what things dwell with thee.
   Whence art thou born? Thou know'st not; and unknown,
   On quick and dead, on all that were thine own,
   Thou hast wrought hate. For that across thy path
   Rising, a mother's and a father's wrath,
   Two-handed, shod with fire, from the haunts of men
   Shall scourge thee, in thine eyes now light, but then
   Darkness. Aye, shriek! What harbour of the sea,
   What wild Kithairon shall not cry to thee
   In answer, when thou hear'st what bridal song,
   What wind among the torches, bore thy strong
   Sail to its haven, not of peace but blood.
   Yea, ill things multitude on multitude
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 425-438]
 
   Thou seest not, which so soon shall lay thee low,
   Low as thyself, low as thy children.--Go,
   Heap scorn on Creon and my lips withal:
   For this I tell thee, never was there fall
   Of pride, nor shall be, like to thine this day.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   To brook such words from this thing? Out, I say!
   Out to perdition! Aye, and quick, before ...
 
   [_The_ LEADER _restrains him_.
 
   Enough then!--Turn and get thee from my door.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   I had not come hadst thou not called me here.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   I knew thee not so dark a fool. I swear
  'Twere long before I called thee, had I known.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Fool, say'st thou? Am I truly such an one?
   The two who gave thee birth, they held me wise.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Birth?... Stop! Who were they? Speak thy prophecies.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   This day shall give thee birth and blot thee out.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 439-455]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Oh, riddles everywhere and words of doubt!
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Aye. Thou wast their best reader long ago.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Laugh on. I swear thou still shalt find me so.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   That makes thy pride and thy calamity.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   I have saved this land, and care not if I die.
 
 TIRESIAS.
 
   Then I will go.--Give me thine arm, my child.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Aye, help him quick.--To see him there makes wild
   My heart. Once gone, he will not vex me more.
 
 TIRESIAS (_turning again as he goes_).
 
  I fear thee not; nor will I go before
  That word be spoken which I came to speak.
  How canst thou ever touch me?--Thou dost seek
  With threats and loud proclaim the man whose hand
  Slew Laius. Lo, I tell thee, he doth stand
  Here. He is called a stranger, but these days
  Shall prove him Theban true, nor shall he praise
  His birthright. Blind, who once had seeing eyes,
  Beggared, who once had riches, in strange guise,
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 456-478]
 
   His staff groping before him, he shall crawl
   O'er unknown earth, and voices round him call:
   "Behold the brother-father of his own
   Children, the seed, the sower and the sown,
   Shame to his mother's blood, and to his sire
   Son, murderer, incest-worker."
                                   Cool thine ire
   With thought of these, and if thou find that aught
   Faileth, then hold my craft a thing of naught.
 
     [_He goes out._ OEDIPUS _returns to the Palace._
 
 CHORUS.
 
     [_They sing of the unknown murderer,_
 
   What man, what man is he whom the voice of Delphi's cell
   Hath named of the bloody hand, of the deed no tongue may tell?
           Let him fly, fly, for his need
           Hath found him; oh, where is the speed
   That flew with the winds of old, the team of North-Wind's spell?
     For feet there be that follow. Yea, thunder-shod
     And girt with fire he cometh, the Child of God;
   And with him are they that fail not, the Sin-Hounds risen from Hell.
 
   For the mountain hath spoken, a voice hath flashed from amid the snows,
   That the wrath of the world go seek for the man whom no man knows.
           Is he fled to the wild forest,
           To caves where the eagles nest?
   O angry bull of the rocks, cast out from thy herd-fellows!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 479-512]
 
     Rage in his heart, and rage across his way,
     He toileth ever to beat from his ears away
   The word that floateth about him, living, where'er he goes.
 
     [_And of the Prophet's strange accusation._
 
   Yet strange, passing strange, the wise augur and his lore;
     And my heart it cannot speak; I deny not nor assent,
   But float, float in wonder at things after and before;
     Did there lie between their houses some old wrath unspent,
   That Corinth against Cadmus should do murder by the way?
     No tale thereof they tell, nor no sign thereof they show;
   Who dares to rise for vengeance and cast Oedipus away
       For a dark, dark death long ago!
 
   Ah, Zeus knows, and Apollo, what is dark to mortal eyes;
     They are Gods. But a prophet, hath he vision more than mine?
   Who hath seen? Who can answer? There be wise men and unwise.
     I will wait, I will wait, for the proving of the sign.
   But I list not nor hearken when they speak Oedipus ill.
     We saw his face of yore, when the riddling singer passed;
   And we knew him that he loved us, and we saw him great in skill.
       Oh, my heart shall uphold him to the last!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 513-531]
 
 _Enter_ CREON.
 
 CREON.
 
   Good brother citizens, a frantic word
   I hear is spoken by our chosen Lord
   Oedipus against me, and here am come
   Indignant. If he dreams, 'mid all this doom
   That weighs upon us, he hath had from me
   Or deed or lightest thought of injury, ...
   'Fore God, I have no care to see the sun
   Longer with such a groaning name. Not one
   Wound is it, but a multitude, if now
   All Thebes must hold me guilty--aye, and thou
   And all who loved me--of a deed so foul.
 
 LEADER.
 
   If words were spoken, it was scarce the soul
   That spoke them: 'twas some sudden burst of wrath.
 
 CREON.
 
   The charge was made, then, that Tiresias hath
   Made answer false, and that I bribed him, I?
 
 LEADER.
 
   It was--perchance for jest. I know not why.
 
 CREON.
 
   His heart beat true, his eyes looked steadily
   And fell not, laying such a charge on me?
 
 LEADER.
 
   I know not. I have no eyes for the thing
   My masters do.--But see, here comes the King.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 532-550]
 
 _Enter_ OEDIPUS _from the Palace._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   How now, assassin? Walking at my gate
   With eye undimmed, thou plotter demonstrate
   Against this life, and robber of my crown?
   God help thee! Me! What was it set me down
   Thy butt? So dull a brain hast found in me
   Aforetime, such a faint heart, not to see
   Thy work betimes, or seeing not to smite?
   Art thou not rash, this once! It needeth might
   Of friends, it needeth gold, to make a throne
   Thy quarry; and I fear me thou hast none.
 
 CREON.
 
   One thing alone I ask thee. Let me speak
   As thou hast spoken; then, with knowledge, wreak
   Thy judgement. I accept it without fear.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   More skill hast thou to speak than I to hear
   Thee. There is peril found in thee and hate.
 
 CREON.
 
   That one thing let me answer ere too late.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   One thing be sure of, that thy plots are known.
 
 CREON.
 
   The man who thinks that bitter pride alone
   Can guide him, without thought--his mind is sick.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 551-562]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Who thinks to slay his brother with a trick
   And suffer not himself, his eyes are blind.
 
 CREON.
 
   Thy words are more than just. But say what kind
   Of wrong thou fanciest I have done thee. Speak.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Didst urge me, or didst urge me not, to seek
   A counsel from that man of prophecies?
 
 CREON.
 
   So judged I then, nor now judge otherwise.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
    [_Suddenly seeing a mode of attack._
 
   How many years have passed since Laius ...
 
     [_The words seem to choke him._
 
 CREON.
 
   Speak on. I cannot understand thee thus.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
     [_With an effort._
 
   Passed in that bloody tempest from men's sight?
 
 CREON.
 
   Long years and old. I scarce can tell them right.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   At that time was this seer in Thebes, or how?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 563-573]
 
 CREON.
 
   He was; most wise and honoured, even as now.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   At that time did he ever speak my name?
 
 CREON.
 
   No. To mine ear at least it never came.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Held you no search for those who slew your King?
 
 CREON.
 
   For sure we did, but found not anything.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   How came the all-knowing seer to leave it so?
 
 CREON.
 
   Ask him! I speak not where I cannot know.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   One thing thou canst, with knowledge full, I wot.
 
 CREON.
 
   Speak it. If true, I will conceal it not.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   This: that until he talked with thee, the seer
   Ne'er spoke of me as Laius' murderer.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 574-589]
 
 CREON.
 
   I know not if he hath so spoken now.
   I heard him not.--But let me ask and thou
   Answer me true, as I have answered thee.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Ask, ask! Thou shalt no murder find in me.
 
 CREON.
 
   My sister is thy wife this many a day?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   That charge it is not in me to gainsay.
 
 CREON.
 
   Thou reignest, giving equal reign to her?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Always to her desire I minister.
 
 CREON.
 
   Were we not all as one, she thou and I?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Yes, thou false friend! There lies thy treachery.
 
 CREON.
 
   Not so! Nay, do but follow me and scan
   Thine own charge close. Think'st thou that any man
   Would rather rule and be afraid than rule
   And sleep untroubled? Nay, where lives the fool--
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 590-613]
 
   I know them not nor am I one of them--
   Who careth more to bear a monarch's name
   Than do a monarch's deeds? As now I stand
   All my desire I compass at thy hand.
   Were I the King, full half my deeds were done
   To obey the will of others, not mine own.
   Were that as sweet, when all the tale were told,
   As this calm griefless princedom that I hold
   And silent power? Am I so blind of brain
   That ease with glory tires me, and I fain
   Must change them? All men now give me God-speed,
   All smile to greet me. If a man hath need
   Of thee, 'tis me he calleth to the gate,
   As knowing that on my word hangs the fate
   Of half he craves. Is life like mine a thing
   To cast aside and plot to be a King?
   Doth a sane man turn villain in an hour?
     For me, I never lusted thus for power
   Nor bore with any man who turned such lust
   To doing.--But enough. I claim but just
   Question. Go first to Pytho; find if well
   And true I did report God's oracle.
   Next, seek in Thebes for any plots entwined
   Between this seer and me; which if ye find,
   Then seize and strike me dead. Myself that day
   Will sit with thee as judge and bid thee Slay!
   But damn me not on one man's guess.--'Tis all
   Unjust: to call a traitor true, to call
   A true man traitor with no cause nor end!
   And this I tell thee. He who plucks a friend
   Out from his heart hath lost a treasured thing
   Dear as his own dear life.
                                But Time shall bring
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 614-626]
 
   Truth back. 'Tis Time alone can make men know
   What hearts are true; the false one day can show.
 
 LEADER.
 
   To one that fears to fall his words are wise,
   O King; in thought the swift win not the prize.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   When he is swift who steals against my reign
   With plots, then swift am I to plot again.
   Wait patient, and his work shall have prevailed
   Before I move, and mine for ever failed.
 
 CREON.
 
   How then? To banish me is thy intent?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Death is the doom I choose, not banishment.
 
 CREON.
 
   Wilt never soften, never trust thy friend?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   First I would see how traitors meet their end.
 
 CREON.
 
   I see thou wilt not think.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                             I think to save
   My life.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 627-633]
 
 CREON.
 
             Think, too, of mine.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                             Thine, thou born knave!
 
 CREON.
 
   Yes.... What, if thou art blind in everything?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   The King must be obeyed.
 
 CREON.
 
                              Not if the King
   Does evil.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
               To your King! Ho, Thebes, mine own!
 
 CREON.
 
   Thebes is my country, not the King's alone.
 
     [OEDIPUS _has drawn his sword; the Chorus
        show signs of breaking into two parties to
        fight for_ OEDIPUS _or for_ CREON, _when
        the door opens and_ JOCASTA _appears on the
        steps._
 
 LEADER.
 
    Stay, Princes, stay! See, on the Castle stair
    The Queen Jocasta standeth. Show to her
    Your strife. She will assuage it as is well.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 634-648]
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Vain men, what would ye with this angry swell
   Of words heart-blinded? Is there in your eyes
   No pity, thus, when all our city lies
   Bleeding, to ply your privy hates?... Alack,
   My lord, come in!--Thou, Creon, get thee back
   To thine own house. And stir not to such stress
   Of peril griefs that are but nothingness.
 
 CREON.
 
   Sister, it is the pleasure of thy lord,
   Our King, to do me deadly wrong. His word
   Is passed on me: 'tis banishment or death.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   I found him ... I deny not what he saith,
   My Queen ... with craft and malice practising
   Against my life.
 
 CREON.
 
                    Ye Gods, if such a thing
   Hath once been in my thoughts, may I no more
   See any health on earth, but, festered o'er
   With curses, die!--Have done. There is mine oath.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   In God's name, Oedipus, believe him, both
   For my sake, and for these whose hearts are all
   Thine own, and for my brother's oath withal.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 649-664]
 
 LEADER. [_Strophe._
 
   Yield; consent; think! My Lord, I conjure thee!
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
            What would ye have me do?
 
 LEADER.
 
   Reject not one who never failed his troth
   Of old and now is strong in his great oath.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Dost know what this prayer means?
 
 LEADER.
 
                                    Yea, verily!
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
            Say then the meaning true.
 
 LEADER.
 
       I would not have thee cast to infamy
            Of guilt, where none is proved,
   One who hath sworn and whom thou once hast loved.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
  'Tis that ye seek? For me, then ... understand
   Well ... ye seek death or exile from the land.
 
 LEADER.
 
   No, by the God of Gods, the all-seeing Sun!
     May he desert me here, and every friend
   With him, to death and utterest malison,
     If e'er my heart could dream of such an end!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 665-680]
 
           But it bleedeth, it bleedeth sore,
             In a land half slain,
           If we join to the griefs of yore
             Griefs of you twain.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Oh, let him go, though it be utterly
   My death, or flight from Thebes in beggary.
   'Tis thy sad lips, not his, that make me know
   Pity. Him I shall hate, where'er he go.
 
 CREON.
 
   I see thy mercy moving full of hate
   And slow; thy wrath came swift and desperate.
   Methinks, of all the pain that such a heart
   Spreadeth, itself doth bear the bitterest part.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Oh, leave me and begone!
 
 CREON.
 
                           I go, wronged sore
   By thee. These friends will trust me as before.
 
     [CREON _goes._ OEDIPUS _stands apart lost in
        trouble of mind._
 
 LEADER.   [_Antistrophe._
 
   Queen, wilt thou lead him to his house again?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
               I will, when I have heard.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 681-696]
 
 LEADER.
 
   There fell some word, some blind imagining
   Between them. Things known foolish yet can sting.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   From both the twain it rose?
 
 LEADER.
 
                                  From both the twain.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
            Aye, and what was the word?
 
 LEADER.
 
     Surely there is enough of evil stirred,
           And Thebes heaves on the swell
   Of storm.--Oh, leave this lying where it fell.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   So be it, thou wise counsellor! Make slight
   My wrong, and blunt my purpose ere it smite.
 
 LEADER.
 
   O King, not once I have answered. Visibly
     Mad were I, lost to all wise usages,
   To seek to cast thee from us. 'Twas from thee
     We saw of old blue sky and summer seas,
       When Thebes in the storm and rain
         Reeled, like to die.
       Oh, if thou canst, again
         Blue sky, blue sky...!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 697-713]
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Husband, in God's name, say what hath ensued
   Of ill, that thou shouldst seek so dire a feud.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   I will, wife. I have more regard for thee
   Than these.--Thy brother plots to murder me.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Speak on. Make all thy charge. Only be clear.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   He says that I am Laius' murderer.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Says it himself? Says he hath witnesses?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Nay, of himself he ventures nothing. 'Tis
   This priest, this hellish seer, makes all the tale.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   The seer?--Then tear thy terrors like a veil
   And take free breath. A seer? No human thing
   Born on the earth hath power for conjuring
   Truth from the dark of God.
                                Come, I will tell
   An old tale. There came once an oracle
   To Laius: I say not from the God
   Himself, but from the priests and seers who trod
   His sanctuary: if ever son were bred
   From him and me, by that son's hand, it said,
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 714-732]
 
   Laius must die. And he, the tale yet stays
   Among us, at the crossing of three ways
   Was slain by robbers, strangers. And my son--
   God's mercy!--scarcely the third day was gone
   When Laius took, and by another's hand
   Out on the desert mountain, where the land
   Is rock, cast him to die. Through both his feet
   A blade of iron they drove. Thus did we cheat
   Apollo of his will. My child could slay
   No father, and the King could cast away
   The fear that dogged him, by his child to die
   Murdered.--Behold the fruits of prophecy!
   Which heed not thou! God needs not that a seer
   Help him, when he would make his dark things clear.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Woman, what turmoil hath thy story wrought
   Within me! What up-stirring of old thought!
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   What thought? It turns thee like a frightened thing.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
  'Twas at the crossing of three ways this King
   Was murdered? So I heard or so I thought.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   That was the tale. It is not yet forgot.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   The crossing of three ways! And in what land?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 733-746]
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Phokis 'tis called. A road on either hand
   From Delphi comes and Daulia, in a glen.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
 How many years and months have passed since then?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
  'Twas but a little time before proclaim
   Was made of thee for king, the tidings came.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   My God, what hast thou willed to do with me?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Oedipus, speak! What is it troubles thee?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Ask me not yet. But say, what build, what height
   Had Laius? Rode he full of youth and might?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Tall, with the white new gleaming on his brow
   He walked. In shape just such a man as thou.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   God help me! I much fear that I have wrought
   A curse on mine own head, and knew it not.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   How sayst thou? O my King, I look on thee
   And tremble.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 747-760]
 
 OEDIPUS (_to himself_).
 
             Horror, if the blind can see!
   Answer but one thing and 'twill all be clear.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Speak. I will answer though I shake with fear.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Went he with scant array, or a great band
   Of armed followers, like a lord of land?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Four men were with him, one a herald; one
   Chariot there was, where Laius rode alone.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Aye me! Tis clear now.
                          Woman, who could bring
   To Thebes the story of that manslaying?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   A house-thrall, the one man they failed to slay.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   The one man...? Is he in the house to-day?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Indeed no. When he came that day, and found
   Thee on the throne where once sat Laius crowned,
   He took my hand and prayed me earnestly
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 761-779]
 
   To send him to the mountain heights, to be
   A herdsman, far from any sight or call
   Of Thebes. And there I sent him. 'Twas a thrall
   Good-hearted, worthy a far greater boon.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Canst find him? I would see this herd, and soon.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
  'Tis easy. But what wouldst thou with the herd?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   I fear mine own voice, lest it spoke a word
   Too much; whereof this man must tell me true.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   The man shall come.--My lord, methinks I too
   Should know what fear doth work thee this despite.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou shalt. When I am tossed to such an height
   Of dark foreboding, woman, when my mind
   Faceth such straits as these, where should I find
   A mightier love than thine?
                                My father--thus
   I tell thee the whole tale--was Polybus,
   In Corinth King; my mother Merope
   Of Dorian line. And I was held to be
   The proudest in Corinthia, till one day
   A thing befell: strange was it, but no way
   Meet for such wonder and such rage as mine.
   A feast it was, and some one flushed with wine
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 780-807]
 
   Cried out at me that I was no true son
   Of Polybus. Oh, I was wroth! That one
   Day I kept silence, but the morrow morn
   I sought my parents, told that tale of scorn
   And claimed the truth; and they rose in their pride
   And smote the mocker.... Aye, they satisfied
   All my desire; yet still the cavil gnawed
   My heart, and still the story crept abroad.
     At last I rose--my father knew not, nor
   My mother--and went forth to Pytho's floor
   To ask. And God in that for which I came
   Rejected me, but round me, like a flame,
   His voice flashed other answers, things of woe,
   Terror, and desolation. I must know
   My mother's body and beget thereon
   A race no mortal eye durst look upon,
   And spill in murder mine own father's blood.
     I heard, and, hearing, straight from where I stood,
   No landmark but the stars to light my way,
   Fled, fled from the dark south where Corinth lay,
   To lands far off, where never I might see
   My doom of scorn fulfilled. On bitterly
   I strode, and reached the region where, so saith
   Thy tale, that King of Thebes was struck to death....
   Wife, I will tell thee true. As one in daze
   I walked, till, at the crossing of three ways,
   A herald, like thy tale, and o'er his head
   A man behind strong horses charioted
   Met me. And both would turn me from the path,
   He and a thrall in front. And I in wrath
   Smote him that pushed me--'twas a groom who led
   The horses. Not a word the master said,
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 808-828]
 
   But watched, and as I passed him on the road
   Down on my head his iron-branched goad
   Stabbed. But, by heaven, he rued it! In a flash
   I swung my staff and saw the old man crash
   Back from his car in blood.... Then all of them
   I slew.
            Oh, if that man's unspoken name
   Had aught of Laius in him, in God's eye
   What man doth move more miserable than I,
   More dogged by the hate of heaven! No man, kin
   Nor stranger, any more may take me in;
   No man may greet me with a word, but all
   Cast me from out their houses. And withal
   'Twas mine own self that laid upon my life
   These curses.--And I hold the dead man's wife
   In these polluting arms that spilt his soul....
   Am I a thing born evil? Am I foul
   In every vein? Thebes now doth banish me,
   And never in this exile must I see
   Mine ancient folk of Corinth, never tread
   The land that bore me; else my mother's bed
   Shall be defiled, and Polybus, my good
   Father, who loved me well, be rolled in blood.
   If one should dream that such a world began
   In some slow devil's heart, that hated man,
   Who should deny him?--God, as thou art clean,
   Suffer not this, oh, suffer not this sin
   To be, that e'er I look on such a day!
   Out of all vision of mankind away
   To darkness let me fall ere such a fate
   Touch me, so unclean and so desolate!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 829-850]
 
 LEADER.
 
   I tremble too, O King; but till thou hear
   From him who saw, oh, let hope conquer fear.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   One shred of hope I still have, and therefore
   Will wait the herdsman's coming. 'Tis no more.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   He shall come. But what further dost thou seek?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   This. If we mark him close and find him speak
   As thou hast, then I am lifted from my dread.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   What mean'st thou? Was there something that I said...?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou said'st he spoke of robbers, a great band,
   That slaughtered Laius' men. If still he stand
   To the same tale, the guilt comes not my way.
   One cannot be a band. But if he say
   One lonely loin-girt man, then visibly
   This is God's finger pointing toward me.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Be sure of this. He told the story so
   When first he came. All they that heard him know,
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 850-870]
 
   Not only I. He cannot change again
   Now. And if change he should, O Lord of men,
   No change of his can make the prophecy
   Of Laius' death fall true. He was to die
   Slain by my son. So Loxias spake.... My son!
   He slew no man, that poor deserted one
   That died.... And I will no more turn mine eyes
   This way nor that for all their prophecies.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Woman, thou counsellest well. Yet let it not
   Escape thee. Send and have the herdsman brought.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   That will I.--Come. Thou knowest I ne'er would do
   Nor think of aught, save thou wouldst have it so.
 
     [JOCASTA _and_ OEDIPUS _go together into the Palace._
 
 CHORUS.
 
     [_They pray to be free from such great sins as
      they have just heard spoken of._
 
     [_Strophe._
 
   Toward God's great mysteries, oh, let me move
       Unstained till I die
   In speech or doing; for the Laws thereof
   Are holy, walkers upon ways above,
       Born in the far blue sky;
 
   Their father is Olympus uncreate;
       No man hath made nor told
   Their being; neither shall Oblivion set
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 870-893]
 
   Sleep on their eyes, for in them lives a great
     Spirit and grows not old. [_Antistrophe._
 
    [_They wonder if these sins be all due to pride
       and if_ CREON _has guilty ambitions;_
 
   'Tis Pride that breeds the tyrant; drunken deep
       With perilous things is she,
   Which bring not peace: up, reeling, steep on steep
   She climbs, till lo, the rock-edge, and the leap
       To that which needs must be,
 
   The land where the strong foot is no more strong!
       Yet is there surely Pride
   That saves a city; God preserve it long!
   I judge not. Only through all maze of wrong
       Be God, not man, my guide. [_Strophe._
 
     [_Or if_ TIRESIAS _can really be a lying prophet with
         no fear of God; they feel that all faith in
         oracles and the things of God is shaken._
 
   Is there a priest who moves amid the altars
       Ruthless in deed and word,
   Fears not the presence of his god, nor falters
       Lest Right at last be heard?
   If such there be, oh, let some doom be given
       Meet for his ill-starred pride,
   Who will not gain his gain where Justice is,
   Who will not hold his lips from blasphemies,
   Who hurls rash hands amid the things of heaven
       From man's touch sanctified.
 
     In a world where such things be,
       What spirit hath shield or lance
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 893-916]
 
         To ward him secretly
           From the arrow that slays askance?
         If honour to such things be,
           Why should I dance my dance?
 
     [_Antistrophe._
 
   I go no more with prayers and adorations
       To Earth's deep Heart of Stone,
   Nor yet the Abantes' floor, nor where the nations
       Kneel at Olympia's throne,
   Till all this dark be lightened, for the finger
       Of man to touch and know.
   O Thou that rulest--if men rightly call
   Thy name on earth--O Zeus, thou Lord of all
   And Strength undying, let not these things linger
       Unknown, tossed to and fro.
 
             For faint is the oracle,
               And they thrust it aside, away;
             And no more visible
               Apollo to save or slay;
             And the things of God, they fail
               As mist on the wind away.
 
     [JOCASTA _comes out from the Palace followed
        by handmaids bearing incense and flowers._
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Lords of the land, the ways my thought hath trod
   Lead me in worship to these shrines of God
   With flowers and incense flame. So dire a storm
   Doth shake the King, sin, dread and every form
   Of grief the world knows. 'Tis the wise man's way
   To judge the morrow by the yester day;
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 917-933]
 
   Which he doth never, but gives eye and ear
   To all who speak, will they but speak of fear.
     And seeing no word of mine hath power to heal
   His torment, therefore forth to thee I steal,
   O Slayer of the Wolf, O Lord of Light,
   Apollo: thou art near us, and of right
   Dost hold us thine: to thee in prayer I fall.
 
     [_She kneels at the altar of Apollo Lukeios._
 
   Oh, show us still some path that is not all
   Unclean; for now our captain's eyes are dim
   With dread, and the whole ship must follow him.
 
     [_While she prays a_ STRANGER _has entered and
         begins to accost the Chorus._
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Good masters, is there one of you could bring
   My steps to the house of Oedipus, your King?
   Or, better, to himself if that may be?
 
 LEADER.
 
   This is the house and he within; and she
   Thou seest, the mother of his royal seed.
 
     [JOCASTA _rises, anxious, from her prayer._
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Being wife to such a man, happy indeed
   And ringed with happy faces may she live!
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   To one so fair of speech may the Gods give
   Like blessing, courteous stranger; 'tis thy due.
   But say what leads thee hither. Can we do
   Thy wish in aught, or hast thou news to bring?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 934-947]
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Good news, O Queen, for thee and for the King.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   What is it? And from what prince comest thou?
 
 STRANGER.
 
   I come from Corinth.--And my tale, I trow,
   Will give thee joy, yet haply also pain.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   What news can have that twofold power? Be plain.
 
 STRANGER.
 
  'Tis spoke in Corinth that the gathering
   Of folk will make thy lord our chosen King.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   How? Is old Polybus in power no more?
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Death has a greater power. His reign is o'er.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   What say'st thou? Dead?... Oedipus' father dead?
 
 STRANGER.
 
   If I speak false, let me die in his stead.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Ho, maiden! To our master! Hie thee fast
   And tell this tale.
 
     [_The maiden goes._
 
                     Where stand ye at the last
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 948-961]
 
   Ye oracles of God? For many a year
   Oedipus fled before that man, in fear
   To slay him. And behold we find him thus
   Slain by a chance death, not by Oedipus.
 
     [OEDIPUS _comes out from the Palace._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   O wife, O face I love to look upon,
   Why call'st thou me from where I sat alone?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Give ear, and ponder from what this man tells
   How end these proud priests and their oracles.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Whence comes he? And what word hath he for us?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   From Corinth; bearing news that Polybus
   Thy father is no more. He has found his death.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   How?--Stranger, speak thyself. This that she saith ...
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Is sure. If that is the first news ye crave,
   I tell thee, Polybus lieth in his grave.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Not murdered?... How? Some passing of disease?
 
 STRANGER.
 
   A slight thing turns an old life to its peace.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 962-978]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Poor father!... 'Tis by sickness he is dead?
 
 STRANGER.
 
   The growing years lay heavy on his head.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   O wife, why then should man fear any more
   The voice of Pytho's dome, or cower before
   These birds that shriek above us? They foretold
   Me for my father's murderer; and behold,
   He lies in Corinth dead, and here am I
   And never touched the sword.... Or did he die
   In grief for me who left him? In that way
   I may have wrought his death.... But come what may,
   He sleepeth in his grave and with him all
   This deadly seercraft, of no worth at all.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Dear Lord, long since did I not show thee clear...?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Indeed, yes. I was warped by mine own fear.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Now thou wilt cast it from thee, and forget.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Forget my mother?... It is not over yet.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   What should man do with fear, who hath but Chance
   Above him, and no sight nor governance
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 979-993]
 
   Of things to be? To live as life may run,
   No fear, no fret, were wisest 'neath the sun.
   And thou, fear not thy mother. Prophets deem
   A deed wrought that is wrought but in a dream.
   And he to whom these things are nothing, best
   Will bear his burden.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                         All thou counsellest
   Were good, save that my mother liveth still.
   And, though thy words be wise, for good or ill
   Her I still fear.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
                     Think of thy father's tomb!
   Like light across our darkness it hath come.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Great light; but while she lives I fly from her.
 
 STRANGER.
 
   What woman, Prince, doth fill thee so with fear?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Merope, friend, who dwelt with Polybus.
 
 STRANGER.
 
   What in Queen Merope should fright thee thus?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   A voice of God, stranger, of dire import.
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Meet for mine ears? Or of some secret sort?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 994-1009]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Nay, thou must hear, and Corinth. Long ago
   Apollo spake a doom, that I should know
   My mother's flesh, and with mine own hand spill
   My father's blood.--'Tis that, and not my will,
   Hath kept me always far from Corinth. So;
   Life hath dealt kindly with me, yet men know
   On earth no comfort like a mother's face.
 
 STRANGER.
 
  'Tis that, hath kept thee exiled in this place?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   That, and the fear too of my father's blood.
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Then, surely, Lord ... I came but for thy good ...
  'Twere well if from that fear I set thee free.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Ah, couldst thou! There were rich reward for thee.
 
 STRANGER.
 
   To say truth, I had hoped to lead thee home
   Now, and myself to get some good therefrom.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Nay; where my parents are I will not go.
 
 STRANGER.
 
   My son, 'tis very clear thou dost not know
   What road thou goest.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
               How? In God's name, say!
   How clear?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1010-1019]
 
 STRANGER.
 
               'Tis this, keeps thee so long away
   From Corinth?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                   'Tis the fear lest that word break
   One day upon me true.
 
 STRANGER.
 
                           Fear lest thou take
   Defilement from the two that gave thee birth?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
  'Tis that, old man, 'tis that doth fill the earth
   With terror.
 
 STRANGER.
 
                 Then thy terror all hath been
   For nothing.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                 How? Were not your King and Queen
   My parents?
 
 STRANGER.
 
               Polybus was naught to thee
   In blood.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
             How? He, my father!
 
 STRANGER.
 
                                 That was he
   As much as I, but no more.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                               Thou art naught;
  'Twas he begot me.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1020-1028]
 
 STRANGER.
 
                          'Twas not I begot
   Oedipus, neither was it he.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                               What wild
   Fancy, then, made him name me for his child?
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Thou wast his child--by gift. Long years ago
   Mine own hand brought thee to him.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                                      Coming so,
   From a strange hand, he gave me that great love?
 
 STRANGER.
 
   He had no child, and the desire thereof
   Held him.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
             And thou didst find somewhere--or buy--
   A child for him?
 
 STRANGER.
 
                    I found it in a high
   Glen of Kithairon.
 
     [_Movement of_ JOCASTA, _who stands riveted
         with dread, unnoticed by the others._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                      Yonder? To what end
   Wast travelling in these parts?
 
 STRANGER.
 
                                   I came to tend
   The flocks here on the mountain.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1029-1037]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                                      Thou wast one
   That wandered, tending sheep for hire?
 
 STRANGER.
 
                                          My son,
   That day I was the saviour of a King.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   How saviour? Was I in some suffering
   Or peril?
 
 STRANGER.
 
             Thine own feet a tale could speak.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Ah me! What ancient pain stirs half awake
   Within me!
 
 STRANGER.
 
               'Twas a spike through both thy feet.
   I set thee free.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                     A strange scorn that, to greet
   A babe new on the earth!
 
 STRANGER.
 
                             From that they fain
   Must call thee Oedipus, "_Who-walks-in-pain_."
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Who called me so--father or mother? Oh,
   In God's name, speak!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1038-1046]
 
 STRANGER.
 
                      I know not. He should know
   Who brought thee.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                     So: I was not found by thee.
   Thou hadst me from another?
 
 STRANGER.
 
                               Aye; to me
   One of the shepherds gave the babe, to bear
   Far off.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
       What shepherd? Know'st thou not? Declare
   All that thou knowest.
 
 STRANGER.
 
                          By my memory, then,
   I think they called him one of Laius' men.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   That Laius who was king in Thebes of old?
 
 STRANGER.
 
   The same. My man did herding in his fold.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Is he yet living? Can I see his face?
 
 STRANGER.
 
     [_Turning to the Chorus._
 
   Ye will know that, being natives to the place.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1047-1062]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   How?--Is there one of you within my pale
   Standing, that knows the shepherd of his tale?
   Ye have seen him on the hills? Or in this town?
   Speak! For the hour is come that all be known.
 
 LEADER.
 
   I think 'twill be the Peasant Man, the same,
   Thou hast sought long time to see.--His place and name
   Our mistress, if she will, can tell most clear.
 
     [JOCASTA _remains as if she heard nothing._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou hear'st him, wife. The herd whose presence here
   We craved for, is it he this man would say?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   He saith ... What of it? Ask not; only pray
   Not to remember.... Tales are vainly told.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
  'Tis mine own birth. How can I, when I hold
   Such clues as these, refrain from knowing all?
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   For God's love, no! Not if thou car'st at all
   For thine own life.... My anguish is enough.
 
 OEDIPUS (_bitterly_).
 
   Fear not!... Though I be thrice of slavish stuff
   From my third grand-dam down, it shames not thee.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1063-1075]
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   Ask no more. I beseech thee.... Promise me!
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   To leave the Truth half-found? 'Tis not my mood.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
   I understand; and tell thee what is good.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thy good doth weary me.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
                           O child of woe,
   I pray God, I pray God, thou never know!
 
 OEDIPUS (_turning from her_).
 
   Go, fetch the herdsman straight!--This Queen of mine
   May walk alone to boast her royal line.
 
 JOCASTA.
 
     [_She twice draws in her breath through her
         teeth, as if in some sharp pain._
 
   Unhappy one, goodbye! Goodbye before
   I go: this once, and never never more!
 
     [_She comes towards him as though to take a last
         farewell, then stops suddenly, turns, and
         rushes into the Palace._
 
 LEADER.
 
   King, what was that? She passed like one who flies
   In very anguish. Dread is o'er mine eyes
   Lest from this silence break some storm of wrong.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1076-1097]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Break what break will! My mind abideth strong
   To know the roots, how low soe'er they be,
   Which grew to Oedipus. This woman, she
   Is proud, methinks, and fears my birth and name
   Will mar her nobleness. But I, no shame
   Can ever touch me. I am Fortune's child,
   Not man's; her mother face hath ever smiled
   Above me, and my brethren of the sky,
   The changing Moons, have changed me low and high.
   There is my lineage true, which none shall wrest
   From me; who then am I to fear this quest?
 
 CHORUS.
 
     [_They sing_ OEDIPUS _as the foundling of their
         own Theban mountain, Kithairon, and
         doubtless of divine birth._
 
     [_Strophe._
 
   If I, O Kithairon, some vision can borrow
     From seercraft, if still there is wit in the old,
   Long, long, through the deep-orbed Moon of the morrow--
     So hear me, Olympus!--thy tale shall be told.
   O mountain of Thebes, a new Theban shall praise thee,
     One born of thy bosom, one nursed at thy springs;
   And the old men shall dance to thy glory, and raise thee
     To worship, O bearer of joy to my kings.
             And thou, we pray,
   Look down in peace, O Apollo; I-e, I-e!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1098-1120]
 
     [_Antistrophe._
 
   What Oread mother, unaging, unweeping,
     Did bear thee, O Babe, to the Crag-walker Pan;
   Or perchance to Apollo? He loveth the leaping
     Of herds on the rock-ways unhaunted of man.
   Or was it the lord of Cyllene, who found thee,
     Or glad Dionysus, whose home is the height,
   Who knew thee his own on the mountain, as round thee
     The White Brides of Helicon laughed for delight?
                   'Tis there, 'tis there,
   The joy most liveth of all his dance and prayer.
 
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   If I may judge, ye Elders, who have ne'er
   Seen him, methinks I see the shepherd there
   Whom we have sought so long. His weight of years
   Fits well with our Corinthian messenger's;
   And, more, I know the men who guide his way,
   Bondsmen of mine own house.
                               Thou, friend, wilt say
   Most surely, who hast known the man of old.
 
 LEADER.
 
   I know him well. A shepherd of the fold
   Of Laius, one he trusted more than all.
 
     [_The_ SHEPHERD _comes in, led by two thralls.
         He is an old man and seems terrified._
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou first, our guest from Corinth: say withal
   Is this the man?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1120-1130]
 
 STRANGER.
 
            This is the man, O King.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
     [_Addressing the_ SHEPHERD.
 
   Old man! Look up, and answer everything
   I ask thee.--Thou wast Laius' man of old?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   Born in his house I was, not bought with gold.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   What kind of work, what way of life, was thine?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   Most of my days I tended sheep or kine.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   What was thy camping ground at midsummer?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   Sometimes Kithairon, sometimes mountains near.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Saw'st ever there this man thou seest now?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   There, Lord? What doing?--What man meanest thou?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
     [_Pointing to the_ STRANGER.
 
   Look! Hath he ever crossed thy path before?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1131-1146]
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   I call him not to mind, I must think more.
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Small wonder that, O King! But I will throw
   Light on his memories.--Right well I know
   He knows the time when, all Kithairon through,
   I with one wandering herd and he with two,
   Three times we neighboured one another, clear
   From spring to autumn stars, a good half-year.
   At winter's fall we parted; he drove down
   To his master's fold, and I back to mine own....
   Dost call it back, friend? Was it as I say?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   It was. It was.... 'Tis all so far away.
 
 STRANGER.
 
   Say then: thou gavest me once, there in the wild,
   A babe to rear far off as mine own child?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
     [_His terror returning._
 
   What does this mean? To what end askest thou?
 
 STRANGER.
 
     [_Pointing to_ OEDIPUS.
 
   That babe has grown, friend. 'Tis our master now.
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
     [_He slowly understands, then stands for a moment horror-struck._
 
   No, in the name of death!... Fool, hold thy peace.
 
     [_He lifts his staff at the_ STRANGER.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1147-1157]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Ha, greybeard! Wouldst thou strike him?--'Tis not his
   Offences, 'tis thine own we need to mend.
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   Most gentle master, how do I offend?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Whence came that babe whereof he questioneth?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   He doth not know ... 'tis folly ... what he saith.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou wilt not speak for love; but pain maybe ...
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   I am very old. Ye would not torture me.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Back with his arms, ye bondmen! Hold him so.
 
     [_The thralls drag back the_ SHEPHERD'S
        _arms, ready for torture._
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   Woe's me! What have I done?... What wouldst thou know?
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Didst give this man the child, as he doth say?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   I did.... Would God that I had died this day!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1158-1167]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
  'Fore heaven, thou shalt yet, if thou speak not true.
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
  'Tis more than death and darker, if I do.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   This dog, it seems, will keep us waiting.
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
                                        Nay,
   I said at first I gave it.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                                In what way
   Came it to thee? Was it thine own child, or
   Another's?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
              Nay, it never crossed my door:
   Another's.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
              Whose? What man, what house, of these
   About thee?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
               In the name of God who sees,
   Ask me no more!
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                   If once I ask again,
   Thou diest.
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
               From the folk of Laius, then,
   It came.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1168-1176]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
           A slave, or born of Laius' blood?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   There comes the word I dread to speak, O God!
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   And I to hear: yet heard it needs must be.
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
   Know then, they said 'twas Laius' child. But she
   Within, thy wife, best knows its fathering.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
  'Twas she that gave it?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
                           It was she, O King.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   And bade you ... what?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
                          Destroy it.
 
 OEDIPUS.
                             Her own child?...
   Cruel!
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
           Dark words of God had made her wild.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   What words?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1176-1192]
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
                  The babe must slay his father; so
   'Twas written.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                  Why didst thou, then, let him go
   With this old man?
 
 SHEPHERD.
 
                            O King, I pitied him.
   I thought the man would save him to some dim
   And distant land, beyond all fear.... And he,
   To worse than death, did save him!... Verily,
   If thou art he whom this man telleth of,
   To sore affliction thou art born.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
                                      Enough!
   All, all, shall be fulfilled.... Oh, on these eyes
   Shed light no more, ye everlasting skies
   That know my sin! I have sinned in birth and breath.
   I have sinned with Woman. I have sinned with Death.
 
     [_He rushes into the Palace. The_ SHEPHERD
         _is led away by the thralls._
 
 CHORUS.
 
     [_Strophe._
 
          Nothingness, nothingness,
          Ye Children of Man, and less
            I count you, waking or dreaming!
          And none among mortals, none,
          Seeking to live, hath won
          More than to seem, and to cease
              Again from his seeming.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1193-1212]
 
         While ever before mine eyes
         One fate, one ensample, lies--
         Thine, thine, O Oedipus, sore
             Of God oppressed--
         What thing that is human more
             Dare I call blessed?
 
     [_Antistrophe._
 
         Straight his archery flew
         To the heart of living; he knew
             Joy and the fulness of power,
         O Zeus, when the riddling breath
         Was stayed and the Maid of Death
         Slain, and we saw him through
             The death-cloud, a tower!
 
         For that he was called my king;
         Yea, every precious thing
         Wherewith men are honoured, down
             We cast before him,
         And great Thebes brought her crown
             And kneeled to adore him.
 
     [_Strophe._
 
   But now, what man's story is such bitterness to speak?
     What life hath Delusion so visited, and Pain,
                 And swiftness of Disaster?
                 O great King, our master,
     How oped the one haven to the slayer and the slain?
   And the furrows of thy father, did they turn not nor shriek,
     Did they bear so long silent thy casting of the grain?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1213-1235]
 
     [_Antistrophe._
 
  'Tis Time, Time, desireless, hath shown thee what thou art;
     The long monstrous mating, it is judged and all its race.
             O child of him that sleepeth,
             Thy land weepeth, weepeth,
     Unfathered.... Would God, I had never seen thy face!
   From thee in great peril fell peace upon my heart,
     In thee mine eye clouded and the dark is come apace.
 
     [_A_ MESSENGER _rushes out from the Palace._
 
 MESSENGER.
 
   O ye above this land in honour old
   Exalted, what a tale shall ye be told,
   What sights shall see, and tears of horror shed,
   If still your hearts be true to them that led
   Your sires! There runs no river, well I ween,
   Not Phasis nor great Ister, shall wash clean
   This house of all within that hideth--nay,
   Nor all that creepeth forth to front the day,
   Of purposed horror. And in misery
   That woundeth most which men have willed to be.
 
 LEADER.
 
   No lack there was in what we knew before
   Of food for heaviness. What bring'st thou more?
 
 MESSENGER.
 
   One thing I bring thee first.... 'Tis quickly said.
   Jocasta, our anointed queen, is dead.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1236-1260]
 
 LEADER.
 
   Unhappy woman! How came death to her?
 
 MESSENGER.
 
   By her own hand.... Oh, of what passed in there
   Ye have been spared the worst. Ye cannot see.
   Howbeit, with that which still is left in me
   Of mind and memory, ye shall hear her fate.
     Like one entranced with passion, through the gate
   She passed, the white hands flashing o'er her head,
   Like blades that tear, and fled, unswerving fled,
   Toward her old bridal room, and disappeared
   And the doors crashed behind her. But we heard
   Her voice within, crying to him of old,
   Her Laius, long dead; and things untold
   Of the old kiss unforgotten, that should bring
   The lover's death and leave the loved a thing
   Of horror, yea, a field beneath the plough
   For sire and son: then wailing bitter-low
   Across that bed of births unreconciled,
   Husband from husband born and child from child.
   And, after that, I know not how her death
   Found her. For sudden, with a roar of wrath,
   Burst Oedipus upon us. Then, I ween,
   We marked no more what passion held the Queen,
   But him, as in the fury of his stride,
   "A sword! A sword! And show me here," he cried,
   "That wife, no wife, that field of bloodstained earth
   Where husband, father, sin on sin, had birth,
   Polluted generations!" While he thus
   Raged on, some god--for sure 'twas none of us--
   Showed where she was; and with a shout away,
   As though some hand had pointed to the prey,
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1261-1286]
 
   He dashed him on the chamber door. The straight
   Door-bar of oak, it bent beneath his weight,
   Shook from its sockets free, and in he burst
   To the dark chamber.
                        There we saw her first
   Hanged, swinging from a noose, like a dead bird.
   He fell back when he saw her. Then we heard
   A miserable groan, and straight he found
   And loosed the strangling knot, and on the ground
   Laid her.--Ah, then the sight of horror came!
   The pin of gold, broad-beaten like a flame,
   He tore from off her breast, and, left and right,
   Down on the shuddering orbits of his sight
   Dashed it: "Out! Out! Ye never more shall see
   Me nor the anguish nor the sins of me.
   Ye looked on lives whose like earth never bore,
   Ye knew not those my spirit thirsted for:
   Therefore be dark for ever!"
                                Like a song
   His voice rose, and again, again, the strong
   And stabbing hand fell, and the massacred
   And bleeding eyeballs streamed upon his beard,
   Wild rain, and gouts of hail amid the rain.
     Behold affliction, yea, afflictions twain
   From man and woman broken, now made one
   In downfall. All the riches yester sun
   Saw in this house were rich in verity.
   What call ye now our riches? Agony,
   Delusion, Death, Shame, all that eye or ear
   Hath ever dreamed of misery, is here.
 
 LEADER.
 
   And now how fares he? Doth the storm abate?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1287-1308]
 
 MESSENGER.
 
   He shouts for one to open wide the gate
   And lead him forth, and to all Thebes display
   His father's murderer, his mother's.... Nay,
   Such words I will not speak. And his intent
   Is set, to cast himself in banishment
   Out to the wild, not walk 'mid human breed
   Bearing the curse he bears. Yet sore his need
   Of strength and of some guiding hand. For sure
   He hath more burden now than man may endure.
     But see, the gates fall back, and that appears
   Which he who loathes shall pity--yea, with tears.
 
     [OEDIPUS _is led in, blinded and bleeding. The
        Old Men bow down and hide their faces;
        some of them weep._
 
 CHORUS.
 
   Oh, terrible! Oh, sight of all
       This life hath crossed, most terrible!
       Thou man more wronged than tongue can tell,
   What madness took thee? Do there crawl
       Live Things of Evil from the deep
       To leap on man? Oh, what a leap
   Was His that flung thee to thy fall!
 
 LEADER.
 
   O fallen, fallen in ghastly case,
       I dare not raise mine eyes to thee;
       Fain would I look and ask and see,
   But shudder sickened from thy face.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
           Oh, pain; pain and woe!
               Whither? Whither?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1308-1328]
 
           They lead me and I go;
             And my voice drifts on the air
                   Far away.
             Where, Thing of Evil, where
               Endeth thy leaping hither?
 
 LEADER.
 
   In fearful ends, which none may hear nor say.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
     [_Strophe._
 
       Cloud of the dark, mine own
           For ever, horrible,
           Stealing, stealing, silent, unconquerable,
           Cloud that no wind, no summer can dispel!
       Again, again I groan,
   As through my heart together crawl the strong
   Stabs of this pain and memories of old wrong.
 
 LEADER.
 
   Yea, twofold hosts of torment hast thou there,
   The stain to think on and the pain to bear.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
     [_Antistrophe._
 
       O Friend, thou mine own
            Still faithful, minister
            Steadfast abiding alone of them that were,
            Dost bear with me and give the blind man care?
       Ah me! Not all unknown
   Nor hid thou art. Deep in this dark a call
   Comes and I know thy voice in spite of all.
 
 LEADER.
 
   O fearful sufferer, and could'st thou kill
   Thy living orbs? What God made blind thy will?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1329-1351]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
     [_Strophe._
 
  'Tis Apollo; all is Apollo,
     O ye that love me, 'tis he long time hath planned
       These things upon me evilly, evilly,
         Dark things and full of blood.
   I knew not; I did but follow
     His way; but mine the hand
       And mine the anguish. What were mine eyes to me
         When naught to be seen was good?
 
 LEADER.
 
  'Tis even so; and Truth doth speak in thee.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   To see, to endure, to hear words kindly spoken,
     Should I have joy in such?
       Out, if ye love your breath,
   Cast me swift unto solitude, unbroken
     By word or touch.
       Am I not charged with death,
         Most charged and filled to the brim
       With curses? And what man saith
         God hath so hated him?
 
 LEADER.
 
   Thy bitter will, thy hard calamity,
   Would I had never known nor looked on thee!
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
     [_Antistrophe._
 
   My curse, my curse upon him,
     That man whom pity held in the wilderness,
       Who saved the feet alive from the blood-fetter
         And loosed the barb thereof!
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1351-1377]
 
   That babe--what grace was done him,
     Had he died shelterless,
       He had not laid on himself this grief to bear,
         And all who gave him love.
 
 LEADER.
 
   I, too, O Friend, I had been happier.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Found not the way to his father's blood, nor shaken
         The world's scorn on his mother,
           The child and the groom withal;
   But now, of murderers born, of God forsaken,
         Mine own sons' brother;
           All this, and if aught can fall
             Upon man more perilous
           And elder in sin, lo, all
             Is the portion of Oedipus.
 
 LEADER.
 
   How shall I hold this counsel of thy mind
   True? Thou wert better dead than living blind.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   That this deed is not well and wisely wrought
   Thou shalt not show me; therefore school me not.
   Think, with what eyes hereafter in the place
   Of shadows could I see my father's face,
   Or my poor mother's? Both of whom this hand
   Hath wronged too deep for man to understand.
   Or children--born as mine were born, to see
   Their shapes should bring me joy? Great God!
       To me
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1378-1403]
 
   There is no joy in city nor in tower
   Nor temple, from all whom, in this mine hour,
   I that was chief in Thebes alone, and ate
   The King's bread, I have made me separate
   For ever. Mine own lips have bid the land
   Cast from it one so evil, one whose hand
   To sin was dedicate, whom God hath shown
   Birth-branded ... and my blood the dead King's own!
   All this myself have proved. And can I then
   Look with straight eyes into the eyes of men?
   I trow not. Nay, if any stop there were
   To dam this fount that welleth in mine ear
   For hearing, I had never blenched nor stayed
   Till this vile shell were all one dungeon made,
   Dark, without sound. 'Tis thus the mind would fain
   Find peace, self-prisoned from a world of pain.
     O wild Kithairon, why was it thy will
   To save me? Why not take me quick and kill,
   Kill, before ever I could make men know
   The thing I am, the thing from which I grow?
   Thou dead King, Polybus, thou city wall
   Of Corinth, thou old castle I did call
   My father's, what a life did ye begin,
   What splendour rotted by the worm within,
   When ye bred me! O Crossing of the Roads,
   O secret glen and dusk of crowding woods,
   O narrow footpath creeping to the brink
   Where meet the Three! I gave you blood to drink.
   Do ye remember? 'Twas my life-blood, hot
   From mine own father's heart. Have ye forgot
   What deed I did among you, and what new
   And direr deed I fled from you to do?
   O flesh, horror of flesh!...
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1409-1431]
 
                               But what is shame
   To do should not be spoken. In God's name,
   Take me somewhere far off and cover me
   From sight, or slay, or cast me to the sea
   Where never eye may see me any more.
     What? Do ye fear to touch a man so sore
   Stricken? Nay, tremble not. My misery
   Is mine, and shall be borne by none but me.
 
 LEADER.
 
   Lo, yonder comes for answer to thy prayer
   Creon, to do and to decree. The care
   Of all our land is his, now thou art weak.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Alas, what word to Creon can I speak,
   How make him trust me more? He hath seen of late
   So vile a heart in me, so full of hate.
 
 _Enter_ CREON.
 
 CREON.
 
   Not to make laughter, Oedipus, nor cast
   Against thee any evil of the past
   I seek thee, but ... Ah God! ye ministers,
   Have ye no hearts? Or if for man there stirs
   No pity in you, fear at least to call
   Stain on our Lord the Sun, who feedeth all;
   Nor show in nakedness a horror such
   As this, which never mother Earth may touch,
   Nor God's clean rain nor sunlight. Quick within!
   Guide him.--The ills that in a house have been
   They of the house alone should know or hear.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1432-1447]
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   In God's name, since thou hast undone the fear
   Within me, coming thus, all nobleness,
   To one so vile, grant me one only grace.
   For thy sake more I crave it than mine own.
 
 CREON.
 
   Let me first hear what grace thou wouldst be shown.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Cast me from Thebes ... now, quick ... where none may see
   My visage more, nor mingle words with me.
 
 CREON.
 
   That had I done, for sure, save that I still
   Tremble, and fain would ask Apollo's will.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   His will was clear enough, to stamp the unclean
   Thing out, the bloody hand, the heart of sin.
 
 CREON.
 
  'Twas thus he seemed to speak; but in this sore
   Strait we must needs learn surer than before.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou needs must trouble God for one so low?
 
 CREON.
 
   Surely; thyself will trust his answer now.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   I charge thee more ... and, if thou fail, my sin
   Shall cleave to thee.... For her who lies within,
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1448-1472]
 
   Make as thou wilt her burial. 'Tis thy task
   To tend thine own. But me: let no man ask
   This ancient city of my sires to give
   Harbour in life to me. Set me to live
   On the wild hills and leave my name to those
   Deeps of Kithairon which my father chose,
   And mother, for my vast and living tomb.
   As they, my murderers, willed it, let my doom
   Find me. For this my very heart doth know,
   No sickness now, nor any mortal blow,
   Shall slay this body. Never had my breath
   Been thus kept burning in the midst of death,
   Save for some frightful end. So, let my way
   Go where it listeth.
                        But my children--Nay,
   Creon, my sons will ask thee for no care.
   Men are they, and can find them everywhere
   What life needs. But my two poor desolate
   Maidens.... There was no table ever set
   Apart for them, but whatso royal fare
   I tasted, they were with me and had share
   In all.... Creon, I pray, forget them not.
   And if it may be, go, bid them be brought,
 
     [CREON _goes and presently returns with the
        two princesses._ OEDIPUS _thinks he is
        there all the time._
 
   That I may touch their faces, and so weep....
   Go, Prince. Go, noble heart!...
   If I might touch them, I should seem to keep
   And not to have lost them, now mine eyes are gone....
   What say I?
   In God's name, can it be I hear mine own
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1473-1505]
 
   Beloved ones sobbing? Creon of his grace
   Hath brought my two, my dearest, to this place.
   Is it true?
 
 CREON.
 
  'Tis true. I brought them, for in them I know
   Thy joy is, the same now as long ago.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   God bless thee, and in this hard journey give
   Some better guide than mine to help thee live.
     Children! Where are ye? Hither; come to these
   Arms of your ... brother, whose wild offices
   Have brought much darkness on the once bright eyes
   Of him who grew your garden; who, nowise
   Seeing nor understanding, digged a ground
   The world shall shudder at. Children, my wound
   Is yours too, and I cannot meet your gaze
   Now, as I think me what remaining days
   Of bitter living the world hath for you.
   What dance of damsels shall ye gather to,
   What feast of Thebes, but quick ye shall turn home,
   All tears, or ere the feast or dancers come?
   And, children, when ye reach the years of love,
   Who shall dare wed you, whose heart rise above
   The peril, to take on him all the shame
   That cleaves to my name and my children's name?
   God knows, it is enough!...
   My flowers, ye needs must die, waste things, bereft
   And fruitless.
                  Creon, thou alone art left
   Their father now, since both of us are gone
   Who cared for them. Oh, leave them not alone
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1505-1518]
 
   To wander masterless, these thine own kin,
   And beggared. Neither think of them such sin
   As ye all know in me, but let their fate
   Touch thee. So young they are, so desolate--
   Of all save thee. True man, give me thine hand,
   And promise.
 
     [OEDIPUS _and_ CREON _clasp hands._
 
                 If your age could understand,
   Children, full many counsels I could give.
   But now I leave this one word: Pray to live
   As life may suffer you, and find a road
   To travel easier than your father trod.
 
 CREON.
 
   Enough thy heart hath poured its tears; now back into
   thine house repair.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
 I dread the house, yet go I must.
 
 CREON.
 
               Fair season maketh all things fair.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   One oath then give me, and I go.
 
 CREON.
 
               Name it, and I will answer thee.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   To cast me from this land.
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1519-1523]
 
 CREON.
 
              A gift not mine but God's thou askest me.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   I am a thing of God abhorred.
 
 CREON.
 
             The more, then, will he grant thy prayer.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Thou givest thine oath?
 
 CREON.
 
     I see no light; and, seeing not, I may not swear.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Then take me hence. I care not.
 
 CREON.
 
           Go in peace, and give these children o'er.
 
 OEDIPUS.
 
   Ah no! Take not away my daughters!
 
     [_They are taken from him._
 
 CREON.
 
                      Seek not to be master more. Did not thy
     masteries of old forsake thee when the end was near?
 
 [Sidenote: vv. 1524-1530]
 
 CHORUS.
 
   Ye citizens of Thebes, behold; 'tis Oedipus that passeth here,
   Who read the riddle-word of Death, and mightiest stood of mortal
     men,
   And Fortune loved him, and the folk that saw him turned and looked
     again.
   Lo, he is fallen, and around great storms and the outreaching sea!
   Therefore, O Man, beware, and look toward the end of things that be,
   The last of sights, the last of days; and no man's life account as gain
   Ere the full tale be finished and the darkness find him without pain.
 
     [OEDIPUS _is led into the house and the doors
        close on him._
 
 
 
 
                               NOTES TO
 
                        OEDIPUS, KING OF THEBES
 
 
 P. 4, l. 21: Dry Ash of Ismenus.]--Divination by burnt offerings was
 practised at an altar of Apollo by the river Ismenus in Thebes.
 
 Observe how many traits Oedipus retains of the primitive king, who was
 at once chief and medicine-man and god. The Priest thinks it necessary
 to state explicitly that he does not regard Oedipus as a god, but he is
 clearly not quite like other men. And it seems as if Oedipus himself
 realised in this scene that the oracle from Delphi might well demand the
 king's life. Cf. p. 6, "what deed of mine, what bitter task, May save my
 city"; p. 7, "any fear for mine own death." This thought, present
 probably in more minds than his, greatly increases the tension of the
 scene. Cf. _Anthropology and the Classics_, pp. 74-79.]
 
 P. 7, l. 87, Message of joy.]--Creon says this for the sake of the omen.
 The first words uttered at such a crisis would be ominous and tend to
 fulfil themselves.]
 
 Pp. 13-16, ll. 216-275. The long cursing speech of Oedipus.]--Observe
 that this speech is broken into several divisions, Oedipus at each point
 expecting an answer and receiving none. Thus it is not mere declamation;
 it involves action and reaction between a speaker and a crowd.--Every
 reader will notice how full it is of "tragic irony." Almost every
 paragraph carries with it some sinister meaning of which the speaker is
 unconscious. Cf. such phrases as "if he tread my hearth," "had but his
 issue been more fortunate," "as I would for mine own father," and of
 course the whole situation.
 
 P. 25, l. 437, Who were they?]--This momentary doubt of Oedipus, who of
 course regarded himself as the son of Polybus, King of Corinth, is
 explained later (p. 46, l. 780).
 
 Pp. 29 ff. The Creon scene.]--The only part of the play which could
 possibly be said to flag. Creon's defence, p. 34, "from probabilities,"
 as the rhetoricians would have called it, seems less interesting to us
 than it probably did to the poet's contemporaries. It is remarkably like
 Hippolytus's defence (pp. 52 f. of my translation), and probably one was
 suggested by the other. We cannot be sure which was the earlier play.
 
 The scene serves at least to quicken the pace of the drama, to bring out
 the impetuous and somewhat tyrannical nature of Oedipus, and to prepare
 the magnificent entrance of Jocasta.
 
 P. 36, l. 630, Thebes is my country.]--It must be remembered that to the
 Chorus Creon is a real Theban, Oedipus a stranger from Corinth.
 
 P. 41, Conversation of Oedipus and Jocasta.]--The technique of this
 wonderful scene, an intimate self-revealing conversation between husband
 and wife about the past, forming the pivot of the play, will remind a
 modern reader of Ibsen.
 
 P. 42, l. 718.]--Observe that Jocasta does not tell the whole truth. It
 was she herself who gave the child to be killed (p. 70, l. 1173).
 
 P. 42, l. 730, Crossing of Three Ways.]--Cross roads always had dark
 associations. This particular spot was well known to tradition and is
 still pointed out. "A bare isolated hillock of grey stone stands at the
 point where our road from Daulia meets the road to Delphi and a third
 road that stretches to the south.... The road runs up a frowning pass
 between Parnassus on the right hand and the spurs of the Helicon range
 on the left. Away to the south a wild and desolate valley opens, running
 up among the waste places of Helicon, a scene of inexpressible grandeur
 and desolation" (Jebb, abridged).
 
 P. 44, l. 754, Who could bring, &c.]--Oedipus of course thought he had
 killed them all. See his next speech.
 
 P. 51.]--Observe the tragic effect of this prayer. Apollo means to
 destroy Jocasta, not to save her; her prayer is broken across by the
 entry of the Corinthian Stranger, which seems like a deliverance but is
 really a link in the chain of destruction. There is a very similar
 effect in Sophocles' _Electra_, 636-659, Clytaemnestra's prayer; compare
 also the prayers to Cypris in Euripides' _Hippolytus_.
 
 P. 51, l. 899.]--Abae was an ancient oracular shrine in Boeotia; Olympia
 in Elis was the seat of the Olympian Games and of a great Temple of
 Zeus.
 
 P. 52, l. 918, O Slayer of the Wolf, O Lord of Light.]--The names
 Lykeios, Lykios, &c., seem to have two roots, one meaning "Wolf" and the
 other "Light."
 
 P. 56, l. 987, Thy father's tomb Like light across our darkness.]--This
 ghastly line does not show hardness of heart, it shows only the terrible
 position in which Oedipus and Jocasta are. Naturally Oedipus would give
 thanks if his father was dead. Compare his question above, p. 54, l.
 960, "Not murdered?"--He cannot get the thought of the fated murder out
 of his mind.
 
 P. 57, l. 994.]--Why does Oedipus tell the Corinthian this oracle, which
 he has kept a secret even from his wife till to-day?--Perhaps because,
 if there is any thought of his going back to Corinth, his long voluntary
 exile must be explained. Perhaps, too, the secret possesses his mind so
 overpoweringly that it can hardly help coming out.
 
 Pp. 57, 58, ll. 1000-1020.]--It is natural that the Corinthian hesitates
 before telling a king that he is really not of royal birth.
 
 Pp. 64, 65, ll. 1086-1109.]--This joyous Chorus strikes a curious note.
 Of course it forms a good contrast with what succeeds, but how can the
 Elders take such a serenely happy view of the discovery that Oedipus is
 a foundling just after they have been alarmed at the exit of Jocasta? It
 seems as if the last triumphant speech of Oedipus, "fey" and almost
 touched with megalomania as it was, had carried the feeling of the
 Chorus with it.
 
 P. 66, l. 1122.]--Is there any part in any tragedy so short and yet so
 effective as that of this Shepherd?
 
 P. 75, l. 1264, Like a dead bird.]--The curious word, [Greek:
 empeplegmenen], seems to be taken from Odyssey xxii. 469, where it is
 applied to birds caught in a snare. As to the motives of Oedipus, his
 first blind instinct to kill Jocasta as a thing that polluted the earth;
 when he saw her already dead, a revulsion came.
 
 P. 76, ll. 1305 ff.]--Observe how a climax of physical horror is
 immediately veiled and made beautiful by lyrical poetry. Sophocles does
 not, however, carry this plan of simply flooding the scene with sudden
 beauty nearly so far as Euripides does. See _Hipp._, p. 39; _Trojan
 Women_, p. 51.
 
 P. 83, ll. 1450 ff., Set me to live on the wild hills.]--These lines
 serve to explain the conception, existing in the poet's own time, of
 Oedipus as a daemon or ghost haunting Mount Kithairon.
 
 P. 86, l. 1520, Creon.]--Amid all Creon's whole-hearted forgiveness of
 Oedipus and his ready kindness there are one or two lines of his which
 strike a modern reader as tactless if not harsh. Yet I do not think that
 Sophocles meant to produce that effect. At the present day it is not in
 the best manners to moralise over a man who is down, any more than it is
 the part of a comforter to expound and insist upon his friend's
 misfortunes. But it looks as if ancient manners expected, and even
 demanded, both. Cf. the attitude of Theseus to Adrastus in Eur.,
 _Suppliants_.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Ted Garvin, Fred Robinson and the PG Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team
 
 
 
 
 
 
                               SOPHOCLES
 
                                  THE
                      SEVEN PLAYS IN ENGLISH VERSE
 
                                   BY
                          LEWIS CAMPBELL, M.A.
 
                        HON. LL.D., HON. D.LITT.
      EMERITUS PROFESSOR OF GREEK IN THE UNIVERSITY OF ST. ANDREWS
                 HON. FELLOW OF BALLIOL COLLEGE, OXFORD
 
                  [Illustration: THE WORLD'S CLASSICS]
 
                          NEW EDITION, REVISED
 
                              HENRY FROWDE
                        OXFORD UNIVERSITY PRESS
                      LONDON, NEW YORK AND TORONTO
 
 
 
 
                               SOPHOCLES
 
               Born at Colonos         probably 495 B.C.
               Died                    406 B.C.
 
 _The present translation was first published in 'The World's Classics'
                               in 1906._
 
 
 
 
                 Sie hoeren nicht die folgenden Gesaenge,
                 Die Seelen, denen ich die ersten sang.
 
 
 
 
                                CONTENTS
 
                 PREFACE
                 PREFATORY NOTE TO THE EDITION OF 1883
 
                 ANTIGONE
                 AIAS
                 KING OEDIPUS
                 ELECTRA
                 THE TRACHINIAN MAIDENS
                 PHILOCTETES
                 OEDIPUS AT COLONOS
                 NOTES
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                                PREFACE
 
 
 In 1869, having read the Antigone with a pupil who at the time had a
 passion for the stage, I was led to attempt a metrical version of the
 _Antigone_, and, by and by, of the Electra and Trachiniae.[1] I had
 the satisfaction of seeing this last very beautifully produced by an
 amateur company in Scotland in 1877; when Mrs. Fleeming Jenkin may be
 said to have 'created' the part of Deanira. Thus encouraged, I
 completed the translation of the seven plays, which was published by
 Kegan Paul in 1883 and again by Murray in 1896. I have now to thank
 Mr. Murray for consenting to this cheaper issue.
 
 The seven extant plays of Sophocles have been variously arranged. In
 the order most frequently adopted by English editors, the three plays
 of the Theban cycle, Oedipus Tyrannus, Oedipus Coloneus, and Antigone,
 have been placed foremost.
 
 In one respect this is obviously convenient, as appearing to present
 continuously a connected story. But on a closer view, it is in two
 ways illusory.
 
 1. The Antigone is generally admitted to be, comparatively speaking,
 an early play, while the Oedipus Coloneus belongs to the dramatist's
 latest manner; the first Oedipus coming in somewhere between the two.
 The effect is therefore analogous to that produced on readers of
 Shakespeare by the habit of placing Henry VI after Henry IV and V. But
 tragedies and 'histories' or chronicle plays are not _in pari
 materia_.
 
 2. The error has been aggravated by a loose way of speaking of 'the
 Theban Trilogy', a term which could only be properly applicable if the
 three dramas had been produced in the same year. I have therefore now
 arranged the seven plays in an order corresponding to the most
 probable dates of their production, viz. Antigone, Aias, King Oedipus,
 Electra, Trachiniae, Philoctetes, and Oedipus at Colonos. A credible
 tradition refers the Antigone to 445 B.C. The Aias appears to be not
 much later--it may even be earlier--than the Antigone. The Philoctetes
 was produced in 408 B.C., when the poet was considerably over eighty.
 The Oedipus at Colonos has always been believed to be a composition of
 Sophocles' old age. It is said to have been produced after his death,
 though it may have been composed some years earlier. The tragedy of
 King Oedipus, in which the poet's art attained its maturity, is
 plausibly assigned to an early year of the Peloponnesian war (say 427
 B.C.), the Trachiniae to about 420 B.C. The time of the Electra is
 doubtful; but Professor Jebb has shown that, on metrical grounds, it
 should be placed after, rather than before, King Oedipus. Even the
 English reader, taking the plays as they are grouped in this volume,
 may be aware of a gradual change of manner, not unlike what is
 perceptible in passing from Richard II to Macbeth, and from Macbeth to
 The Winter's Tale or Cymbeline. For although the supposed date of the
 Antigone was long subsequent to the poet's first tragic victory, the
 forty years over which the seven plays are spread saw many changes of
 taste in art and literature.
 
 Footnote:
   1 _Three Plays of Sophocles:_ Blackwood, 1873.
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                         PREFATORY NOTE TO THE
                            EDITION OF 1883
 
 
 I. The Hellenic spirit has been repeatedly characterized as simple
 Nature-worship. Even the Higher Paganism has been described as 'in
 other words the purified worship of natural forms.'[1] One might
 suppose, in reading some modern writers, that the Nymphs and Fauns,
 the River-Gods and Pan, were at least as prominent in all Greek poetry
 as Zeus, Apollo, and Athena, or that Apollo was only the sweet singer
 and not also the prophet of retribution.
 
 The fresh and unimpaired enjoyment of the Beautiful is certainly the
 aspect of ancient life and literature which most attracted the
 humanists of the sixteenth century, and still most impresses those
 amongst ourselves who for various reasons desire to point the contrast
 between Paganism and Judaism. The two great groups of forces vaguely
 known as the Renaissance and the Revolution have both contributed to
 this result. Men who were weary of conventionality and of the weight
 of custom 'heavy as frost and deep almost as life,' have longed for
 the vision of 'Oread or Dryad glancing through the shade,' or to 'hear
 old Triton blow his wreathed horn.' Meanwhile, that in which the
 Greeks most resembled us, 'the human heart by which we live,' for the
 very reason that it lies so near to us, is too apt to be lost from our
 conception of them. Another cause of this one-sided view is the
 illusion produced by the contemplation of statuary, together with the
 unapproachable perfection of form which every relic of Greek antiquity
 indisputably possesses.
 
 But on turning from the forms of Greek art to the substance of Greek
 literature, we find that Beauty, although everywhere an important
 element, is by no means the sole or even the chief attribute of the
 greatest writings, nor is the Hellenic consciousness confined within
 the life of Nature, unless this term is allowed to comprehend man with
 all his thoughts and aspirations. It was in this latter sense that
 Hegel recognized the union of depth with brightness in Greek culture:
 'If the first paradise was the paradise of nature, this is the second,
 the higher paradise of the human spirit, which in its fair
 naturalness, freedom, depth and brightness here comes forth like a
 bride out of her chamber. The first wild majesty of the rise of
 spiritual life in the East is here circumscribed by the dignity of
 form, and softened into beauty. Its depth shows itself no longer in
 confusion, obscurity, and inflation, but lies open before us in simple
 clearness. Its brightness (Heiterkeit) is not a childish play, but
 covers a sadness which knows the baldness of fate but is not by that
 knowledge driven out of freedom and measure.' Hegel's Werke, vol. XVI.
 p. 139 (translated by Prof. Caird). The simplicity of Herodotus, for
 example, does not exclude far reaching thoughts on the political
 advantages of liberty, nor such reflections on experience as are
 implied in the saying of Artabanus, that the transitoriness of human
 life is the least of its evils. And in what modern writing is more of
 the wisdom of life condensed than in the History of Thucydides? It is
 surely more true to say of Greek literature that it contains types of
 all things human, stamped with the freshness, simplicity, and
 directness which belong to first impressions, and to the first
 impressions of genius.
 
 Now the 'thoughts and aspirations,' which are nowhere absent from
 Greek literature, and make a centre of growing warmth and light in its
 Periclean period--when the conception of human nature for the first
 time takes definite shape--have no less of Religion in them than
 underlay the 'creed outworn'. To think otherwise would be an error of
 the same kind as that 'abuse of the word Atheism' against which the
 author of the work above alluded to protests so forcibly.
 
 Religion, in the sense here indicated, is the mainspring and vital
 principle of Tragedy. The efforts of Aeschylus and Sophocles were
 sustained by it, and its inevitable decay through the scepticism which
 preceded Socrates was the chief hindrance to the tragic genius of
 Euripides. Yet the inequality of which we have consequently to
 complain in him is redeemed by pregnant hints of something yet 'more
 deeply interfused,' which in him, as in his two great predecessors, is
 sometimes felt as 'modern,' because it is not of an age but for all
 time. The most valuable part of every literature is something which
 transcends the period and nation out of which it springs.
 
 On the other hand, much that at first sight seems primitive in Greek
 tragedy belongs more to the subject than to the mode of handling. The
 age of Pericles was in advance of that in which the legends were first
 Hellenized and humanized, just as this must have been already far
 removed from the earliest stages of mythopoeic imagination. The reader
 of Aeschylus or Sophocles should therefore be warned against
 attributing to the poet's invention that which is given in the fable.
 
 An educated student of Italian painting knows how to discriminate--say
 in an Assumption by Botticelli--between the traditional conventions,
 the contemporary ideas, and the refinements of the artist's own fancy.
 The same indulgence must be extended to dramatic art. The tragedy of
 King Lear is not rude or primitive, although the subject belongs to
 prehistoric times in Britain. Nor is Goethe's Faust mediaeval in
 spirit as in theme. So neither is the Oedipus Rex the product of
 'lawless and uncertain thoughts,' notwithstanding the unspeakable
 horror of the story, but is penetrated by the most profound estimate
 of all in human life that is saddest, and all that is most precious.
 
 Far from being naive naturalists after the Keats fashion, the Greek
 tragic poets had succeeded to a pessimistic reaction from simple Pagan
 enjoyment; they were surrounded with gloomy questionings about human
 destiny and Divine Justice, and they replied by looking steadily at
 the facts of life and asserting the supreme worth of innocence,
 equity, and mercy.
 
 They were not philosophers, for they spoke the language of feeling;
 but the civilization of which they were the strongest outcome was
 already tinged with influences derived from early philosophy--
 especially from the gnomic wisdom of the sixth century and from the
 spirit of theosophic speculation, which in Aeschylus goes far even to
 recast mythology. The latter influence was probably reinforced,
 through channels no longer traceable, by the Eleusinian worship, in
 which the mystery of life and death and of human sorrow had replaced
 the primitive wonder at the phenomena of the year.
 
 And whatever elements of philosophic theory or mystic exaltation the
 drama may have reflected, it was still more emphatically the
 repository of some of the most precious traditions of civilized
 humanity--traditions which philosophy has sometimes tended to
 extenuate, if not to destroy.
 
 Plato's Gorgias contains one of the most eloquent vindications of the
 transcendent value of righteousness and faithfulness as such. But when
 we ask, 'Righteousness in what relation?'--'Faithfulness to whom?'--
 the Gorgias is silent; and when the vacant outline is filled up in the
 Republic, we are presented with an ideal of man's social relations,
 which, although it may be regarded as the ultimate development of
 existing tendencies, yet has no immediate bearing on any actual
 condition of the world.
 
 The ideal of the tragic poet may be less perfect; or rather he does
 not attempt to set before us abstractedly any single ideal. But the
 grand types of character which he presents to the world are not merely
 imaginary. They are creatures of flesh and blood, men and women, to
 whom the unsullied purity of their homes, the freedom and power of
 their country, the respect and love of their fellow-citizens, are
 inestimably dear. From a Platonic, and still more from a Christian
 point of view, the best morality of the age of Pericles is no doubt
 defective. Such counsels of perfection as 'Love your enemies', or 'A
 good man can harm no one, not even an enemy',--are beyond the horizon
 of tragedy, unless dimly seen in the person of Antigone. The
 coexistence of savage vindictiveness with the most affectionate
 tenderness is characteristic of heroes and heroines alike, and
 produces some of the most moving contrasts. But the tenderness is no
 less deep and real for this, and while the chief persons are thus
 passionate, the Greek lesson of moderation and reasonableness is
 taught by the event, whether expressed or not by the mouth of sage or
 prophet or of the 'ideal bystander'.
 
 Greek tragedy, then, is a religious art, not merely because associated
 with the festival of Dionysus, nor because the life which it
 represented was that of men who believed, with all the Hellenes, in
 Zeus, Apollo, and Athena, or in the power of Moira and the Erinyes,--
 not merely because it represented
 
            'the dread strife
      Of poor humanity's afflicted will
      Struggling in vain with ruthless destiny,'
 
 but much more because it awakened in the Athenian spectator emotions
 of wonder concerning human life, and of admiration for nobleness in
 the unfortunate--a sense of the infinite value of personal uprightness
 and of domestic purity--which in the most universal sense of the word
 were truly religious,--because it expressed a consciousness of depths
 which Plato never fathomed, and an ideal of character which, if less
 complete than Shakespeare's, is not less noble. It is indeed a 'rough'
 generalization that ranks the Agamemnon with the Adoniazusae as a
 religious composition.
 
 II. This spiritual side of tragic poetry deserves to be emphasized
 both as the most essential aspect of it, and as giving it the most
 permanent claim to lasting recognition. And yet, apart from this,
 merely as dramas, the works of Aeschylus, Sophocles, and Euripides
 will never cease to be admired. These poets are teachers, but they
 teach through art. To ask simply, as Carlyle once did, 'What did they
 think?' is not the way to understand or learn from them.
 
 Considered simply as works of art, the plays of Sophocles stand alone
 amongst dramatic writings in their degree of concentration and complex
 unity.
 
 1. The interest of a Sophoclean drama is always intensely personal,
 and is almost always centred in an individual destiny. In other words,
 it is not historical or mythical, but ethical. Single persons stand
 out magnificently in Aeschylus. But the action is always larger than
 any single life. Each tragedy or trilogy resembles the fragment of a
 sublime Epic poem. Mighty issues revolve about the scene, whether this
 is laid on Earth or amongst the Gods, issues far transcending the fate
 of Orestes or even of Prometheus. In the perspective painting of
 Sophocles, these vast surroundings fall into the background, and the
 feelings of the spectator are absorbed in sympathy with the chief
 figure on the stage, round whom the other characters--the members of
 the chorus being included--are grouped with the minutest care.
 
 2. In this grouping of the persons, as well as in the conduct of the
 action, Sophocles is masterly in his use of pathetic contrast. This
 motive must of course enter into all tragedy--nothing can be finer
 than the contrast of Cassandra to Clytemnestra in the Agamemnon,--but
 in Sophocles it is all-pervading, and some of the minor effects of it
 are so subtle that although inevitably felt by the spectator they are
 often lost upon the mere reader or student. And every touch, however
 transient, is made to contribute to the main effect.
 
 To recur once more to the much-abused analogy of statuary:--the work
 of Aeschylus may be compared to a colossal frieze, while that of
 Sophocles resembles the pediment of a smaller temple. Or if, as in
 considering the Orestean trilogy, the arrangement of the pediment
 affords the more fitting parallel even for Aeschylus, yet the forms
 are so gigantic that minute touches of characterization and of
 contrast are omitted as superfluous. Whereas in Sophocles, it is at
 once the finish of the chief figure and the studied harmony of the
 whole, which have led his work to be compared with that of his
 contemporary Phidias. Such comparison, however, is useful by way of
 illustration merely. It must never be forgotten that, as Lessing
 pointed out to some who thought the Philoctetes too sensational,
 analogies between the arts are limited by essential differences of
 material and of scope. All poetry represents successive moments. Its
 figures are never in repose. And although the action of Tragedy is
 concentrated and revolves around a single point, yet it is a dull
 vision that confounds rapidity of motion with rest.
 
 3. Sophocles found the subjects of his dramas already embodied not
 only in previous tragedies but in Epic and Lyric poetry. And there
 were some fables, such as that of the death of Oedipus at Colonos,
 which seem to have been known to him only through oral tradition. For
 some reason which is not clearly apparent, both he and Aeschylus drew
 more largely from the Cyclic poets than from 'our Homer'. The inferior
 and more recent Epics, which are now lost, were probably more
 episodical, and thus presented a more inviting repertory of legends
 than the Iliad and Odyssey.
 
 Arctinus of Lesbos had treated at great length the story of the House
 of Thebes. The legend of Orestes, to which there are several
 allusions, not always consistent with each other, in the Homeric
 poems, had been a favourite and fruitful subject of tradition and of
 poetical treatment in the intervening period. Passages of the Tale of
 Troy, in which other heroes than Achilles had the pre-eminence, had
 been elaborated by Lesches and other Epic writers of the Post-Homeric
 time. The voyage of the Argonauts, another favourite heroic theme,
 supplied the subjects of many dramas which have disappeared. Lastly,
 the taking of Oechalia by Heracles, and the events which followed it,
 had been narrated in a long poem, in which one version of that hero's
 multiform legend was fully set forth.
 
 The subjects of the King Oedipus, Oedipus at Colonos, and Antigone,
 are taken from the Tale of Thebes, the Aias and the Philoctetes are
 founded on incidents between the end of the Iliad and the taking of
 Troy, the Electra represents the vengeance of Orestes, the crowning
 event in the tale of 'Pelops' line', the Trachiniae recounts the last
 crisis in the life of Heracles.
 
 4. Of the three Theban plays, the Antigone was first composed,
 although its subject is the latest. Aeschylus in the Seven against
 Thebes had already represented the young heroine as defying the
 victorious citizens who forbade the burial of her brother, the rebel
 Polynices. He allowed her to be supported in her action by a band of
 sympathizing friends. But in the play of Sophocles she stands alone,
 and the power which she defies is not that of the citizens generally,
 but of Creon, whose will is absolute in the State. Thus the struggle
 is intensified, and both her strength and her desolation become more
 impressive, while the opposing claims of civic authority and domestic
 piety are more vividly realized, because either is separately embodied
 in an individual will. By the same means the situation is humanized to
 the last degree, and the heart of the spectator, although strained to
 the uttermost with pity for the heroic maiden whose life when full of
 brightest hopes was sacrificed to affection and piety, has still some
 feeling left for the living desolation of the man, whose patriotic
 zeal, degenerating into tyranny, brought his city to the brink of
 ruin, and cost him the lives of his two sons and of his wife, whose
 dying curse, as well as that of Haemon, is denounced upon him.
 
 In the Oedipus Tyrannus, Sophocles goes back to the central crisis of
 the Theban story. And again he fixes our attention, not so much on the
 fortunes of the city, or of the reigning house, as on the man Oedipus,
 his glory and his fall.--
 
      'O mirror of our fickle state
      Since man on earth unparalleled!
      The rarer thy example stands,
      By how much from the top of wondrous glory,
      Strongest of mortal men,
      To lowest pitch of abject fortune thou art fallen[2].
 
 The horror and the pity of it are both enhanced by the character of
 Oedipus--his essential innocence, his affectionateness, his
 uncalculating benevolence and public spirit;--while his impetuosity
 and passionateness make the sequel less incredible.
 
 The essential innocence of Oedipus, which survives the ruin of his
 hopes in this world, supplies the chief motive of the Oedipus at
 Colonos. This drama, which Sophocles is said to have written late in
 life, is in many ways contrasted with the former Oedipus. It begins
 with pity and horror, and ends with peace. It is only in part founded
 on Epic tradition, the main incident belonging apparently to the local
 mythology of the poet's birthplace. It also implies a later stage of
 ethical reflection, and in this respect resembles the Philoctetes; it
 depends more on lyrical and melodramatic effects, and allows more room
 for collateral and subsidiary motives than any other of the seven. Yet
 in its principal theme, the vindication or redemption of an
 essentially noble spirit from the consequences of error, it repeats a
 note which had been struck much earlier in the Aias with great force,
 although with some crudities of treatment which are absent from the
 later drama.
 
 5. In one of the Epic poems which narrated the fall of Troy, the
 figure of Aias was more prominent than in the Iliad. He alone and
 unassisted was there said to have repulsed Hector from the ships, and
 he had the chief share, although in this he was aided by Odysseus, in
 rescuing the dead body of Achilles. Yet Achilles' arms were awarded by
 the votes of the chieftains, as the prize of valour, not to Aias, but
 to Odysseus. This, no doubt, meant that wisdom is better than
 strength. But the wisdom of Odysseus in these later Epics was often
 less nobly esteemed than in the Iliad and Odyssey, and was represented
 as alloyed with cunning.
 
 Aias has withdrawn with his Salaminians, in a rage, from the fight,
 and after long brooding by the ships his wrath has broken forth into a
 blaze which would have endangered the lives of Odysseus and the
 Atridae, had not Athena in her care for them changed his anger into
 madness. Hence, instead of slaying the generals, he makes havoc
 amongst the flocks and herds, which as the result of various forays
 were the common property of the whole army. The truth is discovered by
 Odysseus with the help of Athena, and from being next to Achilles in
 renown, Aias becomes the object of universal scorn and hatred. The
 sequel of this hour of his downfall is the subject of the Aias of
 Sophocles. After lamenting his fate, the hero eludes the vigilance of
 his captive bride Tecmessa, and of his Salaminian mariners, and, in
 complete solitude, falls upon his sword. He is found by Tecmessa and
 by his half-brother Teucer, who has returned too late from a raid in
 the Mysian highlands. The Atridae would prohibit Aias' funeral; but
 Odysseus, who has been specially enlightened by Athena, advises
 generous forbearance, and his counsel prevails. The part representing
 the disgrace and death of Aias is more affecting to modern readers
 than the remainder of the drama. But we should bear in mind that the
 vindication of Aias after death, and his burial with undiminished
 honours, had an absorbing interest for the Athenian and Salaminian
 spectator.
 
 Philoctetes also is rejected by man and accepted by Destiny. The
 Argives in his case, as the Thebans in the case of Oedipus, are blind
 to the real intentions of the Gods.
 
 The Philoctetes, like the Oedipus at Colonos, was a work of Sophocles'
 old age; and while it can hardly be said that the fire of tragic
 feeling is abated in either of these plays, dramatic effect is
 modified in both of them by the influence of the poet's contemplative
 mood. The interest of the action in the Philoctetes is more inward and
 psychological than in any other ancient drama. The change of mind in
 Neoptolemus, the stubborn fixity of will in Philoctetes, contrasted
 with the confiding tenderness of his nature, form the elements of a
 dramatic movement at once extremely simple and wonderfully sustained.
 No purer ideal of virtuous youth has been imagined than the son of
 Achilles, who in this play, though sorely tempted, sets faithfulness
 before ambition.
 
 6. In the Electra, which, though much earlier than the Philoctetes, is
 still a work of his mature genius, our poet appears at first sight to
 be in unequal competition with Aeschylus. If the Theban trilogy of the
 elder poet had remained entire, a similar impression might have been
 produced by the Oedipus Tyrannus. It is best to lay such comparisons
 aside, and to consider the work of Sophocles simply on its own merits.
 The subject, as he has chosen to treat it, is the heroic endurance of
 a woman who devotes her life to the vindication of intolerable wrongs
 done to her father, and the restoration of her young brother to his
 hereditary rights. Hers is the human agency which for this purpose
 works together with Apollo. But the divine intention is concealed from
 her. She suffers countless indignities from her father's enemies, of
 whom her own mother is the chief. And, at length, all her hopes are
 shattered by the false tidings that Orestes is no more. Even then she
 does not relinquish her resolve. And the revulsion from her deep
 sorrow to extremity of joy, when she finds Orestes at her side and
 ready to perform the act of vengeance in his own person, is
 irresistably affecting, even when the play is only read.
 
 Sophocles is especially great in the delineation of ideal female
 characters. The heroic ardour of Antigone, and the no less heroic
 persistence and endurance of Electra, are both founded on the strength
 of their affection. And the affection in both cases is what some
 moderns too have called the purest of human feelings, the love of a
 sister for a brother. Another aspect of that world-old marvel, 'the
 love of women,' was presented in Aias' captive bride, Tecmessa. This
 softer type also attains to heroic grandeur in Deanira, the wronged
 wife of Heracles, whose fatal error is caused by the innocent working
 of her wounded love.
 
 It is strange that so acute a critic as A.W. Schlegel should have
 doubted the Sophoclean authorship of the Trachiniae. If its religious
 and moral lessons are even less obtrusive than those of either Oedipus
 and of the Antigone, there is no play which more directly pierces to
 the very heart of humanity. And it is a superficial judgement which
 complains that here at all events our sympathies are distracted
 between the two chief persons, Deanira and Heracles. To one passion of
 his, to one fond mistake of hers, the ruin of them both is due. Her
 love has made their fates inseparable. And the spectator, in sharing
 Hyllus' grief, is afflicted for them both at once. We may well
 recognize in this treatment of the death of Heracles the hand of him
 who wrote--
 
 [Greek:
      su kai dikaion adikous
      phrenas paraspas epi loba,
      ..., ...
      amachos gar empaizei theos Aphrodita[3].]
 
 7. It is unnecessary to expatiate here on the merits of construction
 in which these seven plays are generally acknowledged to be
 unrivalled; the natural way in which the main situation is explained,
 the suddenness and inevitableness of the complications, the steadily
 sustained climax of emotion until the action culminates, the
 preservation of the fitting mood until the end, the subtlety and
 effectiveness of the minor contrasts of situation and character[4].
 
 But it may not be irrelevant to observe that the 'acting qualities' of
 Sophocles, as of Shakespeare, are best known to those who have seen
 him acted, whether in Greek, as by the students at Harvard[5] and
 Toronto[6], and more recently at Cambridge[7], or in English long ago
 by Miss Helen Faucit (since Lady Martin[8]), or still earlier and
 repeatedly in Germany, or in the French version of the Antigone by MM.
 Maurice and Vacquerie (1845) or of King Oedipus by M. Lacroix, in
 which the part of OEdipe Roi was finely sustained by M. Geoffroy in
 1861, and by M. Mounet Sully in 1881[9]. With reference to the latter
 performance, which was continued throughout the autumn season, M.
 Francisque Sarcey wrote an article for the _Temps_ newspaper of August
 15, 1881, which is full of just and vivid appreciation. At the risk of
 seeming absurdly 'modern', I will quote from this article some of the
 more striking passages.
 
      'Ce troisieme et ce quatrieme actes, les plus emouvants qui se
      soient jamais produits sur aucune scene, se composent d'une suite
      de narrations, qui viennent l'une apres l'autre frapper au coeur
      d'OEdipe, et qui ont leur contrecoup dans l'ame des spectateurs.
      Je ne sais qu'une piece au monde qui soit construite de la sorte,
      c'est l'_Ecole des Femmes_. Ce rapprochement vous paraitra
      singulier, sans doute.... Mais ... c'est dans le vieux drame grec
      comme dans la comedie du maitre francais une trouvaille de
      genie....
 
      'Sophocle a voulu, apres des emotions si terribles, apres des
      angoisses si seches, ouvrir la source des larmes: il a ecrit un
      cinquieme acte....
 
      'Les yeux creves d'OEdipe ne sont qu'un accident, ou, si vous
      aimez mieux, un accessoire, Le poete, sans s'arreter a ce detail,
      a mis sur les levres de son heros toute la gamme des sentiments
      douloureux qu'excite une si prodigieuse infortune....
 
      'A la lecture, elle est un pen longue cette scene de
      lamentations. Au theatre, on n'a pas le temps de la trouver
      telle: on pleure de toute son ame et de tous ses yeux. C'est
      qu'apres avoir eu le coeur si longtemps serre comme dans un etau,
      on epreuve comme un soulagement a sentir en soi jaillir la source
      des larmes. Sophocle, qui semble avoir ete le plus malin des
      dramaturges, comme il est le plus parfait des ecrivains
      dramatiques, a cherche la un effet de contraste dont l'effet est
      immanquant sur le public.'
 
 These and other like remarks of one of the best-known critics of the
 Parisian stage show that the dramatic art of Sophocles is still a
 living power.
 
 I am well aware how feeble and inadequate the present attempted
 reproduction must appear to any reader who knows the Greek original.
 There is much to be said for the view of an eminent scholar who once
 declared that he would never think of translating a Greek poet. But
 the end of translating is not to satisfy fastidious scholars, but to
 make the classics partially accessible to those whose acquaintance
 with them would otherwise be still more defective. Part of this
 version of Sophocles was printed several years ago in an imperfect
 form. The present volume contains the seven extant plays entire. As
 the object has been to give the effect of each drama as a whole,
 rather than to dwell on particular 'beauties' (which only a poet can
 render), the fragments have not been included. But the reader should
 bear in mind that the seven plays are less than a tithe of the work
 produced by the poet in his lifetime.
 
 It may very possibly be asked why verse has been employed at all. Why
 not have listened to Carlyle's rough demand, 'Tell us what they
 thought; none of your silly poetry'? The present translator can only
 reply that he began with prose, but soon found that, for tragic
 dialogue in English, blank verse appeared a more natural and effective
 vehicle than any prose style which he could hope to frame. And with
 the dialogue in verse, it was impossible to have the lyric parts in
 any sort of prose, simply because the reader would then have felt an
 intolerable incongruity. These parts have therefore been turned into
 such familiar lyric measures as seemed at once possible and not
 unsuitable. And where this method was found impracticable, as
 sometimes in the _Commoi_, blank metres have again been used,--with
 such liberties as seemed appropriate to the special purpose. The
 writer's hope throughout has been, not indeed fully to transfuse the
 poetry of Sophocles into another tongue, but to make the poet's
 dramatic intention to be understood and felt by English readers. One
 more such endeavour may possibly find acceptance at a time when many
 causes have combined to awaken a fresh interest at once in dramatic
 literature and in Hellenic studies.
 
 The reader who is hitherto unacquainted with the Greek drama, should
 be warned that the parts assigned to the 'Chorus' were often
 distributed among its several members, who spoke or chanted, singly or
 in groups, alternately or in succession. In some cases, but not in
 all, _Ch. 1_, _Ch. 2_, &c., have been prefixed, to indicate such an
 arrangement.
 
 Footnotes:
   1 [Sir John Seeley's] _Natural Religion_, p. 79.
 
   2 Milton, _Samson Agonistes_, 164-169.
 
   3        'Thou drawest awry
     Just minds to wrong and ruin ...
                  ... With resistless charm
     Great Aphrodite mocks the might of men.'
                                              _Antigone._
 
   4 Cf. _Sophocles_ in Green's 'Classical Writers.' Macmillan & Co.
 
   5 Oed. Tyr., 1881.
 
   6 Antigone, 1882.
 
   7 Ajax, Nov. 1882.
 
   8 Antigone, 1845.
 
   9 The performance of Greek plays (as of the Agamemnon at Oxford in
     1880) is not altogether a new thing in England. The author of Ion,
     Mr. Serjeant Talfourd, in his Notice prefixed to that drama in
     1836, mentions, amongst other reasons for having intended to
     dedicate it to Dr. Valpy, 'the exquisite representations of Greek
     Tragedy, which he superintended,' and which 'made his images
     vital.' At a still earlier time, 'the great Dr. Parr' had
     encouraged his pupils at Stanmore to recite the dialogue of Greek
     tragedies before an audience and in costume. It would be
     ungrateful to omit all reference here to some performances of the
     Trachiniae in English in Edinburgh and St. Andrews in 1877, which,
     though not of a public nature, are still remembered with delight
     by those who were present at them, and were really the first of a
     series.
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                                ANTIGONE
 
 
                              THE PERSONS
 
 ANTIGONE,} _Daughters of Oedipus and Sisters of Polynices_
 ISMENE,  }                 _and Eteocles._
 CHORUS _of Theban Elders._
 CREON, _King of Thebes._
 _A Watchman._
 HAEMON, _Son of Creon, betrothed to Antigone._
 TIRESIAS, _the blind Prophet._
 _A Messenger._
 EURYDICE, _the Wife of Creon._
 _Another Messenger._
 
 
 SCENE. Before the Cadmean Palace at Thebes.
 
 _Note._ The town of Thebes is often personified as Thebe.
 
 
 
 
 Polynices, son and heir to the unfortunate Oedipus, having been
 supplanted by his younger brother Eteocles, brought an army of Argives
 against his native city, Thebes. The army was defeated, and the two
 brothers slew each other in single combat. On this Creon, the brother-
 in-law of Oedipus, succeeding to the chief power, forbade the burial
 of Polynices. But Antigone, sister of the dead, placing the dues of
 affection and piety before her obligation to the magistrate, disobeyed
 the edict at the sacrifice of her life. Creon carried out his will,
 but lost his son Haemon and his wife Eurydice, and received their
 curses on his head. His other son, Megareus, had previously been
 devoted as a victim to the good of the state.
 
 
 
 
                                ANTIGONE
 
 
 ANTIGONE. ISMENE.
 
 ANTIGONE. Own sister of my blood, one life with me,
 Ismene, have the tidings caught thine ear?
 Say, hath not Heaven decreed to execute
 On thee and me, while yet we are alive,
 All the evil Oedipus bequeathed? All horror,
 All pain, all outrage, falls on us! And now
 The General's proclamation of to-day--
 Hast thou not heard?--Art thou so slow to hear
 When harm from foes threatens the souls we love?
 
 ISMENE. No word of those we love, Antigone,
 Painful or glad, hath reached me, since we two
 Were utterly deprived of our two brothers,
 Cut off with mutual stroke, both in one day.
 And since the Argive host this now-past night
 Is vanished, I know nought beside to make me
 Nearer to happiness or more in woe.
 
 ANT. I knew it well, and therefore led thee forth
 The palace gate, that thou alone mightst hear.
 
 ISM. Speak on! Thy troubled look bodes some dark news.
 
 ANT. Why, hath not Creon, in the burial-rite,
 Of our two brethren honoured one, and wrought
 On one foul wrong? Eteocles, they tell,
 With lawful consecration he lays out,
 And after covers him in earth, adorned
 With amplest honours in the world below.
 But Polynices, miserably slain,
 They say 'tis publicly proclaimed that none
 Must cover in a grave, nor mourn for him;
 But leave him tombless and unwept, a store
 Of sweet provision for the carrion fowl
 That eye him greedily. Such righteous law
 Good Creon hath pronounced for thy behoof--
 Ay, and for mine! I am not left out!--And now
 He moves this way to promulgate his will
 To such as have not heard, nor lightly holds
 The thing he bids, but, whoso disobeys,
 The citizens shall stone him to the death.
 This is the matter, and thou wilt quickly show
 If thou art noble, or fallen below thy birth.
 
 ISM. Unhappy one! But what can I herein
 Avail to do or undo?
 
 ANT.                 Wilt thou share
 The danger and the labour? Make thy choice.
 
 ISM. Of what wild enterprise? What canst thou mean?
 
 ANT. Wilt thou join hand with mine to lift the dead?
 
 ISM. To bury him, when all have been forbidden?
 Is that thy thought?
 
 ANT.                 To bury my own brother
 And thine, even though thou wilt not do thy part.
 I will not be a traitress to my kin.
 
 ISM. Fool-hardy girl! against the word of Creon?
 
 ANT. He hath no right to bar me from mine own.
 
 ISM. Ah, sister, think but how our father fell,
 Hated of all and lost to fair renown,
 Through self-detected crimes--with his own hand,
 Self-wreaking, how he dashed out both his eyes:
 Then how the mother-wife, sad two-fold name!
 With twisted halter bruised her life away,
 Last, how in one dire moment our two brothers
 With internecine conflict at a blow
 Wrought out by fratricide their mutual doom.
 Now, left alone, O think how beyond all
 Most piteously we twain shall be destroyed,
 If in defiance of authority
 We traverse the commandment of the King!
 We needs must bear in mind we are but women,
 Never created to contend with men;
 Nay more, made victims of resistless power,
 To obey behests more harsh than this to-day.
 I, then, imploring those beneath to grant
 Indulgence, seeing I am enforced in this,
 Will yield submission to the powers that rule,
 Small wisdom were it to overpass the bound.
 
 ANT. I will not urge you! no! nor if now you list
 To help me, will your help afford me joy.
 Be what you choose to be! This single hand
 Shall bury our lost brother. Glorious
 For me to take this labour and to die!
 Dear to him will my soul be as we rest
 In death, when I have dared this holy crime.
 My time for pleasing men will soon be over;
 Not so my duty toward the Dead! My home
 Yonder will have no end. You, if you will,
 May pour contempt on laws revered on High.
 
 ISM. Not from irreverence. But I have no strength
 To strive against the citizens' resolve.
 
 ANT. Thou, make excuses! I will go my way
 To raise a burial-mound to my dear brother.
 
 ISM. Oh, hapless maiden, how I fear for thee!
 
 ANT. Waste not your fears on me! Guide your own fortune.
 
 ISM. Ah! yet divulge thine enterprise to none,
 But keep the secret close, and so will I.
 
 ANT. O Heavens! Nay, tell! I hate your silence worse;
 I had rather you proclaimed it to the world.
 
 ISM. You are ardent in a chilling enterprise.
 
 ANT. I know that I please those whom I would please.
 
 ISM. Yes, if you thrive; but your desire is bootless.
 
 ANT. Well, when I fail I shall be stopt, I trow!
 
 ISM. One should not start upon a hopeless quest.
 
 ANT. Speak in that vein if you would earn my hate
 And aye be hated of our lost one. Peace!
 Leave my unwisdom to endure this peril;
 Fate cannot rob me of a noble death.
 
 ISM. Go, if you must--Not to be checked in folly,
 But sure unparalleled in faithful love!                      [_Exeunt_
 
 CHORUS (_entering_).
     Beam of the mounting Sun!                                      I 1
   O brightest, fairest ray
   Seven-gated Thebe yet hath seen!
   Over the vale where Dirce's fountains run
   At length thou appearedst, eye of golden Day,
   And with incitement of thy radiance keen
         Spurredst to faster flight
   The man of Argos hurrying from the fight.
   Armed at all points the warrior came,
   But driven before thy rising flame
   He rode, reverting his pale shield,
   Headlong from yonder battlefield.
 
   In snow-white panoply, on eagle wing,                 [_Half-Chorus_
   He rose, dire ruin on our land to bring,
         Roused by the fierce debate
         Of Polynices' hate,
   Shrilling sharp menace from his breast,
   Sheathed all in steel from crown to heel,
   With many a plumed crest.
 
   Then stooped above the domes,                                    I 2
   With lust of carnage fired,
   And opening teeth of serried spears
   Yawned wide around the gates that guard our homes;
   But went, or e'er his hungry jaws had tired
   On Theban flesh,--or e'er the Fire-god fierce
         Seizing our sacred town
   Besmirched and rent her battlemented crown.
   Such noise of battle as he fled
   About his back the War-god spread;
   So writhed to hard-fought victory
   The serpent[1] struggling to be free.
 
   High Zeus beheld their stream that proudly rolled     [_Half-Chorus_
   Idly caparisoned[2] with clanking gold:
         Zeus hates the boastful tongue:
         He with hurled fire down flung
   One who in haste had mounted high,
   And that same hour from topmost tower
         Upraised the exulting cry.
 
   Swung rudely to the hard repellent earth                        II 1
   Amidst his furious mirth
   He fell, who then with flaring brand
         Held in his fiery hand
   Came breathing madness at the gate
         In eager blasts of hate.
   And doubtful swayed the varying fight
   Through the turmoil of the night,
   As turning now on these and now on those
   Ares hurtled 'midst our foes,
   Self-harnessed helper[3] on our right.
 
   Seven matched with seven, at each gate one,           [_Half-Chorus_
   Their captains, when the day was done,
   Left for our Zeus who turned the scale,
   The brazen tribute in full tale:--
   All save the horror-burdened pair,
         Dire children of despair,
   Who from one sire, one mother, drawing breath,
   Each with conquering lance in rest
   Against a true born brother's breast,
         Found equal lots in death.
 
   But with blithe greeting to glad Thebe came                     II 2
   She of the glorious name,
   Victory,--smiling on our chariot throng
         With eyes that waken song
   Then let those battle memories cease,
         Silenced by thoughts of peace.
   With holy dances of delight
   Lasting through the livelong night
   Visit we every shrine, in solemn round,
   Led by him who shakes the ground,
   Our Bacchus, Thebe's child of light.
 
 LEADER OF CHORUS.
   But look! where Creon in his new-made power,
   Moved by the fortune of the recent hour,
   Comes with fresh counsel. What intelligence
   Intends he for our private conference,
   That he hath sent his herald to us all,
   Gathering the elders with a general call?
 
 _Enter_ CREON.
 
 CREON. My friends, the noble vessel of our State,
 After sore shaking her, the Gods have sped
 On a smooth course once more. I have called you hither,
 By special messengers selecting you
 From all the city, first, because I knew you
 Aye loyal to the throne of Laius;
 Then, both while Oedipus gave prosperous days,
 And since his fall, I still beheld you firm
 In sound allegiance to the royal issue.
 Now since the pair have perished in an hour,
 Twinned in misfortune, by a mutual stroke
 Staining our land with fratricidal blood,
 All rule and potency of sovereign sway,
 In virtue of next kin to the deceased,
 Devolves on me. But hard it is to learn
 The mind of any mortal or the heart,
 Till he be tried in chief authority.
 Power shows the man. For he who when supreme
 Withholds his hand or voice from the best cause,
 Being thwarted by some fear, that man to me
 Appears, and ever hath appeared, most vile.
 He too hath no high place in mine esteem,
 Who sets his friend before his fatherland.
 Let Zeus whose eye sees all eternally
 Be here my witness. I will ne'er keep silence
 When danger lours upon my citizens
 Who looked for safety, nor make him my friend
 Who doth not love my country. For I know
 Our country carries us, and whilst her helm
 Is held aright we gain good friends and true.
   Following such courses 'tis my steadfast will
 To foster Thebe's greatness, and therewith
 In brotherly accord is my decree
 Touching the sons of Oedipus. The man--
 Eteocles I mean--who died for Thebes
 Fighting with eminent prowess on her side,
 Shall be entombed with every sacred rite
 That follows to the grave the lordliest dead.
 But for his brother, who, a banished man,
 Returned to devastate and burn with fire
 The land of his nativity, the shrines
 Of his ancestral gods, to feed him fat
 With Theban carnage, and make captive all
 That should escape the sword--for Polynices,
 This law hath been proclaimed concerning him:
 He shall have no lament, no funeral,
 But he unburied, for the carrion fowl
 And dogs to eat his corse, a sight of shame.
   Such are the motions of this mind and will.
 Never from me shall villains reap renown
 Before the just. But whoso loves the State,
 I will exalt him both in life and death.
 
 CH. Son of Menoeceus, we have heard thy mind
 Toward him who loves, and him who hates our city.
 And sure, 'tis thine to enforce what law thou wilt
 Both on the dead and all of us who live.
 
 CR. Then be ye watchful to maintain my word.
 
 CH. Young strength for such a burden were more meet.
 
 CR. Already there be watchers of the dead.
 
 CH. What charge then wouldst thou further lay on us?
 
 CR. Not to give place to those that disobey.
 
 CH. Who is so fond, to be in love with death?
 
 CR. Such, truly, is the meed. But hope of gain
 Full oft ere now hath been the ruin of men.
 
 WATCHMAN (_entering_).
   My lord, I am out of breath, but not with speed.
 I will not say my foot was fleet. My thoughts
 Cried halt unto me ever as I came
 And wheeled me to return. My mind discoursed
 Most volubly within my breast, and said--
 Fond wretch! why go where thou wilt find thy bane?
 Unhappy wight! say, wilt thou bide aloof?
 Then if the king shall hear this from another,
 How shalt thou 'scape for 't? Winding thus about
 I hasted, but I could not speed, and so
 Made a long journey of a little way.
 At last 'yes' carried it, that I should come
 To thee; and tell thee I must needs; and shall,
 Though it be nothing that I have to tell.
 For I came hither, holding fast by this--
 Nought that is not my fate can happen to me.
 
 CR. Speak forth thy cause of fear. What is the matter?
 
 WATCH. First of mine own part in the business. For
 I did it not, nor saw the man who did,
 And 'twere not right that I should come to harm.
 
 CR. You fence your ground, and keep well out of danger;
 I see you have some strange thing to declare.
 
 WATCH. A man will shrink who carries words of fear.
 
 CB. Let us have done with you. Tell your tale, and go.
 
 WATCH. Well, here it is. The corse hath burial
 From some one who is stolen away and gone,
 But first hath strown dry dust upon the skin,
 And added what religious rites require.
 
 CR. Ha!
 What man hath been so daring in revolt?
 
 WATCH. I cannot tell. There was no mark to show--
 No dint of spade, or mattock-loosened sod,--
 Only the hard bare ground, untilled and trackless.
 Whoe'er he was, the doer left no trace.
 And, when the scout of our first daylight watch
 Showed us the thing, we marvelled in dismay.
 The Prince was out of sight; not in a grave,
 But a thin dust was o'er him, as if thrown
 By one who shunned the dead man's curse. No sign
 Appeared of any hound or beast o' the field
 Having come near, or pulled at the dead body.
 Then rose high words among us sentinels
 With bickering noise accusing each his mate,
 And it seemed like to come to blows, with none
 To hinder. For the hand that thus had wrought
 Was any of ours, and none; the guilty man
 Escaped all knowledge. And we were prepared
 To lift hot iron with our bare palms; to walk
 Through fire, and swear by all the Gods at once
 That we were guiltless, ay, and ignorant
 Of who had plotted or performed this thing.
   When further search seemed bootless, at the last
 One spake, whose words bowed all our heads to the earth
 With fear. We knew not what to answer him,
 Nor how to do it and prosper. He advised
 So grave a matter must not be concealed,
 But instantly reported to the King.
   Well, this prevailed, and the lot fell on me,
 Unlucky man! to be the ministrant
 Of this fair service. So I am present here,
 Against my will and yours, I am sure of that.
 None love the bringer of unwelcome news.
 
 CH. My lord, a thought keeps whispering in my breast,
 Some Power divine hath interposed in this.
 
 CR. Cease, ere thou quite enrage me, and appear
 Foolish as thou art old. Talk not to me
 Of Gods who have taken thought for this dead man!
 Say, was it for his benefits to them
 They hid his corse, and honoured him so highly,
 Who came to set on fire their pillared shrines,
 With all the riches of their offerings,
 And to make nothing of their land and laws?
 Or, hast thou seen them honouring villany?
 That cannot be. Long time the cause of this
 Hath come to me in secret murmurings
 From malcontents of Thebes, who under yoke
 Turned restive, and would not accept my sway.
 Well know I, these have bribed the watchmen here
 To do this for some fee. For nought hath grown
 Current among mankind so mischievous
 As money. This brings cities to their fall:
 This drives men homeless, and moves honest minds
 To base contrivings. This hath taught mankind
 The use of wickedness, and how to give
 An impious turn to every kind of act.
 But whosoe'er hath done this for reward
 Hath found his way at length to punishment.
 If Zeus have still my worship, be assured
 Of that which here on oath I say to thee--
 Unless ye find the man who made this grave
 And bring him bodily before mine eye,
 Death shall not be enough, till ye have hung
 Alive for an example of your guilt,
 That henceforth in your rapine ye may know
 Whence gain is to be gotten, and may learn
 Pelf from all quarters is not to be loved.
 For in base getting, 'tis a common proof,
 More find disaster than deliverance.
 
 WATCH. Am I to speak? or must I turn and go?
 
 CR. What? know you not your speech offends even now?
 
 WATCH. Doth the mind smart withal, or only the ear?
 
 CR. Art thou to probe the seat of mine annoy?
 
 WATCH. If I offend, 'tis in your ear alone,
 The malefactor wounds ye to the soul.
 
 CR. Out on thee! thou art nothing but a tongue.
 
 WATCH. Then was I ne'er the doer of this deed.
 
 CR. Yea, verily: self-hired to crime for gold.
 
 WATCH. Pity so clear a mind should clearly err!
 
 CR. Gloze now on clearness! But unless ye bring
 The burier, without glozing ye shall tell,
 Craven advantage clearly worketh bane.
 
 WATCH. By all means let the man be found; one thing
 I know right well:--caught or not caught, howe'er
 Fate rules his fortune, me you ne'er will see
 Standing in presence here. Even now I owe
 Deep thanks to Heaven for mine escape, so far
 Beyond my hope and highest expectancy.             [_Exeunt severally_
 
 CHORUS.
 Many a wonder lives and moves, but the wonder of all is man,       I 1
 That courseth over the grey ocean, carried of Southern gale,
 Faring amidst high-swelling seas that rudely surge around,
 And Earth, supreme of mighty Gods, eldest, imperishable,
 Eternal, he with patient furrow wears and wears away
       As year by year the plough-shares turn and turn,--
 Subduing her unwearied strength with children of the steed[4].
 
 And wound in woven coils of nets he seizeth for his prey           I 2
 The aery tribe of birds and wilding armies of the chase,
 And sea-born millions of the deep--man is so crafty-wise.
 And now with engine of his wit he tameth to his will
 The mountain-ranging beast whose lair is in the country wild;
       And now his yoke hath passed upon the mane
 Of horse with proudly crested neck and tireless mountain bull.
 
 Wise utterance and wind-swift thought, and city-moulding mind,    II 1
 And shelter from the clear-eyed power of biting frost,
 He hath taught him, and to shun the sharp, roof-penetrating rain,--
 Full of resource, without device he meets no coming time;
       From Death alone he shall not find reprieve;
 No league may gain him that relief; but even for fell disease,
 That long hath baffled wisest leech, he hath contrived a cure.
 
 Inventive beyond wildest hope, endowed with boundless skill,      II 2
 One while he moves toward evil, and one while toward good,
 According as he loves his land and fears the Gods above.
 Weaving the laws into his life and steadfast oath of Heaven,
       High in the State he moves but outcast he,
 Who hugs dishonour to his heart and follows paths of crime
 Ne'er may he come beneath my roof, nor think like thoughts with me.
 
 LEADER OF CHORUS
     What portent from the Gods is here?
     My mind is mazed with doubt and fear.
     How can I gainsay what I see?
     I know the girl Antigone,
     O hapless child of hapless sire!
     Didst thou, then, recklessly aspire
     To brave kings' laws, and now art brought
     In madness of transgression caught?
 
 _Enter_ Watchman, _bringing in_ ANTIGONE
 
 WATCH. Here is the doer of the deed--this maid
 We found her burying him. Where is the King?
 
 CH. Look, he comes forth again to meet thy call.
 
 _Enter_ CREON.
 
 CR. What call so nearly times with mine approach?
 
 WATCH. My lord, no mortal should deny on oath,
 Judgement is still belied by after thought
 When quailing 'neath the tempest of your threats,
 Methought no force would drive me to this place
 But joy unlook'd for and surpassing hope
 Is out of bound the best of all delight,
 And so I am here again,--though I had sworn
 I ne'er would come,--and in my charge this maid,
 Caught in the act of caring for the dead
 Here was no lot throwing, this hap was mine
 Without dispute. And now, my sovereign lord,
 According to thy pleasure, thine own self
 Examine and convict her. For my part
 I have good right to be away and free
 From the bad business I am come upon.
 
 CR. This maiden!
 How came she in thy charge? Where didst thou find her?
 
 WATCH. Burying the prince. One word hath told thee all.
 
 CR. Hast thou thy wits, and knowest thou what thou sayest?
 
 WATCH. I saw her burying him whom you forbade
 To bury. Is that, now, clearly spoken, or no?
 
 CR. And how was she detected, caught, and taken?
 
 WATCH. It fell in this wise. We were come to the spot,
 Bearing the dreadful burden of thy threats;
 And first with care we swept the dust away
 From round the corse, and laid the dank limbs bare:
 Then sate below the hill-top, out o' the wind,
 Where no bad odour from the dead might strike us,
 Stirring each other on with interchange
 Of loud revilings on the negligent
 In 'tendance on this duty. So we stayed
 Till in mid heaven the sun's resplendent orb
 Stood high, and the heat strengthened. Suddenly,
 The Storm-god raised a whirlwind from the ground,
 Vexing heaven's concave, and filled all the plain,
 Rending the locks of all the orchard groves,
 Till the great sky was choked withal. We closed
 Our lips and eyes, and bore the God-sent evil.
 When after a long while this ceased, the maid
 Was seen, and wailed in high and bitter key,
 Like some despairing bird that hath espied
 Her nest all desolate, the nestlings gone.
 So, when she saw the body bare, she mourned
 Loudly, and cursed the authors of this deed.
 Then nimbly with her hands she brought dry dust,
 And holding high a shapely brazen cruse,
 Poured three libations, honouring the dead.
 We, when we saw, ran in, and straightway seized
 Our quarry, nought dismayed, and charged her with
 The former crime and this. And she denied
 Nothing;--to my delight, and to my grief.
 One's self to escape disaster is great joy;
 Yet to have drawn a friend into distress
 Is painful. But mine own security
 To me is of more value than aught else.
 
 CR. Thou, with thine eyes down-fastened to the earth!
 Dost thou confess to have done this, or deny it?
 
 ANT. I deny nothing. I avow the deed.
 
 CR. (_to_ Watchman).
 Thou may'st betake thyself whither thou wilt,
 Acquitted of the grievous charge, and free.
 (_to_ ANTIGONE)
 And thou,--no prating talk, but briefly tell,
 Knew'st thou our edict that forbade this thing?
 
 ANT. I could not fail to know. You made it plain.
 
 CR. How durst thou then transgress the published law?
 
 ANT. I heard it not from Heaven, nor came it forth
 From Justice, where she reigns with Gods below.
 They too have published to mankind a law.
 Nor thought I thy commandment of such might
 That one who is mortal thus could overbear
 The infallible, unwritten laws of Heaven.
 Not now or yesterday they have their being,
 But everlastingly, and none can tell
 The hour that saw their birth. I would not, I,
 For any terror of a man's resolve,
 Incur the God-inflicted penalty
 Of doing them wrong. That death would come, I knew
 Without thine edict;--if before the time,
 I count it gain. Who does not gain by death,
 That lives, as I do, amid boundless woe?
 Slight is the sorrow of such doom to me.
 But had I suffered my own mother's child,
 Fallen in blood, to be without a grave,
 That were indeed a sorrow. This is none.
 And if thou deem'st me foolish for my deed,
 I am foolish in the judgement of a fool.
 
 CH. Fierce shows the maiden's vein from her fierce sire;
 Calamity doth not subdue her will.
 
 CR. Ay, but the stubborn spirit first doth fall.
 Oft ye shall see the strongest bar of steel,
 That fire hath hardened to extremity,
 Shattered to pieces. A small bit controls
 The fiery steed. Pride may not be endured
 In one whose life is subject to command.
 This maiden hath been conversant with crime
 Since first she trampled on the public law;
 And now she adds to crime this insolence,
 To laugh at her offence, and glory in it.
 Truly, if she that hath usurped this power
 Shall rest unpunished, she then is a man,
 And I am none. Be she my sister's child,
 Or of yet nearer blood to me than all
 That take protection from my hearth, the pair
 Shall not escape the worst of deaths. For know,
 I count the younger of the twain no less
 Copartner in this plotted funeral:
 And now I bid you call her. Late I saw her
 Within the house, beyond herself, and frantic.
 --Full oft when one is darkly scheming wrong,
 The disturbed spirit hath betrayed itself
 Before the act it hides.--But not less hateful
 Seems it to me, when one that hath been caught
 In wickedness would give it a brave show.
 
 ANT. Wouldst thou aught more of me than merely death?
 
 CR. No more. 'Tis all I claim. Death closes all.
 
 ANT. Why then delay? No talk of thine can charm me,
 Forbid it Heaven! And my discourse no less
 Must evermore sound noisome to thine ear.
 Yet where could I have found a fairer fame
 Than giving burial to my own true brother?
 All here would tell thee they approve my deed,
 Were they not tongue-tied to authority.
 But kingship hath much profit; this in chief,
 That it may do and say whate'er it will.
 
 CR. No Theban sees the matter with thine eye.
 
 ANT. They see, but curb their voices to thy sway
 
 CR. And art thou not ashamed, acting alone?
 
 ANT. A sister's piety hath no touch of shame.
 
 CR. Was not Eteocles thy brother too?
 
 ANT. My own true brother from both parents' blood.
 
 CR. This duty was impiety to him.
 
 ANT. He that is dead will not confirm that word.
 
 CR. If you impart his honours to the vile.
 
 ANT. It was his brother, not a slave, who fell.
 
 CR. But laying waste the land for which he fought.
 
 ANT. Death knows no difference, but demands his due.
 
 CR. Yet not equality 'twixt good and bad.
 
 ANT. Both may be equal yonder; who can tell?
 
 CR. An enemy is hated even in death.
 
 ANT. Love, and not hatred, is the part for me.
 
 CR. Down then to death! and, if you must, there love
 The dead. No woman rules me while I live.
 
 CH. Now comes Ismene forth. Ah, see,
 From clouds above her brow
 The sister-loving tear
 Is falling wet on her fair cheek,
 Distaining all her passion-crimson'd face!
 
 _Enter_ ISMENE.
 
 CR. And thou, that like a serpent coiled i' the house
 Hast secretly been draining my life-blood,--
 Little aware that I was cherishing
 Two curses and subverters of my throne,--
 Tell us, wilt thou avouch thy share in this
 Entombment, or forswear all knowledge of it?
 
 ISM. If her voice go therewith, I did the deed,
 And bear my part and burden of the blame.
 
 ANT. Nay, justice will not suffer that. You would not,
 And I refused to make you mine ally.
 
 ISM. But now in thy misfortune I would fain
 Embark with thee in thy calamity.
 
 ANT. Who did the deed, the powers beneath can tell.
 I care not for lip-kindness from my kin.
 
 ISM. Ah! scorn me not so far as to forbid me
 To die with thee, and honour our lost brother.
 
 ANT. Die not with me, nor make your own a deed
 you never touched! My dying is enough.
 
 ISM. What joy have I in life when thou art gone?
 
 ANT. Ask Creon there. He hath your care and duty.
 
 ISM. What can it profit thee to vex me so?
 
 ANT. My heart is pained, though my lip laughs at thee.
 
 ISM. What can I do for thee now, even now?
 
 ANT. Save your own life. I grudge not your escape.
 
 ISM. Alas! and must I be debarred thy fate?
 
 ANT. Life was the choice you made. Mine was to die.
 
 ISM. I warned thee----
 
 ANT.                   Yes, your prudence is admired
 On earth. My wisdom is approved below.
 
 ISM. Yet truly we are both alike in fault.
 
 ANT. Fear not; you live. My life hath long been given
 To death, to be of service to the dead.
 
 CR. Of these two girls, the one hath lost her wits:
 The other hath had none since she was born.
 
 ISM. My lord, in misery, the mind one hath
 Is wont to be dislodged, and will not stay.
 
 CR. You have ta'en leave of yours at any rate,
 When you cast in your portion with the vile.
 
 ISM. What can life profit me without my sister?
 
 CR. Say not 'my sister'; she is nothing now.
 
 ISM. What? wilt thou kill thy son's espousal too?
 
 CR. He may find other fields to plough upon.
 
 ISM. Not so as love was plighted 'twixt them twain.
 
 CR. I hate a wicked consort for my son.
 
 ANT. O dearest Haemon! how thy father wrongs thee!
 
 CR. Thou and thy marriage are a torment to me.
 
 CH. And wilt thou sever her from thine own son?
 
 CR. 'Tis death must come between him and his joy,
 
 CH. All doubt is then resolved: the maid must die,
 
 CR. I am resolved; and so, 'twould seem, are you.
 In with her, slaves! No more delay! Henceforth
 These maids must have but woman's liberty
 And be mewed up; for even the bold will fly
 When they see Death nearing the house of life.
                      [ANTIGONE _and_ ISMENE _are led into the palace._
 
 CHORUS.
 Blest is the life that never tasted woe.                           I 1
       When once the blow
 Hath fallen upon a house with Heaven-sent doom,
 Trouble descends in ever-widening gloom
 Through all the number of the tribe to flow;
       As when the briny surge
       That Thrace-born tempests urge
 (The big wave ever gathering more and more)
 Runs o'er the darkness of the deep,
       And with far-searching sweep
 Uprolls the storm-heap'd tangle on the shore,
 While cliff to beaten cliff resounds with sullen roar.
 
 The stock of Cadmus from old time, I know,                         I 2
       Hath woe on woe,
 Age following age, the living on the dead,
 Fresh sorrow falling on each new-ris'n head,
 None freed by God from ruthless overthrow.
       E'en now a smiling light
       Was spreading to our sight
 O'er one last fibre of a blasted tree,--
 When, lo! the dust of cruel death,
       Tribute of Gods beneath,
 And wildering thoughts, and fate-born ecstasy,
 Quench the brief gleam in dark Nonentity.
 
 What froward will of man, O Zeus! can check thy might?            II 1
 Not all-enfeebling sleep, nor tireless months divine,
 Can touch thee, who through ageless time
 Rulest mightily Olympus' dazzling height.
 This was in the beginning, and shall be
       Now and eternally,
 Not here or there, but everywhere,
 A law of misery that shall not spare.
 
 For Hope, that wandereth wide, comforting many a head,            II 2
 Entangleth many more with glamour of desire:
 Unknowing they have trode the fire.
 Wise was the famous word of one who said,
 'Evil oft seemeth goodness to the mind
       An angry God doth blind.'
 Few are the days that such as he
 May live untroubled of calamity.
 
 LEADER OF CHORUS.
 Lo, Haemon, thy last offspring, now is come,
 Lamenting haply for the maiden's doom,
 Say, is he mourning o'er her young life lost,
 Fiercely indignant for his bridal crossed?
 
 _Enter_ HAEMON.
 
 CR. We shall know soon, better than seers could teach us.
 Can it be so, my son, that thou art brought
 By mad distemperature against thy sire,
 On hearing of the irrevocable doom
 Passed on thy promised bride? Or is thy love
 Thy father's, be his actions what they may?
 
 HAEMON. I am thine, father, and will follow still
 Thy good directions; nor would I prefer
 The fairest bride to thy wise government.
 
 CR. That, O my son! should be thy constant mind,
 In all to bend thee to thy father's will.
 Therefore men pray to have around their hearths
 Obedient offspring, to requite their foes
 With harm, and honour whom their father loves;
 But he whose issue proves unprofitable,
 Begets what else but sorrow to himself
 And store of laughter to his enemies?
 Make not, my son, a shipwreck of thy wit
 For a woman. Thine own heart may teach thee this;--
 There's but cold comfort in a wicked wife
 Yoked to the home inseparably. What wound
 Can be more deadly than a harmful friend?
 Then spurn her like an enemy, and send her
 To wed some shadow in the world below!
 For since of all the city I have found
 Her only recusant, caught in the act,
 I will not break my word before the State.
 I will take her life. At this let her invoke
 The god of kindred blood! For if at home
 I foster rebels, how much more abroad?
 Whoso is just in ruling his own house,
 Lives rightly in the commonwealth no less:
 But he that wantonly defies the law,
 Or thinks to dictate to authority,
 Shall have no praise from me. What power soe'er
 The city hath ordained, must be obeyed
 In little things and great things, right or wrong.
 The man who so obeys, I have good hope
 Will govern and be governed as he ought,
 And in the storm of battle at my side
 Will stand a faithful and a trusty comrade.
 But what more fatal than the lapse of rule?
 This ruins cities, this lays houses waste,
 This joins with the assault of war to break
 Full numbered armies into hopeless rout;
 And in the unbroken host 'tis nought but rule
 That keeps those many bodies from defeat,
 I must be zealous to defend the law,
 And not go down before a woman's will.
 Else, if I fall, 'twere best a man should strike me;
 Lest one should say, 'a woman worsted him.'
 
 CH. Unless our sense is weakened by long time,
 Thou speakest not unwisely.
 
 HAEM.                       O my sire,
 Sound wisdom is a God implanted seed,
 Of all possessions highest in regard.
 I cannot, and I would not learn to say
 That thou art wrong in this; though in another,
 It may be such a word were not unmeet.
 But as thy son, 'tis surely mine to scan
 Men's deeds, and words, and muttered thoughts toward thee.
 Fear of thy frown restrains the citizen
 In talk that would fall harshly on thine ear.
 I under shadow may o'erhear, how all
 Thy people mourn this maiden, and complain
 That of all women least deservedly
 She perishes for a most glorious deed.
 'Who, when her own true brother on the earth
 Lay weltering after combat in his gore,
 Left him not graveless, for the carrion few
 And raw devouring field dogs to consume--
 Hath she not merited a golden praise?'
 Such the dark rumour spreading silently.
 Now, in my valuing, with thy prosperous life,
 My father, no possession can compare.
 Where can be found a richer ornament
 For children, than their father's high renown?
 Or where for fathers, than their children's fame?
 Nurse not one changeless humour in thy breast,
 That nothing can be right but as thou sayest.
 Whoe'er presumes that he alone hath sense,
 Or peerless eloquence, or reach of soul,
 Unwrap him, and you'll find but emptiness.
 'Tis no disgrace even to the wise to learn
 And lend an ear to reason. You may see
 The plant that yields where torrent waters flow
 Saves every little twig, when the stout tree
 Is torn away and dies. The mariner
 Who will not ever slack the sheet that sways
 The vessel, but still tightens, oversets,
 And so, keel upward, ends his voyaging.
 Relent, I pray thee, and give place to change.
 If any judgement hath informed my youth,
 I grant it noblest to be always wise,
 But,--for omniscience is denied to man--
 Tis good to hearken to admonishment.
 
 CH. My lord, 'twere wise, if thou wouldst learn of him
 In reason; and thou, Haemon, from thy sire!
 Truth lies between you.
 
 CR.                     Shall our age, forsooth,
 Be taught discretion by a peevish boy?
 
 HAEM. Only in what is right. Respects of time
 Must be outbalanced by the actual need.
 
 CR. To cringe to rebels cannot be a need.
 
 HAEM. I do not claim observance for the vile.
 
 CR. Why, is not she so tainted? Is 't not proved?
 
 HAEM. All Thebes denies it.
 
 CR.                         Am I ruled by Thebes?
 
 HAEM. If youth be folly, that is youngly said.
 
 CR. Shall other men prescribe my government?
 
 HAEM. One only makes not up a city, father.
 
 CR. Is not the city in the sovereign's hand?
 
 HAEM. Nobly you'd govern as the desert's king.
 
 CR. This youngster is the woman's champion.
 
 HAEM. You are the woman, then--for you I care.
 
 CR. Villain, to bandy reasons with your sire!
 
 HAEM. I plead against the unreason of your fault.
 
 CR. What fault is there in reverencing my power?
 
 HAEM. There is no reverence when you spurn the Gods.
 
 CR. Abominable spirit, woman-led!
 
 HAEM. You will not find me following a base guide.
 
 CR. Why, all your speech this day is spent for her.
 
 HAEM. For you and me too, and the Gods below.
 
 CR. She will not live to be your wife on earth.
 
 HAEM. I know, then, whom she will ruin by her death.
 
 CR. What, wilt thou threaten, too, thou audacious boy?
 
 HAEM. It is no threat to answer empty words.
 
 CR. Witless admonisher, thou shalt pay for this!
 
 HAEM. Thou art my sire, else would I call thee senseless.
 
 CR. Thou woman's minion! mince not terms with me,
 
 HAEM. Wouldst thou have all the speaking on thy side?
 
 CR. Is 't possible? By yon heaven! thou'lt not escape,
 For adding contumely to words of blame.
 Bring out the hated thing, that she may die
 Immediately, before her lover's face!
 
 HAEM. Nay, dream not she shall suffer in my sight
 Nor shalt thou ever see my face again
 Let those stay with you that can brook your rage!              [_Exit_
 
 CH. My lord, he is parted swiftly in deep wrath!
 The youthful spirit offended makes wild work.
 
 CR. Ay, let him do his worst. Let him give scope
 To pride beyond the compass of a man!
 He shall not free these maidens from their doom.
 
 CH. Is death thy destination for them both?
 
 CR. Only for her who acted. Thou art right.
 
 CH. And what hast thou determined for her death?
 
 CH. Where human footstep shuns the desert ground,
 I'll hide her living in a cave like vault,
 With so much provender as may prevent
 Pollution from o'ertaking the whole city
 And there, perchance, she may obtain of Death,
 Her only deity, to spare her soul,
 Or else in that last moment she will learn
 'Tis labour lost to worship powers unseen.               [_Exit_ CREON
 
 CHORUS
 Love, never foiled in fight!                                         1
 Warrior Love, that on Wealth workest havoc!
 Love, who in ambush of young maid's soft cheek
 All night keep'st watch!--Thou roamest over seas.
 In lonely forest homes thou harbourest.
 Who may avoid thee? None!
 Mortal, Immortal,
 All are o'erthrown by thee, all feel thy frenzy.
 
 Lightly thou draw'st awry                                            2
 Righteous minds into wrong to their ruin
 Thou this unkindly quarrel hast inflamed
 'Tween kindred men--Triumphantly prevails
 The heart-compelling eye of winsome bride,
 Compeer of mighty Law
 Throned, commanding.
 Madly thou mockest men, dread Aphrodite.
 
 LEADER OF CHORUS.
 Ah! now myself am carried past the bound
 Of law, nor can I check the rising tear,
 When I behold Antigone even here
 Touching the quiet bourne where all must rest.
 
 _Enter_ ANTIGONE _guarded._
 
 ANT. Ye see me on my way,                                          I 1
 O burghers of my father's land!
 With one last look on Helios' ray,
 Led my last path toward the silent strand.
 Alive to the wide house of rest I go;
       No dawn for me may shine,
 No marriage-blessing e'er be mine,
 No hymeneal with my praises flow!
 The Lord of Acheron's unlovely shore
 Shall be mine only husband evermore.
 
 CH. Yea, but with glory and fame,--
     Not by award of the sword,
     Not with blighting disease,
     But by a law of thine own,--
     Thou, of mortals alone,
     Goest alive to the deep
     Tranquil home of the dead.
 
 ANT. Erewhile I heard men say,                                     I 2
 How, in far Phrygia, Thebe's friend,
 Tantalus' child, had dreariest end
 On heights of Sipylus consumed away:
 O'er whom the rock like clinging ivy grows,
       And while with moistening dew
 Her cheek runs down, the eternal snows
 Weigh o'er her, and the tearful stream renew
 That from sad brows her stone-cold breast doth steep.
 Like unto her the God lulls me to sleep.
 
 CH. But she was a goddess born,
     We but of mortal line;
     And sure to rival the fate
     Of a daughter of sires Divine
     Were no light glory in death.
 
 ANT. O mockery of my woe!                                         II 1
 I pray you by our fathers' holy Fear,
     Why must I hear
 Your insults, while in life on earth I stand,
     O ye that flow
 In wealth, rich burghers of my bounteous land?
 O fount of Dirce, and thou spacious grove,
 Where Thebe's chariots move!
 Ye are my witness, though none else be nigh,
 By what enormity of lawless doom,
     Without one friendly sigh,
 I go to the strong mound of yon strange tomb,--
 All hapless, having neither part nor room
 With those who live or those who die!
 
 CH. Thy boldness mounted high,
 And thou, my child, 'gainst the great pedestal
 Of Justice with unmeasured force didst fall.
 Thy father's lot still presseth hard on thee.
 
 ANT. That pains me more than all.                                 II 2
 Ah! thou hast touched my father's misery
     Still mourned anew,
 With all the world-famed sorrows on us rolled
     Since Cadmus old.
 O cursed marriage that my mother knew!
 O wretched fortune of my sire, who lay
     Where first he saw the day!
 Such were the authors of my burdened life;
 To whom, with curses dowered, never a wife,
     I go to dwell beneath.
 O brother mine, thy princely marriage-tie
 Hath been thy downfall, and in this thy death
 Thou hast destroyed me ere I die.
 
 CH. 'Twas pious, we confess,
 Thy fervent deed. But he, who power would show,
 Must let no soul of all he rules transgress.
 A self-willed passion was thine overthrow.
 
 ANT. Friendless, uncomforted of bridal lay,                        III
 Unmourned, they lead me on my destined way.
 Woe for my life forlorn! I may not see
 The sacred round of yon great light
 Rising again to greet me from the night;
 No friend bemoans my fate, no tear hath fallen for me!
 
 _Enter_ CREON.
 
 CR. If criminals were suffered to complain
 In dirges before death, they ne'er would end.
 Away with her at once, and closing her,
 As I commanded, in the vaulty tomb,
 Leave her all desolate, whether to die,
 Or to live on in that sepulchral cell.
 We are guiltless in the matter of this maid;
 Only she shall not share the light of day.
 
 ANT. O grave! my bridal chamber, prison-house
 Eterne, deep-hollowed, whither I am led
 To find mine own,--of whom Persephone
 Hath now a mighty number housed in death:--
 I last of all, and far most miserably,
 Am going, ere my days have reached their term!
 Yet lives the hope that, when I go, most surely
 Dear will my coming be, father, to thee,
 And dear to thee, my mother, and to thee,
 Brother! since with these very hands I decked
 And bathed you after death, and ministered
 The last libations. And I reap this doom
 For tending, Polynices, on thy corse.
 Indeed I honoured thee, the wise will say.
 For neither, had I children, nor if one
 I had married were laid bleeding on the earth,
 Would I have braved the city's will, or taken
 This burden on me. Wherefore? I will tell.
 A husband lost might be replaced; a son,
 If son were lost to me, might yet be born;
 But, with both parents hidden in the tomb,
 No brother may arise to comfort me.
 Therefore above all else I honoured thee,
 And therefore Creon thought me criminal,
 And bold in wickedness, O brother mine!
 And now by servile hands, for all to see,
 He hastens me away, unhusbanded,
 Before my nuptial, having never known
 Or married joy or tender motherhood.
 But desolate and friendless I go down
 Alive, O horror! to the vaults of the dead.
 For what transgression of Heaven's ordinance?
 Alas! how can I look to Heaven? on whom
 Call to befriend me? seeing that I have earned,
 By piety, the meed of impious?--
 Oh! if this act be what the Gods approve,
 In death I may repent me of my deed;
 But if they sin who judge me, be their doom
 No heavier than they wrongly wreak on me!
 
 CH. With unchanged fury beats the storm of soul
 That shakes this maiden.
 
 CR.                      Then for that, be sure
 Her warders shall lament their tardiness.
 
 ANT. Alas! I hear Death's footfall in that sound.
 
 CR. I may not reassure thee.--'Tis most true.
 
 ANT. O land of Thebe, city of my sires,
 Ye too, ancestral Gods! I go--I go!
 Even now they lead me to mine end. Behold!
 Founders of Thebes, the only scion left
 Of Cadmus' issue, how unworthily,
 By what mean instruments I am oppressed,
 For reverencing the dues of piety.                     [_Exit guarded_
 
 CHORUS.
 Even Danae's beauty left the lightsome day.                        I 1
 Closed in her strong and brass-bound tower she lay
       In tomb-like deep confine.
 Yet she was gendered, O my child!
       From sires of noblest line,
 And treasured for the Highest the golden rain.
 Fated misfortune hath a power so fell:
       Not wealth, nor warfare wild,
 Nor dark spray-dashing coursers of the main
 Against great Destiny may once rebel.
 
 He too in darksome durance was compressed,                         I 2
 King of Edonians, Dryas' hasty son[5],
       In eyeless vault of stone
 Immured by Dionysus' hest,
       All for a wrathful jest.
 Fierce madness issueth in such fatal flower.
 He found 'twas mad to taunt the Heavenly Power,
       Chilling the Maenad breast
 Kindled with Bacchic fire, and with annoy
 Angering the Muse that in the flute hath joy.
 
 And near twin rocks that guard the Colchian sea,                  II 1
 Bosporian cliffs 'fore Salmydessus rise,
 Where neighbouring Ares from his shrine beheld
 Phineus' two sons[6] by female fury quelled.
 With cursed wounding of their sight-reft eyes,
 That cried to Heaven to 'venge the iniquity.
 The shuttle's sharpness in a cruel hand
 Dealt the dire blow, not struck with martial brand.
 
 But chiefly for her piteous lot they pined,                       II 2
 Who was the source of their rejected birth.
 She touched the lineage of Erechtheus old;
 Whence in far caves her life did erst unfold,
 Cradled 'mid storms, daughter of Northern wind,
 Steed-swift o'er all steep places of the earth.
 Yet even on her, though reared of heavenly kind,
 The long-enduring Fates at last took hold.
 
 _Enter_ TIRESIAS, _led by a boy._
 
 TIRESIAS. We are come, my lords of Thebes, joint wayfarers,
 One having eyes for both. The blind must still
 Thus move in frail dependence on a guide.
 
 CR. And what hath brought thee, old Tiresias, now?
 
 TI. I will instruct thee, if thou wilt hear my voice.
 
 CR. I have not heretofore rejected thee.
 
 TI. Therefore thy pilotage hath saved this city.
 
 CR. Grateful experience owns the benefit.
 
 TI. Take heed. Again thou art on an edge of peril.
 
 CR. What is it? How I shudder at thy word!
 
 TI. The tokens of mine art shall make thee know.
 As I was sitting on that ancient seat
 Of divination, where I might command
 Sure cognisance of every bird of the air,
 I heard strange clamouring of fowl, that screeched
 In furious dissonance; and, I could tell,
 Talons were bloodily engaged--the whirr
 Of wings told a clear tale. At once, in fear,
 I tried burnt sacrifice at the high altar:
 Where from the offering the fire god refused
 To gleam; but a dank humour from the bones
 Dripped on the embers with a sputtering fume.
 The gall was spirited high in air, the thighs
 Lay wasting, bared of their enclosing fat.
 Such failing tokens of blurred augury
 This youth reported, who is guide to me,
 As I to others. And this evil state
 Is come upon the city from thy will:
 Because our altars--yea, our sacred hearths--
 Are everywhere infected from the mouths
 Of dogs or beak of vulture that hath fed
 On Oedipus' unhappy slaughtered son.
 And then at sacrifice the Gods refuse
 Our prayers and savour of the thigh-bone fat--
 And of ill presage is the thickening cry
 Of bird that battens upon human gore
 Now, then, my son, take thought. A man may err;
 But he is not insensate or foredoomed
 To ruin, who, when he hath lapsed to evil,
 Stands not inflexible, but heals the harm.
 The obstinate man still earns the name of fool.
 Urge not contention with the dead, nor stab
 The fallen. What valour is 't to slay the slain?
 I have thought well of this, and say it with care;
 And careful counsel, that brings gain withal,
 Is precious to the understanding soul.
 
 CR. I am your mark, and ye with one consent
 All shoot your shafts at me. Nought left untried,
 Not even the craft of prophets, by whose crew
 I am bought and merchandised long since. Go on!
 Traffic, get gain, electrum from the mine
 Of Lydia, and the gold of Ind! Yet know,
 Grey-beard! ye ne'er shall hide him in a tomb.
 No, not if heaven's own eagle chose to snatch
 And bear him to the throne supreme for food,
 Even that pollution should not daunt my heart
 To yield permission for his funeral.
 For well know I defilement ne'er can rise
 From man to God. But, old Tiresias, hear!
 Even wisest spirits have a shameful fall
 That fairly speak base words for love of gain.
 
 TI. Ah! where is wisdom? who considereth?
 
 CR. Wherefore? what means this universal doubt?
 
 TI. How far the best of riches is good counsel!
 
 CR. As far as folly is the mightiest bane.
 
 TI. Yet thou art sick of that same pestilence.
 
 CR. I would not give the prophet blow for blow.
 
 TI. What blow is harder than to call me false?
 
 CR. Desire of money is the prophet's plague.
 
 TI. And ill-sought lucre is the curse of kings.
 
 CR. Know'st thou 'tis of thy sovereign thou speak'st this?
 
 TI. Yea, for my aid gives thee to sway this city.
 
 CR. Far seeing art thou, but dishonest too.
 
 TI. Thou wilt provoke the utterance of my tongue
 To that even thought refused to dwell upon.
 
 CR. Say on, so thou speak sooth, and not for gain.
 
 TI. You think me likely to seek gain from you?
 
 CR. You shall not make your merchandise on me!
 
 TI. Not many courses of the racing sun
 Shalt thou fulfil, ere of thine own true blood
 Thou shalt have given a corpse in recompense
 For one on earth whom thou hast cast beneath,
 Entombing shamefully a living soul,
 And one whom thou hast kept above the ground
 And disappointed of all obsequies,
 Unsanctified and godlessly forlorn.
 Such violence the powers beneath will bear
 Not even from the Olympian gods. For thee
 The avengers wait. Hidden but near at hand,
 Lagging but sure, the Furies of the grave
 Are watching for thee to thy ruinous harm,
 With thine own evil to entangle thee.
 Look well to it now whether I speak for gold!
 A little while, and thine own palace-halls
 Shall flash the truth upon thee with loud noise
 Of men and women, shrieking o'er the dead.
 And all the cities whose unburied sons,
 Mangled and torn, have found a sepulchre
 In dogs or jackals or some ravenous bird
 That stains their incense with polluted breath,
 Are forming leagues in troublous enmity.
 Such shafts, since thou hast stung me to the quick,
 I like an archer at thee in my wrath
 Have loosed unerringly--carrying their pang,
 Inevitable, to thy very heart.
 Now, sirrah! lead me home, that his hot mood
 Be spent on younger objects, till he learn
 To keep a safer mind and calmer tongue.                        [_Exit_
 
 CH. Sire, there is terror in that prophecy.
 He who is gone, since ever these my locks,
 Once black, now white with age, waved o'er my brow,
 Hath never spoken falsely to the state.
 
 CR. I know it, and it shakes me to the core.
 To yield is dreadful: but resistingly
 To face the blow of fate, is full of dread.
 
 CH. The time calls loud on wisdom, good my lord.
 
 CR. What must I do? Advise me. I will obey.
 
 CH. Go and release the maiden from the vault,
 And make a grave for the unburied dead.
 
 CR. Is that your counsel? Think you I will yield?
 
 CH. With all the speed thou mayest: swift harms from heaven
 With instant doom o'erwhelm the froward man.
 
 CR. Oh! it is hard. But I am forced to this
 Against myself. I cannot fight with Destiny.
 
 CH. Go now to do it. Trust no second hand.
 
 CR. Even as I am, I go. Come, come, my people.
 Here or not here, with mattocks in your hands
 Set forth immediately to yonder hill!
 And, since I have ta'en this sudden turn, myself,
 Who tied the knot, will hasten to unloose it.
 For now the fear comes over me, 'tis best
 To pass one's life in the accustomed round.                  [_Exeunt_
 
 CHORUS.
 O God of many a name!                                              I 1
 Filling the heart of that Cadmeian bride
       With deep delicious pride,
 Offspring of him who wields the withering flame!
       Thou for Italia's good
 Dost care, and 'midst the all-gathering bosom wide[7]
       Of Deo dost preside;
 Thou, Bacchus, by Ismenus' winding waters
       'Mongst Thebe's frenzied daughters,
 Keep'st haunt, commanding the fierce dragon's brood.
 
 Thee o'er the forked hill                                          I 2
 The pinewood flame beholds, where Bacchai rove,
       Nymphs of Corycian grove,
 Hard by the flowing of Castalia's rill.
       To visit Theban ways,
 By bloomy wine-cliffs flushing tender bright
       'Neath far Nyseian height
 Thou movest o'er the ivy-mantled mound,
       While myriad voices sound
 Loud strains of 'Evoe!' to thy deathless praise.
 
 For Thebe thou dost still uphold,                                 II 1
 First of cities manifold,
 Thou and the nymph whom lightning made
 Mother of thy radiant head.
 Come then with healing for the violent woe
 That o'er our peopled land doth largely flow,
 Passing the high Parnassian steep
 Or moaning narrows of the deep!
 
 Come, leader of the starry quire                                  II 2
 Quick-panting with their breath of fire!
 Lord of high voices of the night,
 Child born to him who dwells in light,
 Appear with those who, joying in their madness,
 Honour the sole dispenser of their gladness,
 Thyiads of the Aegean main
 Night-long trooping in thy train.
 
 _Enter_ Messenger.
 
 MESS. Neighbours of Cadmus and Amphion's halls,
 No life of mortal, howsoe'er it stand,
 Shall once have praise or censure from my mouth;
 Since human happiness and human woe
 Come even as fickle Fortune smiles or lours;
 And none can augur aught from what we see.
 Creon erewhile to me was enviable,
 Who saved our Thebe from her enemies;
 Then, vested with supreme authority,
 Ruled her aright; and flourish'd in his home
 With noblest progeny. What hath he now?
 Nothing. For when a man is lost to joy,
 I count him not to live, but reckon him
 A living corse. Riches belike are his,
 Great riches and the appearance of a King;
 But if no gladness come to him, all else
 Is shadow of a vapour, weighed with joy.
 
 CH. What new affliction heaped on sovereignty
 Com'st thou to tell?
 
 MESS.                They are dead; and they that live
 Are guilty of the death.
 
 CH.                      The slayer, who?
 And who the slain? Declare.
 
 MESS.                       Haemon is dead,
 And by a desperate hand.
 
 CH.                      His own, or Creon's?
 
 MESS. By his own hand, impelled with violent wrath
 At Creon for the murder of the maid.
 
 CH. Ah, Seer! how surely didst thou aim thy word!
 
 MESS. So stands the matter. Make of it what ye list.
 
 CH. See, from the palace cometh close to us
 Creon's unhappy wife, Eurydice.
 Is it by chance, or heard she of her son?
 
 _Enter_ EURYDICE.
 
 EURYDICE. Ye men of Thebes, the tidings met mine ear
 As I was coming forth to visit Pallas
 With prayerful salutation. I was loosening
 The bar of the closed gate, when the sharp sound
 Of mine own sorrow smote against my heart,
 And I fell back astonied on my maids
 And fainted. But the tale? tell me once more;
 I am no novice in adversity.
 
 MESS. Dear lady, I will tell thee what I saw,
 And hide no grain of truth: why should I soothe
 Thy spirit with soft tales, when the harsh fact
 Must prove me a liar? Truth is always best.
 I duly led the footsteps of thy lord
 To the highest point of the plain, where still was lying,
 Forlorn and mangled by the dogs, the corse
 Of Polynices. We besought Persephone
 And Pluto gently to restrain their wrath,
 And wash'd him pure and clean, and then we burned
 The poor remains with brushwood freshly pulled,
 And heaped a lofty mound of his own earth
 Above him. Then we turned us to the vault,
 The maiden's stony bride-chamber of death.
 And from afar, round the unhallowed cell,
 One heard a voice of wailing loud and long,
 And went and told his lord: who coming near
 Was haunted by the dim and bitter cry,
 And suddenly exclaiming on his fate
 Said lamentably, 'My prophetic heart
 Divined aright. I am going, of all ways
 That e'er I went, the unhappiest to-day.
 My son's voice smites me. Go, my men, approach
 With speed, and, where the stones are torn away,
 Press through the passage to that door of death,
 Look hard, and tell me, if I hear aright
 The voice of Haemon, or the gods deceive me.'
 Thus urged by our despairing lord, we made
 Th' espial. And in the farthest nook of the vault
 We saw the maiden hanging by the neck
 With noose of finest tissue firmly tied,
 And clinging to her on his knees the boy,
 Lamenting o'er his ruined nuptial-rite,
 Consummated in death, his father's crime
 And his lost love. And when the father saw him,
 With loud and dreadful clamour bursting in
 He went to him and called him piteously:
 'What deed is this, unhappy youth? What thought
 O'ermaster'd thee? Where did the force of woe
 O'erturn thy reason? O come forth, my son,
 I beg thee!' But with savage eyes the youth
 Glared scowling at him, and without a word
 Plucked forth his two-edged blade. The father then
 Fled and escaped: but the unhappy boy,
 Wroth with himself, even where he stood, leant heavily
 Upon his sword and plunged it in his side.--
 And while the sense remained, his slackening arm
 Enfolded still the maiden, and his breath,
 Gaspingly drawn and panted forth with pain,
 Cast ruddy drops upon her pallid face;
 Then lay in death upon the dead, at last
 Joined to his bride in Hades' dismal hall:--
 A monument unto mankind, that rashness
 Is the worst evil of this mortal state.               [_Exit_ EURYDICE
 
 CH. What augur ye from this? The queen is gone
 Without word spoken either good or bad.
 
 MESS. I, too, am struck with dread. But hope consoles me,
 That having heard the affliction of her son,
 Her pride forbids to publish her lament
 Before the town, but to her maids within
 She will prescribe to mourn the loss of the house.
 She is too tried in judgement to do ill.
 
 CH. I cannot tell. The extreme of silence, too,
 Is dangerous, no less than much vain noise.
 
 MESS. Well, we may learn, if there be aught unseen
 Suppressed within her grief-distempered soul,
 By going within the palace. Ye say well:
 There is a danger, even in too much silence.
 
 CH. Ah! look where sadly comes our lord the King,
 Bearing upon his arm a monument--
 If we may speak it--of no foreign woe,
 But of his own infirmity the fruit.
 
 _Enter_ CREON _with the body of_ HAEMON.
 
 CR. O error of my insensate soul,                                  I 1
 Stubborn, and deadly in the fateful end!
 O ye who now behold
 Slayer and slain of the same kindred blood!
 O bitter consequence of seeming-wise decree!
 Alas, my son!
 Strange to the world wert thou, and strange the fate
 That took thee off, that slew thee; woe is me!
 Not for thy rashness, but my folly. Ah me!
 
 CH. Alas for him who sees the right too late!
 
 CR. Alas!
 I have learnt it now. But then upon my head
 Some God had smitten with dire weight of doom;
 And plunged me in a furious course, woe is me!
 Discomforting and trampling on my joy.
 Woe! for the bitterness of mortal pain!
 
 _Enter_ 2nd Messenger.
 
 2ND MESS. My lord and master. Thou art master here
 Of nought but sorrows. One within thine arms
 Thou bear'st with thee, and in thy palace hall
 Thou hast possession of another grief,
 Which soon thou shalt behold.
 
 CR.                           What more of woe,
 Or what more woeful, sounds anew from thee?
 
 2ND MESS. The honoured mother of that corse, thy queen,
 Is dead, and bleeding with a new-given wound.
 
 CR. O horrible! O charnel gulf                                     I 2
 Of death on death, not to be done away,
 Why harrowest thou my soul?
 Ill boding harbinger of woe, what word
 Have thy lips uttered? Oh, thou hast killed me again,
 Before undone!
 What say'st? What were thy tidings? Woe is me!
 Saidst thou a slaughtered queen in yonder hall
 Lay in her blood, crowning the pile of ruin?
 
 CH. No longer hidden in the house. Behold!
                               [_The Corpse of_ EURYDICE _is disclosed_
 
 CR. Alas!
 Again I see a new, a second woe.
 What more calamitous stroke of Destiny
 Awaits me still? But now mine arms enfold
 My child, and lo! yon corse before my face!
 Ah! hapless, hapless mother, hapless son!
 
 2ND MESS. She with keen knife before the altar place[8]
 Closed her dark orbs; but first lamented loud
 The glorious bed of buried Megareus[9],
 And then of Haemon; lastly clamoured forth
 The curse of murdered offspring upon thee.
 
 CR. Ay me! Ay me!                                                 II 1
 I am rapt with terror. Is there none to strike me
 With doubly sharpened blade a mortal blow?
 Ah! I am plunged in fathomless distress.
 
 2ND MESS. The guilt of this and of the former grief
 By this dead lady was denounced on thee.
 
 CR. Tell us, how ended she her life in blood?
 
 2ND MESS. Wounding herself to the heart, when she had heard
 The loud lamented death of Haemon here.
 
 CR. O me! This crime can come
 On no man else, exempting me.
 I slew thee--I, O misery!
 I say the truth, 'twas I! My followers,
 Take me with speed--take me away, away!
 Me, who am nothing now.
 
 CH. Thou sayest the best, if there be best in woe.
 Briefest is happiest in calamity.
 
 CR. Ah! let it come,                                              II 2
 The day, most welcome of all days to me,
 That brings the consummation of my doom.
 Come! Come! I would not see another sun.
 
 CH. Time will determine that. We must attend
 To present needs. Fate works her own dread work.
 
 CR. All my desire was gathered in my prayer.
 
 CH. But prayer is bootless. For to mortal men
 There is no saviour from appointed woe.
 
 CR. Take me away, the vain-proud man that slew
 Thee, O my son! unwittingly,--and thee!
 Me miserable, which way shall I turn,
 Which look upon? Since all that I can touch
 Is falling,--falling,--round me, and o'erhead
 Intolerable destiny descends.
 
 LEADER OF CHORUS.
 Wise conduct hath command of happiness
 Before all else, and piety to Heaven
 Must be preserved. High boastings of the proud
 Bring sorrow to the height to punish pride:--
 A lesson men shall learn when they are old.
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                                  AIAS
 
 
                              THE PERSONS
 
 ATHENA.
 ODYSSEUS.
 AIAS, _the son of Telamon._
 CHORUS _of Salaminian Mariners._
 TECMESSA.
 _A Messenger._
 TEUCER, _half brother of Aias._
 MENELAUS.
 AGAMEMNON.
 
 EURYSAKES, _the child of Aias and Tecmessa, appears, but does not
 speak._
 
 
 SCENE. Before the encampment of Aias on the shore of the Troad.
 Afterwards a lonely place beyond Rhoeteum.
 
 Time, towards the end of the Trojan War.
 
 
 
 
                   _'A wounded spirit who can bear?'_
 
 After the death of Achilles, the armour made for him by Hephaestus was
 to be given to the worthiest of the surviving Greeks. Although Aias
 was the most valiant, the judges made the award to Odysseus, because
 he was the wisest.
 
 Aias in his rage attempts to kill the generals; but Athena sends
 madness upon him, and he makes a raid upon the flocks and herds of the
 army, imagining the bulls and rams to be the Argive chiefs. On
 awakening from his delusion, he finds that he has fallen irrecoverably
 from honour and from the favour of the Greeks. He also imagines that
 the anger of Athena is unappeasable. Under this impression he eludes
 the loving eyes of his captive-bride Tecmessa, and of his Salaminian
 comrades, and falls on his sword. ('The soul and body rive not more in
 parting Than greatness going off.')
 
 But it is revealed through the prophet Calchas, that the wrath of
 Athena will last only for a day; and on the return of Teucer, Aias
 receives an honoured funeral, the tyrannical reclamations of the two
 sons of Atreus being overcome by the firm fidelity of Teucer and the
 magnanimity of Odysseus, who has been inspired for this purpose by
 Athena.
 
 
 
 
                                  AIAS
 
 
 ATHENA (_above_). ODYSSEUS.
 
 ATHENA. Oft have I seen thee, Laertiades,
 Intent on some surprisal of thy foes;
 As now I find thee by the seaward camp,
 Where Aias holds the last place in your line,
 Lingering in quest, and scanning the fresh print
 Of his late footsteps, to be certified
 If he keep house or no. Right well thy sense
 Hath led thee forth, like some keen hound of Sparta!
 The man is even but now come home, his head
 And slaughterous hands reeking with ardent toil.
 Thou, then, no longer strain thy gaze within
 Yon gateway, but declare what eager chase
 Thou followest, that a god may give thee light.
 
 ODYSSEUS. Athena, 'tis thy voice! Dearest in heaven,
 How well discerned and welcome to my soul
 From that dim distance doth thine utterance fly
 In tones as of Tyrrhenian trumpet clang!
 Rightly hast thou divined mine errand here,
 Beating this ground for Aias of the shield,
 The lion-quarry whom I track to day.
 For he hath wrought on us to night a deed
 Past thought--if he be doer of this thing;
 We drift in ignorant doubt, unsatisfied--
 And I unbidden have bound me to this toil.
 
   Brief time hath flown since suddenly we knew
 That all our gathered spoil was reaved and slaughtered,
 Flocks, herds, and herdmen, by some human hand,
 All tongues, then, lay this deed at Aias' door.
 And one, a scout who had marked him, all alone,
 With new-fleshed weapon bounding o'er the plain,
 Gave me to know it, when immediately
 I darted on the trail, and here in part
 I find some trace to guide me, but in part
 I halt, amazed, and know not where to look.
 Thou com'st full timely. For my venturous course,
 Past or to come, is governed by thy will.
 
 ATH. I knew thy doubts, Odysseus, and came forth
 Zealous to guard thy perilous hunting-path.
 
 OD. Dear Queen! and am I labouring to an end?
 
 ATH. Thou schem'st not idly. This is Aias' deed.
 
 OD. What can have roused him to a work so wild?
 
 ATH. His grievous anger for Achilles' arms.
 
 OD. But wherefore on the flock this violent raid?
 
 ATH. He thought to imbrue his hands with your heart's blood.
 
 OD. What? Was this planned against the Argives, then?
 
 ATH. Planned, and performed, had I kept careless guard.
 
 OD. What daring spirit, what hardihood, was here!
 
 ATH. Alone by night in craft he sought your tents.
 
 OD. How? Came he near them? Won he to his goal?
 
 ATH. He stood in darkness at the generals' gates.
 
 OD. What then restrained his eager hand from murder?
 
 ATH. I turned him backward from his baleful joy,
 And overswayed him with blind phantasies,
 To swerve against the flocks and well-watched herd
 Not yet divided from the public booty.
 There plunging in he hewed the horned throng,
 And with him Havoc ranged: while now he thought
 To kill the Atreidae with hot hand, now this
 Now that commander, as the fancy grew.
 I, joining with the tumult of his mind,
 Flung the wild victim on the fatal net.
 Anon, this toil being overpast, he draws
 The living oxen and the panting sheep
 With cords to his home, not as a horned prey,
 But as in triumph marshalling his foes:
 Whom now he tortures in their bonds within.
   Come, thou shalt see this madness in clear day,
 And tell to the Argives all I show thee here
 Only stand firm and shrink not, I will turn
 His eyes askance, not to distinguish thee,
 Fear nought--Ho! thou that bindest to thy will
 The limbs of those thy captives, come thou forth!
 Aias! advance before thy palace gate!
 
 OD. My Queen! what dost thou? Never call him forth.
 
 ATH. Hush, hush! Be not so timorous, but endure.
 
 OD. Nay, nay! Enough. He is there, and let him bide.
 
 ATH. What fear you? Dates his valour from to day?
 
 OD. He was and is my valiant enemy.
 
 ATH. Then is not laughter sweetest o'er a foe?
 
 OD. No more! I care not he should pass abroad.
 
 ATH. You flinch from seeing the madman in full view.
 
 OD. When sane, I ne'er had flinched before his face.
 
 ATH. Well, but even now he shall not know thee near.
 
 OD. How, if his eyes be not transformed or lost?
 
 ATH. I will confound his sense although he see.
 
 OD. Well, nothing is too hard for Deity.
 
 ATH. Stand still and keep thy place without a word.
 
 OD. I must. Would I were far away from here!
 
 ATH. Aias! Again I summon thee. Why pay
 So scanty heed to her who fights for thee?
 
 _Enter_ AIAS _with a bloody scourge._
 
 AIAS. Hail, offspring of the Highest! Pallas, hail!
 Well hast thou stood by me. Triumphal gold
 Shall crown thy temple for this lordly prey.
 
 ATH. A fair intention! But resolve me this:
 Hast dyed thy falchion deep in Argive blood?
 
 AI. There is my boast; that charge I'll ne'er deny.
 
 ATH. Have Atreus' sons felt thy victorious might?
 
 AI. They have. No more they'll make a scorn of me!
 
 ATH. I take it, then, they are dead.
 
 AI.                                  Ay, now they are dead,
 Let them arise and rob me of mine arms!
 
 ATH. Good. Next inform us of Laertes' son;
 How stands his fortune? Hast thou let him go?
 
 AI. The accursed fox! Dost thou inquire of him?
 
 ATH. Ay, of Odysseus, thy late adversary.
 
 AI. He sits within, dear lady, to my joy,
 Bound; for I mean him not just yet to die.
 
 ATH. What fine advantage wouldst thou first achieve?
 
 AI. First, tie him to a pillar of my hall--
 
 ATH. Poor wretch! What torment wilt thou wreak on him?
 
 AI. Then stain his back with scourging till he die.
 
 ATH. Nay, 'tis too much. Poor caitiff! Not the scourge!
 
 AI. Pallas, in all things else have thou thy will,
 But none shall wrest Odysseus from this doom.
 
 ATH. Well, since thou art determined on the deed,
 Spare nought of thine intent: indulge thy hand!
 
 AI. (_waving the bloody scourge_).
 I go! But thou, I charge thee, let thine aid
 Be evermore like valiant as to-day.                            [_Exit_
 
 ATH. The gods are strong, Odysseus. Dost thou see?
 What man than Aias was more provident,
 Or who for timeliest action more approved?
 
 OD. I know of none. But, though he hates me sore,
 I pity him, poor mortal, thus chained fast
 To a wild and cruel fate,--weighing not so much
 His fortune as mine own. For now I feel
 All we who live are but an empty show
 And idle pageant of a shadowy dream.
 
 ATH. Then, warned by what thou seest, be thou not rash
 To vaunt high words toward Heaven, nor swell thy port
 Too proudly, if in puissance of thy hand
 Thou passest others, or in mines of wealth.
 Since Time abases and uplifts again
 All that is human, and the modest heart
 Is loved by Heaven, who hates the intemperate will.          [_Exeunt_
 
 CHORUS (_entering_).
       Telamonian child, whose hand
       Guards our wave-encircled land,
       Salamis that breasts the sea,
       Good of thine is joy to me;
       But if One who reigns above
       Smite thee, or if murmurs move
       From fierce Danaaens in their hate
       Full of threatening to thy state,
       All my heart for fear doth sigh,
       Shrinking like a dove's soft eye.
 
       Hardly had the darkness waned,                 [_Half-Chorus I._
       When our ears were filled and pained
       With huge scandal on thy fame.
       Telling, thine the arm that came
       To the cattle-browsed mead,
       Wild with prancing of the steed,
       And that ravaged there and slew
       With a sword of fiery hue
       All the spoils that yet remain,
       By the sweat of spearmen ta'en.
 
       Such report against thy life,                 [_Half-Chorus II._
       Whispered words with falsehood rife,
       Wise Odysseus bringing near
       Shrewdly gaineth many an ear:
       Since invention against thee
       Findeth hearing speedily,
       Tallying with the moment's birth;
       And with loudly waxing mirth
       Heaping insult on thy grief,
       Each who hears it glories more
       Than the tongue that told before.
       Every slander wins belief
       Aimed at souls whose worth is chief:
       Shot at me, or one so small,
       Such a bolt might harmless fall.
       Ever toward the great and high
       Creepeth climbing jealousy
       Yet the low without the tall
       Make at need a tottering wall
       Let the strong the feeble save
       And the mean support the brave.
 
 CHORUS
       Ah! 'twere vain to tune such song
       'Mid the nought discerning throng
       Who are clamouring now 'gainst thee
       Long and loud, and strengthless we,
       Mighty chieftain, thou away,
       To withstand the gathering fray
       Flocking fowl with carping cry
       Seem they, lurking from thine eye,
       Till the royal eagle's poise
       Overawe the paltry noise
       Till before thy presence hushed
       Sudden sink they, mute and crushed.
 
 Did bull slaying Artemis, Zeus' cruel daughter                     I 1
   (Ah, fearful rumour, fountain of my shame!)
 Prompt thy fond heart to this disastrous slaughter
   Of the full herd stored in our army's name!
 Say, had her blood stained temple[1] missed the kindness
   Of some vow promised fruit of victory,
 Foiled of some glorious armour through thy blindness,
   Or fell some stag ungraced by gift from thee?
 Or did stern Ares venge his thankless spear
 Through this night foray that hath cost thee dear!
 
 For never, if thy heart were not distracted                        I 2
   By stings from Heaven, O child of Telamon,
 Wouldst thou have bounded leftward, to have acted
   Thus wildly, spoiling all our host hath won!
 Madness might fall some heavenly power forfend it
   But if Odysseus and the tyrant lords
 Suggest a forged tale, O rise to end it,
   Nor fan the fierce flame of their withering words!
 Forth from thy tent, and let thine eye confound
 The brood of Sisyphus[2] that would thee wound!
 
 Too long hast thou been fixed in grim repose,                      III
   Heightening the haughty malice of thy foes,
 That, while thou porest by the sullen sea,
   Through breezy glades advanceth fearlessly,
 A mounting blaze with crackling laughter fed
 From myriad throats; whence pain and sorrow bred
 Within my bosom are established.
 
 _Enter_ TECMESSA.
 
 TECMESSA. Helpers of Aias' vessel's speed,
 Erechtheus' earth-derived seed,
 Sorrows are ours who truly care
 For the house of Telamon afar.
 The dread, the grand, the rugged form
       Of him we know,
 Is stricken with a troublous storm;
     Our Aias' glory droopeth low.
 
 CHORUS. What burden through the darkness fell
 Where still at eventide 'twas well?
 Phrygian Teleutas' daughter, say;
 Since Aias, foremost in the fray,
 Disdaining not the spear-won bride,
 Still holds thee nearest at his side,
 And thou may'st solve our doubts aright.
 
 TEC. How shall I speak the dreadful word?
 How shall ye live when ye have heard?
 Madness hath seized our lord by night
 And blasted him with hopeless blight.
 Such horrid victims mightst thou see
 Huddled beneath yon canopy,
 Torn by red hands and dyed in blood,
 Dread offerings to his direful mood.
 
 CH. What news of our fierce lord thy story showeth,                  1
     Sharp to endure, impossible to fly!
 News that on tongues of Danaaens hourly groweth,
     Which Rumour's myriad voices multiply!
 Alas! the approaching doom awakes my terror.
     The man will die, disgraced in open day,
 Whose dark dyed steel hath dared through mad brained error
     The mounted herdmen with their herds to slay.
 
 TEC. O horror! Then 'twas there he found
       The flock he brought as captives tied,
     And some he slew upon the ground,
       And some, side smiting, sundered wide
     Two white foot rams he backward drew,
     And bound. Of one he shore and threw
     The tipmost tongue and head away,
     The other to an upright stay
     He tied, and with a harness thong
       Doubled in hand, gave whizzing blows,
     Echoing his lashes with a song
       More dire than mortal fury knows.
 
 CH. Ah! then 'tis time, our heads in mantles hiding,                 2
     Our feet on some stol'n pathway now to ply,
 Or with swift oarage o'er the billows gliding,
     With ordered stroke to make the good ship fly
 Such threats the Atridae, armed with two fold power,
     Launch to assail us. Oh, I sadly fear
 Stones from fierce hands on us and him will shower,
     Whose heavy plight no comfort may come near.
 
 TEC. 'Tis changed, his rage, like sudden blast,
     Without the lightning gleam is past
     And now that Reason's light returns,
     New sorrow in his spirit burns.
     For when we look on self made woe,
       In which no hand but ours had part,
     Thought of such griefs and whence they flow
       Brings aching misery to the heart.
 
 CH. If he hath ceased to rave, he should do well
 The account of evil lessens when 'tis past.
 
 TEC. If choice were given you, would you rather choose
 Hurting your friends, yourself to feel delight,
 Or share with them in one commingled pain?
 
 CH. The two fold trouble is more terrible.
 
 TEC. Then comes our torment now the fit is o'er.
 
 CH. How mean'st thou by that word? I fail to see.
 
 TEC. He in his rage had rapture of delight
 And knew not how he grieved us who stood near
 And saw the madding tempest ruining him.
 But now 'tis over and he breathes anew,
 The counterblast of sorrow shakes his soul,
 Whilst our affliction vexeth as before,
 Have we not double for our single woe?
 
 CH. I feel thy reasoning move me, and I fear
 Some heavenly stroke hath fallen. How else, when the end
 Of stormy sickness brings no cheering ray?
 
 TEC. Our state is certain. Dream not but 'tis so.
 
 CH. How first began the assault of misery?
 Tell us the trouble, for we share the pain.
 
 TEC. It toucheth you indeed, and ye shall hear
 All from the first. 'Twas midnight, and the lamp
 Of eve had died, when, seizing his sharp blade,
 He sought on some vain errand to creep forth.
 I broke in with my word: 'Aias, what now?
 Why thus uncalled for salliest thou? No voice
 Of herald summoned thee. No trumpet blew.
 What wouldst thou when the camp is hushed in sleep?'
 He with few words well known to women's ears
 Checked me: 'The silent partner is the best.'
 I saw how 'twas and ceased. Forth then he fared
 Alone--What horror passed upon the plain
 This night, I know not. But he drags within,
 Tied in a throng, bulls, shepherd dogs, and spoil
 Of cattle and sheep. Anon he butchers them,
 Felling or piercing, hacking or tearing wide,
 Ribs from breast, limb from limb. Others in rage
 He seized and bound and tortured, brutes for men.
 Last, out he rushed before the doors, and there
 Whirled forth wild language to some shadowy form,
 Flouting the generals and Laertes' son
 With torrent laughter and loud triumphing
 What in his raid he had wreaked to their despite.
 Then diving back within--the fitful storm
 Slowly assuaging left his spirit clear.
 And when his eye had lightened through the room
 Cumbered with ruin, smiting on his brow
 He roared; and, tumbling down amid the wreck
 Of woolly carnage he himself had made,
 Sate with clenched hand tight twisted in his hair.
 Long stayed he so in silence. Then flashed forth
 Those frightful words of threatening vehemence,
 That bade me show him all the night's mishap,
 And whither he was fallen I, dear my friends,
 Prevailed on through my fear, told all I knew.
 And all at once he raised a bitter cry,
 Which heretofore I ne'er had heard, for still
 He made us think such doleful utterance
 Betokened the dull craven spirit, and still
 Dumb to shrill wailings, he would only moan
 With half heard muttering, like an angry bull.
 But now, by such dark fortune overpowered,
 Foodless and dry, amid the quivering heap
 His steel hath quelled, all quietly he broods;
 And out of doubt his mind intends some harm:
 Such words, such groans, burst from him. O my friends.--
 Therefore I hastened,--enter and give aid
 If aught ye can! Men thus forgone will oft
 Grow milder through the counsel of a friend.
 
 CH. Teleutas' child! we shudder at thy tale
 That fatal frenzy wastes our hero's soul.
 
 AIAS (_within_). Woe's me, me, me!
 
 TEC. More cause anon! Hear ye not Aias there,
 How sharp the cry that shrills from him?
 
 AI.                                      Woe! Woe!
 
 CH. Madly it sounds--Or springs it of deep grief
 For proofs of madness harrowing to his eye?
 
 AI. Boy, boy!
 
 TEC.          What means he? Oh, Eurysakes!
 He cries on thee. Where art thou? O my heart!
 
 AI. Teucer I call! Where 's Teucer? Will he ne'er
 Come from the chase, but leave me to my doom?
 
 CH. Not madness now. Disclose him. Let us look.
 Haply the sight of us may calm his soul.
 
 TEC. There, then; I open to your view the form
 Of Aias, and his fortunes as they are.           [AIAS _is discovered_
 
 AI. Dear comrades of the deep, whose truth and love                I 1
     Stand forth alone unbroken in my woe,
         Behold what gory sea
         Of storm-lashed agony
     Doth round and round me flow!
 
 CH. (_to_ TEC.) Too true thy witness: for the fact cries out
 Wild thoughts were here and Reason's lamp extinct.
 
 AI. Strong helpers of sea-speed, whose nimble hand                 I 2
     Plied hither the salt oar with circling stroke,
         No shepherd there was found
         To give the avenging wound.
     Come, lay me with the flock!
 
 CH. Speak no rash word! nor curing ill with ill
 Augment the plague of this calamity.
 
 AI.     Mark ye the brave and bold,                               II 1
         Whom none could turn of old,
     When once he set his face to the fierce fight?
         Now beasts that thought no harm
         Have felt this puissant arm.
     O laughter of my foes! O mockery of my might!
 
 TEC. Aias, my lord! I entreat thee, speak not so!
 
 AI. Thou here! Away! begone, and trouble me not!
 O! O!
 
 CH.   Be softened! bear a steadier mind!
 
 AI. O heaven-accursed hand
       That let the ruffians go,
     But falling 'midst the horn'd and bleating band,
       Made darkling blood-streams flow!
 
 CH. Why vex thy heart with what is over and done?
 Do what we may, this ne'er will alter now.
 
 AI.     Child of Laertes old,                                     II 2
         Thou that dost still behold
     And still contrive all shapes of monstrous ill,
         Winding in foulest ways
         Through the army's sinful maze,--
     Now even for pleasure thou may'st laugh thy fill.
 
 CH. Laughter and tears are in the gift of God.
 
 AI. Ay, might I see him, though thus broken,--ay me!
 Even yet--
 
 CH. Nay, vaunt not. Look where thou art fallen.
 
 AI.   Source where my life-blood springs,
         O Zeus, might I but slay
     That crafty plague, with those twin-sceptred kings,
       Then breathe my life away!
 
 TEC. Pray thus, and pray that I too be no more!
 If thou wert gone, what were my life to me?
 
 AI. Darkness! my only light!                                     III 1
     O nether gloom, to me
     Brighter than morning to the wakeful eye!
     Take me to dwell with thee.
     Take me! What help? Zeus' daughter with fell might
     Torments me sore. I may not look on high,
     Nor to the tribe of momentary men.--
     Oh, whither, then,
     Should it avail to fly?
     Ah! whither should I go and stay?
     All here is ruin. This mad prey
     Shames me for evermore:
     Vengeance is at the door;
     Yea, all the Achaean host, with armed hand,
     Is ready at command
     To slay me o'er and o'er.
 
 TEC. Woe 's me! to hear from one so good and true
 Words he had scorned to utter in past days.
 
 AI. Grey firths of foaming brine,                                III 2
 And ye, deep groves, that crown
 The sea-caves and long cliffs upon the shore,
 Too long did ye confine
 My life about the walls of Troia's town:
 But no more now! a breathing man, no more!
 The wise in heart may duly learn that lore.
 Let Xanthus know,
 Whose waters neighbouring flow,
 And minister to Argive men:
 One man he ne'er shall see again;
 One, I will vaunt it forth!
 Highest in warlike worth
 Of all Greek forms that Troia's towers have eyed:
 Now, shorn of all that pride,
 I lie thus low.
 
 CH. I know not how to let thee speak, nor how
 To silence thee. Such evils close thee round.
 
 AI. Ay me!
            Could human thought have prophesied
 My name would thus give echo to mine ill?
 'Ai' now for Aias, doubly, trebly said,
 Sorts all too well to mark my misery;
 Whose father from this land of Troy, as noblest
 Of all the host, carrying the fairest prize,
 Came girt about with glory to his home.
 But I his son, not less of might than he,
 Nor poorer in the achievements of my hand,
 To this same region following in my prime,
 Am scouted by the Achaeans and destroyed.
 Yet know I one thing well. Had Peleus' child,
 Living, adjudged his armour as a meed
 Of well-tried bravery, no grasp save mine
 Had clutched it. But the Atridae with mean craft
 Conveyed his heirloom to a wit-proud knave,
 Whilst Aias' peerless prowess was despised.
 And had not this mine eye and mind distraught
 Glanced from my purpose, ne'er again had they
 Perverted judgement. But the invincible
 Stern daughter of the Highest, with baneful eye,
 Even as mine arm descended, baffled me,
 And hurled upon my soul a frenzied plague,
 To stain my hand with these dumb victims' blood.
 And those mine enemies exult in safety,--
 Not with my will; but where a God misguides,
 Strong arms are thwarted and the weakling lives.
   Now, what remains? Heaven hates me, 'tis too clear:
 The Grecian host abhor me: Troy, with all
 This country round our camp, is my sworn foe.
 Shall I, across the Aegean sailing home,
 Leave these Atridae and their fleet forlorn?
 How shall I dare to front my father's eye?
 How will he once endure to look on me,
 Denuded of the prize of high renown,
 Whose coronal stood sparkling on his brow?
 No! 'twere too dreadful. Then shall I advance
 Before the Trojan battlements, and there
 In single conflict doing valiantly
 Last die upon their spears? Nay, for by this
 I might perchance make Atreus' offspring glad.
 That may not be imagined. I must find
 Some act to let my grey-haired father feel
 No heartless recreant once called him sire.
 Shame on the wight who when beset with ill
 Cares to live on in misery unrelieved.
 Can hour outlasting hour make less or more
 Of death? Whereby then can it furnish joy?
 That mortal weighs for nothing-worth with me,
 Whom Hope can comfort with her fruitless fire.
 Honour in life or honour in the grave
 Befits the noble heart. You hear my will.
 
 CH. From thine own spirit, Aias, all may tell,
 That utterance came, and none have prompted thee.
 Yet stay thy hurrying thought, and by thy friends
 Be ruled to loose this burden from thy mind.
 
 TEC. O my great master! heaviest of all woe
 Is theirs whose life is crushed beyond recall.
 I, born of one the mightiest of the free
 And wealthiest in the Phrygian land, am now
 A captive. So Heaven willed, and thy strong arm
 Determined. Therefore, since the hour that made
 My being one with thine, I breathe for thee;
 And I beseech thee by the sacred fire
 Of home, and by the sweetness of the night
 When from thy captive I became thy bride,
 Leave me not guardless to the unworthy touch
 And cruel taunting of thine enemies'
 For, shouldst thou die and leave us, then shall I
 Borne off by Argive violence with thy boy
 Eat from that day the bread of slavery.
 And some one of our lords shall smite me there
 With galling speech: Behold the concubine
 Of Aias, first of all the Greeks for might,
 How envied once, worn with what service now!
 So will they speak; and while my quailing heart
 Shall sink beneath its burden, clouds of shame
 Will dim thy glory and degrade thy race.
 Oh! think but of thy father, left to pine
 In doleful age, and let thy mother's grief--
 Who, long bowed down with many a careful year,
 Prays oftentimes thou may'st return alive--
 O'er awe thee. Yea, and pity thine own son,
 Unsheltered in his boyhood, lorn of thee,
 With bitter foes to tend his orphanhood,
 Think, O my lord, what sorrow in thy death
 Thou send'st on him and me. For I have nought
 To lean to but thy life. My fatherland
 Thy spear hath ruined. Fate--not thou--hath sent
 My sire and mother to the home of death
 What wealth have I to comfort me for thee?
 What land of refuge? Thou art all my stay
 Oh, of me too take thought! Shall men have joy,
 And not remember? Or shall kindness fade?
 Say, can the mind be noble, where the stream
 Of gratitude is withered from the spring?
 
 CH. Aias, I would thy heart were touched like mine
 With pity; then her words would win thy praise.
 
 AI. My praise she shall not miss, if she perform
 My bidding with firm heart, and fail not here.
 
 TEC. Dear Aias, I will fail in nought thou bidst me.
 
 AI. Bring me my boy, that I may see his face.
 
 TEC. Oh, in my terror I conveyed him hence!
 
 AI. Clear of this mischief, mean'st thou? or for what?
 
 TEC. Lest he might run to thee, poor child, and die.
 
 AI. That issue had been worthy of my fate!
 
 TEC. But I kept watch to fence his life from harm.
 
 AI. 'Twas wisely done. I praise thy foresight there.
 
 TEC. Well, since 'tis so, how can I help thee now?
 
 AI. Give me to speak to him and see him near.
 
 TEC. He stands close by with servants tending him.
 
 AI. Then why doth he not come, but still delay?
 
 TEC. Thy father calls thee, child. Come, lead him hither,
 Whichever of you holds him by the hand.
 
 AI. Moves he? or do thine accents idly fall?
 
 TEC. See, where thy people bring him to thine eye.
 
 AI. Lift him to me: lift him! He will not fear
 At sight of this fresh havoc of the sword,
 If rightly he be fathered of my blood.
 Like some young colt he must be trained and taught
 To run fierce courses with his warrior sire.
 Be luckier than thy father, boy! but else
 Be like him, and thy life will not be low.
 One thing even now I envy thee, that none
 Of all this misery pierces to thy mind.
 For life is sweetest in the void of sense,
 Ere thou know joy or sorrow. But when this
 Hath found thee, make thy father's enemies
 Feel the great parent in the valiant child.
 Meantime grow on in tender youthfulness,
 Nursed by light breezes, gladdening this thy mother.
 No Greek shall trample thee with brutal harm,
 That I know well, though I shall not be near--
 So stout a warder to protect thy life
 I leave in Teucer. He'll not fail, though now
 He follow far the chase upon his foes.
 My trusty warriors, people of the sea,
 Be this your charge, no less,--and bear to him
 My clear commandment, that he take this boy
 Home to my fatherland, and make him known
 To Telamon, and Eriboea too,
 My mother. Let him tend them in their age.
 And, for mine armour, let not that be made
 The award of Grecian umpires or of him
 Who ruined me. But thou, named of the shield[3],
 Eurysakes, hold mine, the unpierceable
 Seven-hided buckler, and by the well stitched thong
 Grasp firm and wield it mightily.--The rest
 Shall lie where I am buried.--Take him now,
 Quickly, and close the door. No tears! What! weep
 Before the tent? How women crave for pity!
 Make fast, I say. No wise physician dreams
 With droning charms to salve a desperate sore.
 
 CH. There sounds a vehement ardour in thy words
 That likes me not. I fear thy sharpened tongue.
 
 TEC. Aias, my lord, what act is in thy mind?
 
 AI. Inquire not, question not; be wise, thou'rt best.
 
 TEC. How my heart sinks! Oh, by thy child, by Heaven,
 I pray thee on my knees, forsake us not!
 
 AI. Thou troublest me. What! know'st thou not that Heaven
 Hath ceased to be my debtor from to-day?
 
 TEC. Hush! Speak not so.
 
 AI.                      Speak thou to those that hear.
 
 TEC. Will you not hear me?
 
 AI.                        Canst thou not be still?
 
 TEC. My fears, my fears!
 
 AI. (_to the_ Attendants). Come, shut me in, I say.
 
 TEC. Oh, yet be softened!
 
 AI.                       'Tis a foolish hope,
 If thou deem'st now to mould me to thy will.
                                    [Aias _is withdrawn. Exit_ Tecmessa
 
 CHORUS.
 Island of glory! whom the glowing eyes                             I 1
 Of all the wondering world immortalize,
 Thou, Salamis, art planted evermore,
 Happy amid the wandering billows' roar;
 While I--ah, woe the while!--this weary time,
   By the green wold where flocks from Ida stray,
 Lie worn with fruitless hours of wasted prime,
   Hoping--ah, cheerless hope!--to win my way
 Where Hades' horrid gloom shall hide me from the day.
 
 Aias is with me, yea, but crouching low,                           I 2
 Where Heaven-sent madness haunts his overthrow,
 Beyond my cure or tendance: woful plight!
 Whom thou, erewhile, to head the impetuous fight,
 Sent'st forth, thy conquering champion. Now he feeds
   His spirit on lone paths, and on us brings
 Deep sorrow; and all his former peerless deeds
 Of prowess fall like unremembered things
 From Atreus' loveless brood, this caitiff brace of kings.
 
 Ah! when his mother, full of days and bowed                       II 1
 With hoary eld, shall hear his ruined mind,
       How will she mourn aloud!
 Not like the warbler of the dale,
       The bird of piteous wail,
 But in shrill strains far borne upon the wind,
 While on the withered breast and thin white hair
 Falls the resounding blow, the rending of despair.
 
 Best hid in death were he whom madness drives                     II 2
 Remediless; if, through his father's race
       Born to the noblest place
 Among the war-worn Greeks, he lives
       By his own light no more,
 Self-aliened from the self he knew before.
 Oh, hapless sire, what woe thine ear shall wound!
 One that of all thy line no life save this hath found.
 
 _Enter_ Aias _with a bright sword, and_ Tecmessa, _severally._
 
 AI. What change will never-terminable Time
 Not heave to light, what hide not from the day?
 What chance shall win men's marvel? Mightiest oaths
 Fall frustrate, and the steely-tempered will.
 Ay, and even mine, that stood so diamond-keen
 Like iron lately dipped, droops now dis-edged
 And weakened by this woman, whom to leave
 A widow with her orphan to my foes,
 Dulls me with pity. I will go to the baths
 And meadows near the cliff, and purging there
 My dark pollution, I will screen my soul
 From reach of Pallas' grievous wrath. I will find
 Same place untrodden, and digging of the soil
 Where none shall see, will bury this my sword,
 Weapon of hate! for Death and Night to hold
 Evermore underground. For, since my hand
 Had this from Hector mine arch-enemy,
 No kindness have I known from Argive men.
 So true that saying of the bygone world,
 'A foe's gift is no gift, and brings no good.'
   Well, we will learn of Time. Henceforth I'll bow
 To heavenly ordinance and give homage due
 To Atreus' sons. Who rules, must be obeyed.
 Since nought so fierce and terrible but yields
 Place to Authority. Wild Winter's snows
 Make way for bounteous Summer's flowery tread,
 And Night's sad orb retires for lightsome Day
 With his white steeds to illumine the glad sky.
 The furious storm-blast leaves the groaning sea
 Gently to rest. Yea, the all-subduer Sleep
 Frees whom he binds, nor holds enchained for aye.
 And shall not men be taught the temperate will?
 Yea, for I now know surely that my foe
 Must be so hated, as being like enough
 To prove a friend hereafter, and my friend
 So far shall have mine aid, as one whose love
 Will not continue ever. Men have found
 But treacherous harbour in companionship.
   Our ending, then, is peaceful. Thou, my girl,
 Go in and pray the Gods my heart's desire
 Be all fulfilled. My comrades, join her here,
 Honouring my wishes; and if Teucer come,
 Bid him toward us be mindful, kind toward you.
 I must go--whither I must go. Do ye
 But keep my word, and ye may learn, though now
 Be my dark hour, that all with me is well.
                        [_Exit towards the country._ Tecmessa _retires_
 
 CHORUS.
 A shudder of love thrills through me. Joy! I soar                    1
       O Pan, wild Pan!                                   [_They dance_
       Come from Cyllene hoar--
 Come from the snow drift, the rock-ridge, the glen!
       Leaving the mountain bare
       Fleet through the salt sea-air,
 Mover of dances to Gods and to men.
 Whirl me in Cnossian ways--thrid me the Nysian maze!
 Come, while the joy of the dance is my care!
       Thou too, Apollo, come
       Bright from thy Delian home,
           Bringer of day,
       Fly o'er the southward main
       Here in our hearts to reign,
 Loved to repose there and kindly to stay.
 
 Horror is past. Our eyes have rest from pain.                        2
         O Lord of Heaven!                                [_They dance_
         Now blithesome day again
 Purely may smile on our swift-sailing fleet,
         Since, all his woe forgot,
         Aias now faileth not
 Aught that of prayer and Heaven-worship is meet.
 Time bringeth mighty aid--nought but in time doth fade:
 Nothing shall move me as strange to my thought.
         Aias our lord hath now
         Cleared his wrath-burdened brow
           Long our despair,
         Ceased from his angry feud
         And with mild heart renewed
 Peace and goodwill to the high-sceptred pair.
 
 _Enter_ Messenger.
 
 MESSENGER. Friends, my first news is Teucer's presence here,
 Fresh from the Mysian heights; who, as he came
 Right toward the generals' quarter, was assailed
 With outcry from the Argives in a throng:
 For when they knew his motion from afar
 They swarmed around him, and with shouts of blame
 From each side one and all assaulted him
 As brother to the man who had gone mad
 And plotted 'gainst the host,--threatening aloud,
 Spite of his strength, he should be stoned, and die.
 --So far strife ran, that swords unscabbarded
 Crossed blades, till as it mounted to the height
 Age interposed with counsel, and it fell.
   But where is Aias to receive my word?
 Tidings are best told to the rightful ear.
 
 CH. Not in the hut, but just gone forth, preparing
 New plans to suit his newly altered mind.
 
 MESS. Alas!
 Too tardy then was he who sped me hither;
 Or I have proved too slow a messenger.
 
 CH. What point is lacking for thine errand's speed?
 
 MESS. Teucer was resolute the man should bide
 Close held within-doors till himself should come.
 
 CH. Why, sure his going took the happiest turn
 And wisest, to propitiate Heaven's high wrath.
 
 MESS. The height of folly lives in such discourse,
 If Calchas have the wisdom of a seer.
 
 CH. What knowest thou of our state? What saith he? Tell.
 
 MESS. I can tell only what I heard and saw.
 Whilst all the chieftains and the Atridae twain
 Were seated in a ring, Calchas alone
 Rose up and left them, and in Teucer's palm
 Laid his right hand full friendly; then out-spake
 With strict injunction by all means i' the world
 To keep beneath yon covert this one day
 Your hero, and not suffer him to rove,
 If he would see him any more alive.
 For through this present light--and ne'er again---
 Holy Athena, so he said, will drive him
 Before her anger. Such calamitous woe
 Strikes down the unprofitable growth that mounts
 Beyond his measure and provokes the sky.
 'Thus ever,' said the prophet, 'must he fall
 Who in man's mould hath thoughts beyond a man.
 And Aias, ere he left his father's door,
 Made foolish answer to his prudent sire.
   'My son,' said Telamon, 'choose victory
 Always, but victory with an aid from Heaven.'
 How loftily, how madly, he replied!
 'Father, with heavenly help men nothing worth
 May win success. But I am confident
 Without the Gods to pluck this glory down.'
 So huge the boast he vaunted! And again
 When holy Pallas urged him with her voice
 To hurl his deadly spear against the foe,
 He turned on her with speech of awful sound:
   'Goddess, by other Greeks take thou thy stand;
 Where I keep rank, the battle ne'er shall break.'
 Such words of pride beyond the mortal scope
 Have won him Pallas' wrath, unlovely meed.
 But yet, perchance, so be it he live to-day,
 We, with Heaven's succour, may restore his peace.'--
 Thus far the prophet, when immediately
 Teucer dispatched me, ere the assembly rose,
 Bearing to thee this missive to be kept
 With all thy care. But if my speed be lost,
 And Calchas' word have power, the man is dead.
 
 CH. O trouble-tost Tecmessa, born to woe,
 Come forth and see what messenger is here!
 This news bites near the bone, a death to joy.
 
 _Enter_ TECMESSA.
 
 TEC. Wherefore again, when sorrow's cruel storm
 Was just abating, break ye my repose?
 
 CH. (_pointing to the_ Messenger).
 Hear what he saith, and how he comes to bring
 News of our Aias that hath torn my heart.
 
 TEC. Oh me! what is it, man? Am I undone?
 
 MESS. Thy case I know not; but of Aias this,
 That if he roam abroad, 'tis dangerous.
 
 TEC. He is, indeed, abroad. Oh! tell me quickly!
 
 MESS. 'Tis Teucer's strong command to keep him close
 Beneath this roof, nor let him range alone.
 
 TEC. But where is Teucer? and what means his word?
 
 MESS. Even now at hand, and eager to make known
 That Aias, if he thus go forth, must fall.
 
 TEC. Alas! my misery! Whence learned he this?
 
 MESS. From Thestor's prophet-offspring, who to-day
 Holds forth to Aias choice of life or death.
 
 TEC. Woe's me! O friends, this desolating blow
 Is falling! Oh, stand forward to prevent!
 And some bring Teucer with more haste, while some
 Explore the western bays and others search
 Eastward to find your hero's fatal path!
 For well I see I am cheated and cast forth
 From the old favour. Child, what shall I do?   [_Looking at_ EURYSAKES
 We must not stay. I too will fare along,
 go far as I have power. Come, let us go.
 Bestir ye! 'Tis no moment to sit still,
 If we would save him who now speeds to die.
 
 CH. I am ready. Come! Fidelity of foot,
 And swift performance, shall approve me true.          [_Exeunt omnes_
 
 _The scene changes to a lonely wooded spot._
 
 AIAS (_discovered alone_).
 The sacrificer stands prepared,--and when
 More keen? Let me take time for thinking, too!
 This gift of Hector, whom of stranger men
 I hated most with heart and eyes, is set
 In hostile Trojan soil, with grinding hone
 Fresh-pointed, and here planted by my care
 Thus firm, to give me swift and friendly death.
 Fine instrument, so much for thee! Then, first,
 Thou, for 'tis meet, great Father, lend thine aid.
 For no great gift I sue thee. Let some voice
 Bear Teucer the ill news, that none but he
 May lift my body, newly fallen in death
 About my bleeding sword, ere I be spied
 By some of those who hate me, and be flung
 To dogs and vultures for an outcast prey.
 So far I entreat thee, Lord of Heaven. And thou,
 Hermes, conductor of the shadowy dead,
 Speed me to rest, and when with this sharp steel
 I have cleft a sudden passage to my heart,
 At one swift bound waft me to painless slumber!
 But most be ye my helpers, awful Powers,
 Who know no blandishments, but still perceive
 All wicked deeds i' the world--strong, swift, and sure,
 Avenging Furies, understand my wrong,
 See how my life is ruined, and by whom.
 Come, ravin on Achaean flesh--spare none;
 Rage through the camp!--Last, thou that driv'st thy course
 Up yon steep Heaven, thou Sun, when thou behold'st
 My fatherland, checking thy golden rein,
 Report my fall, and this my fatal end,
 To my old sire, and the poor soul who tends him.
 Ah, hapless one! when she shall hear this word,
 How she will make the city ring with woe!
   'Twere from the business idly to condole.
 To work, then, and dispatch. O Death! O Death!
 Now come, and welcome! Yet with thee, hereafter,
 I shall find close communion where I go.
 But unto thee, fresh beam of shining Day,
 And thee, thou travelling Sun-god, I may speak
 Now, and no more for ever. O fair light!
 O sacred fields of Salamis my home!
 Thou, firm set natal hearth: Athens renowned,
 And ye her people whom I love; O rivers,
 Brooks, fountains here--yea, even the Trojan plain
 I now invoke!--kind fosterers, farewell!
 This one last word from Aias peals to you:
 Henceforth my speech will be with souls unseen.  [_Falls on his sword_
 
 CHORUS (_re-entering severally_).
 
 CH. A.  Toil upon toil brings toil,
         And what save trouble have I?
         Which path have I not tried?
         And never a place arrests me with its tale.
         Hark! lo, again a sound!
 
 CH. B.  'Tis we, the comrades of your good ship's crew.
 
 CH. A.  Well, sirs?
 
 CH. B.  We have trodden all the westward arm o' the bay.
 
 CH. A.  Well, have ye found?
 
 CH. B.  Troubles enow, but nought to inform our sight.
 
 CH. A.  Nor yet along the road that fronts the dawn
         Is any sign of Aias to be seen.
 
 CH. Who then will tell me, who? What hard sea-liver,                 1
         What toiling fisher in his sleepless quest,
     What Mysian nymph, what oozy Thracian river,
         Hath seen our wanderer of the tameless breast?
             Where? tell me where!
     'Tis hard that I, far-toiling voyager,
           Crossed by some evil wind,
           Cannot the haven find,
     Nor catch his form that flies me, where? ah! where?
 
 TEC. (_behind_). Oh, woe is me! woe, woe!
 
 CH. A. Who cries there from the covert of the grove?
 
 TEC. O boundless misery!
 
 CH. B. Steeped in this audible sorrow I behold
 Tecmessa, poor fate-burdened bride of war.
 
 TEC. Friends, I am spoiled, lost, ruined, overthrown!
 
 CH. A. What ails thee now?
 
 TEC. See where our Aias lies, but newly slain,
 Fallen on his sword concealed within the ground,
 
 CH.   Woe for my hopes of home!
         Aias, my lord, thou hast slain
       Thy ship-companion on the salt sea foam.
         Alas for us, and thee,
         Child of calamity!
 
 TEC. So lies our fortune. Well may'st thou complain.
 
 CH. A. Whose hand employed he for the deed of blood?
 
 TEC. His own, 'tis manifest. This planted steel,
 Fixed by his hand, gives verdict from his breast.
 
 CH.   Woe for my fault, my loss!
         Thou hast fallen in blood alone,
       And not a friend to cross
         Or guard thee. I, deaf, senseless as a stone,
 Left all undone. Oh, where, then, lies the stern
 Aias, of saddest name, whose purpose none might turn?
 
 TEC. No eye shall see him. I will veil him round
 With this all covering mantle; since no heart
 That loved him could endure to view him there,
 With ghastly expiration spouting forth
 From mouth and nostrils, and the deadly wound,
 The gore of his self slaughter. Ah, my lord!
 What shall I do? What friend will carry thee?
 Oh, where is Teucer! Timely were his hand,
 Might he come now to smooth his brother's corse.
 O thou most noble, here ignobly laid,
 Even enemies methinks must mourn thy fate!
 
 CH.   Ah! 'twas too clear thy firm knit thoughts would fashion,        2
         Early or late, an end of boundless woe!
       Such heaving groans, such bursts of heart-bruised passion,
         Midnight and morn, bewrayed the fire below.
             'The Atridae might beware!'
     A plenteous fount of pain was opened there,
             What time the strife was set,
             Wherein the noblest met,
     Grappling the golden prize that kindled thy despair!
 
 TEC. Woe, woe is me!
 
 CH. Deep sorrow wrings thy soul, I know it well.
 
 TEC. O woe, woe, woe!
 
 CH. Thou may'st prolong thy moan, and be believed,
 Thou that hast lately lost so true a friend.
 
 TEC. Thou may'st imagine; 'tis for me to know.
 
 CH. Ay, ay, 'tis true.
 
 TEC. Alas, my child! what slavish tasks and hard
 We are drifting to! What eyes control our will!
 
 CH.   Ay me! Through thy complaint
           I hear the wordless blow
       Of two high-throned, who rule without restraint
           Of Pity. Heaven forfend
           What evil they intend!
 
 TEC. The work of Heaven hath brought our life thus low.
 
 CH. 'Tis a sore burden to be laid on men.
 
 TEC. Yet such the mischief Zeus' resistless maid,
 Pallas, hath planned to make Odysseus glad.
 
 CH.   O'er that dark-featured soul
       What waves of pride shall roll,
       What floods of laughter flow,
       Rudely to greet this madness-prompted woe,
 Alas! from him who all things dares endure,
 And from that lordly pair, who hear, and seat them sure!
 
 TEC. Ay, let them laugh and revel o'er his fall!
 Perchance, albeit in life they missed him not,
 Dead, they will cry for him in straits of war.
 For dullards know not goodness in their hand,
 Nor prize the jewel till 'tis cast away.
 To me more bitter than to them 'twas sweet,
 His death to him was gladsome, for he found
 The lot he longed for, his self-chosen doom.
 What cause have they to laugh? Heaven, not their crew,
 Hath glory by his death. Then let Odysseus
 Insult with empty pride. To him and his
 Aias is nothing; but to me, to me,
 He leaves distress and sorrow in his room!
 
 TEUCER (_within_). Alas, undone!
 
 LEADER OF CH. Hush! that was Teucer's cry. Methought I heard
 His voice salute this object of dire woe.
 
 _Enter_ TEUCER.
 
 TEU. Aias, dear brother, comfort of mine eye,
 Hast thou then done even as the rumour holds?
 
 CH. Be sure of that, Teucer. He lives no more.
 
 TEU. Oh, then how heavy is the lot I bear!
 
 CH. Yes, thou hast cause--
 
 TEU.                       O rash assault of woe!--
 
 CH. To mourn full loud.
 
 TEU.                    Ay me! and where, oh where
 On Trojan earth, tell me, is this man's child?
 
 CH. Beside the huts, untended.
 
 TEU. (_to_ TEC).          Oh, with haste
 Go bring him hither, lest some enemy's hand
 Snatch him, as from the lion's widowed mate
 The lion-whelp is taken. Spare not speed.
 All soon combine in mockery o'er the dead.            [_Exit_ TECMESSA
 
 CH. Even such commands he left thee ere he died.
 As thou fulfillest by this timely care.
 
 TEU. O sorest spectacle mine eyes e'er saw!
 Woe for my journey hither, of all ways
 Most grievous to my heart, since I was ware,
 Dear Aias, of thy doom, and sadly tracked
 Thy footsteps. For there darted through the host,
 As from some God, a swift report of thee
 That thou wert lost in death. I, hapless, heard,
 And mourned even then for that whose presence kills me.
 Ay me! But come,
 Unveil. Let me behold my misery.  [_The corpse of_ AIAS _is uncovered_
 O sight unbearable! Cruelly brave!
 Dying, what store of griefs thou sow'st for me!
 Where, amongst whom of mortals, can I go,
 That stood not near thee in thy troublous hour?
 Will Telamon, my sire and thine, receive me
 With radiant countenance and favouring brow
 Returning without thee? Most like! being one
 Who smiles no more[4], yield Fortune what she may.
 Will he hide aught or soften any word,
 Rating the bastard of his spear-won thrall,
 Whose cowardice and dastardy betrayed
 Thy life, dear Aias,--or my murderous guile,
 To rob thee of thy lordship and thy home?
 Such greeting waits me from the man of wrath,
 Whose testy age even without cause would storm.
 Last, I shall leave my land a castaway,
 Thrust forth an exile, and proclaimed a slave;
 So should I fare at home. And here in Troy
 My foes are many and my comforts few.
 All these things are my portion through thy death.
 Woe's me, my heart! how shall I bear to draw thee,
 O thou ill-starr'd! from this discoloured blade,
 Thy self-shown slayer? Didst thou then perceive
 Dead Hector was at length to be thine end?--
 I pray you all, consider these two men.
 Hector, whose gift from Aias was a girdle,
 Tight-braced therewith to the car's rim, was dragged
 And scarified till he breathed forth his life.
 And Aias with this present from his foe
 Finds through such means his death-fall and his doom.
 Say then what cruel workman forged the gifts,
 But Fury this sharp sword, Hell that bright band?
 In this, and all things human, I maintain,
 Gods are the artificers. My thought is said.
 And if there be who cares not for my thought,
 Let him hold fast his faith and leave me mine.
 
 CH. Spare longer speech, and think how to secure
 Thy brother's burial, and what plea will serve;
 Since one comes here hath no good will to us
 And like a villain haply comes in scorn.
 
 TEU. What man of all the host hath caught thine eye?
 
 CH. The cause for whom we sailed, the Spartan King.
 
 TEU. Yes; I discern him, now he moves more near.
 
 _Enter_ MENELAUS.
 
 MENELAUS. Fellow, give o'er. Cease tending yon dead man!
 Obey my voice, and leave him where he lies.
 
 TEU. Thy potent cause for spending so much breath?
 
 MEN. My will, and his whose word is sovereign here.
 
 TEU. May we not know the reasons of your will?
 
 MEN. Because he, whom we trusted to have brought
 To lend us loyal help with heart and hand,
 Proved in the trial a worse than Phrygian foe;
 Who lay in wait for all the host by night,
 And sallied forth in arms to shed our blood;
 That, had not one in Heaven foiled this attempt,
 Our lot had been to lie as he doth here
 Dead and undone for ever, while he lived
 And flourished. Heaven hath turned this turbulence
 To fall instead upon the harmless flock.
 Wherefore no strength of man shall once avail
 To encase his body with a seemly tomb,
 But outcast on the wide and watery sand,
 He'll feed the birds that batten on the shore.
 Nor let thy towering spirit therefore rise
 In threatening wrath. Wilt thou or not, our hand
 Shall rule him dead, howe'er he braved us living,
 And that by force; for never would he yield,
 Even while he lived, to words from me. And yet
 It shows base metal when the subject-wight
 Deigns not to hearken to the chief in power.
 Since without settled awe, neither in states
 Can laws have rightful sway, nor can a host
 Be governed with due wisdom, if no fear
 Or wholesome shame be there to shield its safety.
 And though a man wax great in thews and bulk,
 Let him be warned: a trifling harm may ruin him.
 Whoever knows respect and honour both
 Stands free from risk of dark vicissitude.
 But whereso pride and licence have their fling,
 Be sure that state will one day lose her course
 And founder in the abysm. Let fear have place
 Still where it ought, say I, nor let men think
 To do their pleasure and not bide the pain.
 That wheel comes surely round. Once Aias flamed
 With insolent fierceness. Now I mount in pride,
 And loudly bid thee bury him not, lest burying
 Thy brother thou be burrowing thine own grave.
 
 CH. Menelaues, make not thy philosophy
 A platform whence to insult the valiant dead.
 
 TEU. I nevermore will marvel, sirs, when one
 Of humblest parentage is prone to sin,
 Since those reputed men of noble strain
 Stoop to such phrase of prating frowardness.
 Come, tell it o'er again,--said you ye brought
 My brother bound to aid you with his power?
 Sailed he not forth of his own sovereign will?
 Where is thy voucher of command o'er him?
 Where of thy right o'er those that followed him?
 Sparta, not we, shall buckle to thy sway.
 'Twas written nowhere in the bond of rule
 That thou shouldst check him rather than he thee.
 Thou sailedst under orders, not in charge
 Of all, much less of Aias. Then pursue
 Thy limited direction, and chastise,
 In haughty phrase, the men who fear thy nod.
 But I will bury Aias, whether thou
 Or the other general give consent or no.
 'Tis not for me to tremble at your word.
 Not to reclaim thy wife, like those poor souls
 Thou flll'st with labour, issued this man forth,
 But caring for his oath, and not for thee,
 Or any other nobody. Then come
 With heralds all arow, and bring the man
 Called king of men with thee! For thy sole noise
 I budge not, wert thou twenty times thy name.
 
 CH. The sufferer should not bear a bitter tongue.
 Hard words, how just soe'er, will leave their sting.
 
 MEN. Our bowman carries no small pride, I see.
 
 TEU. No mere mechanic's menial craft is mine.
 
 MEN. How wouldst thou vaunt it hadst thou but a shield!
 
 TEU. Unarmed I fear not thee in panoply.
 
 MEN. Redoubted is the wrath lives on thy tongue.
 
 TEU. Whose cause is just hath licence to be proud.
 
 MEN. Just, that my murderer have a peaceful end?
 
 TEU. Thy murderer? Strange, to have been slain and live!
 
 MEN. Yea, through Heaven's mercy. By his will, I am dead.
 
 TEU. If Heaven have saved thee, give the Gods their due.
 
 MEN. Am I the man to spurn at Heaven's command?
 
 TEU. Thou dost, to come and frustrate burial.
 
 MEN. Honour forbids to yield my foe a tomb.
 
 TEU. And Aias was thy foeman? Where and when?
 
 MEN. Hate lived between us; that thou know'st full well.
 
 TEU. For thy proved knavery, coining votes i' the court
 
 MEN. The judges voted. He ne'er lost through me.
 
 TEU. Guilt hiding guile wears often fairest front.
 
 MEN. I know whom pain shall harass for that word.
 
 TEU. Not without giving equal pain, 'tis clear.
 
 MEN. No more, but this. No burial for this man!
 
 TEU. Yea, this much more. He shall have instant burial.
 
 MEN. I have seen ere now a man of doughty tongue
 Urge sailors in foul weather to unmoor,
 Who, caught in the sea-misery by and by,
 Lay voiceless, muffled in his cloak, and suffered
 Who would of the sailors over trample him
 Even so methinks thy truculent mouth ere long
 Shall quench its outcry, when this little cloud
 Breaks forth on thee with the full tempest's might.
 
 TEU. I too have seen a man whose windy pride
 Poured forth loud insults o'er a neighbour's fall,
 Till one whose cause and temper showed like mine
 Spake to him in my hearing this plain word:
 'Man, do the dead no wrong; but, if thou dost,
 Be sure thou shalt have sorrow.' Thus he warned
 The infatuate one: ay, one whom I behold,
 For all may read my riddle--thou art he.
 
 MEN. I will be gone. 'Twere shame to me, if known,
 To chide when I have power to crush by force.
 
 TEU. Off with you, then! 'Twere triple shame in me
 To list the vain talk of a blustering fool.           [_Exit_ MENELAUS
 
 LEADER OF CHORUS.
       High the quarrel rears his head!
         Haste thee, Teucer, trebly haste,
       Grave-room for the valiant dead
         Furnish with what speed thou mayst,
       Hollowed deep within the ground,
       Where beneath his mouldering mound
       Aias aye shall be renowned.
 
 _Re-enter_ TECMESSA _with_ EURYSAKES.
 
 TEU. Lo! where the hero's housemate and his child,
 Hitting the moment's need, appear at hand,
 To tend the burial of the ill fated dead.
 Come, child, take thou thy station close beside:
 Kneel and embrace the author of thy life,
 In solemn suppliant fashion holding forth
 This lock of thine own hair, and hers, and mine
 With threefold consecration, that if one
 Of the army force thee from thy father's corse,
 My curse may banish him from holy ground,
 Far from his home, unburied, and cut off
 From all his race, even as I cut this curl.
 There, hold him, child, and guard him; let no hand
 Stir thee, but lean to the calm breast and cling.
 (_To_ CHORUS) And ye, be not like women in this scene,
 Nor let your manhoods falter; stand true men
 To this defence, till I return prepared,
 Though all cry No, to give him burial.                         [_Exit_
 
 CHORUS.
 When shall the tale of wandering years be done?                    I 1
 When shall arise our exile's latest sun?
 Oh, where shall end the incessant woe
 Of troublous spear-encounter with the foe,
     Through this vast Trojan plain,
 Of Grecian arms the lamentable stain?
 
 Would he had gone to inhabit the wide sky,                         I 2
 Or that dark home of death where millions lie,
 Who taught our Grecian world the way
 To use vile swords and knit the dense array!
     His toil gave birth to toil
 In endless line. He made mankind his spoil.
 
 His tyrant will hath forced me to forgo                           II 1
 The garland, and the goblet's bounteous flow:
     Yea, and the flute's dear noise,
     And night's more tranquil joys;
     Ay me! nor only these,
     The fruits of golden ease,
 But Love, but Love--O crowning sorrow!--
 Hath ceased for me. I may not borrow
   Sweet thoughts from him to smooth my dreary bed,
   Where dank night-dews fall ever on my head,
 Lest once I might forget the sadness of the morrow.
 
 Even here in Troy, Aias was erst my rock,                         II 2
 From darkling fears and 'mid the battle-shock
     To screen me with huge might:
     Now he is lost in night
     And horror. Where again
     Shall gladness heal my pain?
 O were I where the waters hoary,
 Round Sunium's pine-clad promontory,
   Plash underneath the flowery upland height.
   Then holiest Athens soon would come in sight,
 And to Athena's self I might declare my story.
 
 _Enter_ TEUCER.
 
 TEU. My steps were hastened, brethren, when I saw
 Great Agamemnon hitherward afoot.
 He means to talk perversely, I can tell.
 
 _Enter_ AGAMEMNON.
 
 AG. And so I hear thou'lt stretch thy mouth agape
 With big bold words against us undismayed--
 Thou, the she-captive's offspring! High would scale
 Thy voice, and pert would be thy strutting gait,
 Were but thy mother noble; since, being naught,
 So stiff thou stand'st for him who is nothing now,
 And swear'st we came not as commanders here
 Of all the Achaean navy, nor of thee;
 But Aias sailed, thou say'st, with absolute right.
 Must we endure detraction from a slave?
 What was the man thou noisest here so proudly?
 Have I not set my foot as firm and far?
 Or stood his valour unaccompanied
 In all this host? High cause have we to rue
 That prize-encounter for Pelides' arms,
 Seeing Teucer's sentence stamps our knavery
 For all to know it; and nought will serve but ye,
 Being vanquished, kick at the award that passed
 By voice of the majority in the court,
 And either pelt us with rude calumnies,
 Or stab at us, ye laggards! with base guile.
 Howbeit, these ways will never help to build
 The wholesome order of established law,
 If men shall hustle victors from their right,
 And mix the hindmost rabble with the van.
 That craves repression. Not by bulky size,
 Or shoulders' breadth, the perfect man is known;
 But wisdom gives chief power in all the world.
 The ox hath a huge broadside, yet is held
 Right in the furrow by a slender goad;
 Which remedy, I perceive, will pass ere long
 To visit thee, unless thy wisdom grow;
 Who hast uttered forth such daring insolence
 For the pale shadow of a vanished man.
 Learn modestly to know thy place and birth,
 And bring with thee some freeborn advocate
 To plead thy cause before us in thy room.
 I understand not in the barbarous tongue,
 And all thy talk sounds nonsense to mine ear.
 
 CH. Would ye might both have sense to curb your ire!
 No better hope for either can I frame.
 
 TEU. Fie! How doth gratitude when men are dead
 Prove renegade and swiftly pass away!
 This Agamemnon hath no slightest word
 Of kind remembrance any more for thee,
 Aias, who oftentimes for his behoof
 Hast jeoparded thy life in labour of war.
 Now all is clean forgotten and out of mind.
 Thou who hast multiplied words void of sense,
 Hast thou no faintest memory of the time
 When who but Aias came and rescued you
 Already locked within the toils,--all lost,
 The rout began: when close abaft the ships
 The torches flared, and o'er the bootless trench
 Hector was bounding high to board our fleet?
 Who stayed that onset? Was not Aias he?
 Whom thou deny'st to have once set foot by thine.
 Find ye no merit there? And once again
 When he met Hector singly, man to man,
 Not by your bidding, but the lottery's choice,
 His lot, that skulked not low adown i' the heap,
 A moist earth-clod, but sure to spring in air,
 And first to clear the plumy helmet's brim.
 Yes, Aias was the man, and I too there
 Kept rank, the 'barbarous mother's servile son.'
 I pity thee the blindness of that word.
 Who was thy father's father? A barbarian,
 Pelops, the Phrygian, if you trace him far!
 And what was Atreus, thine own father? One
 Who served his brother with the abominable
 Dire feast of his own flesh. And thou thyself
 Cam'st from a Cretan mother, whom her sire
 Caught with a man who had no right in her
 And gave dumb fishes the polluted prey.
 Such was thy race. What is the race thou spurnest?
 My father, Telamon, of all the host
 Being foremost proved in valour, took as prize
 My mother for his mate: a princess she,
 Born of Laomedon; Alcmena's son
 Gave her to grace him--a triumphant meed.
 Thus royally descended and thus brave,
 Shall I renounce the brother of my blood,
 Or suffer thee to thrust him in his woes
 Far from all burial, shameless that thou art?
 Be sure that, if ye cast him forth, ye'll cast
 Three bodies more beside him in one spot;
 For nobler should I find it here to die
 In open quarrel for my kinsman's weal,
 Than for thy wife--or Menelaues', was 't?
 Consider then, not my case, but your own.
 For if you harm me you will wish some day
 To have been a coward rather than dare me.
 
 CH. Hail, Lord Odysseus! thou art come in time
 Not to begin, but help to end, a fray.
 
 _Enter_ ODYSSEUS.
 
 OD. What quarrel, sirs? I well perceived from far
 The kings high-voicing o'er the valiant dead.
 
 AG. Yea, Lord Odysseus, for our ears are full
 Of this man's violent heart-offending talk.
 
 OD. What words have passed? I cannot blame the man
 Who meets foul speech with bitterness of tongue.
 
 AG. My speech was bitter, for his deeds were foul.
 
 OD. What deed of his could harm thy sovereign head?
 
 AG. He boldly says this corse shall not be left
 Unburied, but he'll bury it in our spite.
 
 OD. May I then speak true counsel to my friend,
 And pull with thee in policy as of yore?
 
 AG. Speak. I were else a madman; for no friend
 Of all the Argeians do I count thy peer.
 
 OD. Then hear me in Heaven's name! Be not so hard
 Thus without ruth tombless to cast him forth;
 Nor be so vanquished by a vehement will,
 That to thy hate even Justice' self must bow.
 I, too, had him for my worst enemy,
 Since I gained mastery o'er Pelides' arms.
 But though he used me so, I ne'er will grudge
 For his proud scorn to yield him thus much honour,
 That, save Achilles' self, I have not seen
 So noble an Argive on the fields of Troy.
 Then 'twere not just in thee to slight him now;
 Nor would thy treatment wound him, but confound
 The laws of Heaven. No hatred should have scope
 To offend the noble spirits of the dead.
 
 AG. Wilt thou thus fight against me on his side?
 
 OD. Yea, though I hated him, while hate was comely.
 
 AG. Why, thou shouldst trample him the more, being dead.
 
 OD. Rejoice not, King, in feats that soil thy fame!
 
 AG. 'Tis hard for power to observe each pious rule.
 
 OD. Not hard to grace the good words of a friend.
 
 AG. The 'noble spirit' should hearken to command.
 
 OD. No more! 'Tis conquest to be ruled by love.
 
 AG. Remember what he was thou gracest so.
 
 OD. A noisome enemy; but his life was great.
 
 AG. And wilt thou honour such a pestilent corse?
 
 OD. Hatred gives way to magnanimity.
 
 AG. With addle-pated fools.
 
 OD.                         Full many are found
 Friends for an hour, yet bitter in the end.
 
 AG. And wouldst thou have us gentle to such friends?
 
 OD. I would not praise ungentleness in aught.
 
 AG. We shall be known for weaklings through thy counsel.
 
 OD. Not so, but righteous in all Grecian eyes.
 
 AG. Thou bidst me then let bury this dead man?
 
 OD. I urge thee to the course myself shall follow.
 
 AG. Ay, every man for his own line! That holds.
 
 OD. Why not for my own line? What else were natural?
 
 AG. 'Twill be thy doing then, ne'er owned by me.
 
 OD. Own it or not, the kindness is the same.
 
 AG. Well, for thy sake I'd grant a greater boon;
 Then why not this? However, rest assured
 That in the grave or out of it, Aias still
 Shall have my hatred. Do thou what thou wilt.                  [_Exit_
 
 CH. Whoso would sneer at thy philosophy,
 While such thy ways, Odysseus, were a fool.
 
 OD. And now let Teucer know that from this hour
 I am more his friend than I was once his foe,
 And fain would help him in this burial-rite
 And service to his brother, nor would fail
 In aught that mortals owe their noblest dead.
 
 TEU. Odysseus, best of men, thine every word
 Hath my heart's praise, and my worst thought of thee
 Is foiled by thy staunch kindness to the man
 Who was thy rancorous foe. Thou wast not keen
 To insult in present of his corse, like these,
 The insensate general and his brother-king,
 Who came with proud intent to cast him forth
 Foully debarred from lawful obsequy.
 Wherefore may he who rules in yon wide heaven,
 And the unforgetting Fury-spirit, and she,
 Justice, who crowns the right, so ruin them
 With cruellest destruction, even as they
 Thought ruthlessly to rob him of his tomb!
 For thee, revered Laertes' lineal seed,
 I fear to admit thy hand unto this rite,
 Lest we offend the spirit that is gone.
 But for the rest, I hail thy proffered aid;
 And bring whom else thou wilt, I'll ne'er resent it.
 This work shall be my single care; but thou,
 Be sure I love thee for thy generous heart.
 
 OD. I had gladly done it; but, since thou declinest,
 I bow to thy decision, and depart.                             [_Exit_
 
 TEU.  Speed we, for the hour grows late:
         Some to scoop his earthy cell,
       Others by the cauldron wait,
         Plenished from the purest well.
       Hoist it, comrades, here at hand,
       High upon the three-foot stand!
       Let the cleansing waters flow;
       Brightly flame the fire below!
       Others in a stalwart throng
       From his chamber bear along
       All the arms he wont to wield
       Save alone the mantling shield.
       Thou with me thy strength employ,
       Lifting this thy father, boy;
       Hold his frame with tender heed--
       Still the gashed veins darkly bleed.
       Who professes here to love him?
       Ply your busy cares above him,
       Come and labour for the man,
       Nobler none since time began,
       Aias, while his life-blood ran.
 
 LEADER OF CH. Oft we know not till we see.
       Weak is human prophecy.
       Judge not, till the hour have taught thee
       What the destinies have brought thee.
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                              KING OEDIPUS
 
 
                              THE PERSONS
 
 OEDIPUS, _King of Thebes._
 _Priest of Zeus._
 CREON, _brother of Jocasta._
 CHORUS _of Theban Elders._
 TIRESIAS, _the Blind Prophet._
 JOCASTA, _the Queen, sister to Creon._
 _A Corinthian Shepherd._
 _A Theban Shepherd._
 _Messenger_
 
 The following also appear, but do not speak:
 
 _A Train of Suppliants._
 _The children_ ANTIGONE _and_ ISMENE.
 
 
 SCENE. Before the Royal Palace in the Cadmean citadel of Thebes.
 
 
 
 
 Laius, the descendant of Cadmus, and king of Thebes (or Thebe), had
 been told by an oracle that if a son were born to him by his wife
 Jocasta the boy would be his father's death.
 
 Under such auspices, Oedipus was born, and to elude the prophecy was
 exposed by his parents on Mount Cithaeron. But he was saved by a
 compassionate shepherd, and became the adopted son of Polybus, king of
 Corinth. When he grew up he was troubled by a rumour that he was not
 his father's son. He went to consult the oracle of Apollo at Delphi,
 and was told--not of his origin but of his destiny--that he should be
 guilty of parricide and incest.
 
 He was too horror-stricken to return to Corinth, and as he travelled
 the other way, he met Laius going from Thebes to Delphi. The
 travellers quarrelled and the son killed his father, but knew not whom
 he had slain. He went onward till he came near Thebes, where the
 Sphinx was making havoc of the noblest citizens, devouring all who
 failed to solve her riddle. But Oedipus succeeded and overcame her,
 and, as Laius did not return, was rewarded with the regal sceptre,--
 and with the hand of the queen.
 
 He reigned nobly and prosperously, and lived happily with Jocasta, by
 whom he had four children.
 
 But after some years a plague descended on the people, and Apollo, on
 being inquired of, answered that it was for Laius' death. The act of
 regicide must be avenged. Oedipus undertakes the task of discovering
 the murderer,--and in the same act discovers his own birth, and the
 fulfilment of both the former prophecies.
 
 Jocasta hangs herself, and Oedipus in his despair puts out his eyes.
 
 
 
 
                              KING OEDIPUS
 
 
 OEDIPUS--Priest of Zeus
 (_with the_ Train of Suppliants _grouped before an altar_).
 
 OEDIPUS. Nurslings of Cadmus, children of my care,
 Why press ye now to kneel before my gate
 With sacred branches in those suppliant hands,
 While o'er your city clouds of incense rise
 And sounds of praise, mingling with sounds of woe?
   I would not learn of your estate, my sons,
 Through others, wherefore I myself am come,
 Your Oedipus,--a name well known to men.
 Speak, aged friend, whose look proclaims thee meet
 To be their spokesman--What desire, what fear
 Hath brought you? Doubt not of my earnest will
 To lend all succour. Hard would be the heart
 That looked unmoved on such a kneeling throng.
 
 PRIEST. Great ruler of my country, thou beholdest
 The different ages of our flock who here
 Are gathered round thine altar,--some, whose wing
 Hath not yet ventured far from home, and some
 Burdened with many years, priests of the Gods,
 Myself the arch priest of Zeus, and these fresh youths,
 A chosen few. Others there are who crowd
 The holy agora and the temples twain
 Of Pallas, and Ismenus' hallowed fires,
 A suppliant host. For, as thyself perceivest,
 Our city is tempest tost, and all too weak
 To lift above the waves her weary prow
 That plunges in a rude and ravenous sea.
 Earth's buds are nipped, withering the germs within,
 Our cattle lose their increase, and our wives
 Have fruitless travail; and that scourge from Heaven,
 The fiery Pestilence abhorred of men,
 Descending on our people with dire stroke
 Lays waste the Home of Cadmus, while dark Death
 Wins ample tribute of laments and groans.
   We kneel, then, at thy hearth; not likening thee
 Unto the gods, I nor these children here,
 But of men counting thee the first in might
 Whether to cope with earthly casualty
 Or visiting of more than earthly Power.
 Thou, in thy coming to this Theban land,
 Didst take away the hateful tax we paid
 To that stern songstress[1],--aided not by us
 With hint nor counsel, but, as all believe,
 Gifted from heaven with life-restoring thought.
 Now too, great Oedipus of matchless fame,
 We all uplift our suppliant looks to thee,
 To find some help for us, whether from man,
 Or through the prompting of a voice Divine.
 Experienced counsel, we have seen and know,
 Hath ever prosperous issue. Thou, then, come,
 Noblest of mortals, give our city rest
 From sorrow! come, take heed! seeing this our land
 Now calls thee Saviour for thy former zeal;
 And 'twere not well to leave this memory
 Of thy great reign among Cadmean men,
 'He raised us up, only again to fall.'
 Let the salvation thou hast wrought for us
 Be flawless and assured! As once erewhile
 Thy lucky star gave us prosperity,
 Be the same man to-day. Wouldst thou be king
 In power, as in command, 'tis greater far
 To rule a people than a wilderness.
 Since nought avails or city or buttressed wall
 Or gallant vessel, if unmanned and void.
 
 OED. Ye touch me to the core. Full well I know
 Your trouble and your desire. Think not, my sons,
 I have no feeling of your misery!
 Yet none of you hath heaviness like mine.
 Your grief is held within the single breast
 Of each man severally. My burdened heart
 Mourns for myself, for Thebe, and for you.
 Your coming hath not roused me from repose:
 I have watched, and bitterly have wept; my mind
 Hath travelled many a labyrinth of thought.
 And now I have tried in act the only plan
 Long meditation showed me. I have sent
 The brother of my queen, Menoeceus' son,
 Creon, to learn, in Phoebus' Delphian Hall,
 What word or deed of mine may save this city.
 And when I count the time, I am full of pain
 To guess his speed; for he is absent long,
 Beyond the limit of expectancy.
 But when he shall appear, base then were I
 In aught to disobey the voice of Heaven.
 
 PR. Lo, in good time, crowning thy gracious word,
 'Tis told me by these youths, Creon draws near.
 
 OED. Apollo! may his coming be as blest
 With saving fortune, as his looks are bright.
 
 PR. Sure he brings joyful news; else had he ne'er
 Worn that full wreath of thickly-berried bay.
 
 OED. We have not long to doubt. He can hear now.
 
 _Enter_ CREON.
 
 Son of Menoeceus, brother of my queen,
 What answer from Apollo dost thou bring?
 
 CREON. Good; for my message is that even our woes,
 When brought to their right issue, shall be well.
 
 OED. What saith the oracle? Thy words so far
 Neither embolden nor dishearten me.
 
 CR. Say, must I tell it with these standing by,
 Or go within? I am ready either way.
 
 OED. Speak forth to all. The burden of their grief
 Weighs more on me than my particular fear.
 
 CE. My lips shall utter what the God hath said.
 Sovereign Apollo clearly bids us drive
 Forth from this region an accursed thing
 (For such is fostered in the land and stains
 Our sacred clime), nor cherish it past cure.
 
 OED. What is the fault, and how to be redressed?
 
 CR. By exile, or by purging blood with blood.
 Since blood it is that shakes us with this storm.
 
 OED. Whose murder doth Apollo thus reveal?
 
 CR. My gracious lord, before thy prosperous reign
 King Laius was the leader of our land.
 
 OED. Though I ne'er saw him, I have heard, and know.
 
 CR. Phoebus commands us now to punish home,
 Whoe'er they are, the authors of his death.
 
 OED. But they, where are they? Where shall now be read
 The fading record of this ancient guilt?
 
 CR He saith, 'tis in this land. And what is sought
 Is found, while things uncared for glide away.
 
 OED. But where did Laius meet this violent end?
 At home, afield, or on some foreign soil?
 
 CR. He had left us, as he said, to visit Delphi;
 But nevermore returned since he set forth.
 
 OED. And was there none, no fellow traveller,
 To see, and tell the tale, and help our search?
 
 CR. No, they were slain; save one, who, flying in fear,
 Had nought to tell us but one only thing.
 
 OED. What was that thing? A little door of hope,
 Once opened, may discover much to view.
 
 CR. A random troop of robbers, meeting him,
 Outnumbered and o'erpowered him. So 'twas told.
 
 OED. What robber would have ventured such a deed,
 If unsolicited with bribes from hence?
 
 CR. We thought of that. But Laius being dead,
 We found no helper in our miseries.
 
 OED. When majesty was fallen, what misery
 Could hinder you from searching out the truth?
 
 CR. A present trouble had engrossed our care.
 The riddling Sphinx compelled us to observe
 The moment's grief, neglecting things unknown.
 
 OED. But I will track this evil to the spring
 And clear it to the day. Most worthily
 Doth great Apollo, worthily dost thou
 Prompt this new care for the unthought of dead.
 And me too ye shall find a just ally,
 Succouring the cause of Phoebus and the land.
 Since, in dispelling this dark cloud, I serve
 No indirect or distant claim on me,
 But mine own life, for he that slew the king
 May one day turn his guilty hand 'gainst me
 With equal rage. In righting Laius, then,
 I forward mine own cause.--Now, children, rise
 From the altar-steps, and lift your suppliant boughs,
 And let some other summon to this place
 All Cadmus' people, and assure them, I
 Will answer every need. This day shall see us
 Blest with glad fortune through God's help, or fallen.
 
 PR. Rise then, my children. Even for this we came
 Which our good lord hath promised of himself.
 Only may Phoebus, who hath sent this word,
 With healing power descend, and stay the plague.   [_Exeunt severally_
 
 CHORUS (_entering_).
 Kind voice of Heaven, soft-breathing from the height               I 1
 Of Pytho's opulent home to Thebe bright,
         What wilt thou bring to day?
         Ah, Delian Healer, say!
 My heart hangs on thy word with trembling awe:
         What new giv'n law,
 Or what returning in Time's circling round
 Wilt thou unfold? Tell us, immortal sound,
 Daughter of golden Hope, tell us, we pray, we pray!
 
 First, child of Zeus, Pallas, to thee appealing,                   I 2
 Then to sweet Artemis, thy sister, kneeling,
         Who with benignant hand
         Still guards our sacred land,
 Throned o'er the circling mart that hears her praise,
         And thou, whose rays
 Pierce evil from afar, ho! come and save,
 Ye mighty three! if e'er before ye drave
 The threatening fire of woe from Thebe, come to day!
 
   For ah! the griefs that on me weigh                             II 1
   Are numberless; weak are my helpers all,
   And thought finds not a sword to fray
   This hated pestilence from hearth or hall.
         Earth's blossoms blasted fall:
         Nor can our women rise
         From childbed after pangs and cries;
         But flocking more and more
         Toward the western shore,
 Soul after soul is known to wing her flight,
 Swifter than quenchless flame, to the far realm of Night.
 
       So deaths innumerable abound.                               II 2
   My city's sons unpitied lie around
   Over the plague-encumbered ground
   And wives and matrons old on every hand
         Along the altar-strand
         Groaning in saddest grief
         Pour supplication for relief.
         Loud hymns are sounding clear
         With wailing voices near.
 Then, golden daughter of the heavenly sire,
 Send bright-eyed Succour forth to drive away this fire.
 
             And swiftly speed afar,                              III 1
             Windborne on backward car,
       The viewless fiend who scares me with wild cries,
             To oarless Thracian tide,
             Of ocean-chambers wide,
       About the bed where Amphitrite lies.
 Day blights what night hath spared. O thou whose hand
 Wields lightning, blast him with thy thundrous brand.
 
             Shower from the golden string                        III 2
             Thine arrows Lycian King!
       O Phoebus, let thy fiery lances fly
             Resistless, as they rove
             Through Xanthus' mountain-grove!
       O Thoeban Bacchus of the lustrous eye,
 With torch and trooping Maenads and bright crown
 Blaze on thee god whom all in Heaven disown.
                          [OEDIPUS _has entered during the Choral song_
 
 OED. Your prayers are answered. Succour and relief
 Are yours, if ye will heed my voice and yield
 What help the plague requires. Hear it from me,
 Who am hitherto a stranger to the tale,
 As to the crime. Being nought concerned therewith,
 I could not of myself divine the truth.
 But now, as one adopted to your state,
 To all of you Cadmeans I speak this:
 Whoe'er among you knoweth the murderer
 Of Laius, son of royal Labdacus,
 Let him declare the deed in full to me.
 First, if the man himself be touched with fear,
 Let him depart, carrying the guilt away;
 No harm shall follow him:--he shall go free.
 Or if there be who knows another here,
 Come from some other country, to have wrought
 This murder, let him speak. Reward from me
 And store of kind remembrance shall be his.
 But if ye are silent, and one present here
 Who might have uttered this, shall hold his peace,
 As fearing for himself, or for his friend,
 What then shall be performed, hear me proclaim.
 I here prohibit all within this realm
 Whereof I wield the sceptre and sole sway,
 To admit the murderer, whosoe'er he be,
 Within their houses, or to speak with him,
 Or share with him in vow or sacrifice
 Or lustral rite. All men shall thrust him forth,
 Our dark pollution, so to me revealed
 By this day's oracle from Pytho's cell.
   So firm is mine allegiance to the God
 And your dead sovereign in this holy war.
 Now on the man of blood, whether he lurk
 In lonely guilt, or with a numerous band,
 I here pronounce this curse:--Let his crushed life
 Wither forlorn in hopeless misery.
 Next, I pray Heaven, should he or they be housed
 With mine own knowledge in my home, that I
 May suffer all I imprecate on them.
 Last, I enjoin each here to lend his aid
 For my sake, and the God's, and for your land
 Reft of her increase and renounced by Heaven.
 It was not right, when your good king had fallen,
 Although the oracle were silent still,
 To leave this inquisition unperformed.
 Long since ye should have purged the crime. But now
 I, to whom fortune hath transferred his crown,
 And given his queen in marriage,--yea, moreover,
 His seed and mine had been one family
 Had not misfortune trampled on his head
 Cutting him off from fair posterity,--
 All this being so, I will maintain his cause
 As if my father's, racking means and might
 To apprehend the author of the death
 Of Laius, son to Labdacus, and heir
 To Polydorus and to Cadmus old,
 And proud Agenor of the eldest time.
   Once more, to all who disobey in this
 May Heaven deny the produce of the ground
 And offspring from their wives, and may they pine
 With plagues more horrible than this to-day.
 But for the rest of you Cadmean men,
 Who now embrace my word, may Righteousness,
 Strong to defend, and all the Gods for aye
 Watch over you for blessing in your land.
 
 LEADER OF CH. Under the shadow of thy curse, my lord,
 I will speak. I slew him not, nor can I show
 The man who slew. Phoebus, who gave the word,
 Should name the guilty one.
 
 OED.                        Thy thought is just,
 But man may not compel the Gods.
 
 CH.                              Again,
 That failing, I perceive a second way.
 
 OED. Were there a third, spare not to speak it forth.
 
 CH. I know of one alone whose kingly mind
 Sees all King Phoebus sees--Tiresias,--he
 Infallibly could guide us in this quest.
 
 OED. That doth not count among my deeds undone.
 By Creon's counsel I have sent twice o'er
 To fetch him, and I muse at his delay.
 
 CH. The rumour that remains is old and dim.
 
 OED. What rumour? Let no tale be left untried.
 
 CH. 'Twas said he perished by some wandering band.
 
 OED. But the one witness is removed from ken.
 
 CH. Well, if the man be capable of fear,
 He'll not remain when he hath heard thy curse.
 
 OED. Words have no terror for the soul that dares
 Such doings.
 
 CH.          Yet lives one who shall convict him.
 For look where now they lead the holy seer,
 Whom sacred Truth inspires alone of men.
 
 _Enter_ TIRESIAS.
 
 OED. O thou whose universal thought commands
 All knowledge and all mysteries, in Heaven
 And on the earth beneath, thy mind perceives,
 Tiresias, though thine outward eye be dark,
 What plague is wasting Thebe, who in thee,
 Great Sir, finds her one saviour, her sole guide.
 Phoebus (albeit the messengers perchance
 Have told thee this) upon our sending sent
 This answer back, that no release might come
 From this disaster, till we sought and found
 And slew the murderers of king Laius,
 Or drave them exiles from our land. Thou, then,
 Withhold not any word of augury
 Or other divination which thou knowest,
 But rescue Thebe, and thyself, and me,
 And purge the stain that issues from the dead.
 On thee we lean: and 'tis a noble thing
 To use what power one hath in doing good.
 
 TIRESIAS. Ah! terrible is knowledge to the man
 Whom knowledge profits not. This well I knew,
 But had forgotten. Else I ne'er had come.
 
 OED. Why dost thou bring a mind so full of gloom?
 
 TI. Let me go home. Thy part and mine to-day
 Will best be borne, if thou obey me in that.
 
 OED. Disloyal and ungrateful! to deprive
 The state that reared thee of thine utterance now.
 
 TI. Thy speech, I see, is foiling thine intent;
 And I would shield me from the like mishap. (_Going._)
 
 OED. Nay, if thou knowest, turn thee not away:
 All here with suppliant hands importune thee.
 
 TI. Yea, for ye all are blind. Never will I
 Reveal my woe;--mine, that I say not, thine.
 
 OED. So, then, thou hast the knowledge of the crime
 And wilt not tell, but rather wouldst betray
 This people, and destroy thy fatherland!
 
 TI. You press me to no purpose. I'll not pain
 Thee, nor myself. Thou wilt hear nought from me.
 
 OED. How? Miscreant! Thy stubbornness would rouse
 Wrath in a breast of stone. Wilt thou yet hold
 That silent, hard, impenetrable mien?
 
 TI. You censure me for my harsh mood. Your own
 Dwells unsuspected with you. Me you blame!
 
 OED. Who can be mild and gentle, when thou speakest
 Such words to mock this people?
 
 TI.                             It will come:
 Although I bury it in silence here.
 
 OED. Must not the King be told of what will come?
 
 TI. No word from me. At this, an if thou wilt,
 Rage to the height of passionate vehemence.
 
 OED. Ay, and my passion shall declare my thought.
 'Tis clear to me as daylight, thou hast been
 The arch-plotter of this deed; yea, thou hast done
 All but the actual blow. Hadst thou thy sight,
 I had proclaimed thee the sole murderer.
 
 TI. Ay, say'st thou so?--I charge thee to abide
 By thine own ordinance; and from this hour
 Speak not to any Theban nor to me.
 Thou art the vile polluter of the land.
 
 OED. O void of shame! What wickedness is this?
 What power will give thee refuge for such guilt?
 
 TI. The might of truth is scatheless. I am free.
 
 OED. Whence came the truth to thee? Not from thine art.
 
 TI. From thee, whose rage impelled my backward tongue.
 
 OED. Speak it once more, that I may know the drift.
 
 TI. Was it so dark? Or wouldst thou tempt me further?
 
 OED. I cannot say 'twas clear. Speak it again.
 
 TI. I say thou art the murderer whom thou seekest.
 
 OED. Again that baleful word! But thou shalt rue.
 
 TI. Shall I add more, to aggravate thy wrath?
 
 OED. All is but idleness. Say what thou wilt.
 
 TI. I tell thee thou art living unawares
 In shameful commerce with thy near'st of blood,
 Ignorant of the abyss wherein thou liest.
 
 OED. Think you to triumph in offending still?
 
 TI. If Truth have power.
 
 OED.                     She hath, but not for thee.
 Blind as thou art in eyes and ears and mind.
 
 TI. O miserable reproach, which all who now
 Behold thee, soon shall thunder forth on thee!
 
 OED. Nursed in unbroken night, thou canst not harm
 Or me, or any man who seeth the day.
 
 TI. No, not from me proceeds thy fall; the God,
 Who cares for this, is able to perform it.
 
 OED. Came this device from Creon or thyself?
 
 TI. Not Creon: thou art thy sole enemy.
 
 OED. O wealth and sovereign power and high success
 Attained through wisdom and admired of men,
 What boundless jealousies environ you!
 When for this rule, which to my hand the State
 Committed unsolicited and free,
 Creon, my first of friends, trusted and sure,
 Would undermine and hurl me from my throne,
 Meanly suborning such a mendicant
 Botcher of lies, this crafty wizard rogue,
 Blind in his art, and seeing but for gain.
 Where are the proofs of thy prophetic power?
 How came it, when the minstrel-hound was here,
 This folk had no deliverance through thy word?
 Her snare could not be loosed by common wit,
 But needed divination and deep skill;
 No sign whereof proceeded forth from thee
 Procured through birds or given by God, till I,
 The unknowing traveller, overmastered her,
 The stranger Oedipus, not led by birds,
 But ravelling out the secret by my thought:
 Whom now you study to supplant, and trust
 To stand as a supporter of the throne
 Of lordly Creon,--To your bitter pain
 Thou and the man who plotted this will hunt
 Pollution forth[2].--But for thy reverend look
 Thou hadst atoned thy trespass on the spot.
 
 CH. Your friends would humbly deprecate the wrath
 That sounds both in your speech, my lord, and his.
 That is not what we need, but to discern
 How best to solve the heavenly oracle.
 
 TI. Though thou art king and lord, I claim no less
 Lordly prerogative to answer thee.
 Speech is my realm; Apollo rules my life,
 Not thou. Nor need I Creon to protect me.
 Now, then: my blindness moves thy scorn:--thou hast
 Thy sight, and seest not where thou art sunk in evil,
 What halls thou dost inhabit, or with whom:
 Know'st not from whence thou art--nay, to thy kin,
 Buried in death and here above the ground,
 Unwittingly art a most grievous foe.
 And when thy father's and thy mother's curse
 With fearful tread shall drive thee from the land,
 On both sides lashing thee,--thine eye so clear
 Beholding darkness in that day,--oh, then,
 What region will not shudder at thy cry?
 What echo in all Cithaeron will be mute,
 When thou perceiv'st, what bride-song in thy hall
 Wafted thy gallant bark with nattering gale
 To anchor,--where? And other store of ill
 Thou seest not, that shall show thee as thou art,
 Merged with thy children in one horror of birth.
 Then rail at noble Creon, and contemn
 My sacred utterance! No life on earth
 More vilely shall be rooted out, than thine.
 
 OED. Must I endure such words from him? Begone!
 Off to thy ruin, and with speed! Away,
 And take thy presence from our palace-hall!
 
 TI. Had you not sent for me, I ne'er had come.
 
 OED. I knew not thou wouldst utter folly here,
 Else never had I brought thee to my door.
 
 TI. To thee I am foolish, then; but to the pair
 Who gave thee life, I was wise.
 
 OED.                            Hold, go not! who?
 Who gave me being?
 
 TI.               To-day shall bring to light
 Thy birth and thy destruction.
 
 OED.                           Wilt thou still
 Speak all in riddles and dark sentences?
 
 TI. Methought thou wert the man to find them out.
 
 OED. Ay! Taunt me with the gift that makes me great.
 
 TI. And yet this luck hath been thy overthrow.
 
 OED. I care not, since I rescued this fair town.
 
 TI. Then I will go. Come, sirrah, guide me forth!
 
 OED. Be it so! For standing here you vex our eye,
 But, you being gone, our trouble goes with you.
 
 TI. I go, but I will speak. Why should I fear
 Thy frown? Thou ne'er canst ruin me. The word
 Wherefore I came, is this: The man you seek
 With threatening proclamation of the guilt
 Of Laius' blood, that man is here to-day,
 An alien sojourner supposed from far,
 But by-and-by he shall be certified
 A true-born Theban: nor will such event
 Bring him great joy; for, blind from having sight
 And beggared from high fortune, with a staff
 In stranger lands he shall feel forth his way;
 Shown living with the children of his loins,
 Their brother and their sire, and to the womb
 That bare him, husband-son, and, to his father,
 Parricide and corrival. Now go in,
 Ponder my words; and if thou find them false,
 then say my power is naught in prophecy.           [_Exeunt severally_
 
 CHORUS.
 Whom hath the voice from Delphi's rocky throne                     I 1
       Loudly declared to have done
 Horror unnameable with murdering hand?
       With speed of storm-swift car
       'Tis time he fled afar
 With mighty footstep hurrying from the land.
       For, armed with lightning brand,
 The son of Zeus assails him with fierce bounds,
 Hunting with Death's inevitable hounds.
 
 Late from divine Parnassus' snow-capped height                     I 2
       This utterance sprang to light,
 To track by every path the man unknown.
       Through woodland caverns deep
       And o'er the rocky steep
 Harbouring in caves he roams the wild alone,
       With none to share his moan.
 Shunning that prophet-voice's central sound,
 Which ever lives, and haunts him, hovering round.
 
 The reverend Seer hath stirred me with strange awe.               II 1
 Gainsay I cannot, nor yet think him true.
 I know not how to speak. My fluttering heart
 In wild expectancy sees nothing clear.
 Things past and future with the present doubt
 Are shrouded in one mist. What quarrel lay
 'Twixt Cadmus' issue and Corinthus' heir
 Was never shown me, from old times till now,
 By one on whose sure word I might rely
 In running counter to the King's fair fame,
 To wreak for Laius that mysterious death.
 
 Zeus and Apollo scan the ways of men                              II 2
 With perfect vision. But of mortals here
 That soothsayers are more inspired than I
 What certain proof is given? A man through wit
 May pass another's wisdom in the race.
 But never, till I see the word fulfilled,
 Will I confirm their clamour 'gainst the King.
 In open day the female monster came:
 Then perfect witness made his wisdom clear.
 Thebe hath tried him and delights in him.
 Wherefore my heart shall still believe him good.
 
 _Enter_ CREON.
 
 CR. Citizens, hearing of dire calumny
 Denounced on me by Oedipus the King,
 I am here to make loud protest. If he think,
 In this embroilment of events, one word
 Or deed of mine hath wrought him injury,
 I am not careful to prolong my life
 Beneath such imputation. For it means
 No trifling danger, but disastrous harm,
 Making my life dishonoured in the state,
 And meanly thought of by my friends and you.
 
 CH. Perchance 'twas but the sudden flash of wrath,
 Not the deliberate judgement of the soul.
 
 CR. Who durst declare it[3], that Tiresias spake
 False prophecies, set on to this by me?
 
 CH. Such things were said, I know not how advised.
 
 CR. And were the eyes and spirit not distraught,
 When the tongue uttered this to ruin me?
 
 CH. I cannot say. To what my betters do
 I am blind. But see, the King comes forth again.
 
 _Enter_ OEDIPUS.
 
 OED. Insolent, art thou here? Hadst thou the face
 To bring thy boldness near my palace-roof,
 Proved as thou art to have contrived my death
 And laid thy robber hands upon my state?
 Tell me, by heaven, had you seen in me
 A coward or a fool, when you planned this?--
 Deemed you I should be blind to your attempt
 Craftily creeping on, or, when perceived,
 Not ward it off? Is't not a silly scheme,
 To think to compass without troops of friends
 Power, that is only won by wealth and men?
 
 CR. Wilt them be counselled? Hear as much in turn
 As thou hast spoken, and then thyself be judge.
 
 OED. I know thy tongue, but I am slow to learn
 From thee, whom I have found my grievous foe.
 
 CR. First on this very point, hear me declare--
 
 OED. I will not hear that thou art not a villain.
 
 CR. Thine is a shallow judgement, if thou thinkest
 Self-will without true thought can bring thee gain.
 
 OED. Thine is a shallow judgement, if thou thinkest
 Thou canst abuse thy kinsman and be free.
 
 CR. A rightful sentence. But I fain would learn
 What wrong is that you speak of?
 
 OED.                             Tell me this;
 Didst thou, or not, urge me to send and bring
 The reverend-seeming prophet?
 
 CR.                           Yea, and still
 I hold that counsel firm.
 
 OED.                      How long is 't now
 Since Laius--
 
 CR.           What? I do not catch your drift.
 
 OED. Vanished in ruin by a dire defeat?
 
 CR. 'Twere long to count the years that come between.
 
 OED. And did this prophet then profess his art?
 
 CR. Wise then as now, nor less in reverence.
 
 OED. Then at that season did he mention me?
 
 CR. Not in my hearing.
 
 OED.                   But, I may presume,
 Ye held an inquisition for the dead?
 
 CR. Yes, we inquired, of course: and could not hear.
 
 OED. Why was he dumb, your prophet, in that day?
 
 CR. I cannot answer, for I do not know.
 
 OED. This you can answer, for you know it well.
 
 CR. Say what? I will not gainsay, if I know.
 
 OED. That, but for your advice, he had not dared
 To talk of Laius' death as done by me.
 
 CR. You know, that heard him, what he spake. But I
 Would ask thee too a question in my turn.
 
 OED. No questioning will fasten blood on me.
 
 CR. Hast thou my sister for thine honoured queen?
 
 OED. The fact is patent, and denial vain.
 
 CR. And shar'st with her dominion of this realm?
 
 OED. All she desires is given her by my will.
 
 CR. Then, am not I third-partner with you twain?
 
 OED. There is your villany in breaking fealty.
 
 CR. Not so, if thou wouldst reason with thyself
 As I do. First consider one thing well:
 Who would choose rule accompanied with fear
 Before safe slumbers with an equal sway?
 'Tis not my nature, no, nor any man's,
 Who follows wholesome thoughts, to love the place
 Of domination rather than the power.
 Now, without fear, I have my will from thee;
 But were I king, I should do much unwillingly.
 How then can I desire to be a king,
 When masterdom is mine without annoy?
 Delusion hath not gone so far with me
 As to crave more than honour joined with gain.
 Now all men hail me happy, all embrace me;
 All who have need of thee, call in my aid;
 For thereupon their fortunes wholly turn.
 How should I leave this substance for that show?
 No man of sense can harbour thoughts of crime.
 Such vain ambition hath no charm for me,
 Nor could I bear to lend it countenance.
 If you would try me, go and ask again
 If I brought Phoebus' answer truly back.
 Nay more, should I be found to have devised
 Aught in collusion with the seer, destroy me,
 Not by one vote, but two, mine own with thine.
 But do not on a dim suspicion blame me
 Of thy mere will. To darken a good name
 Without clear cause is heinous wickedness;
 And to cast off a worthy friend I call
 No less a folly than to fling away
 What most we love, the life within our breast.
 The certainty of this will come with time;
 For time alone can clear the righteous man.
 An hour suffices to make known the villain.
 
 CH. Prudence bids hearken to such words, my lord,
 For fear one fall. Swift is not sure in counsel.
 
 OED. When he who hath designs on me is swift
 In his advance, I must bethink me swiftly.
 Should I wait leisurely, his work hath gained
 Achievement, while my plans have missed success.
 
 CR. What would you then? To thrust me from the land?
 
 OED. Nay, death, not exile, is my wish for thee,
 When all have seen what envy brings on men.
 
 [CR. You'll ne'er relent nor listen to my plea.][4]
 
 OED. You'll ne'er be governed or repent your guilt.
 
 CR. Because I see thou art blind.
 
 OED.                              Not to my need.
 
 CR. Mine must be thought of too.
 
 OED.                             You are a villain.
 
 CR. How if thy thought be vain?
 
 OED.                            Authority
 Must be maintained.
 
 CR.                Not when authority
 Declines to evil.
 
 OED.              O my citizens!
 
 CR. I have a part in them no less than you.
 
 LEADER OF CH. Cease, princes. Opportunely I behold
 Jocasta coming toward you from the palace.
 Her presence may attune your jarring minds.
 
 _Enter_ JOCASTA.
 
 JOCASTA. Unhappy that ye are, why have ye reared
 Your wordy rancour 'mid the city's harms?
 Have you no shame, to stir up private broils
 In such a time as this? Get thee within!  (_To_ OED)
 And thou too, Creon! nor enlarge your griefs
 To make a mountain out of nothingness.
 
 CR. Sister, thy husband Oedipus declares
 One of two horrors he will wreak on me,
 Banishment from my native land, or death.
 
 OED. Yea, for I caught him practising, my queen,
 Against our person with malignant guile.
 
 CR. May comfort fail me, and a withering curse
 Destroy me, if I e'er planned aught of this.
 
 JO. I pray thee, husband, listen to his plea;
 Chiefly respecting his appeal to Heaven,
 But also me, and these who stand by thee.
 
 CH. 1. Incline to our request                                      I 1
 Thy mind and heart, O King!
 
 OED. What would you I should yield unto your prayer?
 
 CH. 2. Respect one ever wise,
 Whose oath protects him now.
 
 OED. Know ye what thing ye ask?
 
 CH. 3. I know.
 
 OED.           Then plainly tell.
 
 CH. 4. Thy friend, who is rendered sacred by his oath,
 Rob not of honour through obscure surmise.
 
 OED. In asking that, you labour for my death
 Or banishment. Of this be well assured.
 
 CH. 5. No, by the Sun I swear,                                    II 1
 Vaunt-courier of the host of heaven.
 For may I die the last of deaths,
 Unblest of God or friend,
 If e'er such thought were mine.
 But oh! this pining land
 Afflicts my sorrow-burdened soul,
 To think that to her past and present woe
 She must add this, which springs to her from you.
 
 OED. Then let him range, though I must die outright,
 Or be thrust forth with violence from the land!
 --Not for his voice, but thine, which wrings my heart:
 He, wheresoe'er he live, shall have my hate.
 
 CR. You show yourself as sullen when you yield,
 As unendurable in your fury's height.
 Such natures justly give themselves most pain.
 
 OED. Let me alone, then, and begone!
 
 CR.                                  I go,
 Untainted in their sight, though thou art blind.               [_Exit_
 
 CH. 1. Lady, why tarriest thou                                     I 2
 To lead thy husband in?
 
 JO. Not till I learn what mischief is befallen.
 
 CH. 2. A dim, unproved debate.
 Reproach, though unfounded, stings.
 
 JO. From both?
 
 CH. 3.         From both alike.
 
 JO. How caused?
 
 CH. 4.          Enough for me,
 Amply enough it seems, when our poor land
 Is vexed already, not to wake what sleeps.
 
 OED. (_to_ LEADER OF CH.).
 See where thine honest zeal hath landed thee,
 Bating my wrath, and blunting my desire!
 
 CH. 5. My prince, I say it again:                                 II 2
 Assure thee, I were lost to sense,
 Infatuate, void of wholesome thought,
 Could I be tempted now
 To loose my faith from thee,
 Who, when the land I love
 Laboured beneath a wildering load,
 Didst speed her forth anew with favouring gale.
 Now, too, if but thou may'st, be her good guide.
 
 JO. Let not thy queen be left in ignorance
 What cause thou hadst to lift thy wrath so high.
 
 OED. I'll tell thee, lady, for I honour thee
 More than these citizens. 'Twas Creon there,
 And his inveterate treason against me.
 
 JO. Accuse him, so you make the quarrel plain.
 
 OED. He saith I am the murderer of the King.
 
 JO. Speaks he from hearsay, or as one who knows?
 
 OED. He keeps his own lips free: but hath suborned
 A rascal soothsayer to this villany.
 
 JO. Hearken to me, and set your heart at rest
 On that you speak of, while I make you learn
 No mortal thing is touched by soothsaying.
 Of that I'll give thee warrant brief and plain.
 Word came to Laius once, I will not say
 From Phoebus' self, but from his ministers,
 The King should be destroyed by his own son,
 If son were born to him from me. What followed?
 Laius was slain, by robbers from abroad,
 Saith Rumour, in a cross-way! But the child
 Lived not three days, ere by my husband's hand
 His feet were locked, and he was cast and left
 By messengers on the waste mountain wold.
 So Phoebus neither brought upon the boy
 His father's murder, nor on Laius
 The thing he greatly feared, death by his son.
 Such issue came of prophesying words.
 Therefore regard them not. God can himself
 With ease bring forth what for his ends he needs.
 
 OED. What strange emotions overcloud my soul,
 Stirred to her depths on hearing this thy tale!
 
 JO. What sudden change is this? What cares oppress thee?
 
 OED. Methought I heard thee say, King Laius
 Was at a cross-road overpowered and slain?
 
 JO. So ran the talk that yet is current here.
 
 OED. Where was the scene of this unhappy blow?
 
 JO. Phocis the land is named. The parted ways
 Meet in one point from Dauha and from Delphi.
 
 OED. And since the event how much of time hath flown?
 
 JO. 'Twas just ere you appeared with prospering speed
 And took the kingdom, that the tidings came.
 
 OED. What are thy purposes against me, Zeus?
 
 JO. Why broods thy mind upon such thoughts, my king?
 
 OED. Nay, ask me not! But tell me first what height
 Had Laius, and what grace of manly prime?
 
 JO. Tall, with dark locks just sprinkled o'er with grey:
 In shape and bearing much resembling thee.
 
 OED. O heavy fate! How all unknowingly
 I laid that dreadful curse on my own head!
 
 JO. How?
 I tremble as I gaze on thee, my king!
 
 OED. The fear appals me that the seer can see.
 Tell one thing more, to make it doubly clear!
 
 JO. I am lothe to speak, but, when you ask, I will.
 
 OED. Had he scant following, or, as princes use,
 Full numbers of a well-appointed train?
 
 JO. There were but five in all: a herald one;
 And Laius travelled in the only car.
 
 OED. Woe! woe! 'Tis clear as daylight. Who was he
 That brought you this dire message, O my queen?
 
 JO. A home-slave, who alone returned alive.
 
 OED. And is he now at hand within the house?
 
 JO. No, truly. When he came from yonder scene
 And found thee king in room of Laius murdered,
 He touched my hand, and made his instant prayer
 That I would send him to o'erlook the flocks
 And rural pastures, so to live as far
 As might be from the very thought of Thebes.
 I granted his desire. No servant ever
 More richly merited such boon than he.
 
 OED. Can he be brought again immediately?
 
 JO. Indeed he can. But why desire it so?
 
 OED. Words have by me been uttered, O my queen,
 That give me too much cause to wish him here.
 
 JO. Then come he shall. But I may surely claim
 To hear what in thy state goes heavily.
 
 OED. Thou shalt not lose thy rights in such an hour,
 When I am harrowed thus with doubt and fear.
 To whom more worthy should I tell my grief?
 --My father was Corinthian Polybus,
 My mother, Dorian Merope.--I lived
 A prince among that people, till a chance
 Encountered me, worth wonder, but, though strange,
 Not worth the anxious thought it waked in me.
 For at a feasting once over the wine
 One deep in liquor called aloud to me,
 'Hail, thou false foundling of a foster-sire!'
 That day with pain I held my passion down;
 But early on the morrow I came near
 And questioned both my parents, who were fierce
 In anger at the man who broached this word.
 For their part I was satisfied, but still
 It galled me, for the rumour would not die.
   Eluding then my parents I made way
 To Delphi, where, as touching my desire,
 Phoebus denied me; but brake forth instead
 With other oracles of misery
 And horrible misfortune, how that I
 Must know my mother's shame, and cause to appear
 A birth intolerable in human view,
 And do to death the author of my life.
 I fled forth at the word, conjecturing now
 Corinthia's region by the stars of heaven,
 And wandered, where I never might behold
 Those dreadful prophecies fulfilled on me.
 So travelling on, I came even to the place
 Where, as thou tell'st, the King of Thebe fell.
 And, O my wife, I will hide nought from thee.
 When I drew near the cross-road of your tale,
 A herald, and a man upon a car,
 Like your description, there encountered me.
 And he who led the car, and he himself
 The greybeard, sought to thrust me from the path.
 Then in mine angry mood I sharply struck
 The driver-man who turned me from the way;
 Which when the elder saw, he watched for me
 As I passed by, and from the chariot-seat
 Smote full upon my head with the fork'd goad;
 But got more than he gave; for, by a blow
 From this right hand, smit with my staff, he fell
 Instantly rolled out of the car supine.
 I slew them every one. Now if that stranger
 Had aught in common with king Laius,
 What wretch on earth was e'er so lost as I?
 Whom have the Heavens so followed with their hate?
 No house of Theban or of foreigner
 Must any more receive me, none henceforth
 Must speak to me, but drive me from the door!
 I, I have laid this curse on mine own head!
 Yea, and this arm that slew him now enfolds
 His queen. O cruel stain! Am I not vile?
 Polluted utterly! Yes, I must flee,
 And, lost to Thebe, nevermore behold
 My home, nor tread my country, lest I meet
 In marriage mine own mother, and bring low
 His head that gave me life and reared my youth,
 My father, Polybus. Ah! right were he
 Who should declare some god of cruel mood
 Had sent this trouble upon my soul! Ye Powers,
 Worshipped in holiness, ne'er may I see
 That day, but perish from the sight of men,
 Ere sins like these be branded on my name!
 
 CH. Thy fear is ours, O king: yet lose not hope,
 Till thou hast heard the witness of the deed.
 
 OED. Ay, that is all I still have left of hope,
 To bide the coming of the shepherd man.
 
 JO. What eager thought attends his presence here?
 
 OED. I'll tell thee. Should his speech accord with thine,
 My life stands clear from this calamity.
 
 JO. What word of mine agreed not with the scene?
 
 OED. You said he spake of robbers in a band
 As having slain him. Now if he shall still
 Persist in the same number, I am free.
 One man and many cannot be the same.
 But should he tell of one lone traveller,
 Then, unavoidably, this falls on me.
 
 JO. So 'twas given out by him, be sure of that.
 He cannot take it back. Not I alone
 But all the people heard him speak it so.
 And should he swerve in aught from his first tale,
 He ne'er can show the murder of the king
 Rightly accordant with the oracle.
 For Phoebus said expressly he should fall
 Through him whom I brought forth. But that poor babe
 Ne'er slew his sire, but perished long before.
 Wherefore henceforth I will pursue my way
 Regardless of all words of prophecy.
 
 OED. Wisely resolved. But still send one to bring
 The labourer swain, and be not slack in this.
 
 JO. I will, and promptly. Go we now within!
 My whole desire is but to work thy will.                     [_Exeunt_
 
 CHORUS
 O may my life be evermore                                          I 1
   Pure in each holy word and deed
   By those eternal laws decreed
 That pace the sapphire-paven floor!
 Children of Heaven, of Ether born,
 No mortal knew their natal morn,
 Nor may Oblivion's waters deep
 E'er lull their wakeful spirit asleep,
 Nor creeping Age o'erpower the mighty God
 Who far within them holds his unprofaned abode.
 
 Pride breeds the tyrant: monstrous birth!                          I 2
   Insolent Pride, if idly nursed
   On timeless surfeit, plenty accursed,
 Spurning the lowlier tract of Earth
 Mounts to her pinnacle,--then falls,
 Dashed headlong down sheer mountain walls
 To dark Necessity's deep ground,
 Where never foothold can be found.
 Let wrestlers for my country's glory speed,
 God, I thee pray! Be God my helper in all need!
 
 But if one be, whose bold disdain                                  I 2
 Walks in a round of vapourings vain
 And violent acts, regarding not
 The Rule of Right, but with proud thought
 Scorning the place where Gods have set their seat,
 --Made captive by an Evil Doom,
 Shorn of that inauspicious bloom,
 Let him be shown the path of lawful gain
 And taught in holier ways to guide his feet,
 Nor with mad folly strain
 His passionate arms to clasp things impious to retain.
 Who in such courses shall defend his soul
 From storms of thundrous wrath that o'er him roll?
 If honour to such lives be given,
 What needs our choir to hymn the power of Heaven?
 
 No more to Delphi, central shrine                                 II 2
 Of Earth, I'll seek, for light divine,
 Nor visit Abae's mystic fane
 Nor travel o'er the well-trod plain
 Where thousands throng to famed Olympia's town,
 Unless, with manifest accord,
 The event fulfil the oracular word.
 Zeus, Lord of all! if to eternity
 Thou would'st confirm thy kingdom's large renown,
 Let not their vauntings high
 Evade the sovereign look of the everlasting eye!
 They make as though the ancient warning slept
 By Laius erst with fear and trembling kept;
 Apollo's glory groweth pale,
 And holiest rites are prone to faint and fail.
 
 _Enter_ JOCASTA.
 
 JO. Princes of Thebes, it came into my thought
 To stand before some holy altar-place
 With frankincense and garlands. For the king,
 Transported by the tempest of his fear,
 Runs wild in grief, nor like a man of sense
 Reasons of present things from what hath been.
 Each tongue o'ermasters him that tells of woe.
 Then since my counsels are of no avail,
 To thee, for thou art nearest, Lykian God,
 I bring my supplication with full hand.
 O grant us absolution and relief!
 For seeing him, our pilot, so distraught,
 Like mariners, we are all amazed with dread.
 
 _Enter the_ CORINTHIAN SHEPHERD.
 
 COR. SH. Are ye the men to tell me where to find
 The mansion of the sovereign Oedipus?
 Or better, where he may himself be found?
 
 CH. Here is the roof you seek, and he, our lord,
 Is there within: and, stranger, thou behold'st
 The queenly mother of his royal race.
 
 COR. SH. May she and hers be alway fortunate!
 Still may she crown him with the joys of home!
 
 JO. Be thou, too, blest, kind sir! Thy gracious tongue
 Deserves no less. But tell me what request
 Or what intelligence thou bring'st with thee?
 
 COR. SH. Good tidings for thy house and husband, queen.
 
 JO. What are they? Who hath sent thee to our hall?
 
 COR. SH. From Corinth come I, and will quickly tell
 What sure will please you; though perchance 'twill grieve.
 
 JO. What news can move us thus two ways at once?
 
 COR. SH. 'Twas rumoured that the people of the land
 Of Corinth would make Oedipus their king.
 
 JO. Is ancient Polybus not still in power?
 
 COR. SH. No. Death confines him in a kingly grave.
 
 JO. Hold there! How say you? Polybus in his grave?
 
 COR. SH. May I die for him if I speak not true!
 
 JO. (_To an attendant_).
 Run thou, and tell this quickly to my lord!
 Voices of prophecy, where are ye now?
 Long time hath Oedipus, a homeless man,
 Trembled with fear of slaying Polybus.
 Who now lies slain by Fortune, not by him.
 
 _Enter_ OEDIPUS.
 
 OED. Jocasta, my dear queen, why didst thou send
 To bring me hither from our palace-hall?
 
 JO. Hear that man's tale, and then consider well
 The end of yonder dreadful prophecy.
 
 OED. Who is the man, and what his errand here?
 
 JO. He comes from Corinth, to make known to thee
 That Polybus, thy father, is no more.
 
 OED. How, stranger? Let me learn it from thy mouth.
 
 COR. SH. If my first duty be to make this clear,
 Know beyond doubt that he is dead and gone.
 
 OED. By illness coming o'er him, or by guile?
 
 COR. SH. Light pressure lays to rest the timeworn frame.
 
 OED. He was subdued by sickness then, poor soul!
 
 COR. SH. By sickness and the burden of his years.
 
 OED. Ah! my Jocasta, who again will heed
 The Pythian hearth oracular, and birds
 Screaming in air, blind guides! that would have made
 My father's death my deed; but he is gone,
 Hidden underneath the ground, while I stand hero
 Harmless and weaponless:--unless, perchance,
 My absence killed him,--so he may have died
 Through me. But be that as it may, the grave
 That covers Polybus, hath silenced, too,
 One voice of prophecy, worth nothing now.
 
 JO. Did I not tell thee so, long since?
 
 OED.                                    Thou didst.
 But I was drawn to error by my fear.
 
 JO. Now cast it altogether out of mind.
 
 OED. Must I not fear my mother's marriage-bed?
 
 JO. Why should man fear, seeing his course is ruled
 By fortune, and he nothing can foreknow?
 'Tis best to live at ease as best one may.
 Then fear not thou thy mother's nuptial hour.
 Many a man ere now in dreams hath lain
 With her who bare him. He hath least annoy
 Who with such omens troubleth not his mind.
 
 OED. That word would be well spoken, were not she
 Alive that gave me birth. But since she lives,
 Though you speak well, yet have I cause for fear.
 
 JO. Your father's burial might enlighten you.
 
 OED. It doth. But I am darkened by a life.
 
 COR. SH. Whose being overshadows thee with fear?
 
 OED. Queen Merope, the consort of your king.
 
 COR. SH. What in her life should make your heart afraid?
 
 OED. A heaven-sent oracle of dreadful sound.
 
 COR. SH. May it be told, or must no stranger know?
 
 OED. Indeed it may. Word came from Phoebus once
 That I must know my mother's shame, and shed
 With these my hands my own true father's blood.
 Wherefore long since my home hath been removed
 Far from Corinthos:--not unhappily;
 But still 'tis sweet to see a parent's face.
 
 COR. SH. Did fear of this make thee so long an exile?
 
 OED. Of this and parricide, my aged friend.
 
 COR. SH. I came with kind intent--and, dear my lord,
 I fain would rid thee from this haunting dread.
 
 OED. Our gratitude should well reward thy love.
 
 COR. SH. Hope of reward from thee in thy return
 Was one chief motive of my journey hither.
 
 OED. Return? Not to my parents' dwelling-place!
 
 COR. SH. Son, 'tis too clear, you know not what you do.
 
 OED. Wherefore, kind sir? For Heaven's sake teach me this.
 
 COR. SH. If for these reasons you avoid your home.
 
 OED. The fear torments me, Phoebus may prove true.
 
 COR. SH. Lest from your parents you receive a stain?
 
 OED. That is the life-long torment of my soul.
 
 COR. SH. Will you be certified your fears are groundless?
 
 OED. How groundless, if I am my parents' child?
 
 COR. SH. Because with Polybus thou hast no kin.
 
 OED. Why? Was not he the author of my life?
 
 COR. SH. As much as I am, and no more than I.
 
 OED. How can my father be no more to me
 Than who is nothing?
 
 COR. SH.             In begetting thee
 Nor I nor he had any part at all.
 
 OED. Why then did he declare me for his son?
 
 COR. SH. Because he took thee once a gift from me.
 
 OED. Was all that love unto a foundling shown?
 
 COR. SH. Heirless affection so inclined his heart.
 
 OED. A gift from you! Your purchase, or your child?[5]
 
 COR. SH. Found in Cithaeron's hollowy wilderness.
 
 OED. What led your travelling footstep to that ground?
 
 COR. SH. The flocks I tended grazed the mountain there.
 
 OED. A shepherd wast thou, and a wandering hind?
 
 COR. SH. Whatever else, my son, thy saviour then.
 
 OED. From what didst thou release me or relieve?
 
 COR. SH. Thine instep bears memorial of the pain.
 
 OED. Ah! what old evil will thy words disclose?
 
 COR. SH. Thy feet were pierced. 'Twas I unfastened them.
 
 OED. So cruel to my tender infancy!
 
 COR. SH. From this thou hast received thy name.
 
 OED.                                By heaven
 I pray thee, did my father do this thing,
 Or was't my mother?
 
 COR. SH.            That I dare not say.
 He should know best who gave thee to my hand.
 
 OED. Another gave me, then? You did not find me?
 
 COR. SH. Another herdsman passed thee on to me.
 
 OED. Can you describe him? Tell us what you know.
 
 COR. SH. Methinks they called him one of Laius' people.
 
 OED. Of Laius once the sovereign of this land?
 
 COR. SH. E'en so. He was a shepherd of his flock.
 
 OED. And is he still alive for me to see?
 
 COR. SH. You Thebans are most likely to know that.
 
 OED. Speak, any one of you in presence here,
 Can you make known the swain he tells us of,
 In town or country having met with him?
 The hour for this discovery is full come.
 
 CH. Methinks it is no other than the peasant
 Whom thou didst seek before to see: but this
 Could best be told by queen Jocasta there.
 
 OED. We lately sought that one should come, my queen.
 Know'st thou, is this of whom he speaks the same?
 
 JO. What matter who? Regard not, nor desire
 Even vainly to remember aught he saith.
 
 OED. When I have found such tokens of my birth,
 I must disclose it.
 
 JO.                 As you love your life,
 By heaven I beg you, search no further here!
 The sickness in my bosom is enough.
 
 OED. Nay, never fear! Were I proved thrice a slave
 And waif of bondwomen, you still are noble.
 
 JO. Yet hearken, I implore you: do not so.
 
 OED. I cannot hear you. I must know this through.
 
 JO. With clear perception I advise the best.
 
 OED. Thy 'best' is still my torment.
 
 JO.                                  Wretched one,
 Never may'st thou discover who thou art!
 
 OED. Will some one go and bring the herdman hither?
 Leave her to revel in her lordly line!
 
 JO. O horrible! O lost one! This alone
 I speak to thee, and no word more for ever.                    [_Exit_
 
 CH. Oedipus, wherefore is Jocasta gone,
 Driven madly by wild grief? I needs must fear
 Lest from this silence she make sorrow spring.
 
 OED. Leave her to raise what storm she will. But I
 Will persevere to know mine origin,
 Though from an humble seed. Her woman's pride
 Is shamed, it may be, by my lowliness.
 But I, whilst I account myself the son
 Of prospering Fortune, ne'er will be disgraced.
 For she is my true mother: and the months,
 Coheirs with me of the same father, Time,
 Have marked my lowness and mine exaltation.
 So born, so nurtured, I can fear no change,
 That I need shrink to probe this to the root.
                      [OEDIPUS _remains, and gazes towards the country,
                                               while the_ CHORUS _sing_
 
 CHORUS.
       If I wield a prophet's might,                                  1
       Or have sense to search aright,
   Cithaeron, when all night the moon rides high,
       Loud thy praise shall be confessed,
       How upon thy rugged breast,
   Thou, mighty mother, nursed'st tenderly
   Great Oedipus, and gav'st his being room
       Within thy spacious home.
       Yea, we will dance and sing
   Thy glory for thy kindness to our king.
       Phoebus, unto thee we cry,
       Be this pleasing in thine eye!
 
       Who, dear sovereign, gave thee birth,                          2
       Of the long lived nymphs of earth?
   Say, was she clasped by mountain roving Pan?
       Or beguiled she one sweet hour
       With Apollo in her bower,
   Who loves to trace the field untrod by man?
   Or was the ruler of Cyllene's height
       The author of thy light?
       Or did the Bacchic god,
   Who makes the top of Helicon to nod,
       Take thee for a foundling care
       From his playmates that are there?
 
 _The_ THEBAN SHEPHERD _is seen approaching, guarded._
 
 OED. If haply I, who never saw his face,
 Thebans, may guess, methinks I see the hind
 Whose coming we have longed for. Both his age,
 Agreeing with this other's wintry locks,
 Accords with my conjecture, and the garb
 Of his conductors is well known to me
 As that of mine own people. But methinks       [_to_ LEADER of CHORUS]
 Thou hast more perfect knowledge in this case,
 Having beheld the herdman in the past.
 
 CH. I know him well, believe me. Laius
 Had no more faithful shepherd than this man.
 
 OED. Corinthian friend, I first appeal to you:
 Was't he you spake of?
 
 COR. SH.               'Twas the man you see.
 
 OED. Turn thine eyes hither, aged friend, and tell
 What I shall ask thee. Wast thou Laius' slave?
 
 THEB. SH. I was, not bought, but bred within the house.
 
 OED. What charge or occupation was thy care?
 
 THEB. SH. Most of my time was spent in shepherding.
 
 OED. And where didst thou inhabit with thy flock?
 
 THEB. SH. 'Twas now Cithaeron, now the neighbouring tract.
 
 OED. And hadst thou there acquaintance of this man?
 
 THEB. SH. Following what service? What is he you mean?
 
 OED. The man you see. Hast thou had dealings with him?
 
 THEB. SH. I cannot bring him all at once to mind.
 
 COR. SH. No marvel, good my lord. But I will soon
 Wake to clear knowledge his oblivious sense.
 For sure I am he can recall the time,
 When he with his two flocks, and I with one
 Beside him, grazed Cithaeron's pasture wide
 Good six months' space of three successive years,
 From spring to rising of Arcturus; then
 For the bleak winter season, I drove mine
 To their own folds, he his to Laius' stalls.
 Do I talk idly, or is this the truth?
 
 THEB. SH. The time is far remote. But all is true.
 
 COR. SH. Well, dost remember having given me then
 A child, that I might nurture him for mine?
 
 THEB. SH. What means thy question? Let me know thy drift.
 
 COR. SH. Friend, yonder stands the infant whom we knew.
 
 THEB. SH. Confusion seize thee, and thy evil tongue!
 
 OED. Check not his speech, I pray thee, for thy words
 Call more than his for chastisement, old sir.
 
 THEB. SH. O my dread lord, therein do I offend?
 
 OED. Thou wilt not answer him about the child?
 
 THEB. SH. He knows not what he speaks. His end is vain.
 
 OED. So! Thou'lt not tell to please us, but the lash
 Will make thee tell.
 
 THEB. SH.            By all that's merciful,
 Scourge not this aged frame!
 
 OED.                         Pinion him straight!
 
 THEB. SH. Unhappy! wherefore? what is't you would know?
 
 OED. Gave you this man the child of whom he asks you?
 
 THEB. SH. I gave it him. Would I had died that hour!
 
 OED. Speak rightly, or your wish will soon come true.
 
 THEB. SH. My ruin comes the sooner, if I speak.
 
 OED. This man will balk us with his baffling prate.
 
 THEB. SH. Not so. I said long since, 'I gave the child.'
 
 OED. Whence? Was't your own, or from another's hand?
 
 THEB. SH. 'Twas not mine own; another gave it me.
 
 OED. What Theban gave it, from what home in Thebes?
 
 THEB. SH. O, I implore thee, master, ask no more!
 
 OED. You perish, if I have to ask again.
 
 THEB. SH. The child was of the stock of Laius.
 
 OED. Slave-born, or rightly of the royal line?
 
 THEB. SH. Ah me! Now comes the horror to my tongue!
 
 OED. And to mine ear. But thou shalt tell it me!
 
 THEB. SH. He was given out for Laius' son: but she,
 Thy queen, within the palace, best can tell.
 
 OED. How? Did she give it thee?
 
 THEB. SH.                       My lord, she did.
 
 OED. With what commission?
 
 THEB. SH.                  I was to destroy him.
 
 OED. And could a mother's heart be steeled to this?
 
 THEB. SH. With fear of evil prophecies.
 
 OED.                                    What were they?
 
 THEB. SH. 'Twas said the child should be his father's death.
 
 OED. What then possessed thee to give up the child
 To this old man?
 
 THEB. SH.        Pity, my sovereign lord!
 Supposing he would take him far away
 Unto the land whence he was come. But he
 Preserved him to great sorrow. For if thou
 Art he this man hath said, be well assured
 Thou bear'st a heavy doom.
 
 OED.                       O horrible!
 Horrible! All fulfilled, as sunlight clear!
 Oh may I nevermore behold the day,
 Since proved accursed in my parentage,
 In those I live with, and in him I slew!                     [_Exeunt_
 
 CHORUS.
       O mortal tribes of men,                                      I 1
       How near to nothingness
 I count you while your lives remain!
 What man that lives hath more of happiness
 Than to seem blest, and, seeming, fade in night?
 O Oedipus, in this thine hour of gloom,
 Musing on thee and thy relentless doom,
 I call none happy who beholds the light.
 
       Thou through surpassing skill                                I 2
       Didst rise to wealth and power,
 When thou the monstrous riddling maid didst kill,
 And stoodst forth to my country as a tower
 To guard from myriad deaths this glorious town;
 Whence thou wert called my king, of faultless fame,
 In all the world a far-resounded name,
 Unparagoned in honour and renown.
 
 But now to hear of thee, who more distressed?                     II 1
     Who more acquainted with fierce misery,
 Assaulted by disasters manifest,
     Than thou in this thy day of agony?
 Most noble, most renowned!--Yet one same room
     Heard thy first cry, and in thy prime of power,
 Received thee, harbouring both bride and groom,
     And bore it silently till this dread hour.
 How could that furrowing of thy father's field
 Year after year continue unrevealed?
 
 Time hath detected thine unwitting deed,                          II 2
     Time, who discovers all with eyes of fire,
 Accusing thee of living without heed
     In hideous wedlock husband, son, and sire.
 Ah would that we, thou child of Laius born,
     Ah would that we had never seen thee nigh!
 E'er since we knew thee who thou art, we mourn
     Exceedingly with cries that rend the sky.
 For, to tell truth, thou didst restore our life
 And gavest our soul sweet respite after strife.
 
 _Enter_ Messenger.
 
 MESS. O ye who in this land have ever held
 Chief honour, what an object of dire woe
 Awaits your eyes, your ears! What piercing grief
 Your hearts must suffer, if as kinsmen should
 Ye still regard the house of Laius!
 Not Phasis, nor the Danube's rolling flood,
 Can ever wash away the stain and purge
 This mansion of the horror that it hides.
 --And more it soon shall give to light, not now
 Unconsciously enacted. Of all ill,
 Self-chosen sorrows are the worst to bear.
 
 CH. What hast thou new to add? the weight of grief
 From that we know burdens the heart enough.
 
 MESS. Soon spoken and soon heard is the chief sum.
 Jocasta's royal head is sunk in death.
 
 CH. The hapless queen! What was the fatal cause?
 
 MESS. Her own determination. You are spared
 The worst affliction, not being there to see.
 Yet to the height of my poor memory's power
 The wretched lady's passion you shall hear.
 When she had passed in her hot mood within
 The vestibule, straight to the bridal room
 She rushes, tearing with both hands her hair.
 Then having entered, shutting fast the door,
 She called aloud on Laius, long dead,
 With anguished memory of that birth of old
 Whereby the father fell, leaving his queen
 To breed a dreadful brood for his own son.
 And loudly o'er the bed she wailed, where she,
 In twofold wedlock, hapless, had brought forth
 Husband from husband, children from a child.
 We could not know the moment of her death,
 Which followed soon, for Oedipus with cries
 Broke in, and would not let us see her end,
 But held our eyes as he careered the hall,
 Demanding arms, and where to find his wife,--
 No, not his wife, but fatal mother-croft,
 Cropped doubly with himself and his own seed.
 And in his rage some god directed him
 To find her:--'twas no man of us at hand.
 Then with a fearful shout, as following
 His leader, he assailed the folding-doors;
 And battering inward from the mortised bolts
 The bending boards, he burst into the room:
 Where high suspended we beheld the queen,
 In twisted cordage resolutely swung.
 He all at once on seeing her, wretched king!
 Undid the pendent noose, and on the ground
 Lay the ill-starred queen. Oh, then 'twas terrible
 To see what followed--for he tore away
 The tiring-pins wherewith she was arrayed,
 And, lifting, smote his eyeballs to the root,
 Saying, Nevermore should they behold the evil
 His life inherited from that past time,
 But all in dark henceforth should look upon
 Features far better not beheld, and fail
 To recognize the souls he had longed to know.
 Thus crying aloud, not once but oftentimes
 He drave the points into his eyes; and soon
 The bleeding pupils moistened all his beard,
 Nor stinted the dark flood, but all at once
 The ruddy hail poured down in plenteous shower.
 Thus from two springs, from man and wife together,
 Rose the joint evil that is now o'erflowing.
 And the old happiness in that past day
 Was truly happy, but the present hour
 Hath pain, crime, ruin:--whatsoe'er of ill
 Mankind have named, not one is absent here.
 
 CH. And finds the sufferer now some pause of woe?
 
 MESS. He bids make wide the portal and display
 To all the men of Thebes the man who slew
 His father, who unto his mother did
 What I dare not repeat, and fain would fling
 His body from the land, nor calmly bide
 The shock of his own curse on his own hall.
 Meanwhile he needs some comfort and some guide,
 For such a load of misery who can bear?
 Thyself shalt judge: for, lo, the palace-gates
 Unfold, and presently thine eyes will see
 A hateful sight, yet one thou needs must pity.
 
 _Enter_ OEDIPUS, _blind and unattended._
 
 LEADER OF CH. O horror of the world!
 Too great for mortal eye!
 More terrible than all I have known of ill!
 What fury of wild thought
 Came o'er thee? Who in heaven
 Hath leapt against thy hapless life
 With boundings out of measure fierce and huge?
 Ah! wretched one, I cannot look on thee:
 No, though I long to search, to ask, to learn.
 Thine aspect is too horrible.--I cannot!
 
 OED. Me miserable! Whither am I borne?
 Into what region are these wavering sounds
 Wafted on aimless wings? O ruthless Fate!
 To what a height thy fury hath soared!
 
 CH.                                    Too far
 For human sense to follow, or human thought
 To endure the horror.
 
 OED.                  O dark cloud, descending                     I 1
 Unutterably on me! invincible,
 Abhorred, borne onward by too sure a wind.
 Woe, woe!
 Woe! Yet again I voice it, with such pangs
 Both from these piercing wounds I am assailed
 And from within through memory of my grief.
 
 CH. Nay, 'tis no marvel if thy matchless woe
 Redouble thine affliction and thy moan!
 
 OED. Ah! Friend, thou art still constant! Thou remainest           I 2
 To tend me and to care for the blind man.
 Alas!
 I know thee well, nor fail I to perceive,
 Dark though I be, thy kind familiar voice.
 
 CH. How dreadful is thy deed! How couldst thou bear
 Thus to put out thine eyes? What Power impelled thee?
 
 OED. Apollo, dear my friends, Apollo brought to pass              II 1
 In dreadful wise, this my calamitous woe.
 But I,--no being else,--I with this hand destroyed them.
                                                [_Pointing to his eyes_
 For why should I have sight,
 To whom nought now gave pleasure through the eye?
 
 CH. There speak'st thou truly.
 
 OED.                           What could I see, whom hear
 With gladness, whom delight in any more?
 Lead me away out of the land with speed!
 Be rid of the destroyer, the accursed,
 Whom most of all the world the Gods abhor.
 
 CH. O miserable in thy calamity
 And not less miserable in thy despair,
 Would thou wert still in ignorance of thy birth!
 
 OED. My curse on him who from the cruel bond                      II 2
 That held my feet in that high pasture-land
 Freed me, and rescued me from murder there,
 And saved my life! Vain kindness! Then to have died
 Had spared this agony to me and mine.
 
 CH. Ay, would it had been so!
 
 OED. Then had I ne'er
 Been proved a parricide, ne'er borne the shame
 Of marriage bonds incestuous! But now
 I am God abandoned, Son of the unholy,
 Rival of him who gave me being. Ah woe!
 What sorrow beyond sorrows hath chief place?
 That sorrow Oedipus must bear!
 
 LEADER OF CH. I know not how to call thee wise in this:
 Thou wert better dead than to be blind and live.
 
 OED. That this last act hath not been for the best
 Instruct me not, nor counsel me again.
 How, if I kept my sight, could I have looked
 In Hades on my father's countenance,
 Or mine all hapless mother, when, toward both,
 I have done deeds no death can e'er atone?
 Ah! but my children were a sight of joy,--
 Offspring of such a marriage! were they so?
 Never, to eyes of mine! nor town, nor tower,
 Nor holy shrines o' the gods, which I myself,
 Dowered with the fairest life of Theban men,
 Have forfeited, alas, by mine own law,
 Declaring men should drive from every door
 One marked by Heaven as impious and impure,
 Nay worse, of Laius born! And was I then,
 By mine own edict branded thus, to look
 On Theban faces with unaltered eye?
 Nay verily, but had there been a way
 To stop the hearing fountain through the ear,
 I had not faltered, but had closed and barred
 Each gate of this poor body, deaf and blind!
 So thought might sweetly dwell at rest from ill
 Cithaeron! Why didst thou receive me? Why
 Not slay me then and there? So had I not
 Told to the world the horror of my birth.
 O foster home of Corinth and her king,
 How bright the life ye cherished, filming o'er
 What foulness far beneath! For I am vile,
 And vile were both my parents. So 'tis proved
 O cross road in the covert of the glen,
 O thicket in the gorge where three ways met,
 Bedewed by these my hands with mine own blood
 From whence I sprang--have ye forgotten me?
 Or doth some memory haunt you of the deeds
 I did before you, and went on to do
 Worse horrors here? O marriage twice accurst!
 That gave me being, and then again sent forth
 Fresh saplings springing from the selfsame seed,
 To amaze men's eyes and minds with dire confusion
 Of father, brother, son, bride, mother, wife,
 Murder of parents, and all shames that are!
 Silence alone befits such deeds. Then, pray you,
 Hide me immediately away from men!
 Kill me outright, or fling me far to sea,
 Where never ye may look upon me more.
 Come, lend your hand unto my misery!
 Comply, and fear not, for my load of woe
 Is incommunicable to all but me.
 
 CH. With timely presence to fulfil thy need
 With act and counsel, Creon comes, who now
 Is regent o'er this people in thy room.
 
 OED. Alas, what shall I say to him? What plea
 For my defence will hold? My evil part
 Toward him in all the past is clearly proved.
 
 _Enter_ CREON.
 
 CR. I come not, Oedipus, to mock thy woes,
 Nor to reproach thee for thine evils past.
 But ye, (_to_ Chorus) if all respect of mortal eye
 Be dead, let awe of the universal flame
 Of life's great nourisher, our lord the Sun,
 Forbid your holding thus unveiled to view
 This huge abomination, which nor Earth
 Nor sacred Element, nor light of Heaven
 Can once endure. Convey him in with speed.
 Religion bids that kindred eyes and ears
 Alone should witness kindred crime and woe.
 
 OED. By Heaven, since thou hast reft away my fear,
 So nobly meeting my unworthiness,
 I pray thee, hear me for thine own behoof.
 
 CR. What boon dost thou desire so earnestly?
 
 OED. Fling me with speediest swiftness from the land,
 Where nevermore I may converse with men.
 
 CR. Doubt not I would have done it, but the God
 Must be inquired of, ere we act herein.
 
 OED. His sacred utterance was express and clear,
 The parricide, the unholy, should be slain.
 
 CR. Ay, so 'twas spoken: but, in such a time,
 We needs must be advised more perfectly.
 
 OED. Will ye then ask him for a wretch like me?
 
 CR. Yea. For even thou methinks wilt now believe.
 
 OED. Not only so. But I will charge thee too,
 With urgent exhortation, to perform
 The funeral rite for her who lies within--
 She is thy kinswoman--howe'er thou wilt.
 But never let this city of my sires
 Claim me for living habitant! There, there
 Leave me to range the mountain, where my nurse,
 Cithaeron, echoeth with my name,--Cithaeron,
 Which both my parents destined for my tomb.
 So my true murderers will be my death.
 Yet one thing I can tell. Mine end will come
 Not by disease nor ordinary chance
 I had not lived when at the point to die,
 But for some terrible doom. Then let my fate
 Run out its full career. But for my children
 Thou, Creon, shalt provide. As for my sons,
 I pray thee burden not thyself with them.
 They ne'er will lack subsistence--they are men.
 But my poor maidens, hapless and forlorn,
 Who never had a meal apart from mine,
 But ever shared my table, yea, for them
 Take heedful care, and grant me, though but once.
 Yea, I beseech thee, with these hands to feel,
 Thou noble heart! the forms I love so well,
 And weep with them our common misery.
 Oh, if my arms were round them, I might seem
 To have them as of old when I could see--
 What! Am I fooled once more, or do I hear
 My dear ones weeping! And hath Creon sent,
 Pitying my sorrows, mine own children to me
 Whom most I love? Can this be truth I utter?
 
 CR. Yea, I have done it. For I knew the joy
 Thou ever hadst in this, thy comfort now.
 
 OED. Fair be thy fortune, and, for this last deed,
 Heaven guide thee on a better course than mine.
 Where are ye, O my children? Come, draw near
 To these my hands of brother blood with you,
 Hands that have made so piteous to your sight
 The darkened gaze of his once brilliant eyes,
 Who all in blindness, with no thought of ill,
 Became your father at that fount of life,
 Where he himself took being! Oh! for you
 I weep, not seeing you, when I but think
 Of all the bitter passages of fate
 That must attend you amongst men. For where
 Can ye find fellowship, what civic throng
 Shall ye resort unto, what festival,
 From whence, instead of sight or sound enjoyed,
 Ye will not come in tears unto your home?
 And when ye reach the marriageable bloom,
 My daughters, who will be the man to cast
 His lot with yours, receiving for his own
 All those reproaches which have marred the name
 Of both my parents and your name no less?
 What evil is not here? Your father slew
 His father, and then eared the mother field
 Where he himself was sown, and got you from
 The source of his own birth. Such taunts will fly.
 And who will marry you? No man, my daughters;
 But ye must wither childless and unwed.
 Son of Menoeceus, who alone art left
 As father to these maidens, for the pair
 That gave them birth are utterly undone,
 Suffer them not, being your kinswomen,
 To wander desolate and poor, nor make
 Their lot perforce the counterpart of mine.
 But look on them with pity, left in youth
 Forlorn of all protection save from thee.
 Noble one, seal this promise with thy hand!
 --For you, my children, were ye of an age
 To ponder speech, I would have counselled you
 Full carefully. Now I would have you pray
 To dwell where 'tis convenient, that your life
 May find more blessing than your father knew.
 
 CR. Thou hast had enough of weeping. Close thee in thy chamber walls.
 
 OED. I must yield, though sore against me.
 
 CR.                                    Yea, for strong occasion calls.
 
 OED. Know'st thou on what terms I yield it?
 
 CR.                                     Tell me, let us hear and know.
 
 OED. That ye send from the country.
 
 CR.                                 God alone can let thee go.
 
 OED. But the Gods long since abhor me.
 
 CR.                                   Thou wilt sooner gain that boon.
 
 OED. Then consent.
 
 CR.                'Tis not my wont to venture promises too soon.
 
 OED. Lead me now within the palace.
 
 CR.                                 Come, but leave thy children.
 
 OED.                                                              Nay!
 Tear not these from my embraces!
 
 CR.                              Hope not for perpetual sway:
 Since the power thou once obtainedst ruling with unquestioned might
 Ebbing from thy life hath vanished ere the falling of the night.
 
 LEADER OF CHORUS.
 Dwellers in our native Thebe, fix on Oedipus your eyes.
 Who resolved the dark enigma, noblest champion and most wise.
 Like a star his envied fortune mounted beaming[6] far and wide:
 Now he sinks in seas of anguish, whelmed beneath a raging tide.
 Therefore, with the old-world sages, waiting for that final day,
 I will call no mortal happy, while he holds his house of clay,
 Till without one pang of sorrow, all his hours have passed away.
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                                ELECTRA
 
 
                              THE PERSONS
 
 An Old Man, _formerly one of the retainers of Agamemnon._
 ORESTES, _son of Agamemnon and Clytemnestra_.
 ELECTRA, _sister of Orestes_.
 CHORUS _of Argive Women_.
 CHRYSOTHEMIS, _sister of Orestes and Electra_.
 CLYTEMNESTRA.
 AEGISTHUS.
 
 PYLADES _appears with_ ORESTES, _but does not speak_.
 
 
 SCENE. Mycenae: before the palace of the Pelopidae.
 
 
 
 
 Agamemnon on his return from Troy, had been murdered by his wife
 Clytemnestra and her paramour Aegisthus, who had usurped the Mycenean
 throne. Orestes, then a child, had been rescued by his sister Electra,
 and sent into Phocis with the one servant who remained faithful to his
 old master. The son of Agamemnon now returns, being of a full age,
 accompanied by this same attendant and his friend Pylades, with whom
 he has already concerted a plan for taking vengeance on his father's
 murderers, in obedience to the command of Apollo.
 
 Orestes had been received in Phocis by Strophius, his father's friend.
 Another Phocian prince, named Phanoteus, was a friend of Aegisthus.
 
 
 
 
                                ELECTRA
 
 
 ORESTES _and the_ Old Man--PYLADES _is present._
 
 OLD MAN. Son of the king who led the Achaean host
 Erewhile beleaguering Troy, 'tis thine to day
 To see around thee what through many a year
 Thy forward spirit hath sighed for. Argolis
 Lies here before us, hallowed as the scene
 Of Io's wildering pain: yonder, the mart
 Named from the wolf slaying God[1], and there, to our left,
 Hera's famed temple. For we reach the bourn
 Of far renowned Mycenae, rich in gold
 And Pelops' fatal roofs before us rise,
 Haunted with many horrors, whence my hand,
 Thy murdered sire then lying in his gore,
 Received thee from thy sister, and removed
 Where I have kept thee safe and nourished thee
 To this bright manhood thou dost bear, to be
 The avenger of thy father's bloody death.
 Wherefore, Orestes, and thou, Pylades,
 Dearest of friends, though from a foreign soil,
 Prepare your enterprise with speed. Dark night
 Is vanished with her stars, and day's bright orb
 Hath waked the birds of morn into full song.
 Now, then, ere foot of man go forth, ye two
 Knit counsels. 'Tis no time for shy delay:
 The very moment for your act is come.
 
 OR. Kind faithful friend, how well thou mak'st appear
 Thy constancy in service to our house!
 As some good steed, aged, but nobly bred,
 Slacks not his spirit in the day of war,
 But points his ears to the fray, even so dost thou
 Press on and urge thy master in the van.
 Hear, then, our purpose, and if aught thy mind,
 Keenly attent, discerns of weak or crude
 In this I now set forth, admonish me.
   I, when I visited the Pythian shrine
 Oracular, that I might learn whereby
 To punish home the murderers of my sire,
 Had word from Phoebus which you straight shall hear:
 'No shielded host, but thine own craft, O King!
 The righteous death-blow to thine arm shall bring.'
 Then, since the will of Heaven is so revealed,
 Go thou within, when Opportunity
 Shall marshal thee the way, and gathering all
 Their business, bring us certain cognizance.
 Age and long absence are a safe disguise;
 They never will suspect thee who thou art.
 And let thy tale be that another land,
 Phocis, hath sent thee forth, and Phanoteus,
 Than whom they have no mightier help in war.
 Then, prefaced with an oath, declare thy news,
 Orestes' death by dire mischance, down-rolled
 From wheel-borne chariot in the Pythian course.
 So let the fable be devised; while we,
 As Phoebus ordered, with luxuriant locks
 Shorn from our brows, and fair libations, crown
 My father's sepulchre, and thence return
 Bearing aloft the shapely vase of bronze
 That's hidden hard by in brushwood, as thou knowest,
 And bring them welcome tidings, that my form
 Is fallen ere now to ashes in the fire.
 How should this pain me, in pretence being dead,
 Really to save myself and win renown?
 No saying bodes men ill, that brings them gain.
 Oft have I known the wise, dying in word,
 Return with glorious salutation home.
 So lightened by this rumour shall mine eye
 Blaze yet like bale-star on mine enemies.
 O native earth! and Gods that hold the land,
 Accept me here, and prosper this my way!
 Thou, too, paternal hearth! To thee I come,
 Justly to cleanse thee by behest from heaven.
 Send me not bootless, Gods, but let me found
 A wealthy line of fair posterity!
 I have spoken. To thy charge! and with good heed
 Perform it. We go forth. The Occasion calls,
 Great taskmaster of enterprise to men.
 
 ELECTRA (_within_). Woe for my hapless lot!
 
 OLD M. Hark! from the doors, my son, methought there came
 A moaning cry, as of some maid within.
 
 OR. Can it be poor Electra? Shall we stay,
 And list again the lamentable sound?
 
 OLD M. Not so. Before all else begin the attempt
 To execute Apollo's sovereign will,
 Pouring libation to thy sire: this makes
 Victory ours, and our success assured.                       [_Exeunt_
 
 _Enter_ ELECTRA.
 
 MONODY.
 
 EL. O purest light!
 And air by earth alone
 Measured and limitable, how oft have ye
 Heard many a piercing moan,
 Many a blow full on my bleeding breast,
 When gloomy night
 Hath slackened pace and yielded to the day!
 And through the hours of rest,
 Ah! well 'tis known
 To my sad pillow in yon house of woe,
 What vigil of scant joyance keeping,
 Whiles all within are sleeping,
 For my dear father without stint I groan,
 Whom not in bloody fray
 The War-god in the stranger-land
 Received with hospitable hand,
 But she that is my mother, and her groom,
 As woodmen fell the oak,
 Cleft through the skull with murdering stroke.
 And o'er this gloom
 No ray of pity, save from only me,
 Goes forth on thee,
 My father, who didst die
 A cruel death of piteous agony.
 But ne'er will I
 Cease from my crying and sad mourning lay,
 While I behold the sky,
 Glancing with myriad fires, or this fair day.
 But, like some brood-bereaved nightingale,
 With far-heard wail,
 Here at my father's door my voice shall sound.
 O home beneath the ground!
 Hades unseen, and dread Persephone,
 And darkling Hermes, and the Curse revered,
 And ye, Erinyes, of mortals feared,
 Daughters of Heaven, that ever see
 Who die unjustly, who are wronged i' the bed
 Of those they wed,
 Avenge our father's murder on his foe!
 Aid us, and send my brother to my side;
 Alone I cannot longer bide
 The oppressive strain of strength-o'ermastering woe.
 
 CHORUS (_entering_).
       O sad Electra, child                                         I 1
 Of a lost mother, why still flow
 Unceasingly with lamentation wild
 For him who through her treachery beguiled,
 Inveigled by a wife's deceit,
 Fallen at the foul adulterer's feet,
 Most impiously was quelled long years ago?
 Perish the cause! if I may lawfully pray so.
 
 EL. O daughters of a noble line,
 Ye come to soothe me from my troublous woe.
         I see, I know:
 Your love is not unrecognized of mine.
 But yet I will not seem as I forgot,
 Or cease to mourn my hapless father's lot.
         Oh, of all love
 That ever may you move,
 This only boon I crave--
 Leave me to rave!
 
 CH. Lament, nor praying breath                                     I 2
 Will raise thy sire, our honoured chief,
 From that dim multitudinous gulf of death.
 Beyond the mark, due grief that measureth,
 Still pining with excess of pain
 Thou urgest lamentation vain,
 That from thy woes can bring thee no relief.
 Why hast thou set thy heart on unavailing grief?
 
 EL. Senseless were he who lost from thought
 A noble father, lamentably slain!
         I love thy strain,
 Bewildered mourner, bird divinely taught,
 For 'Itys,' 'Itys,' ever heard to pine.
 O Niobe, I hold thee all divine,
         Of sorrows queen,
 Who with all tearful mien
 Insepulchred in stone
 Aye makest moan.
 
 CH. Not unto thee alone hath sorrow come,                         II 1
 Daughter, that thou shouldst carry grief so far
 Beyond those dwellers in the palace-home
         Who of thy kindred are
 And own one source with thee.
         What life hath she,
 Chrysothemis, and Iphianassa bright,
         And he whose light
 Is hidden afar from taste of horrid doom,
 Youthful Orestes, who shall come
 To fair Mycenae's glorious town,
 Welcomed as worthy of his sire's renown,
 Sped by great Zeus with kindly thought,
 And to this land with happiest omen brought?
 
 EL. Awaiting him I endlessly endure;
 Unwed and childless still I go,
         With tears in constant flow,
 Girt round with misery that finds no cure.
 But he forgets his wrong and all my teaching.
 What message have I sent beseeching,
 But baffled flies back idly home?
 Ever he longs, he saith, but, longing, will not come.
 
 CH. Take heart, dear child! still mighty in the sky               II 2
 Is Zeus who ruleth all things and surveys.
 Commit to him thy grief that surgeth high,
         And walk in safer ways,
 Let not hate vex thee sore,
         Nor yet ignore
 The cause of hate and sorrow in thy breast.
         Time bringeth rest:
 All is made easy through his power divine.
 The heir of Agamemnon's line
 Who dwells by Crisa's pastoral strand
 Shall yet return unto his native land;
 And he shall yet regard his own
 Who reigns beneath upon his Stygian throne.
 
 EL. Meanwhile my life falls from me in despair
 Years pass and patience nought avails:
         My heart within me fails:
 Orphaned I pine without protecting care;
 And like a sojourner all unregarded
 At slave-like labour unrewarded
 I toil within my father's hall
 Thus meanly attired, and starved, a table-serving thrall.
 
 CH. Sad was thy greeting when he reached the strand,             III 1
 Piteous thy crying where thy father lay
         On that fell day
 When the bronze edge with dire effect was driven.
         By craft 'twas planned,
 By frenzied lust the blow was given:
 Mother and father of a monstrous birth,
 Whether a God there wrought or mortal of the Earth.
 
 EL. O day beyond all days that yet have rolled
 Most hateful in thy course of light!
         O horror of that night!
 O hideous feast, abhorr'd, not to be told!
 How could I bear it, when my father's eye
 Saw death advancing from the ruthless pair,
 Conjoint in cruel villany,
 By whom my life was plunged in black despair?
 Oh, to the workers of such deeds as these
         May great Olympus' Lord
 Return of evil still afford,
 Nor let them wear the gloss of sovran ease!
 
 CH. Take thought to keep thy crying within bound.                III 2
 Doth not thy sense enlighten thee to see
         How recklessly
 Even now thou winnest undeserved woe?
         Still art thou found
 To make thy misery overflow
 Through self-bred gloomy strife. But not for long
 Shall one alone prevail who strives against the strong.
 
 EL. 'Twas dire oppression taught me my complaint
 I know my rage a quenchless fire:
         But nought, however dire,
 Shall visit this my frenzy with restraint,
 Or check my lamentation while I live.
 Dear friends, kind women of true Argive breed,
 Say, who can timely counsel give
 Or word of comfort suited to my need?
 Beyond all cure shall this my cause be known.
         No counsels more! Ah leave,
 Vain comforters, and let me grieve
 With ceaseless pain, unmeasured in my moan.
 
 CH. With kind intent                                                IV
 Full tenderly my words are meant;
 Like a true mother pressing heart to heart,
 I pray thee, do not aggravate thy smart.
 
 EL. But have my miseries a measure? Tell.
         Can it be well
 To pour forgetfulness upon the dead?
         Hath mortal head
 Conceived a wickedness so bold?
 O never may such brightness shine for me,
         Nor let me peaceful be
 With aught of good my life may still enfold,
 If from wide echoing of my father's name
 The wings of keen lament I must withhold.
         Sure holy shame
 And pious care would vanish among men,
 If he, mere earth and nothingness, must lie
 In darkness, and his foes shall not again
 Render him blood for blood in amplest penalty.
 
 LEADER OF CH. Less from our own desires, my child, we came,
 Than for thy sake. But, if we speak amiss,
 Take thine own course. We still will side with thee.
 
 EL. Full well I feel that too impatiently
 I seem to multiply the sounds of woe.
 Yet suffer me, dear women! Mighty force
 Compels me. Who that had a noble heart
 And saw her father's cause, as I have done,
 By day and night more outraged, could refrain?
 Are my woes lessening? Are they not in bloom?--
 My mother full of hate and hateful proved,
 Whilst I in my own home must dwell with these,
 My father's murderers, and by them be ruled,
 Dependent on their bounty even for bread.
 And then what days suppose you I must pass,
 When I behold Aegisthus on the throne
 That was my father's; when I see him wear
 Such robes, and pour libations by the hearth
 Where he destroyed him; lastly, when I see
 Their crowning insolence,--our regicide
 Laid in my father's chamber beside her,
 My mother--if she still must bear the name
 When resting in those arms? Her shame is dead.
 She harbours with blood-guiltiness, and fears
 No vengeance, but, as laughing at the wrong,
 She watches for the hour wherein with guile
 She killed our sire, and orders dance and mirth
 That day o' the month, and joyful sacrifice
 Of thanksgiving. But I within the house
 Beholding, weep and pine, and mourn that feast
 Of infamy, called by my father's name,
 All to myself; for not even grief may flow
 As largely as my spirit would desire.
 That so-called princess of a noble race
 O'ercrows my wailing with loud obloquy:
 'Hilding! are you alone in grief? Are none
 Mourning for loss of fathers but yourself?
 'Fore the blest Gods! ill may you thrive, and ne'er
 Find cure of sorrow from the powers below!'
 So she insults: unless she hear one say
 'Orestes will arrive': then standing close,
 She shouts like one possessed into mine ear,
 'These are your doings, this your work, I trow.
 You stole Orestes from my gripe, and placed
 His life with fosterers; but you shall pay
 Full penalty.' So harsh is her exclaim.
 And he at hand, the husband she extols,
 Hounds on the cry, that prince of cowardice,
 From head to foot one mass of pestilent harm.
 Tongue-doughty champion of this women's-war.
 I, for Orestes ever languishing
 To end this, am undone. For evermore
 Intending, still delaying, he wears out
 All hope, both here and yonder. How, then, friends,
 Can I be moderate, or feel the touch
 Of holy resignation? Evil fruit
 Cannot but follow on a life of ill.
 
 CH. Say, is Aegisthus near while thus you speak?
 Or hath he left the palace? We would know.
 
 EL. Most surely. Never think, if he were by,
 I could stray out of door. He is abroad.
 
 CH. Then with less fear I may converse with thee.
 
 EL. Ask what you will, for he is nowhere near.
 
 CH. First of thy brother I beseech thee tell,
 How deem'st thou? Will he come, or still delay?
 
 EL. His promise comes, but still performance sleeps.
 
 CH. Well may he pause who plans a dreadful deed.
 
 EL. I paused not in his rescue from the sword.
 
 CH. Fear not. He will bestead you. He is true.
 
 EL. But for that faith my life had soon gone by.
 
 CH. No more! I see approaching from the house
 Thy sister by both parents of thy blood,
 Chrysothemis; in her hand an offering,
 Such as old custom yields to those below.
 
 _Enter_ CHRYSOTHEMIS.
 
 CHRYSOTHEMIS. What converse keeps thee now beyond the gates,
 Dear sister? why this talk in the open day?
 Wilt thou not learn after so long to cease
 From vain indulgence of a bootless rage?
 I know in my own breast that I am pained
 By what thou griev'st at, and if I had power,
 My censure of their deeds would soon be known.
 But in misfortune I have chosen to sail
 With lowered canvas, rather than provoke
 With puny strokes invulnerable foes.
 I would thou didst the like: though I must own
 The right is on thy side, and not on mine.
 But if I mean to dwell at liberty,
 I must obey in all the stronger will.
 
 EL. 'Tis strange and pitiful, thy father's child
 Can leave him in oblivion and subserve
 The mother. All thy schooling of me springs
 From her suggestion, not of thine own wit.
 Sure, either thou art senseless, or thy sense
 Deserts thy friends. Treason or dulness then?
 Choose!--You declared but now, if you had strength,
 You would display your hatred of this pair.
 Yet, when I plan full vengeance for my sire,
 You aid me not, but turn me from the attempt.
 What's this but adding cowardice to evil?
 For tell me, or be patient till I show,
 What should I gain by ceasing this my moan?
 I live to vex them:--though my life be poor,
 Yet that suffices, for I honour him,
 My father,--if affection touch the dead.
 You say you hate them, but belie your word,
 Consorting with our father's murderers.
 I then, were all the gifts in which you glory
 Laid at my feet, will never more obey
 This tyrant power. I leave you your rich board
 And life of luxury. Ne'er be it mine[2] to feed
 On dainties that would poison my heart's peace!
 I care not for such honour as thou hast.
 Nor wouldst thou care if thou wert wise. But now,
 Having the noblest of all men for sire,
 Be called thy mother's offspring; so shall most
 Discern thine infamy and traitorous mind
 To thy dead father and thy dearest kin.
 
 CH. No anger, we entreat. Both have said well,
 If each would learn of other, and so do.
 
 CHR. For my part, women, use hath seasoned me
 To her discourse. Nor had I spoken of this,
 Had I not heard a horror coming on
 That will restrain her from her endless moan.
 
 EL. Come speak it forth, this terror! I will yield,
 If thou canst tell me worse than I endure.
 
 CHR. I'll tell thee all I know. If thou persist
 In these thy wailings, they will send thee far
 From thine own land, and close thee from the day,
 Where in a rock-hewn chamber thou may'st chant
 Thine evil orisons in darkness drear.
 Think of it, while there 's leisure to reflect;
 Or if thou suffer, henceforth blame me not.
 
 EL. And have they so determined on my life?
 
 CHR. 'Tis certain; when Aegisthus comes again.
 
 EL. If that be all, let him return with speed!
 
 CHR. Unhappy! why this curse upon thyself?
 
 EL. If this be their intent, why, let him come!
 
 CHR. To work such harm on thee! What thought is this!
 
 EL. Far from mine eye to banish all your brood.
 
 CHR. Art not more tender of the life thou hast?
 
 EL. Fair, to a marvel, is my life, I trow!
 
 CHR. It would be, couldst thou be advised for good.
 
 EL. Never advise me to forsake my kin.
 
 CHR. I do not: only to give place to power.
 
 EL. Thine be such flattery. 'Tis not my way.
 
 CHR. Sure, to be wrecked by rashness is not well.
 
 EL. Let me be wrecked in 'venging my own sire.
 
 CHR. I trust his pardon for my helplessness.
 
 EL. Such talk hath commendation from the vile.
 
 CHR. Wilt thou not listen? Wilt thou ne'er be ruled?
 
 EL. No; not by thee! Let me not sink so low.
 
 CHR. Then I will hie me on mine errand straight.
 
 EL. Stay; whither art bound? For whom to spend those gifts?
 
 CHR. Sent by my mother to my father's tomb
 To pour libations to him.
 
 EL.                       How? To him?
 Most hostile to her of all souls that are?
 
 CHR. Who perished by her hand--so thou wouldst say.
 
 EL. What friend hath moved her? Who hath cared for this?
 
 CHR. Methinks 'twas some dread vision, seen by night.
 
 EL. Gods of my father, O be with me now!
 
 CHR. What? art thou hopeful from the fear I spake of?
 
 EL. Tell me the dream, and I will answer thee.
 
 CHR. I know but little of it.
 
 EL.                           Speak but that.
 A little word hath ofttimes been the cause
 Of ruin or salvation unto men.
 
 CHR. 'Tis said she saw our father's spirit come
 Once more to visit the abodes of light;
 Then take and firmly plant upon the hearth
 The sceptre which he bore of old, and now
 Aegisthus bears: and out of this upsprang
 A burgeoned shoot, that shadowed all the ground
 Of loved Mycenae. So I heard the tale
 Told by a maid who listened when the Queen
 Made known her vision to the God of Day.
 But more than this I know not, save that I
 Am sent by her through terror of the dream.
 And I beseech thee by the Gods we serve
 To take my counsel and not rashly fall.
 If thou repel me now, the time may come
 When suffering shall have brought thee to my side.
 
 EL. Now, dear Chrysothemis, of what thou bearest
 Let nothing touch his tomb. 'Tis impious
 And criminal to offer to thy sire
 Rites and libations from a hateful wife.
 Then cast them to the winds, or deep in dust
 Conceal them, where no particle may reach
 His resting-place: but lie in store for her
 When she goes underground. Sure, were she not
 Most hardened of all women that have been,
 She ne'er had sent those loveless offerings
 To grace the sepulchre of him she slew.
 For think how likely is the buried king
 To take such present kindly from her hand,
 Who slew him like an alien enemy,
 Dishonoured even in death, and mangled him,
 And wiped the death-stain with his flowing locks--
 Sinful purgation! Think you that you bear
 In those cold gifts atonement for her guilt?
 It is not possible. Wherefore let be.
 But take a ringlet from thy comely head,
 And this from mine, that lingers on my brow[3]
 Longing to shade his tomb. Ah, give it to him,
 All I can give, and this my maiden-zone,
 Not daintily adorned, as once erewhile.
 Then, humbly kneeling, pray that from the ground
 He would arise to help us 'gainst his foes,
 And grant his son Orestes with high hand
 Strongly to trample on his enemies;
 That in our time to come from ampler stores
 We may endow him, than are ours to-day.
 I cannot but imagine that his will
 Hath part in visiting her sleep with fears.
 But howsoe'er, I pray thee, sister mine,
 Do me this service, and thyself, and him,
 Dearest of all the world to me and thee,
 The father of us both, who rests below.
 
 CH. She counsels piously; and thou, dear maid,
 If thou art wise, wilt do her bidding here.
 
 CHR. Yea, when a thing is right, it is not well
 Idly to wrangle, but to act with speed.
 Only, dear friends, in this mine enterprise,
 Let me have silence from your lips, I pray;
 For should my mother know of it, sharp pain
 Will follow yet my bold adventurous feat.         [_Exit_ CHRYSOTHEMIS
 
 CHORUS.
     An erring seer am I,                                           I 1
     Of sense and wisdom lorn,
     If this prophetic Power of right,
     O'ertaking the offender, come not nigh
           Ere many an hour be born.
           Yon vision of the night,
     That lately breathed into my listening ear,
     Hath freed me, O my daughter, from all fear.
     Sweet was that bodement. He doth not forget,
     The Achaean lord that gave thee being, nor yet
     The bronzen-griding axe, edged like a spear,
     Hungry and keen, though dark with stains of time,
     That in the hour of hideous crime
     Quelled him with cruel butchery:
     That, too, remembers, and shall testify.
 
     From ambush deep and dread                                     I 2
     With power of many a hand
     And many hastening feet shall spring
     The Fury of the adamantine tread,
           Visiting Argive land
           Swift recompense to bring
     For eager dalliance of a blood-stained pair
     Unhallowed, foul, forbidden. No omen fair,--
     Their impious course hath fixed this in my soul,--
     Nought but black portents full of blame shall roll
     Before their eyes that wrought or aided there.
     Small force of divination would there seem
     In prophecy or solemn dream,
     Should not this vision of the night
     Reach harbour in reality aright.
 
     O chariot-course of Pelops, full of toil[4]!                    II
           How wearisome and sore
     Hath been thine issue to our native soil!--
     Since, from the golden oar
     Hurled to the deep afar,
           Myrtilus sank and slept,
     Cruelly plucked from that fell chariot-floor,
     This house unceasingly hath kept
     Crime and misfortune mounting evermore.
 
 _Enter_ CLYTEMNESTRA.
 
 CLYTEMNESTRA. Again you are let loose and range at will.
 Ay, for Aegisthus is not here, who barred
 Your rashness from defaming your own kin
 Beyond the gates. But now he's gone from home,
 You heed not me: though you have noised abroad
 That I am bold in crime, and domineer
 Outrageously, oppressing thee and thine.
 I am no oppressor, but I speak thee ill,
 For thou art ever speaking ill of me--
 Still holding forth thy father's death, that I
 Have done it. So I did: I know it well:
 That I deny not; for not I alone
 But Justice slew him; and if you had sense,
 To side with Justice ought to be your part.
 For who but he of all the Greeks, your sire,
 For whom you whine and cry, who else but he
 Took heart to sacrifice unto the Gods
 Thy sister?--having less of pain, I trow,
 In getting her, than I, that bore her, knew!
 Come, let me question thee! On whose behalf
 Slew he my child? Was 't for the Argive host?
 What right had they to traffic in my flesh?--
 Menelaues was his brother. Wilt thou say
 He slew my daughter for his brother's sake?
 How then should he escape me? Had not he,
 Menelaues, children twain, begotten of her
 Whom to reclaim that army sailed to Troy?
 Was Death then so enamoured of my seed,
 That he must feast thereon and let theirs live?
 Or was the God-abandoned father's heart
 Tender toward them and cruel to my child?
 Doth this not argue an insensate sire?
 I think so, though your wisdom may demur.
 And could my lost one speak, she would confirm it.
 For my part, I can dwell on what I have done
 Without regret. You, if you think me wrong,
 Bring reasons forth and blame me to my face!
 
 EL. Thou canst not say this time that I began
 And brought this on me by some taunting word.
 But, so you'd suffer me, I would declare
 The right both for my sister and my sire.
 
 CLY. Thou hast my sufferance. Nor would hearing vex,
 If ever thus you tuned your speech to me.
 
 EL. Then I will speak. You say you slew him. Where
 Could there be found confession more depraved,
 Even though the cause were righteous? But I'll prove
 No rightful vengeance drew thee to the deed,
 But the vile bands of him you dwell with now.
 Or ask the huntress Artemis, what sin
 She punished, when she tied up all the winds
 Round Aulis.--I will tell thee, for her voice
 Thou ne'er may'st hear! 'Tis rumoured that my sire,
 Sporting within the goddess' holy ground,
 His foot disturbed a dappled hart, whose death
 Drew from his lips some rash and boastful word.
 Wherefore Latona's daughter in fell wrath
 Stayed the army, that in quittance for the deer
 My sire should slay at the altar his own child.
 So came her sacrifice. The Achaean fleet
 Had else no hope of being launched to Troy
 Nor to their homes. Wherefore, with much constraint
 And painful urging of his backward will,
 Hardly he yielded;--not for his brother's sake.
 But grant thy speech were sooth, and all were done
 In aid of Menelaues; for this cause
 Hadst thou the right to slay him? What high law
 Ordaining? Look to it, in establishing
 Such precedent thou dost not lay in store
 Repentance for thyself. For if by right
 One die for one, thou first wilt be destroyed
 If Justice find thee.--But again observe
 The hollowness of thy pretended plea.
 Tell me, I pray, what cause thou dost uphold
 In doing now the basest deed of all,
 Chambered with the blood-guilty, with whose aid
 Thou slewest our father in that day. For him
 You now bear children--ousting from their right
 The stainless offspring of a holy sire.
 How should this plead for pardon? Wilt thou say
 Thus thou dost 'venge thy daughter's injury?
 O shameful plea? Where is the thought of honour,
 If foes are married for a daughter's sake?--
 Enough. No words can move thee. Thy rash tongue
 With checkless clamour cries that we revile
 Our mother. Nay, no mother, but the chief
 Of tyrants to us! For my life is full
 Of weariness and misery from thee
 And from thy paramour. While he abroad,
 Orestes, our one brother, who escaped
 Hardly from thy attempt, unhappy boy!
 Wears out his life, victim of cross mischance.
 Oft hast thou taunted me with fostering him
 To be thy punisher. And this, be sure,
 Had I but strength, I had done. Now for this word,
 Proclaim me what thou wilt,--evil in soul,
 Or loud in cursing, or devoid of shame:
 For if I am infected with such guilt,
 Methinks my nature is not fallen from thine.
 
 CH. (_looking at_ CLYTEMNESTRA).
 I see her fuming with fresh wrath: the thought
 Of justice enters not her bosom now.
 
 CLY. What thought of justice should be mine for her,
 Who at her age can so insult a mother?
 Will shame withhold her from the wildest deed?
 
 EL. Not unashamed, assure thee, I stand here,
 Little as thou mayest deem it. Well I feel
 My acts untimely and my words unmeet.
 But your hostility and treatment force me
 Against my disposition to this course.
 Harsh ways are taught by harshness.
 
 CLY.                                Brazen thing!
 Too true it is that words and deeds of mine
 Are evermore informing thy harsh tongue.
 
 EL. The shame is yours, because the deeds are yours.
 My words are but their issue and effect.
 
 CLY. By sovereign Artemis, whom still I serve,
 You'll rue this boldness when Aegisthus comes.
 
 EL. See now, your anger bears you off, and ne'er
 Will let you listen, though you gave me leave.
 
 CLY. Must I not even sacrifice in peace
 From your harsh clamour, when you've had your say?
 
 EL. I have done. I check thee not. Go, sacrifice!
 Accuse not me of hindering piety.
 
 CLY. (_to an attendant_).
 Then lift for me those fruitful offerings,
 While to Apollo, before whom we stand,
 I raise my supplication for release
 From doubts and fears that shake my bosom now.
 And, O defender of our house! attend
 My secret utterance. No friendly ear
 Is that which hearkens for my voice. My thought
 Must not be blazoned with her standing by,
 Lest through her envious and wide-babbling tongue
 She fill the city full of wild surmise.
 List, then, as I shall speak: and grant the dreams
 Whose two-fold apparition I to-night
 Have seen, if good their bodement, be fulfilled:
 If hostile, turn their influence on my foes.
 And yield not them their wish that would by guile
 Thrust me from this high fortune, but vouchsafe
 That ever thus exempt from harms I rule
 The Atridae's home and kingdom, in full life,
 Partaking with the friends I live with now
 All fair prosperity, and with my children,
 Save those who hate and vex me bitterly.
 Lykeian Phoebus, favourably hear
 My prayer, and grant to all of us our need!
 More is there, which, though I be silent here,
 A God should understand. No secret thing
 Is hidden from the all-seeing sons of Heaven.
 
 _Enter the_ Old Man.
 
 OLD M. Kind dames and damsels, may I clearly know
 If these be King Aegisthus' palace-halls?
 
 CH. They are, sir; you yourself have guessed aright.
 
 OLD M. May I guess further that in yonder dame
 I see his queen? She looks right royally.
 
 CH. 'Tis she,--no other,--whom your eyes behold.
 
 OLD M. Princess, all hail! To thee and to thy spouse
 I come with words of gladness from a friend.
 
 CLY. That auspice I accept. But I would first
 Learn from thee who of men hath sent thee forth?
 
 OLD M. Phanoteus the Phocian, with a charge of weight.
 
 CLY. Declare it, stranger. Coming from a friend,
 Thou bring'st us friendly tidings, I feel sure.
 
 OLD M. Orestes' death. Ye have the sum in brief.
 
 EL. Ah me! undone! This day hath ruined me.
 
 CLY. What? Let me hear again. Regard her not.
 
 OLD M. Again I say it, Orestes is no more.
 
 EL. Undone! undone! Farewell to life and hope!
 
 CLY. (_to_ ELECTRA).
 See thou to thine own case! (_To_ Old Man) Now, stranger, tell me
 In true discourse the manner of his death.
 
 OLD M. For that I am here, and I will tell the whole.
 He, entering on the great arena famed
 As Hellas' pride, to win a Delphian prize,
 On hearing the loud summons of the man
 Calling the foot-race, which hath trial first,
 Came forward, a bright form, admired by all.
 And when his prowess in the course fulfilled
 The promise of his form, he issued forth
 Dowered with the splendid meed of victory.--
 To tell a few out of the many feats
 Of such a hero were beyond my power.
 Know then, in brief, that of the prizes set
 For every customary course proclaimed
 By order of the judges, the whole sum
 Victoriously he gathered, happy deemed
 By all; declared an Argive, and his name
 Orestes, son of him who levied once
 The mighty armament of Greeks for Troy.
 So fared he then: but when a God inclines
 To hinder happiness, not even the strong
 Are scatheless. So, another day, when came
 At sunrise the swift race of charioteers,
 He entered there with many a rival car:--
 One from Achaia, one from Sparta, two
 Libyan commanders of the chariot-yoke;
 And he among them fifth, with steeds of price
 From Thessaly;--the sixth Aetolia sent
 With chestnut mares; the seventh a Magnete man;
 The eighth with milk-white colts from Oeta's vale;
 The ninth from god-built Athens; and the tenth
 Boeotia gave to make the number full.
 Then stood they where the judges of the course
 Had posted them by lot, each with his team;
 And sprang forth at the brazen trumpet's blare.
 Shouting together to their steeds, they shook
 The reins, and all the course was filled with noise
 Of rattling chariots, and the dust arose
 To heaven. Now all in a confused throng
 Spared not the goad, each eager to outgo
 The crowded axles and the snorting steeds;
 For close about his nimbly circling wheels
 And stooping sides fell flakes of panted foam.
 Orestes, ever nearest at the turn,
 With whirling axle seemed to graze the stone,
 And loosing with free rein the right-hand steed
 That pulled the side-rope[5], held the near one in.
   So for a time all chariots upright moved,
 But soon the Oetaean's hard-mouthed horses broke
 From all control, and wheeling as they passed
 From the sixth circuit to begin the seventh,
 Smote front to front against the Barcan car.
 And when that one disaster had befallen,
 Each dashed against his neighbour and was thrown,
 Till the whole plain was strewn with chariot-wreck.
 Then the Athenian, skilled to ply the rein,
 Drew on one side, and heaving to, let pass
 The rider-crested surge that rolled i' the midst.
 Meanwhile Orestes, trusting to the end,
 Was driving hindmost with tight rein; but now,
 Seeing him left the sole competitor,
 Hurling fierce clamour through his steeds, pursued:
 So drave they yoke by yoke--now this, now that
 Pulling ahead with car and team. Orestes,
 Ill-fated one, each previous course had driven
 Safely without a check, but after this,
 In letting loose again the left-hand rein[6],
 He struck the edge of the stone before he knew,
 Shattering the axle's end, and tumbled prone,
 Caught in the reins[7], that dragged him with sharp thongs.
 Then as he fell to the earth the horses swerved,
 And roamed the field. The people when they saw
 Him fallen from out the car, lamented loud
 For the fair youth, who had achieved before them
 Such glorious feats, and now had found such woe,--
 Dashed on the ground, then tossed with legs aloft
 Against the sky,--until the charioteers,
 Hardly restraining the impetuous team,
 Released him, covered so with blood that none,--
 No friend who saw--had known his hapless form.
 Which then we duly burned upon the pyre.
 And straightway men appointed to the task
 From all the Phocians bear his mighty frame--
 Poor ashes! narrowed in a brazen urn,--
 That he may find in his own fatherland
 His share of sepulture.--Such our report,
 Painful to hear, but unto us, who saw,
 The mightiest horror that e'er met mine eye.
 
 CH. Alas! the stock of our old masters, then,
 Is utterly uprooted and destroyed.
 
 CLY. O heavens! what shall I say? That this is well?
 Or terrible, but gainful? Hard my lot,
 To save my life through my calamity!
 
 OLD M. Lady, why hath my speech disheartened thee?
 
 CLY. To be a mother hath a marvellous power:
 No injury can make one hate one's child.
 
 OLD M. Then it should seem our coming was in vain.
 
 CLY. In vain? Nay, verily; thou, that hast brought
 Clear evidences of his fate, who, sprung
 Prom my life's essence, severed from my breast
 And nurture, was estranged in banishment,
 And never saw me from the day he went
 Out from this land, but for his father's blood
 Threatened me still with accusation dire;
 That sleep nor soothed at night nor sweetly stole
 My senses from the day, but, all my time,
 Each instant led me on the way to death!--
 But this day's chance hath freed me from all fear
 Of him, and of this maid: who being at home
 Troubled me more, and with unmeasured thirst
 Kept draining my life-blood; but now her threats
 Will leave us quiet days, methinks, and peace
 Unbroken.--How then shouldst thou come in vain?
 
 EL. O misery! 'Tis time to wail thy fate,
 Orestes, when, in thy calamity,
 Thy mother thus insults thee. Is it well?
 
 CLY. 'Tis well that he is gone, not that you live.
 
 EL. Hear, 'venging spirits of the lately dead!
 
 CLY. The avenging spirits have heard and answered well.
 
 EL. Insult us now, for thou art fortunate!
 
 CLY. You and Orestes are to quench my pride.
 
 EL. Our pride is quenched. No hope of quenching thee!
 
 CLY. A world of good is in thy coming, stranger,
 Since thou hast silenced this all-clamorous tongue.
 
 OLD M. Then I may go my way, seeing all is well.
 
 CLY. Nay, go not yet! That would disgrace alike
 Me and the friend who sent you to our land.
 But come thou in, and leave her out of door
 To wail her own and loved ones' overthrow.
                                   [_Exeunt_ CLYTEMNESTRA _and_ Old Man
 
 EL. Think you the wretch in heartfelt agony
 Weeps inconsolably her perished son?
 She left us with a laugh! O misery!
 How thou hast ruined me, dear brother mine,
 By dying! Thou hast torn from out my heart
 The only hope I cherished yet, that thou
 Living wouldst come hereafter to avenge
 Thy father's woes and mine. Where must I go?
 Since I am left of thee and of my sire
 Bereaved and lonely, and once more must be
 The drudge and menial of my bitterest foes,
 My father's murderers. Say, is it well?
 Nay, nevermore will I consort with these,
 But sinking here before the palace gate,
 Thus, friendless, I will wither out my life.
 Hereat if any in the house be vexed,
 Let them destroy me; for to take my life
 Were kindness, and to live is only pain:
 Life hath not kindled my desires with joy.
 
 CH. 1. O ever-blazing sun!                                         I 1
       O lightning of the eternal Sire!
       Can ye behold this done
       And tamely hide your all-avenging fire?
 
 EL.   Ah me!
 
 CH. 2.       My daughter, why these tears?
 
 EL.   Woe!
 
 CH. 3.     Weep not, calm thy fears.
 
 EL.   You kill me.
 
 CH. 4.             How?
 
 EL.                     To breathe
       A hope for one beneath
       So clearly sunk in death,
       'Tis to afflict me more
       Already pining sore.
 
 CH. 5. One in a woman's toils                                      I 2
 Was tangled[8], buried by her glittering coils,
 Who now beneath--
 
 EL.              Ah woe!
 
 CH. 6. Rules with a spirit unimpaired and strong.
 
 EL. O dreadful!
 
 CH. 7.          Dreadful was the wrong.
 
 EL. But she was quelled.
 
 CH. 8.                   Ay.
 
 EL.                          True!
 That faithful mourner knew
 A brother's aid. But I
 Have no man now. The one
 I had, is gone, is gone.
 Rapt into nothingness.
 
 CH. 9. Thou art wrung with sore distress.                         II 1
 
 EL. I know it. Too well I know,
 Taught by a life of woe,
 Where horror dwells without relief.
 
 CH. 10. Our eyes have seen thy grief.
 
 EL. Then comfort not again--
 
 CH. 11. Whither now turns thy strain?
 
 EL. One utterly bereft,
 Seeing no hope is left,
 Of help from hands owning the same great sire.
 
 CH. 12. 'Tis nature's debt.                                       II 2
 
 EL.                         To expire
     On sharp-cut dragging thongs,
     'Midst wildly trampling throngs
     Of swiftly racing hoofs, like him,
     Poor hapless one?
 
 CH. 13.               Vast, dim,
     And boundless was the harm.
 
 EL. Yea, severed from mine arm,
     By strangers kept--
 
 CH. 14.                O pain!
 
 EL. Hidden he must remain,
     Of me unsepulchred, unmourned, unwept.
 
 _Enter_ CHRYSOTHEMIS.
 
 CHR. Driven by delight, dear sister, I am come,
 Reckless of dignity, with headlong speed.
 For news I bear of joy and sweet relief
 From ills that drew from thee thy ceaseless moan.
 
 EL. Whence couldst thou hear of succour for my woes,
 That close in darkness without hope of dawn?
 
 CHR. Here is Orestes, learn it from my mouth,
 As certainly as you now look on me.
 
 EL. What? Art thou mad, unhappy one, to laugh
 Over thine own calamity and mine?
 
 CHR. No, by our father's hearth, I say not this
 In mockery. I tell you he is come.
 
 EL. Me miserable! Who hath given thine ear
 The word that so hath wrought on thy belief?
 
 CHR. Myself am the eyewitness, no one else
 Gained my belief, but proofs I clearly saw.
 
 EL. What sign hath so engrossed thine eye, poor girl?
 What sight hath fired thee with this quenchless glow?
 
 CHR. But list to me, I pray thee, that henceforth
 Thou mayest account me clear eyed, or a fool!
 
 EL. By all means, if it pleasure thee, say on.
 
 CHR. Well, I will tell thee all I saw:--I came
 Unto the ancient tomb that holds our sire;
 And from the topmost mound I marked a stream
 Of milk fresh-flowing, and his resting place
 Ringed round with garlands of all flowers that blow.
 I marvelled at the sight, and peered about,
 Lest some one might be nearer than we knew.
 But finding all was quiet in the spot,
 I ventured closer to the tomb, and there,
 Hard by the limit, I beheld a curl
 Of hair new shorn, with all the gloss of youth
 And straight it struck my heart, as with a sense
 Of something seen, ah me! long, long ago,
 And told me that my sight encountered here
 The token of Orestes, dearest soul
 Then, clasping it, I did not cry aloud,
 But straight mine eyes were filled with tears of joy.
 And now as much as then I feel assured
 He and none else bestowed this ornament.
 To whom beyond thyself and me belongs
 Such consecration? And I know this well,
 I did it not,--nor thou. Impossible!
 Thou canst not worship even the blessed Gods
 Forth of this roof, unpunished. And, most sure,
 Our mother is not minded so to act,
 Nor, had she done it, could we fail to know.
 This offering comes then of Orestes' hand.
 Take courage, dear one. Not one fate pursues
 One house perpetually, but changeth still.
 Ours was a sullen Genius, but perchance
 This day begins the assurance of much good.
 
 EL. Oh how I pity thine infatuate mind!
 
 CHR. Why? Dost thou find no comfort in my news?
 
 EL. You know not where you roam. Far wide! far wide!
 
 CHR. Not know? when I have seen it with mine eyes?
 
 EL. Dear, he is dead. Look not to him, poor girl!
 Salvation comes to thee no more from him.
 
 CHR. Oh me, unfortunate! Who told thee this?
 
 EL. He who stood by and saw his life destroyed.
 
 CHR. Amazement seizes me. Where is that man?
 
 EL. Right welcome to the mother there within.
 
 CHR. Me miserable! Who then can have decked
 With all those ceremonies our father's tomb?
 
 EL. I cannot but suppose some hand hath brought
 These gifts in memory of Orestes dead.
 
 CHR. O cruel fate! While I in ecstasy
 Sped with such news, all ignorant, it seems,
 Of our dire fortune; and, arriving, find
 Fresh sorrows added to the former woe.
 
 EL. It is so, sister; yet if thou wilt list
 To me, thou mayest disperse this heaviness.
 
 CHR. What? Shall I raise the dead again to life?
 
 EL. I did not mean so. I am not so fond.
 
 CHR. What bid you then that I have power to do?
 
 EL. To endure courageously what I enjoin.
 
 CHR. So it make profit, I will not refuse.
 
 EL. Remember, without toil no plan may thrive!
 
 CHR. I know it, and will aid thee to my power.
 
 EL. Then hearken my resolve. Thou seest now,
 We have no friendly succour in the world;
 But death has taken all, and we are left
 Two only. I, so long as I could hear
 My brother lived and flourished, still had hope
 He would arise to wreak his father's blood.
 But now that he is gone, to thee I turn,
 To help thy sister boldly to destroy
 The guilty author of our father's death,
 Aegisthus.--Wherefore hide it from thee now?
 --Yea, sister! Till what term wilt thou remain
 Inactive? To what end? What hope is yet
 Left standing? Surely thou hast cause to grieve,
 Bobbed of thy father's opulent heritage,
 And feeling bitterly the creeping years
 That find thee still a virgin and unwed.
 Nay, nor imagine thou shalt ever know
 That blessing. Not so careless of his life
 Is King Aegisthus, as to risk the birth
 Of sons from us, to his most certain fall.
 But if thou wilt but follow my resolve,
 First thou shalt win renown of piety
 From our dead father, and our brother too,
 Who rest beneath the ground, and shalt be free
 For evermore in station as in birth,
 And nobly matched in marriage, for the good
 Draw gazers to them still. Then seest thou not
 What meed of honour, if thou dost my will,
 Thou shalt apportion to thyself and me?
 For who, beholding us, what citizen,
 What foreigner, will not extend the hand
 Of admiration, and exclaim, 'See, friends,
 These scions of one stock, these noble twain,
 These that have saved their father's house from woe,
 Who once when foes were mighty, set their life
 Upon a cast, and stood forth to avenge
 The stain of blood! Who will not love the pair
 And do them reverence? Who will not give
 Honour at festivals, and in the throng
 Of popular resort, to these in chief,
 For their high courage and their bold emprise?'
 Such fame will follow us in all the world.
 Living or dying, still to be renowned.
 Ah, then, comply, dear sister; give thy sire
 This toil--this labour to thy brother give;
 End these my sufferings, end thine own regret:
 The well-born cannot bear to live in shame.
 
 CH. In such affairs, for those who speak and hear
 Wise thoughtfulness is still the best ally.
 
 CHR. True, noble women, and before she spake
 Sound thought should have prevented the rash talk
 That now hath proved her reckless. What wild aim
 Beckons thee forth in arming this design
 Whereto thou wouldst demand my ministry?
 Dost not perceive, thou art not man but woman,
 Of strength inferior to thine enemies,--
 Their Genius daily prospering more and more,
 Whilst ours is dwindling into nothingness?
 Who then that plots against a life so strong
 Shall quit him of the danger without harm?
 Take heed we do not add to our distress
 Should some one hear of this our colloquy.
 Small help and poor advantage 'twere for us
 To win brief praise and then inglorious die.
 Nay, death is not so hateful as when one
 Desiring death is balked of that desire.
 And I beseech thee, ere in utter ruin
 We perish and make desolate our race,
 Refrain thy rage. And I will guard for thee
 In silence these thy words unrealized;
 If thou wilt learn this wisdom from long time,
 Having no strength, to bend before the strong.
 
 CH. Comply. Than prudence and a heedful mind,
 No fairer treasure can be found for men.
 
 EL. Thy words have not surprised me. Well I knew
 The good I offered would come back with scorn.
 I, all alone and with a single hand,
 Must do this. For it shall not rest undone.
 
 CHR. Would thou hadst been thus minded when our sire
 Lay dying! In one act thou hadst compassed all.
 
 EL. My spirit was the same: my mind was less.
 
 CHR. Be such the life-long temper of thy mind!
 
 EL. Thine admonition augurs little aid.
 
 CHR. Yea. For the attempt would bring me certain bane.
 
 EL. I envy thee thy prudence, hate thy fear.
 
 CHR. Even when thou speak'st me fair, I will endure it.
 
 EL. Take heart. That never will be thine from me.
 
 CHR. Long time remains to settle that account.
 
 EL. I find no profit in thee. Go thy way.
 
 CHR. Profit there is, hadst thou a mind to learn.
 
 EL. Go to thy mother and declare all this!
 
 CHR. I am not so in hatred of thy life.
 
 EL. Yet know the shame thou wouldst prepare for me.
 
 CHR. No, no! Not shame, but care for thine estate.
 
 EL. Must I still follow as thou thinkest good?
 
 CHR. When thou hast wisdom, thou shalt be the guide.
 
 EL. 'Tis hard when error wears the garb of sense.
 
 CHR. Right. That is the misfortune of your case.
 
 EL. Why? Feel you not the justice of my speech?
 
 CHR. Justice may chance to bring me injury.
 
 EL. I care not, I, to live by such a rule.
 
 CHR. Well, if you do it, you will find me wise.
 
 EL. Well, I will do it, nought dismayed by thee.
 
 CHR. Speak you plain sooth? and will you not be counselled?
 
 EL. No, for bad counsel is of all most hateful.
 
 CHR. You take the sense of nothing that I say.
 
 EL. Long since, not newly, my resolve is firm.
 
 CHR. Then I will go. Thy heart will ne'er be brought
 To praise my words, nor I thine action here.
 
 EL. Then go within! I will not follow thee,
 Though thou desire it vehemently. None
 Would be so fond to hunt on a cold trail.
 
 CHR. If this seem wisdom to thee, then be wise
 Thy way: but in the hour of misery,
 When it hath caught thee, thou wilt praise my words.
                                                   [_Exit_ CHRYSOTHEMIS
 
 CHORUS.
           Wise are the birds of air                                I 1
           That with true filial care
     For those provide convenient food
     Who gave them birth, who wrought their good.
     Why will not men the like perfection prove?
           Else, by the fires above,
           And heavenly Rectitude,
     Fierce recompense they shall not long elude.
     O darkling rumour, world-o'er-wandering voice
     That piercest to the shades beneath the ground,
     To dead Atrides waft a sound
     Of sad reproach, not bidding him rejoice.
 
           Stained is the ancestral hall,                           I 2
           Broken the battle-call,
     That heretofore his children twain
     In loving concord did sustain.
     Alone, deserted, vexed, Electra sails,
           Storm-tossed with rugged gales,
           Lamenting evermore
     Like piteous Philomel, and pining sore
     For her lost father;--might she but bring down
     That two-fold Fury, caring not for death,
     But ready to resign her breath,
     What maid so worthy of a sire's renown?
 
     None who inherit from a noble race,                           II 1
           Complying with things base
     Will let their ancient glory be defiled.
           So 'twas thy choice, dear child,
     Through homeless misery[9] to win a two-fold prize,
           Purging the sin and shame[10]
           That cloud the Argive name,
     So to be called most noble and most wise.
 
     May'st thou surpass thy foes in wealth and power              II 2
           As o'er thee now they tower!
     Since I have found thee, not in bright estate,
           Nor blessed by wayward fate,
     But through thy loyalty to Heaven's eternal cause
           Wearing the stainless crown
           Of perfectest renown,
     And richly dowered by the mightiest laws.
 
 _Enter_ ORESTES _and_ PYLADES, _with the urn_.
 
 OR. Say, dames and damsels, have we heard aright,
 And speed we to the goal of our desire?
 
 CH. And what desire or quest hath brought thee hither?
 
 OR. I seek Aegisthus' dwelling all this while.
 
 CH. Welcome. The tongue that told thee hath no blame.
 
 OR. Which of you all will signify within
 Our joint arrival,--not unwelcome here.
 
 CH. This maiden, if the nearest should report.
 
 OR. Mistress, wilt thou go yonder and make known,
 That certain Phocians on Aegisthus wait?
 
 EL. Oh! can it be that you are come to bring
 Clear proofs of the sad rumour we have heard?
 
 OR. I know not what ye have heard. Old Strophius
 Charged me with tidings of Orestes' fate.
 
 EL. What, stranger? How this terror steals on me!
 
 OR. Bearing scant remnants of his body dead
 In this small vase thou seest, we bring them home.
 
 EL. O sorrow! thou art here: I see full well
 That burden of my heart in present view.
 
 OR. If thou hast tears for aught Orestes suffered,
 Know that he lies within this vessel's room.
 
 EL. Ah, sir! by all in Heaven, if yonder urn
 Hide him, ah! give it once into my hand,
 That o'er that dust I may lament and mourn
 Myself and mine own house and all our woe!
 
 OR. Bring it and give her, whosoe'er she be.
 For not an enemy--this petition shows it--
 But of his friends or kindred, is this maid.
                             [_The urn is given into_ ELECTRA'S _hands_
 
 EL. O monument of him whom o'er all else
 I loved! sole relic of Orestes' life,
 How cold in this thy welcome is the hope
 Wherein I decked thee as I sent thee forth!
 Then bright was thy departure, whom I now
 Bear lightly, a mere nothing, in my hands.
 Would I had gone from life, ere I dispatched
 Thee from my arms that saved thee to a land
 Of strangers, stealing thee from death! For then
 Thou hadst been quiet on that far off day,
 And had thy portion in our father's tomb
 Now thou hast perished in the stranger land
 Far from thy sister, lorn and comfortless
 And I, O wretchedness! neither have bathed
 And laid thee forth, nor from the blazing fire
 Collected the sad burden, as was meet
 But thou, when foreign hands have tended thee
 Com'st a small handful in a narrow shell
 Woe for the constant care I spent on thee
 Of old all vainly, with sweet toil! For never
 Wast thou thy mother's darling, nay, but mine,
 And I of all the household most thy nurse,
 While 'sister, sister,' was thy voice to me
 But now all this is vanished in one day,
 Dying in thy death. Thou hast carried all away
 As with a whirlwind, and art gone. No more
 My father lives, thyself art lost in death,
 I am dead, who lived in thee. Our enemies
 Laugh loudly, and she maddens in her joy,
 Our mother most unmotherly, of whom
 Thy secret missives ofttimes told me, thou
 Wouldst be the punisher. But that fair hope
 The hapless Genius of thy lot and mine
 Hath reft away, and gives thee thus to me,--
 For thy loved form thy dust and fruitless shade
 O bitterness! O piteous sight! Woe! woe!
 Oh! sent on thy dire journey, dearest one,
 How thou hast ruined me! Thou hast indeed,
 Dear brother! Then receive me to thyself,
 Hide me in this thy covering, there to dwell,
 Me who am nothing, with thy nothingness,
 For ever! Yea, when thou wert here above,
 I ever shared with thee in all, and now
 I would not have thee shut me from thy tomb.
 Oh! let me die and follow thee! the dead,
 My mind assures me now, have no more pain.
 
 CH. Electra, think! Thou hadst a mortal sire,
 And mortal was thy brother. Grieve not far.
 
 OR. O me! What shall I speak, or which way turn
 The desperate word? I cannot hold my tongue.
 
 EL. What pain o'ercomes thee? Wherefore speak'st thou so?
 
 OR. Can this be famed Electra I behold?
 
 EL. No other. In sad case, as you may see
 
 OR. Ah! deep indeed was this calamity!
 
 EL. Is't possible that thou shouldst grieve for me?
 
 OR. O ruined form! abandoned to disgrace!
 
 EL. 'Tis me you mean, stranger, I feel it now.
 
 OR. Woe 's me! Untrimmed for bridal, hapless maid!
 
 EL. Why this fixed gaze, O stranger! that deep groan?
 
 OR. How all unknowing was I of mine ill!
 
 EL. What thing hath passed to make it known to thee?
 
 OR. The sight of thee attired with boundless woe.
 
 EL. And yet thine eye sees little of my pain.
 
 OR. Can aught be still more hateful to be seen?
 
 EL. I have my dwelling with the murderers--
 
 OR. Of whom? What evil would thy words disclose?
 
 EL. Of him who gave me birth. I am their slave.
 
 OR. Whose power compels thee to this sufferance?
 
 EL. One called my mother, most unmotherly.
 
 OR. How? by main force, or by degrading shames?
 
 EL. By force and shames, and every kind of evil.
 
 OR. And is there none to succour or prevent?
 
 EL. None. Him I had, you give me here in dust.
 
 OR. How mine eye pities thee this while, poor maid!
 
 EL. Know now, none ever pitied me but you.
 
 OR. None ever came whose heart like sorrow wrung.
 
 EL. Is't possible we have some kinsman here?
 
 OR. I will tell it, if these women here be friendly.
 
 EL. They are. They may be trusted. Only speak.
 
 OR. Let go yon vase, that thou may'st learn the whole.
 
 EL. Nay, by the Gods! be not so cruel, sir!
 
 OR. Obey me and thou shalt not come to harm.
 
 EL. Ah, never rob me of what most I love!
 
 OR. You must not hold it.
 
 EL.                       O me miserable
 For thee, Orestes, if I lose thy tomb!
 
 OR. Speak no rash word. Thou hast no right to mourn.
 
 EL. No right to mourn my brother who is gone?
 
 OR. Such utterance belongs not to thy tongue,
 
 EL. Oh, am I thus dishonoured of the dead?
 
 OR. Far from dishonour. But this ne'er was thine.
 
 EL. Is't not Orestes' body that I bear?
 
 OR. Nay, but the idle dressing of a tale.
 
 EL. And where is his poor body's resting-place?
 
 OR. Nowhere. Seek not the living with the dead,
 
 EL. My son, what saidst thou?
 
 OR.                           Nought but what is true.
 
 EL. Doth he yet live?
 
 OR.                   If I have life in me.
 
 EL. Art thou Orestes?
 
 OR.                   Let my signet here,
 That was our father's, tell thine eyes, I am.
 
 EL. O day of days!
 
 OR.                Time hath no happier hour.
 
 EL. Is it thy voice?
 
 OR.                  Hearken not otherwhere.
 
 EL. Have my arms caught thee?
 
 OR.                           Hold me so for aye!
 
 EL. O dearest women, Argives of my home!
 Ye see Orestes, dead in craft, but now
 By that same craft delivered and preserved.
 
 CH. We see, dear daughter, and the gladsome tear
 Steals from our eye to greet the bright event.
 
 EL. Offspring of him I loved beyond all telling!                   I 1
 Ah! thou art come,--hast found me, eye to eye
 Behold'st the face thou didst desire to see.
 
 OR. True, I am here; but bide in silence still.
 
 EL. Wherefore?
 
 OR. Hush! speak not loud, lest one within should hearken.
 
 EL. By ever-virgin Artemis, ne'er will I
 Think worthy of my fear
 This useless mass of woman-cowardice
 Burdening the house within,
 Not peering out of door.
 
 OR. Yet know that women too have might in war.
 Of that methinks thou hast feeling evidence.
 
 EL. Ah me! thou hast unveiled
 And thrust before my gaze
 That burning load of my distress
 No time will soothe, no remedy will heal.
 
 OR. I know that too. But when we are face to face
 With the evildoers,--then let remembrance work.
 
 EL. All times alike are fit with instant pain                      I 2
 Justly to mind me of that dreadful day;
 Even now but hardly hath my tongue been free.
 
 OR. Yes, that is it. Therefore preserve this boon.
 
 EL. Whereby?
 
 OR. Put limits to unseasonable talk.
 
 EL. Ah! brother, who, when thou art come,
 Could find it meet to exchange
 Language for silence, as thou bidst me do?
 Since beyond hope or thought
 Was this thy sight to me.
 
 OR. God gave me to your sight when so he willed.
 
 EL. O heaven of grace beyond
 The joy I knew but now!
 If God hath brought thee to our roof,
 A miracle of bounty then is here.
 
 OR. I hate to curb the gladness of thy spirit,
 But yet I fear this ecstasy of joy.
 
 EL. Oh! after all these years,                                      II
 Now thou at length hast sped
 Thy dearest advent on the wished-for way,
 Do not, in all this woe
 Thou seest surrounding me--
 
 OR. What means this prayer?
 
 EL.                         Forbid me not my joy,
 Nor make me lose the brightness of thy face!
 
 OR. Deep were my wrath at him who should attempt it.
 
 EL. Is my prayer heard?
 
 OR.                     Why doubt it?
 
 EL.                                   Friends, I learned
 A tale beyond my thought; and hearing I restrained
 My passion, voiceless in my misery,
 Uttering no cry. But now
 I have thee safe; now, dearest, thou art come,
 With thy blest countenance, which I
 Can ne'er forget, even at the worst of woe.
 
 OR. A truce now to unnecessary words.
 My mother's vileness and Aegisthus' waste,
 Draining and squandering with spendthrift hand
 Our patrimony, tell me not anew.
 Such talk might stifle opportunity.
 But teach me, as befits the present need,
 What place may serve by lurking vigilance
 Or sudden apparition to o'erwhelm
 Our foes in the adventure of to-day.
 And, when we pass within, take heedful care
 Bright looks betray thee not unto our mother.
 But groan as for the dire calamity
 Vainly reported:--Let's achieve success,
 Then with free hearts we may rejoice and laugh.
 
 EL. Dear brother, wheresoe'er thy pleasure leads,
 My will shall follow, since the joys I know,
 Not from myself I took them, but from thee.
 And ne'er would I consent thy slightest grief
 Should win for me great gain. Ill should I then
 Serve the divinity of this high hour!
 Thou knowest how matters in the palace stand.
 Thou hast surely heard, Aegisthus is from home,
 And she, our mother, is within. Nor fear
 She should behold me with a smiling face.
 Mine ancient hate of her hath sunk too deep.
 And from the time I saw thee, tears of joy
 Will cease not. Wherefore should I stint their flow?
 I, who in this thy coming have beheld
 Thee dead and living? Strangely hast thou wrought
 On me;--that should my father come alive,
 I would not think the sight were miracle,
 But sober truth. Since such thy presence, then,
 Lead as thy spirit prompts. For I alone
 Of two things surely had achieved one,
 Noble deliverance or a noble death.
 
 OR. Be silent; for I hear within the house
 A footstep coming forth.
 
 EL. (_loudly_).
                          Strangers, go in!
 For none within the palace will reject
 Your burden, nor be gladdened by the event.
 
 _Enter the_ Old Man.
 
 OLD M. O lost in folly and bereft of soul!
 Is't that your care for life hath ebbed away,
 Or were you born without intelligence,
 When fallen, not near, but in the midst of ill,
 And that the greatest, ye perceive it not?
 Had I not watched the doors this while, your deeds
 Had gone within the palace ere yourselves.
 But, as things are, my care hath fenced you round.
 Now, then, have done with long-protracted talk,
 And this insatiable outburst of joy,
 And enter, for in such attempts as these
 Delay is harmful: and 'tis more than time.
 
 OR. But how shall I find matters there within?
 
 OLD M. Well. You are shielded by their ignorance.
 
 OR. That means you have delivered me as dead.
 
 OLD M. Alone of dead men thou art here above.
 
 OR. Doth this delight them, or how went the talk?
 
 OLD M. I will report, when all is done. Meanwhile,
 Know, all is well with them, even what is evil.
 
 EL. Who is this, brother? I beseech thee, tell.
 
 OR. Dost not perceive?
 
 EL.                    I cannot even imagine.
 
 OR. Know'st not into whose hands thou gav'st me once?
 
 EL. Whose hands? How say you?
 
 OR.                           His, who through thy care
 Conveyed me secretly to Phocis' plain.
 
 EL. What! is this he, whom I, of all the band,
 Found singly faithful in our father's death?
 
 OR. He is that man. No more!
 
 EL.                          O gladsome day!
 Dear only saviour of our father's house,
 How earnest thou hither? Art thou he indeed,
 That didst preserve Orestes and myself
 From many sorrows? O dear hands, kind feet,
 Swift in our service,--how couldst thou so long
 Be near, nor show one gleam, but didst destroy
 My heart with words, hiding the loveliest deeds?
 Father!--in thee methinks I see my father.
 O welcome! thou of all the world to me
 Most hated and most loved in one short hour.
 
 OLD M. Enough, dear maiden! Many nights and days
 Are circling hitherward, that shall reveal
 In clear recountment all that came between.
   But to you two that stand beside I tell,
 Now is your moment, with the Queen alone,
 And none of men within; but if you pause,
 Know that with others of profounder skill
 You'll have to strive, more than your present foes.
 
 OR. Then, Pylades, we need no more to dwell
 On words, but enter on this act with speed,
 First worshipping the holy shrines o' the Gods
 That were my father's, harboured at the gate.
                               [_They pass within_. ELECTRA _remains in
                                                 an attitude of prayer_
 
 EL. O King Apollo! hear them graciously,
 And hear me too, that with incessant hand
 Honoured thee richly from my former store!
 And now, fierce slayer, I importune thee,
 And woo thee with such gifts as I can give,
 Be kindly aidant to this enterprise,
 And make the world take note, what meed of bane
 Heaven still bestows on man's iniquity.         [ELECTRA _goes within_
 
 CH. Lo, where the War-god moves                                      1
     With soft, sure footstep, on to his design,
     Breathing hot slaughter of an evil feud!
     Even now the inevitable hounds that track
     Dark deeds of hideous crime
     Are gone beneath the covert of the domes.
     Not long in wavering suspense shall hang
     The dreaming presage of my wistful soul.
 
     For lo! within is led                                            2
     With crafty tread the avenger of the shades,
     Even to his father's throne of ancient power,
     And in his hand the bright new-sharpened death!
     And Hermes, Maia's son,
     Is leading him, and hath concealed the guile
     Even to the fatal end in clouds of night.
     His time of weary waiting all is o'er.
 
 _Re-enter_ ELECTRA.
 
 EL. O dearest women! they are even now
 About it. Only bide in silence still.
 
 CH. What is the present scene?
 
 EL.                            She decks the vase
 For burial, and they both are standing by.
 
 CH. And wherefore hast thou darted forth?
 
 EL.                                       To watch
 Aegisthus' coming, that he enter not
 At unawares.
 
 CLY. (_within_).
              Ah! ah! Woe for the house,
 Desert of friends, and filled with hands of death!
 
 EL. A cry within! Did ye not hear it, friends?
 
 CH. Would I had not! I heard, and shivered through.
 
 CLY. (_within_). Oh me! Alas, Aegisthus! where art thou?
 
 EL. Hark! yet again that sound!
 
 CLY. (_within_).           O son, have pity!
 Pity the womb that bare thee.
 
 EL.                           Thou hadst none
 For him, nor for his father, in that day.
 
 HALF-CH. Poor city! hapless race!                                    1
 Thy destiny to-day
 Wears thee away, away.
 What morn shall see thy face?
 
 CLY. (_within_).
 Oh, I am smitten!
 
 EL.                Give a second stroke,
 If thou hast power.
 
 CLY. (_within_).
                     Oh me! again, again!
 
 EL. Would thou wert shrieking for Aegisthus too!
 
 CH. The curse hath found, and they in earth who lie
 Are living powers to-day.
 Long dead, they drain away
 The streaming blood of those who made them die.
 
 _Enter_ ORESTES _and_ PYLADES.
 
 Behold, they come, they come!
 His red hand dripping as he moves
 With drops of sacrifice the War-god loves.
 My 'wildered heart is dumb.
 
 EL. How is it with you, brother?
 
 OR.                              If Apollo
 Spake rightfully, the state within is well.
 
 EL. Wretched one, is she dead?
 
 OR.                            No more have fear
 Thou shalt be slighted by thy mother's will.
 
 CH. Cease, for I see Aegisthus near in view.
 
 EL. In, in again, boys!
 
 OR.                     Where do ye behold
 The tyrant?
 
 EL.         To our hand from yonder gate
 He comes with beaming look.
 
 HALF-CH. Haste, with what speed ye may,                              2
 Stand on the doorway stone,
 That, having thus much done,
 Ye may do all to-day.
 
 OR. Fear not: we will perform it.
 
 EL.                               Speed ye now:
 Follow your thought.
 
 OR.                  We are already there.
 
 EL. Leave matters here to me. All shall go well.
                                         [_Exit_ ORESTES _with_ PYLADES
 
 CH. Few words, as if in gentleness, 'twere good
 To utter in his ear,
 That, eager and unware,
 One step may launch him on the field of blood.
 
 _Enter_ AEGISTHUS.
 
 AEGISTHUS. Which of you know where are the Phocian men
 Who brought the news I hear, Orestes' life
 Hath suffered shipwreck in a chariot-race?
 You, you I question, you in former time
 So fearless! You methinks most feelingly
 Can tell us, for it touches you most near.
 
 EL. I know: assure thee. Else had I not heard
 The dearest of all fortunes to my heart.
 
 AEG. Where are the strangers then? Enlighten me.
 
 EL. Yonder. Their hostess entertained them well.
 
 AEG. And did they certainly report him dead?
 
 EL. Not only so. They showed him to our sight.
 
 AEG. May this clear evidence be mine to see?
 
 EL. I envy not the sight that waits you there.
 
 AEG. Against their wont thy words have given me joy.
 
 EL. Much joy be thine, if this be joy to thee!
 
 AEG. Silence, I say! Wide let the gates be flung!
 For all the Myceneans to behold
 And all in Argolis, that if but one
 Hath heretofore been buoyed on empty hopes
 Fixed in Orestes, seeing him now dead,
 He may accept my manage, and not wait
 For our stern chastisement to teach him sense.
 
 EL. My lesson is already learnt: at length
 I am schooled to labour with the stronger will.
                              [_The body of_ CLYTEMNESTRA _is disclosed
                                   under a veil:_ ORESTES _standing by_
 
 AEG. Zeus! Divine envy surely hath laid low
 The form I here behold. But if the truth
 Provoke Heaven's wrath, be it unexpressed.--Unveil!
 Off with all hindrance, that mine eye may see,
 And I may mourn my kinsman as I should.
 
 OR. Thyself put forth thy hand. Not mine but thine
 To look and speak with kindness to this corse.
 
 AEG. I will, for thou advisest well; but thou,
 Call Clytemnestra, if she be within.     [AEGISTHUS _lifts the shroud_
 
 OR. She is beside thee, gaze not otherwhere.
 
 AEG. What do I see! oh!
 
 OR.                     Why so strange? Whom fear you?
 
 AEG. Who are the men into whose midmost toils
 All hapless I am fallen?
 
 OR.                      Ha! knowest thou not
 Thou hast been taking living men for dead?[11]
 
 AEG. I understand that saying. Woe is me!
 I know, Orestes' voice addresseth me.
 
 OR. A prophet! How wert thou so long deceived?
 
 AEG. Undone, undone! Yet let me speak one word.
 
 EL. Brother, by Heaven, no more! Let him not speak.
 When death is certain, what do men in woe
 Gain from a little time? Kill him at once!
 And, killed, expose him to such burial
 From dogs and vultures, as beseemeth such,
 Far from our view. Nought less will solace me
 For the remembrance of a life of pain.
 
 OR. Go in and tarry not. No contest this
 Of verbal question, but of life or death.
 
 AEG. Why drive you me within? If this you do
 Be noble, why must darkness hide the deed?
 Why not destroy me out of hand?
 
 OR.                             Command not!
 Enter, and in the place where ye cut down
 My father, thou shalt yield thy life to me.
 
 AEG. Is there no help but this abode must see
 The past and future ills of Pelops' race?
 
 OR. Thine anyhow. That I can prophesy
 With perfect inspiration to thine ear.
 
 AEG. The skill you boast belonged not to your sire.
 
 OR. You question and delay. Go in!
 
 AEG.                               Lead on.
 
 OR. Nay, go thou first.
 
 AEG.                    That I may not escape thee?
 
 OR. No, that thou may'st not have thy wish in death.
 I may not stint one drop of bitterness.
 And would this doom were given without reprieve,
 If any try to act beyond the law,
 To kill them. Then the wicked would be few.
 
 LEADER OF CH. O seed of Atreus! how triumphantly
 Through grief and hardness thou hast freedom found,
 With full achievement in this onset crowned!
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                         THE TRACHINIAN MAIDENS
 
 
                              THE PERSONS
 
 DEANIRA, _wife of Heracles._
 _An_ Attendant.
 HYLLUS, _son of Heracles and Deanira_.
 CHORUS _of Trachinian Maidens_.
 _A_ Messenger.
 LICHAS, _the Herald_.
 _A_ Nurse.
 _An_ Old Man.
 HERACLES.
 IOLE, _who does not speak_.
 
 
 SCENE. Before the temporary abode of Heracles in Trachis.
 
 
 
 
 This tragedy is named from the Chorus. From the subject it might have
 been called 'Deanira or the Death of Heracles'.
 
 The Centaur Nessus, in dying by the arrow of Heracles, which had been
 dipped in the venom of the Hydra, persuaded the bride Deanira, whose
 beauty was the cause of his death, to keep some of the blood from the
 wound as a love-charm for her husband. Many years afterwards, when
 Heracles was returning from his last exploit of sacking Oechalia, in
 Euboea, he sent before him, by his herald Lichas, Iole, the king's
 daughter, whom he had espoused. Deanira, when she had discovered this,
 commissioned Lichas when he returned to present his master with a
 robe, which she had anointed with the charm,--hoping by this means to
 regain her lord's affection. But the poison of the Hydra did its work,
 and Heracles died in agony, Deanira having already killed herself on
 ascertaining what she had done. The action takes place in Trachis,
 near the Mahae Gulf, where Heracles and Deanira, by permission of
 Ceyx, the king of the country, have been living in exile. At the close
 of the drama, Heracles, while yet alive, is carried towards his pyre
 on Mount Oeta.
 
 
 
 
                         THE TRACHINIAN MAIDENS
 
 
 DEANIRA. Men say,--'twas old experience gave the word,
 --'No lot of mortal, ere he die, can once
 Be known for good or evil.' But I know,
 Before I come to the dark dwelling-place,
 Mine is a lot, adverse and hard and sore.
 Who yet at Pleuron, in my father's home,
 Of all Aetolian women had most cause
 To fear my bridal. For a river-god,
 Swift Acheloues, was my suitor there
 And sought me from my father in three forms;
 Now in his own bull-likeness, now a serpent
 Of coiling sheen, and now with manlike build
 But bovine front, while from the shadowy beard
 Sprang fountain-waters in perpetual spray.
 Looking for such a husband, I, poor girl!
 Still prayed that Death might find me, ere I knew
 That nuptial.--Later, to my glad relief,
 Zeus' and Alcmena's glorious offspring came,
 And closed with him in conflict, and released
 My heart from torment. How the fight was won
 I could not tell. If any were who saw
 Unshaken of dread foreboding, such may speak.
 But I sate quailing with an anguished fear,
 Lest beauty might procure me nought but pain,
 Till He that rules the issue of all strife,
 Gave fortunate end--if fortunate! For since,
 Assigned by that day's conquest, I have known
 The couch of Heracles, my life is spent
 In one continual terror for his fate.
 Night brings him, and, ere morning, some fresh toil
 Drives him afar. And I have borne him seed;
 Which he, like some strange husbandman that farms
 A distant field, finds but at sowing time
 And once in harvest. Such a weary life
 Still tossed him to and fro,--no sooner home
 But forth again, serving I know not whom.
   And when his glorious head had risen beyond
 These labours, came the strongest of my fear.
 For since he quelled the might of Iphitus,
 We here in Trachis dwell, far from our home,
 Dependent on a stranger, but where he
 Is gone, none knoweth. Only this I know,
 His going pierced my heart with pangs for him,
 And now I am all but sure he bears some woe.
 These fifteen months he hath sent me not one word.
 And I have cause for fear. Ere he set forth
 He left a scroll with me, whose dark intent
 I oft pray Heaven may bring no sorrow down.
 
 ATTENDANT. Queen Deanira, many a time ere now
 Have I beheld thee with all tearful moan
 Bewailing the departure of thy lord.
 But, if it be permitted that a slave
 Should tender counsel to the free, my voice
 May venture this:--Of thy strong band of sons
 Why is not one commissioned to explore
 For Heracles? and why not Hyllus first,
 Whom most it would beseem to show regard
 For tidings of his father's happiness?
 Ah! here I see him bounding home, with feet
 Apt for employment! If you count me wise,
 He and my words attend upon your will.
 
 _Enter_ HYLLUS.
 
 DE. Dear child, dear boy! even from the lowliest head
 Wise counsel may come forth. This woman here,
 Though a bond-maiden, hath a free-born tongue.
 
 HYL. What word is spoken, mother? May I know?
 
 DE. That, with thy father lost to us so long,
 'Tis shame thou dost not learn his dwelling-place.
 
 HYL. Yea, I have learnt, if one may trust report.
 
 DE. Where art thou told his seat is fixed, my son?
 
 HYL. 'Tis said that through the length of this past year
 He wrought as bondman to a Lydian girl.
 
 DE. Hath he borne that? Then nothing can be strange!
 
 HYL. Well, that is over, I am told. He is free.
 
 DE. Where is he rumoured, then, alive or dead?
 
 HYL. In rich Euboea, besieging, as they tell,
 The town of Eurytus, or offering siege.
 
 DE. Child, hast thou heard what holy oracles
 He left with me, touching that very land?
 
 HYL. What were they, mother, for I never knew?
 
 DE. That either he must end his being there,
 Or, this one feat performed, his following time
 Should grace his life with fair prosperity.
 Wilt thou not then, my child, when he is held
 In such a crisis of uncertain peril,
 Run to his aid?--since we must perish with him,
 Or owe our lasting safety to his life.
 
 HYL. I will go, mother. Had I heard this voice
 Of prophecy, long since I had been there.
 Fear is unwonted for our father's lot.
 But now I know, my strength shall all be spent
 To learn the course of these affairs in full.
 
 DE. Go then, my son. Though late, to learn and do
 What wisdom bids, hath certainty of gain.
                                    [_Exit_ HYLLUS. DEANIRA _withdraws_
 
 CHORUS (_entering and turning towards the East_).
     Born of the starry night in her undoing,                       I 1
     Lulled in her bosom at thy parting glow,
         O Sun! I bid thee show,
     What journey is Alcmena's child pursuing?
         What region holds him now,
     'Mong winding channels of the deep,
     Or Asian plains, or rugged Western steep?
         Declare it, thou
     Peerless in vision of thy flashing ray
     That lightens on the world with each new day.
     Sad Deanira, bride of battle-wooing[1],                        I 2
     Ne'er lets her tearful eyelids close in rest,
         But in love-longing breast,
     Like some lorn bird its desolation rueing,
         Of her great husband's way
     Still mindful, worn with harrowing fear
     Lest some new danger for him should be near,
         By night and day
     Pines on her widowed couch of ceaseless thought,
     With dread of evil destiny distraught:           [_Enter_ DEANIRA.
 
     For many as are billows of the South                          II 1
     Blowing unweariedly, or Northern gale,
     One going and another coming on
     Incessantly, baffling the gazer's eye,
     Such Cretan ocean of unending toil
     Cradles our Cadmus-born, and swells his fame.
       But still some power doth his foot recall
       From stumbling down to Hades' darkling hall.
 
     Wherefore, in censure of thy mood, I bring                    II 2
     Glad, though opposing, counsel. Let not hope
     Grow weary. Never hath a painless life
     Been cast on mortals by the power supreme
     Of the All-disposer, Cronos' son. But joy
     And sorrow visit in perpetual round
       All mortals, even as circleth still on high
       The constellation of the Northern sky.
 
     What lasteth in the world? Not starry night,                   III
     Nor wealth, nor tribulation; but is gone
     All suddenly, while to another soul
     The joy or the privation passeth on.
     These hopes I bid thee also, O my Queen!
     Hold fast continually, for who hath seen
     Zeus so forgetful of his own?
     How can his providence forsake his son?
 
 DE. I see you have been told of my distress,
 And that hath brought you. But my inward woe,
 Be it evermore unknown to you, as now!
 Such the fair garden of untrammeled ease
 Where the young life grows safely. No fierce heat,
 No rain, no wind disturbs it, but unharmed
 It rises amid airs of peace and joy,
 Till maiden turn to matron, and the night
 Inherit her dark share of anxious thought,
 Haunted with fears for husband or for child.
 Then, imaged through her own calamity,
 Some one may guess the burden of my life.
   Full many have been the sorrows I have wept,
 But one above the rest I tell to-day.
 When my great husband parted last from home,
 He left within the house an ancient scroll
 Inscribed with characters of mystic note,
 Which Heracles had never heretofore,
 In former labours, cared to let me see,--
 As bound for bright achievement, not for death.
 But now, as though his life had end, he told
 What marriage-portion I must keep, what shares
 He left his sons out of their father's ground:
 And set a time, when fifteen moons were spent,
 Counted from his departure, that even then
 Or he must die, or if that date were out
 And he had run beyond it, he should live
 Thenceforth a painless and untroubled life.
 Such by Heaven's fiat was the promised end
 Of Heracles' long labours, as he said;
 So once the ancient oak-tree had proclaimed
 In high Dodona through the sacred Doves.
 Of which prediction on this present hour
 In destined order of accomplishment
 The veritable issue doth depend.
 And I, dear friends, while taking rest, will oft
 Start from sweet slumbers with a sudden fear,
 Scared by the thought, my life may be bereft
 Of the best husband in the world of men.
 
 CH. Hush! For I see approaching one in haste,
 Garlanded, as if laden with good news.
 
 _Enter_ Messenger.
 
 MESSENGER. Queen Deanira, mine shall be the tongue
 To free thee first from fear. Alcmena's child
 Is living, be assured, and triumphing,
 And bringing to our Gods the fruits of war.
 
 DE. What mean'st thou, aged sir, by what thou sayest?
 
 MESS. That soon thy husband, envied all around,
 Will come, distinguished with victorious might.
 
 DE. What citizen or stranger told thee this?
 
 MESS. Your herald Lichas, where the oxen graze
 The summer meadow, cries this to a crowd.
 I, hearing, flew off hither, that being first
 To bring thee word thereof, I might be sure
 To win reward and gratitude from thee.
 
 DE. And how is he not here, if all be well?
 
 MESS. Crossed by no light impediment, my Queen.
 For all the Maliac people, gathering round,
 Throng him with question, that he cannot move.
 But he must still the travail of each soul,
 And none will be dismissed unsatisfied.
 Such willing audience he unwillingly
 Harangues, but soon himself will come in sight.
 
 DE. O Zeus! who rulest Oeta's virgin wold,
 At last, though late, thou hast vouchsafed us joy.
 Lift up your voices, O my women! ye
 Within the halls, and ye beyond the gate!
 For now we reap the gladness of a ray,
 That dawns unhoped for in this rumour's sound.
 
 CHORUS
 With a shout by the hearth let the palace roof ring
   From those that are dreaming of bridal, and ye,
 Young men, let your voices in harmony sing
   To the God of the quiver, the Lord of the free!
 And the Paean withal from the maiden band
 To Artemis, huntress of many a land,
     Let it rise o'er the glad roof tree,
 To Phoebus' own sister, with fire in each hand,
     And the Nymphs that her co-mates be!
 My spirit soars. O sovereign of my soul!
 I will accept the thrilling flute's control.             [_They dance_
     The ivy-crowned thyrsus, see!
     With Bacchic fire is kindling me,
     And turns my emulous tread
     Where'er the mazy dance may lead.
 Euoi! Euoi!
 O Paean! send us joy.
 See, dearest Queen, behold!
 Before thy gaze the event will now unfold.
 
 DE. Think not mine eye hath kept such careless guard,
 Dear maids, that I could miss this moving train.
 Herald, I bid thee hail, although so late
 Appearing, if thou bringest health with thee!
 
 _Enter_ LICHAS, _with_ Captive Women.
 
 LICHAS. A happy welcome on a happy way,
 As prosperous our achievement. Meet it is
 Good words should greet bright actions, mistress mine!
 
 DE. Kind friend, first tell me what I first would know--
 Shall I receive my Heracles alive?
 
 LICH. I left him certainly alive and strong:
 Blooming in health, not with disease oppressed.
 
 DE. In Greece, or in some barbarous country? Tell!
 
 LICH. Euboea's island hath a promontory,
 Where to Cenaean Zeus he consecrates
 Rich altars and the tribute of the ground.
 
 DE. Moved by an oracle, or from some vow?
 
 LICH. So vowed he when he conquered with the spear
 The country of these women whom you see.
 
 DE. And who, by Heaven, are they? Who was their sire?
 Their case is piteous, or eludes my thought.
 
 LICH. He took them for the service of the Gods
 And his own house, when high Oechalia fell.
 
 DE. Was't then before that city he was kept
 Those endless ages of uncounted time?
 
 LICH. Not so. The greater while he was detained
 Among the Lydians, sold, as he declares,
 To bondage. Nor be jealous of the word,
 Since Heaven, my Queen, was author of the deed.
 Enthralled so to Asian Omphale,
 He, as himself avers, fulfilled his year.
 The felt reproach whereof so chafed his soul,
 He bound fierce curses on himself and sware
 That,--children, wife and all,--he yet would bring
 In captive chains the mover of this harm.
 Nor did this perish like an idle word,
 But, when the stain was off him, straight he drew
 Allied battalions to assault the town
 Of Eurytus, whom, sole of earthly powers,
 He had noted as the source of his annoy,
 Because, having received him in his hall
 A guest of ancient days, he burst on him
 With outrage of loud voice and villanous mind,
 Saying, 'with his hand upon the unerring bow,
 Oechalia's princes could o'ershoot his skill;
 And born to bondage, he must quail beneath
 His overlord'; lastly, to crown this cry,
 When at a banquet he was filled with wine,
 He flung him out of door. Whereat being wroth,
 When Iphitus to the Tirynthian height
 Followed the track where his brood-mares had strayed,
 He, while the thought and eye of the man by chance
 Were sundered, threw him from the tower-crowned cliff.
 In anger for which deed the Olympian King,
 Father of Gods and men, delivered him
 To be a bond-slave, nor could brook the offence,
 That of all lives he vanquished, this alone
 Should have been ta'en by guile. For had he wrought
 In open quittance of outrageous wrong,
 Even Zeus had granted that his cause was just.
 The braggart hath no favour even in Heaven.
 Whence they, o'erweening with their evil tongue,
 Are now all dwellers in the house of death,
 Their ancient city a captive;--but these women
 Whom thou beholdest, from their blest estate
 Brought suddenly to taste of piteous woe,
 Come to thy care. This task thy wedded lord
 Ordained, and I, his faithful minister,
 Seek to perform. But, for his noble self,
 When with pure hands he hath done sacrifice
 To his Great Father for the victory given,
 Look for his coming, lady. This last word
 Of all my happy speech is far most sweet.
 
 CH. Now surety of delight is thine, my Queen,
 Part by report and part before thine eye.
 
 DE. Yea, now I learn this triumph of my lord,
 Joy reigns without a rival in my breast.
 This needs must run with that in fellowship.
 Yet wise consideration even of good
 Is flecked with fear of what reverse may come.
 And I, dear friends, when I behold these maids,
 Am visited with sadness deep and strange.
 Poor friendless beings, in a foreign land
 Wandering forlorn in homeless orphanhood!
 Erewhile, free daughters of a freeborn race,
 Now, snared in strong captivity for life.
 O Zeus of battles, breaker of the war,
 Ne'er may I see thee[2] turn against my seed
 So cruelly; or, if thou meanest so,
 Let me be spared that sorrow by my death!
 Such fear in me the sight of these hath wrought.
 Who art thou, of all damsels most distressed?
 Single or child-bearing? Thy looks would say,
 A maid, of no mean lineage. Lichas, tell,
 Who is the stranger-nymph? Who gave her birth?
 Who was her sire? Mine eye hath pitied her
 O'er all, as she o'er all hath sense of woe.
 
 LICH. What know I? Why should'st thou demand? Perchance
 Not lowest in the list of souls there born.
 
 DE. How if a princess, offspring of their King?
 
 LICH. I cannot tell. I did not question far.
 
 DE. Have none of her companions breathed her name?
 
 LICH. I brought them silently. I did not hear.
 
 DE. Yet speak it to us of thyself, poor maid!
 'Tis sorrow not to know thee who thou art.
 
 LICH. She'll ne'er untie her tongue, if she maintain
 An even tenor, since nor more nor less
 Would she disclose; but, poor unfortunate!
 With agonizing sobs and tears she mourns
 This crushing sorrow, from the day she left
 Her wind-swept home. Her case is cruel, sure,--
 And claims a privilege from all who feel.
 
 DE. Well, let her go, and pass beneath the roof
 In peace, as she desires; nor let fresh pain
 From me be added to her previous woe.
 She hath enough already. Come, away!
 Let's all within at once, that thou mayest speed
 Thy journey, and I may order all things here.
                     [_Exit_ LICHAS, _with_ Captives, _into the house_.
                                      DEANIRA _is about to follow them_
 
 _Re-enter_ Messenger.
 
 MESS. Pause first there on the threshold, till you learn
 (Apart from those) who 'tis you take within,
 And more besides that you yet know not of,
 Which deeply imports your knowing. Of all this
 I throughly am informed.
 
 DE.                      What cause hast thou
 Thus to arrest my going?
 
 MESS.                    Stand, and hear.
 Not idle was my former speech, nor this.
 
 DE. Say, must we call them back in presence here,
 Or would'st thou tell thy news to these and me?
 
 MESS. To thee and these I may, but let those be.
 
 DE. Well, they are gone. Let words declare thy drift.
 
 MESS. That man, in all that he hath lately said,
 Hath sinned against the truth: or now he's false,
 Or else unfaithful in his first report.
 
 DE. What? Tell me thy full meaning clearly forth.
 That thou hast uttered is all mystery.
 
 MESS. I heard this herald say, while many thronged
 To hearken, that this maiden was the cause,
 Why lofty-towered Oechalia and her lord
 Fell before Heracles, whom Love alone
 Of heavenly powers had warmed to this emprise,
 And not the Lydian thraldom or the tasks
 Of rigorous Omphale, nor that wild fate
 Of rock-thrown Iphitus. Now he thrusts aside
 The Love-god, contradicting his first tale.
   When he that was her sire could not be brought
 To yield the maid for Heracles to hold
 In love unrecognized, he framed erelong
 A feud about some trifle, and set forth
 In arms against this damsel's fatherland
 (Where Eurytus, the herald said, was king)
 And slew the chief her father; yea, and sacked
 Their city. Now returning, as you see,
 He sends her hither to his halls, no slave,
 Nor unregarded, lady,--dream not so!
 Since all his heart is kindled with desire.
 I, O my Queen! thought meet to show thee all
 The tale I chanced to gather from his mouth,
 Which many heard as well as I, i' the midst
 Of Trachis' market-place, and can confirm
 My witness. I am pained if my plain speech
 Sound harshly, but the honest truth I tell.
 
 DE. Ah me! Where am I? Whither am I fallen?
 What hidden woe have I unwarily
 Taken beneath my roof? O misery!
 Was she unknown, as he that brought her sware?
 
 MESS. Nay, most distinguished both in birth and mien;
 Called in her day of freedom Iole,
 Eurytus' daughter,--of whose parentage,
 Forsooth as ignorant, he ne'er would speak.
 
 CH. I curse not all the wicked, but the man
 Whose secret practices deform his life.
 
 DE. Say, maidens, how must I proceed? The words
 Now spoken have bewildered all my mind.
 
 CH. Go in and question Lichas, who perchance
 Will tell the truth if you but tax him home.
 
 DE. I will; you counsel reasonably.
 
 MESS.                               And I,
 Shall I bide here till thou com'st forth? Or how?
 
 DE. Remain. For see, without my sending for him,
 He issueth from the palace of himself.
 
 _Enter_ LICHAS.
 
 LICH. What message must I carry to my lord?
 Tell me, my Queen. I am going, as thou seest.
 
 DE. So slow in coming, and so quickly flown,
 Ere one have time to talk with thee anew!
 
 LICH. What wouldst thou ask me? I am bent to hear.
 
 DE. And art thou bent on truth in the reply?
 
 LICH. By Heaven! in all that I have knowledge of.
 
 DE. Then tell me, who is she thou brought'st with thee?
 
 LICH. An islander. I cannot trace her stock.
 
 MESS. Look hither, man. Who is't to whom thou speakest?
 
 LICH. Why such a question? What is thine intent?
 
 MESS. Nay, start not, but make answer if thou knowest.
 
 LICH. To Deanira, Oeneus' queenly child,
 Heracles' wife,--if these mine eyes be true,--
 My mistress.
 
 MESS.        Ay, that is the very word
 I longed to hear thee speak. Thy mistress, sayest?
 
 LICH. To whom I am bound.
 
 MESS.                     Hold there! What punishment
 Wilt thou accept, if thou art found to be
 Faithless to her?
 
 LICH.             I faithless! What dark speech
 Hast thou contrived?
 
 MESS.                Not I at all. 'Tis thou
 Dost wrap thy thoughts i' the dark.
 
 LICH.                               Well, I will go.
 'Tis folly to have heard thee for so long.
 
 MESS. You go not till you answer one word more.
 
 LICH. One, or a thousand! You'll not stint, I see.
 
 MESS. Thou knowest the captive maid thou leddest home?
 
 LICH. I do. But wherefore ask?
 
 MESS.                          Did you not say
 That she, on whom you look with ignorant eye,
 Was Iole, the daughter of the King,
 Committed to your charge?
 
 LICH.                     Where? Among whom?
 What witness of such words will bear thee out?
 
 MESS. Many and sound. A goodly company
 In Trachis' market-place heard thee speak this.
 
 LICH. Ay.
 I said 'twas rumoured. But I could not give
 My vague impression for advised report.
 
 MESS. Impression, quotha! Did you not on oath
 Proclaim your captive for your master's bride?
 
 LICH. My master's bride! Dear lady, by the Gods,
 Who is the stranger? for I know him not.
 
 MESS. One who was present where he heard thee tell,
 How that whole city was subdued and taken,
 Not for the bondage to the Lydian girl,
 But through the longing passion for this maid.
 
 LICH. Dear lady, let the fellow be removed.
 To prate with madmen is mere foolishness.
 
 DE. Nay, I entreat thee by His name, whose fire
 Lightens down Oeta's topmost glen, be not
 A niggard of the truth. Thou tell'st thy tale
 To no weak woman, but to one who knows
 Mankind are never constant to one joy.
 Whoso would buffet Love, aspires in vain.
 For Love leads even Immortals at his will,
 And me. Then how not others, like to me?
 'Twere madness, sure, in me to blame my lord
 When this hath caught him, or the woman there,
 His innocent accomplice in a thing,
 No shame to either, and no harm to me.
 It is not so. But if from him thou learnest
 The lore of falsehood, it were best unlearnt;
 Or if the instruction comes of thine own thought,
 Such would-be kindness doth not prove thee kind.
 Then tell me all the truth. To one free-born
 The name of liar is a hateful lot.
 And thou canst not be hid. Thy news was heard
 By many, who will tell me. If thou fearest,
 Thou hast no cause--for doubtfulness is pain,
 But to know all, what harm? His loves ere now
 Were they not manifold? And none hath borne
 Reproach or evil word from me. She shall not,
 Though his new passion were as strong as death;
 Since most mine eye hath pitied her, because
 Her beauty was the ruin of her life,
 And all unweeting, she her own bright land,
 Poor hapless one! hath ravaged and enslaved.--
 Let that be as it must. But for thy part,
 Though false to others, be still true to me.
 
 CH. 'Tis fairly said. Comply. Thou ne'er wilt blame
 Her faithfulness, and thou wilt earn our loves.
 
 LICH. Yea, dear my Queen, now I have seen thee hold
 Thy mortal wishes within mortal bound
 So meekly, I will freely tell thee all.
 It is as he avers. This maiden's love,
 Piercing through Heracles, was the sole cause,
 Why her Oechalia, land of plenteous woe,
 Was made the conquest of his spear. And he--
 For I dare so far clear him--never bade
 Concealment or denial. But myself,
 Fearing the word might wound thy queenly heart,
 Sinned, if thou count such tenderness a sin.
 But now that all is known, for both your sakes,
 His, and thine own no less, look favouringly
 Upon the woman, and confirm the word
 Thou here hast spoken in regard to her:--
 For he, whose might is in all else supreme,
 Is wholly overmastered by her love.
 
 DE. Yea, so my mind is bent. I will do so.
 I will not, in a bootless strife 'gainst Heaven,
 Augment my misery with self-sought ill.
 Come, go we in, that thou may'st bear from me
 Such message as is meet, and also carry
 Gifts, such as are befitting to return
 For gifts new-given. Thou ought'st not to depart
 Unladen, having brought so much with thee.                   [_Exeunt_
 
 CHORUS.
         Victorious in her might,                                   I 1
         The Queen of soft delight
     Still ranges onward with triumphant sway.
         What she from Kronos' son
         And strong Poseidon won,
     And Pluto, King of Night, I durst not say.
         But who, to earn this bride,
         Came forth in sinewy pride
     To strive, or e'er the nuptial might be known
         With fearless heart I tell
         What heroes wrestled well,
     With showering blows, and dust in clouds upthrown.
 
         One was a river bold,                                      I 2
         Horn-crowned, with tramp fourfold,
     Bull Acheloues, Acarnania's Fear;
         And one from Bacchus' town,
         Own son of Zeus, came down,
     With brandished mace, bent bow, and barbed spear.
         Who then in battle brunt,
         Together, front to front,
     Hurled, eager both to win the beauteous prize;
         And Cypris 'mid the fray
         Alone, that dreadful day,
     Sate umpire, holding promise in her eyes.
 
     Then clashed the fist, then clanged the bow;                    II
     Then horns gave crashing blow for blow,
         Whilst, as they clung,
     The twining hip throw both essay
     And hurtling foreheads' fearful play,
         And groans from each were wrung.
 
     But the tender fair one far away
         Sate watching with an eye of piteous cheer
     (A mother's heart will heed the thing I say,)
       Till won by him who freed her from her fear.
     Sudden she leaves her mother's gentle side,
     Borne through the waste, our hero's tender bride.
 
 _Enter_ DEANIRA.
 
 DE. Dear friends, while yonder herald in the house
 Holds converse with the captives ere he go,
 I have stol'n forth to you, partly to tell
 The craft my hand hath compassed, and in part,
 To crave your pity for my wretchedness.
 For I have taken to my hearth a maid,--
 And yet, methinks, no maiden any more,
 Like some fond shipmaster, taking on board
 A cargo fraught with treason to my heart.
 And now we two are closed in one embrace
 Beneath one coverlet. Such generous meed
 For faith in guarding home this dreary while
 Hath the kind Heracles our trusty spouse,
 Sent in return! Yet, oft as he hath caught
 This same distemperature, I know not how
 To harbour indignation against him.
 But who that is a woman could endure
 To dwell with her, both married to one man?
 One bloom is still advancing, one doth fade.
 The budding flower is cropped, the full-blown head
 Is left to wither, while love passeth by
 Unheeding. Wherefore I am sore afraid
 He will be called my husband, but her mate,
 For she is younger. Yet no prudent wife
 Would take this angerly, as I have said.
 But, dear ones, I will tell you of a way,
 Whereof I have bethought me, to prevent
 This heart-break. I had hidden of long time
 In a bronze urn the ancient Centaur's gift,
 Which I, when a mere girl, culled from the wound
 Of hairy-breasted Nessus in his death.
 He o'er Evenus' rolling depths, for hire,
 Ferried wayfarers on his arm, not plying
 Or rowing-boat, or canvas-winged bark.
 Who, when with Heracles, a new-made bride,
 I followed by my father's sending forth,
 Shouldering me too, in the mid-stream, annoyed
 With wanton touch. And I cried out; and he,
 Zeus' son, turned suddenly, and from his bow
 Sent a wing'd shaft, that whizzed into his chest
 To the lungs. Then the weird Thing, with dying voice
 Spake to me:--'Child of aged Oeneues,
 Since thou wert my last burden, thou shalt win
 Some profit from mine act, if thou wilt do
 What now I bid thee. With a careful hand
 Collect and bear away the clotted gore
 That clogs my wound, e'en where the monster snake
 Had dyed the arrow with dark tinct of gall;
 And thou shalt have this as a charm of soul
 For Heracles, that never through the eye
 Shall he receive another love than thine.'
 Whereof bethinking me, for since his death
 I kept it in a closet locked with care,
 I have applied it to this robe, with such
 Addition as his living voice ordained.--
 The thing is done. No criminal attempts
 Could e'er be mine. Far be they from my thought,
 As I abhor the woman who conceives them!
 But if by any means through gentle spells
 And bonds on Heracles' affection, we
 May triumph o'er this maiden in his heart,
 My scheme is perfected. Unless you deem
 Mine action wild. If so, I will desist.
 
 CH. If any ground of confidence approve
 Thine act, we cannot check thy counsel here.
 
 DE. My confidence is grounded on belief,
 Though unconfirmed as yet by actual proof.
 
 CH. Well, do it and try. Assurance cannot come
 Till action bring experience after it.
 
 DE. The truth will soon be known. The man e'en now
 Is coming forth, and quickly will be there.
 Screen ye but well my counsel. Doubtful deeds,
 Wrapt close, will not deliver us to shame.
 
 _Enter_ LICHAS.
 
 LICH. Daughter of Oeneus, tell me thy commands.
 Already time rebukes our tardiness.
 
 DE. Even that hath been my care, Lichas, while thou
 Wert talking to the stranger-maids within,
 That thou shouldst take for me this finewoven web,
 A present from these fingers to my lord.
 And when thou giv'st it, say that none of men
 Must wear it on his shoulders before him;
 And neither light of sun may look upon it,
 Nor holy temple-court, nor household flame,
 Till he in open station 'fore the Gods
 Display it on a day when bulls are slaughtered.
 So once I vowed, that should I ever see
 Or hear his safe return, I would enfold
 His glorious person in this robe, and show
 To all the Gods in doing sacrifice
 Him a fresh worshipper in fresh array.--
 The truth hereof he will with ease descry
 Betokened on this treasure-guarding seal.--
 Now go, and be advised, of this in chief,
 To act within thine office; then of this,
 To bear thee so, that from his thanks and mine
 Meeting in one, a twofold grace may spring.
 
 LICH. If this my Hermes-craft be firm and sure,
 Then never will I fail thee, O my Queen!
 But I will show the casket as it is
 To whom I bear it, and in faithfulness
 Add all the words thou sendest in fit place.
 
 DE. Go, then, at once. Thou hast full cognizance
 How things within the palace are preserved?
 
 LICH. I know, and will declare. There is no flaw.
 
 DE. Methinks thou knowest too, for thou hast seen,
 My kind reception of the stranger-maid?
 
 LICH. I saw, and was amazed with heart-struck joy.
 
 DE. What more is there to tell?--Too rash, I fear,
 Were thy report of longing on my part,
 Till we can learn if we be longed for there.       [_Exeunt severally_
 
 CHORUS.
         O ye that haunt the strand                                 I 1
         Where ships in quiet land
 Near Oeta's height and the warm rock-drawn well,
 And ye round Melis' inland gulf who dwell,
 Worshipping her who wields the golden wand,--
 (There Hellas' wisest meet in council strong):
         Soon shall the flute arise
         With sound of glad surprise,
 Thrilling your sense with no unwelcome song,
 But tones that to the harp of Heavenly Muse belong.
 
         Zeus' and Alcmena's son,--                                 I 2
         All deeds of glory done,--
 Speeds now triumphant to his home, whom we
 Twelve weary months of blind expectancy
 Lost in vast distance, from our country gone.
 While, sadly languishing, his loving wife,
         Still flowing down with tears,
         Pined with unnumbered fears.
 But Ares, lately stung to furious strife,
 Frees him for ever[3] from the toilsome life.
 
         O let him come to-day!                                      II
         Ne'er may his vessel stay,
 But glide with feathery sweep of many an oar,
 Till from his altar by yon island shore
 Even to our town he wind his prosperous way,
         In mien returning mild,
         And inly reconciled,
 With that anointing in his heart ingrained,
 Which the dark Centaur's wizard lips ordained.
 
 _Enter_ DEANIRA.
 
 DE. O how I fear, my friends, lest all too far
 I have ventured in my action of to-day!
 
 CH. What ails thee, Deanira, Oeneus' child?
 
 DE. I know not, but am haunted by a dread,
 Lest quickly I be found to have performed
 A mighty mischief, through bright hopes betrayed.
 
 CH. Thou dost not mean thy gift to Heracles?
 
 DE. Indeed I do. Now I perceive how fond
 Is eagerness, where actions are obscure.
 
 CH. Tell, if it may be told, thy cause of fear.
 
 DE. A thing is come to pass, which should I tell,
 Will strike you with strange wonder when you learn.
 For, O my friends, the stuff wherewith I dressed
 That robe, a flock of soft and milkwhite wool,
 Is shrivelled out of sight, not gnawn by tooth
 Of any creature here, but, self-consumed,
 Frittered and wasting on the courtyard-stones.
   To let you know the circumstance at full,
 I will speak on. Of all the Centaur-Thing,
 When labouring in his side with the fell point
 O' the shaft, enjoined me, I had nothing lost,
 But his vaticination in my heart
 Remained indelible, as though engraved
 With pen of iron upon brass. 'Twas thus:--
 I was to keep this unguent closely hid
 In dark recesses, where no heat of fire
 Or warming ray might reach it, till with fresh
 Anointing I addressed it to an end.
 So I had done. And now this was to do,
 Within my chamber covertly I spread
 The ointment with piece of wool, a tuft
 Pulled from a home-bred sheep; and, as ye saw,
 I folded up my gift and packed it close
 In hollow casket from the glaring sun.
 But, entering in, a fact encounters me
 Past human wit to fathom with surmise.
 For, as it happened, I had tossed aside
 The bit of wool I worked with, carelessly,
 Into the open daylight, 'mid the blaze
 Of Helios' beam. And, as it kindled warm,
 It fell away to nothing, crumbled small,
 Like dust in severing wood by sawyers strewn.
 So, on the point of vanishing, it lay.
 But, from the place where it had lain, brake forth
 A frothy scum in clots of seething foam,
 Like the rich draught in purple vintage poured
 From Bacchus' vine upon the thirsty ground.
 And I, unhappy, know not toward what thought
 To turn me, but I see mine act is dire.
 For wherefore should the Centaur, for what end,
 Show kindness to the cause for whom he died?
 That cannot be. But seeking to destroy
 His slayer, he cajoled me. This I learn
 Too late, by sad experience, for no good.
 And, if I err not now, my hapless fate
 Is all alone to be his murderess.
 For, well I know, the shaft that made the wound
 Gave pain to Cheiron, who was more than man;
 And wheresoe'er it falls, it ravageth
 All the wild creatures of the world. And now
 This gory venom blackly spreading bane
 From Nessus' angry wound, must it not cause
 The death of Heracles? I think it must.
   Yet my resolve is firm, if aught harm him,
 My death shall follow in the self-same hour.
 She cannot bear to live in evil fame,
 Who cares to have a nature pure from ill.
 
 CH. Horrid mischance must needs occasion fear.
 But Hope is not condemned before the event.
 
 DE. In ill-advised proceeding not even Hope
 Remains to minister a cheerful mind.
 
 CH. Yet to have erred unwittingly abates
 The fire of wrath; and thou art in this case.
 
 DE. So speaks not he who hath a share of sin,
 But who is clear of all offence at home.
 
 CH. 'Twere well to say no more, unless thou hast aught
 To impart to thine own son: for he is here,
 Who went erewhile to find his father forth.
 
 HYLLUS _(re-entering)_.
 O mother, mother!
 I would to heaven one of three things were true:
 Either that thou wert dead, or, living, wert
 No mother to me, or hadst gained a mind
 Furnished with better thoughts than thou hast now!
 
 DE. My son! what canst thou so mislike in me?
 
 HYL. I tell thee thou this day hast been the death
 Of him that was thy husband and my sire.
 
 DE. What word hath passed thy lips? my child, my child!
 
 HYL. A word that must be verified. For who
 Can make the accomplished fact as things undone?
 
 DE. Alas, my son! what saidst thou? Who hath told
 That I have wrought a deed so full of woe?
 
 HYL. 'Twas I myself that saw with these mine eyes
 My father's heavy state:--no hearsay word.
 
 DE. And where didst thou come near him and stand by?
 
 HYL. Art thou to hear it? On, then, with my tale!
 When after sacking Eurytus' great city
 He marched in triumph with first-fruits of war,--
 There is a headland, last of long Euboea,
 Surf-beat Cenaeum,--where to his father Zeus
 He dedicates high altars and a grove.
 There first I saw him, gladdened from desire.
 And when he now addressed him to the work
 Of various sacrifice, the herald Lichas
 Arrived from home, bearing thy fatal gift,
 The deadly robe: wherewith invested straight,
 As thou hadst given charge, he sacrificed
 The firstlings of the spoil, twelve bulls entire,
 Each after each. But the full count he brought
 Was a clear hundred of all kinds of head.
   Then the all-hapless one commenced his prayer
 In solemn gladness for the bright array.
 But presently, when from the holy things,
 And from the richness of the oak-tree core,
 There issued flame mingled with blood, a sweat
 Rose on his flesh, and close to every limb
 Clung, like stone-drapery from the craftsman's hand,
 The garment, glued unto his side. Then came
 The tearing pangs within his bones, and then
 The poison feasted like the venomed tooth
 Of murderous basilisk.--When this began,
 He shouted on poor Lichas, none to blame
 For thy sole crime, 'What guile is here, thou knave?
 What was thy fraud in fetching me this robe?'
 He, all-unknowing, in an evil hour
 Declared his message, that the gift was thine.
 Whereat the hero, while the shooting spasm
 Had fastened on the lungs, seized him by the foot
 Where the ankle turns i' the socket, and, with a thought,
 Hurl'd on a surf-vex'd reef that showed i' the sea:
 And rained the grey pulp from the hair, the brain
 Being scattered with the blood. Then the great throng
 Saddened their festival with piteous wail
 For one in death and one in agony.
 And none had courage to approach my sire,--
 Convulsed upon the ground, then tossed i' the air
 With horrid yells and crying, till the cliffs
 Echoed round, the mountain-promontories
 Of Locris, and Euboea's rugged shore.
 Wearied at length with flinging on the earth,
 And shrieking oft with lamentable cry,
 Cursing the fatal marriage with thyself
 The all-wretched, and the bond to Oeneus' house,
 That prize that was the poisoner of his peace,
 He lifted a wild glance above the smoke
 That hung around, and 'midst the crowd of men
 Saw me in tears, and looked on me and said,
 'O son, come near; fly not from my distress,
 Though thou shouldst be consumed in my death,
 But lift and bear me forth; and, if thou mayest,
 Set me where no one of mankind shall see me.
 But if thy heart withhold thee, yet convey me
 Out of this land as quickly as ye may.
 Let me not die where I am now.' We then,
 Thus urgently commanded, laid him down
 Within our bark, and hardly to this shore
 Rowed him convulsed and roaring.--Presently,
 He will appear, alive or lately dead.
   Such, mother, is the crime thou hast devised
 And done against our sire, wherefore let Right
 And Vengeance punish thee!--May I pray so?
 I may: for thou absolv'st me by thy deed,
 Thou that hast slain the noblest of the Earth,
 Thy spouse, whose like thou ne'er wilt see again.     [_Exit_ DEANIRA.
 
 CH. Why steal'st thou forth in silence? Know'st thou not
 Thy silence argues thine accuser's plea?
 
 HYL. Let her go off. Would that a sudden flood
 Might sweep her far and swiftly from mine eye!
 Why fondle vainly the fair-sounding name
 Of mother, when her acts are all unmotherly?
 Let her begone for me: and may she find
 Such joy as she hath rendered to my sire!               [_Exit_ HYLLUS
 
 CHORUS.
         See where falls the doom, of old                           I 1
         By the unerring Voice foretold,--
         'When twelve troublous years have rolled,
         Then shall end your long desire:
         Toil on toil no more shall tire
         The offspring of the Eternal Sire.'
         Lo! the destined Hour is come!
         Lo! it hath brought its burden home.
     For when the eyes have looked their last
     How should sore labour vex again?
     How, when the powers of will and thought are past,
     Should life be any more enthralled to pain?
 
         And if Nessus' withering shroud,                           I 2
         Wrought by destiny and craft,
         Steep him in a poisonous cloud.
         Steaming from the venomed shaft,
         Which to Death in hideous lair
         The many-wreathed Hydra bare,
         How shall he another day
         Feel the glad warmth of Helios' ray?--
     Enfolded by the Monster-Thing
     Of Lerna, while the cruel sting
     Of the shagg'd Centaur's murderous-guileful tongue
     Breaks forth withal to do him painful wrong.
 
         And she, poor innocent, who saw                           II 1
           Checkless advancing to the gate
           A mighty harm unto her state,--
     This rash young bridal without fear of law,--
     Gave not her will to aught that caused this woe,
       But since it came through that strange mind's conceiving,--
       That ruined her in meeting,--deeply grieving,
     She mourns with dewy tears in tenderest flow.
     The approaching hour appeareth great with woe:
     Some guile-born misery doth Fate foreshow.
 
         The springs of sorrow are unbound,                        II 2
           And such an agony disclose,
           As never from the hands of foes
     To afflict the life of Heracles was found.
     O dark with battle-stains, world-champion spear,
       That from Oechalia's highland leddest then
       This bride that followed swiftly in thy train,
     How fatally overshadowing was thy fear!
     But these wild sorrows all too clearly come
     From Love's dread minister[4], disguised and dumb.
 
 CH. 1.
     Am I a fool, or do I truly hear
     Lament new-rising from our master's home?
     Tell!
 
 CH. 2.
     Clearly from within a wailing voice
     Peals piteously. The house hath some fresh woe.
 
 CH. 3.
     Mark!
     How strangely, with what cloud upon her brow,
     Yon aged matron with her tidings moves!
 
 _Enter_ Nurse.
 
 NURSE. Ah! mighty, O my daughters! was the grief
 Sprung from the gift to Heracles conveyed!
 
 LEADER OF CH. What new thing is befallen? Why speak'st thou so?
 
 NUR. Our Queen hath found her latest journey's end.
 Even now she is gone, without the help of feet.
 
 CH. Not dead?
 
 NUR.          You know the whole.
 
 CH.                               Dead! hapless Queen!
 
 NUR. The truth hath twice been told.
 
 CH.                                  O tell us how!
 What was her death, poor victim of dire woe?
 
 NUR. Most ruthless was the deed.
 
 CH.                              Say, woman, say!
 What was the sudden end?
 
 NUR.                     Herself she slew.
 
 CH. What rage, what madness, clutched
 The mischief-working brand?
 How could her single thought
 Contrive the accomplishment of death on death?
 
 NUR. Chill iron stopped the sources of her breath.
 
 CH. And thou, poor helpless crone, didst see this done?
 
 NUR. Yea, I stood near and saw.
 
 CH.                             How was it? Tell!
 
 NUR. With her own hand this violence was given.
 
 CH. What do I hear?
 
 NUR.                The certainty of truth.
 
 CH. A child is come,
 From this new bridal that hath rushed within,
 A fresh-born Fury of woe!
 
 NUR. Too true. But hadst thou been at hand to see
 Her action, pity would have wrung thy soul.
 
 CH. Could this be ventured by a woman's hand?
 
 NUR. Ay, and in dreadful wise, as thou shalt hear.
 When all alone she had gone within the gate,
 And passing through the court beheld her boy
 Spreading the couch that should receive his sire,
 Ere he returned to meet him,--out of sight
 She hid herself, and fell at the altar's foot,
 And loudly cried that she was left forlorn;
 And, taking in her touch each household thing
 That formerly she used, poor lady, wept
 O'er all; and then went ranging through the rooms,
 Where, if there caught her eye the well-loved form
 Of any of her household, she would gaze
 And weep aloud, accusing her own fate
 And her abandoned lot, childless henceforth!
 When this was ended, suddenly I see her
 Fly to the hero's room of genial rest.
 With unsuspected gaze o'ershadowed near,
 I watched, and saw her casting on the bed
 The finest sheets of all. When that was done,
 She leapt upon the couch where they had lain
 And sat there in the midst. And the hot flood
 Burst from her eyes before she spake:--'Farewell,
 My bridal bed, for never more shalt thou
 Give me the comfort I have known thee give.'
 Then with tight fingers she undid her robe,
 Where the brooch lay before the breast, and bared
 All her left arm and side. I, with what speed
 Strength ministered, ran forth to tell her son
 The act she was preparing. But meanwhile,
 Ere we could come again, the fatal blow
 Fell, and we saw the wound. And he, her boy,
 Seeing, wept aloud. For now the hapless youth
 Knew that himself had done this in his wrath,
 Told all too late i' the house, how she had wrought
 Most innocently, from the Centaur's wit.
 So now the unhappy one, with passionate words
 And cries and wild embracings of the dead,
 Groaned forth that he had slain her with false breath
 Of evil accusation, and was left
 Orphaned of both, his mother and his sire.
   Such is the state within. What fool is he
 That counts one day, or two, or more to come?
 To-morrow is not, till the present day
 In fair prosperity have passed away.                           [_Exit_
 
 CHORUS.
       Which shall come first in my wail,                           I 1
       Which shall be last to prevail,
     Is a doubt that will never be done.
 
       Trouble at home may be seen,                                 I 2
       Trouble is looked for with teen;
     And to have and to look for are one.
 
       Would some fair wind                                        II 1
     But waft me forth to roam
   Far from the native region of my home,
   Ere death me find, oppressed with wild affright
   Even at the sudden sight
   Of him, the valiant son of Zeus most High!
   Before the house, they tell, he fareth nigh,
   A wonder beyond thought,
   With torment unapproachable distraught.
 
   Hark! ...                                                       II 2
   The cause then of my cry
   Was coming all too nigh:
   (Doth the clear nightingale lament for nought?)
   Some step of stranger folk is this way brought.
   As for a friend they love
   Heavy and slow with noiseless feet they move.
   Which way? which way? Ah me! behold him come.
   His pallid lips are dumb.
   Dead, or at rest in sleep? What shall I say?
                      [HERACLES _is brought in on a litter, accompanied
                                            by_ HYLLUS _and an_ Old Man
 
 HYL. Oh, woe is me!
   My father, piteous woe for thee!
   Oh, whither shall I turn my thought! Ah me!
 
 OLD M. Hush! speak not, O my child,
   Lest torment fierce and wild
   Rekindle in thy father's rugged breast,
   And break this rest
   Where now his life is held at point to fall.
   With firm lips clenched refrain thy voice through all.
 
 HYL. Yet tell me, doth he live,
   Old sir?
 
 OLD M. Wake not the slumberer,
   Nor kindle and revive
   The terrible recurrent power of pain,
   My son!
 
 HYL. My foolish words are done,
   But my full heart sinks 'neath the heavy strain.
 
 HERACLES. O Father, who are these?
   What countrymen? Where am I? What far land
   Holds me in pain that ceaseth not? Ah me!
   Again that pest is rending me. Pain, pain!
 
 OLD M. Now thou may'st know
   'Twas better to have lurked in silent shade
   And not thus widely throw
   The slumber from his eyelids and his head.
 
 HYL. I could not brook
   All speechless on his misery to look.
 
 MONODY.
 
 HER. O altar on the Euboean strand,
   High-heaped with offerings from my hand,
   What meed for lavish gifts bestowed
   From thy new sanctuary hath flowed!
   Father of Gods! thy cruel power
   Hath foiled me with an evil blight.
   Ah! would mine eyes had closed in night
   Ere madness in a fatal hour
   Had burst upon them with a blaze,
   No help or soothing once allays!
 
   What hand to heal, what voice to charm,
   Can e'er dispel this hideous harm?
   Whose skill save thine,
   Monarch Divine?
   Mine eyes, if such I saw,
   Would hail him from afar with trembling awe.
   Ah! ah!
   O vex me not, touch me not, leave me to rest,
   To sleep my last sleep on Earth's gentle breast.
   You touch me, you press me, you turn me again,
   You break me, you kill me! O pain! O pain!
   You have kindled the pang that had slumbered still.
   It comes, it hath seized me with tyrannous will!
 
   Where are ye, men, whom over Hellas wide
   This arm hath freed, and o'er the ocean-tide,
   And through rough brakes, from every monstrous thing?
   Yet now in mine affliction none will bring
   A sword to aid, a fire to quell this fire,
   O most unrighteous! nor to my desire
   Will come and quench the hateful life I hold
   With mortal stroke! Ah! is there none so bold?
 
 OLD M. Son of our hero, this hath mounted past
   My feeble force to cope with. Take him thou!
   Fresher thine eye and more the hope thou hast
   Than mine to save him.
 
 HYL.                     I support him now
   Thus with mine arm: but neither fleshly vest
   Nor inmost spirit can I lull to rest
   From torture. None may dream
   To wield this power, save he, the King supreme.
 
 HER. Son!
   Where art thou to lift me and hold me aright?
   It tears me, it kills me, it rushes in might,
   This cruel, devouring, unconquered pain
   Shoots forth to consume me. Again! again!
   O Fate! O Athena!--O son, at my word
   Have pity and slay me with merciful sword!
 
   Pity thy father, boy; with sharp relief
   Smite on my breast, and heal the wrathful grief
   Wherewith thy mother, God-abandoned wife,
   Hath wrought this ruin on her husband's life.
   O may I see her falling, even so
   As she hath thrown me, to like depth of woe!
   Sweet Hades, with swift death,
   Brother of Zeus, release my suffering breath!
 
 CH. Horror hath caught me as I hear this, woe,
 Racking our mighty one with mightier pain.
 
 HER. Many hot toils and hard beyond report,
 With sturdy thews and sinews I have borne,
 But no such labour hath the Thunderer's wife
 Or sour Eurystheus ever given, as this,
 Which Oeneus' daughter of the treacherous eye
 Hath fastened on my back, this amply-woven
 Net of the Furies, that is breaking me.
 For, glued unto my side, it hath devoured
 My flesh to the bone, and lodging in the lungs
 It drains the vital channels, and hath drunk
 The fresh life-blood, and ruins all my frame,
 Foiled in the tangle of a viewless bond.
 Yet me nor War-host, nor Earth's giant brood,
 Nor Centaur's monstrous violence could subdue,
 Nor Hellas, nor the Stranger, nor all lands
 Where I have gone, cleansing the world from harms.
 But a soft woman without manhood's strain
 Alone and weaponless hath conquered me.
 Son, let me know thee mine true-born, nor rate
 Thy mother's claim beyond thy sire's, but bring
 Thyself from out the chambers to my hand
 Her body that hath borne thee, that my heart
 May be assured, if lesser than my pain
 It will distress thee to behold her limbs
 With righteous torment agonized and torn.
 Nay, shrink not, son, but pity me, whom all
 May pity--me, who, like a tender girl,
 Am heard to weep aloud! This none could say
 He knew in me of old; for, murmuring not,
 I went with evil fortune, silent still.
 Now, such a foe hath found the woman in me!
   Ay, but come near; stand by me, and behold
 What cause I have for crying. Look but here!
 Here is the mystery unveiled. O see!
 Ye people, gaze on this poor quivering flesh,
 Look with compassion on my misery!
 Ah me!
 Ah! ah! Again!
 Even now the hot convulsion of disease
 Shoots through my side, and will not let me rest
 From this fierce exercise of wearing woe.
 Take me, O King of Night!
 O sudden thunderstroke.
 Smite me! O sire, transfix me with the dart
 Of thy swift lightning! Yet again that fang
 Is tearing; it hath blossomed forth anew,
 It soars up to the height!
 
                            O breast and back,
 O shrivelling arms and hands, ye are the same
 That crushed the dweller of the Nemean wild,
 The lion unapproachable and rude,
 The oxherd's plague, and Hydra of the lake
 Of Lerna, and the twi-form prancing throng
 Of Centaurs,--insolent, unsociable,
 Lawless, ungovernable:--the tusked pest
 Of Erymanthine glades; then underground
 Pluto's three-headed cur--a perilous fear,
 Born from the monster-worm; and, on the verge
 Of Earth, the dragon, guarding fruits of gold.
 These toils and others countless I have tried,
 And none hath triumphed o'er me. But to-day,
 Jointless and riven to tatters, I am wrecked
 Thus utterly by imperceptible woe;
 I, proudly named Alcmena's child, and His
 Who reigns in highest heaven, the King supreme!
   Ay, but even yet, I tell ye, even from here,
 Where I am nothingness and cannot move,
 She who hath done this deed shall feel my power.
 Let her come near, that, mastered by my might,
 She may have this to tell the world, that, dying,
 As living, I gave punishment to wrong.
 
 CH. O Hellas, how I grieve for thy distress!
 How thou wilt mourn in losing him we see!
 
 HYL. My father, since thy silence gives me leave,
 Still hear me patiently, though in thy pain!
 For my request is just. Lend me thy mind
 Less wrathfully distempered than 'tis now;
 Else thou canst never know, where thou art keen
 With vain resentment and with vain desire
 
 HER. Speak what thou wilt and cease, for I in pain
 Catch not the sense of thy mysterious talk
 
 HYL. I come to tell thee of my mother's case,
 And her involuntary unconscious fault.
 
 HER. Base villain! hast thou breathed thy mother's name,
 Thy father's murderess, in my hearing too!
 
 HYL. Her state requires not silence, but full speech.
 
 HER. Her faults in former time might well be told.
 
 HYL. So might her fault to day, couldst thou but know.
 
 HER. Speak, but beware base words disgrace thee not.
 
 HYL. List! She is dead even now with new-given wound.
 
 HER. By whom? Thy words flash wonder through my woe.
 
 HYL. Her own hand slaughtered her, no foreign stroke.
 
 HER. Wretch! to have reft this office from my hands.
 
 HYL. Even your rash spirit were softened, if you knew.
 
 HER. This bodes some knavery. But declare thy thought!
 
 HYL. She erred with good intent. The whole is said.
 
 HER. Good, O thou villain, to destroy thy sire!
 
 HYL. When she perceived that marriage in her home,
 She erred, supposing to enchain thy love.
 
 HER. Hath Trachis a magician of such might?
 
 HYL. Long since the Centaur Nessus moved her mind
 To work this charm for heightening thy desire.
 
 HER. O horror, thou art here! I am no more.
 My day is darkened, boy! Undone, undone!
 I see our plight too plainly. woe is me!
 Come, O my son! --thou hast no more a father,--
 Call to me all the brethren of thy blood,
 And poor Alcmena, wedded all in vain
 Unto the Highest, that ye may hear me tell
 With my last breath what prophecies I know.
 
 HYL. Thy mother is not here, but by the shore
 Of Tiryns hath obtained a dwelling-place;
 And of thy sons, some she hath with her there,
 And some inhabit Thebe's citadel.
 But we who are with thee, sire, if there be aught
 That may by us be done, will hear, and do.
 
 HER. Then hearken thou unto this task, and show
 If worthily thou art reputed mine.
 Now is time to prove thee. My great father
 Forewarned me long ago that I should die
 By none who lived and breathed, but from the will
 Of one now dwelling in the house of death.
 And so this Centaur, as the voice Divine
 Then prophesied, in death hath slain me living.
 And in agreement with that ancient word
 I now interpret newer oracles
 Which I wrote down on going within the grove
 Of the hill-roving and earth-couching Selli,--
 Dictated to me by the mystic tongue
 Innumerous, of my Father's sacred tree;
 Declaring that my ever instant toils
 Should in the time that new hath being and life
 End and release me. And I look'd for joy.
 But the true meaning plainly was my death.--
 No labour is appointed for the dead.--
 Then, since all argues one event, my son,
 Once more thou must befriend me, and not wait
 For my voice goading thee, but of thyself
 Submit and second my resolve, and know
 Filial obedience for thy noblest rule.
 
 HYL. I will obey thee, father, though my heart
 Sinks heavily in approaching such a theme.
 
 HER. Before aught else, lay thy right hand in mine.
 
 HYL. Why so intent on this assurance, sire?
 
 HER. Give it at once and be not froward, boy.
 
 HYL. There is my hand: I will gainsay thee nought.
 
 HER. Swear by the head of him who gave me life.
 
 HYL. Tell me the oath, and I will utter it.
 
 HER. Swear thou wilt do the thing I bid thee do.
 
 HYL. I swear, and make Zeus witness of my troth.
 
 HER. But if you swerve, pray that the curse may come.
 
 HYL. It will not come for swerving:--but I pray.
 
 HER. Now, dost thou know on Oeta's topmost height
 The crag of Zeus?
 
 HYL.              I know it, and full oft
 Have stood there sacrificing.
 
 HER.                          Then even there,
 With thine own hand uplifting this my body,
 Taking what friends thou wilt, and having lopped
 Much wood from the deep-rooted oak and rough
 Wild olive, lay me on the gathered pile,
 And burn all with the touch of pine-wood flame.
 Let not a tear of mourning dim thine eye;
 But silent, with dry gaze, if thou art mine,
 Perform it. Else my curse awaits thee still
 To weigh thee down when I am lost in night.
 
 HYL. How cruel, O my father, is thy tongue!
 
 HER. 'Tis peremptory. Else, if thou refuse,
 Be called another's and be no more mine.
 
 HYL. Alas that thou shouldst challenge me to this,
 To be thy murderer, guilty of thy blood!
 
 HER. Not I, in sooth: but healer of my pain,
 And sole preserver from a life of woe.
 
 HYL. How can it heal to burn thee on the pyre?
 
 HER. If this act frighten thee, perform the rest.
 
 HYL. Mine arms shall not refuse to carry thee.
 
 HER. And wilt thou gather the appointed wood?
 
 HYL. So my hand fire it not. In all but this,
 Not scanting labour, I will do my part.
 
 HER. Enough. 'Tis well. And having thus much given
 Add one small kindness to a list so full.
 
 HYL. How great soe'er it were, it should be done.
 
 HER. The maid of Eurytus thou knowest, I ween.
 
 HYL. Of Iole thou speak'st, or I mistake.
 
 HER. Of her. This then is all I urge, my son.
 When I am dead, if thou wouldst show thy duty,
 Think of thine oath to me, and, on my word,
 Make her thy wife: nor let another man
 Take her, but only thou; since she hath lain
 So near this heart. Obey me, O my boy!
 And be thyself the maker of this bond.
 To spurn at trifles after great things given,
 Were to confound the meed already won.
 
 HYL. Oh, anger is not right, when men are ill!
 But who could bear to see thee in this mind?
 
 HER. You murmur, as you meant to disobey.
 
 HYL. How can I do it, when my mother's death
 And thy sad state sprang solely from this girl?
 Who, not possessed with furies, could choose this?
 Far better, father, for me too to die,
 Than to live still with my worst enemy.
 
 HER. This youth withdraws his reverence in my death.
 But, if thou yield'st not to thy father's best,
 The curse from Heaven shall dog thy footsteps still.
 
 HYL. Ah! thou wilt tell me that thy pain is come.
 
 HER. Yea, for thou wak'st the torment that had slept.
 
 HYL. Ay me! how cross and doubtful is my way!
 
 HER. Because you will reject your father's word.
 
 HYL. Must I be taught impiety from thee?
 
 HER. It is not impious to content my heart.
 
 HYL. Then you require this with an absolute will?
 
 HER. And bid Heaven witness to my strong command.
 
 HYL. Then I will do it, for the act is thine.
 I will not cast it off. Obeying thee,
 My sire, the Gods will ne'er reprove my deed.
 
 HER. Thou endest fairly. Now, then, O my son,
 Add the performance swiftly, that, before
 Some spasm or furious onset of my pain
 Have seized me, ye may place me on the pyre.
 Come, loiter not, but lift me. Now my end
 Is near, the last cessation of my woe.
 
 HYL. Since thy command is urgent, O my sire!
 We tarry not, but bear thee to the pyre.
 
 HER. Stubborn heart, ere yet again
     Wakes the fierce rebound of pain,
     While the evil holds aloof,
     Thou, with bit of diamond proof,
     Curb thy cry, with forced will
     Seeming to do gladly still!
 
 HYL. Lift him, men, and hate not me
     For the evil deeds ye see,
     Since the Heavens' relentless sway
     Recks not of the righteous way.
     He who gave life and doth claim
     From his seed a Father's name
     Can behold this hour of blame.
     Though the future none can tell,
     Yet the present is not well:
     Sore for him who bears the blow,
     Sad for us who feel his woe,
     Shameful to the Gods, we trow.
 
 CH. Maidens from the palace-hall,
     Come ye forth, too, at our call!
     Mighty deaths beyond belief,
     Many an unknown form of grief,
     Ye have seen to-day; and nought
     But the power of Zeus hath wrought.
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                              PHILOCTETES
 
 
                              THE PERSONS
 
 ODYSSEUS.
 NEOPTOLEMUS.
 CHORUS _of Mariners_.
 PHILOCTETES.
 Messenger, _disguised as a Merchantman_.
 HERACLES, _appearing from the sky_.
 
 
 SCENE. A desert shore of the Island of Lemnos.
 
 
 
 
 It was fated that Troy should be taken by Neoptolemus, the son of
 Achilles, assisted by the bow of Heracles in the hands of Philoctetes.
 
 Now Philoctetes had been rejected by the army because of a trouble in
 his foot, which made his presence with them insufferable; and had been
 cast away by Odysseus on the island of Lemnos.
 
 But when the decree of fate was revealed by prophecy, Odysseus
 undertook to bring Philoctetes back, and took with him Neoptolemus,
 whose ambition could only be gratified through the return of
 Philoctetes with the bow.
 
 Philoctetes was resolutely set against returning, and at the opening
 of the drama Neoptolemus is persuaded by Odysseus to take him with
 guile.
 
 But when Philoctetes appears, the youth's ingenuous nature is so
 wrought upon through pity and remorse, that his sympathy and native
 truthfulness at length overcome his ambition.
 
 When the inward sacrifice is complete, Heracles appears from heaven,
 and by a few words changes the mind of Philoctetes, so that all ends
 well.
 
 
 
 
                              PHILOCTETES
 
 
 ODYSSEUS. NEOPTOLEMUS.
 
 ODYSSEUS. This coast of sea-girt Lemnos, where we stand,
 Is uninhabited, untrodden of men.
 And here, O noble son of noblest sire,
 Achilles-born Neoptolemus, I erewhile,--
 Ordered by those who had command,--cast forth
 Trachinian Philoctetes, Poeas' son,
 His foot dark-dripping with a rankling wound;
 When with wild cries, that frighted holy rest,
 Filling the camp, he troubled every rite,
 That none might handle sacrifice, or pour
 Wine-offering, but his noise disturbed our peace.
   But why these words? No moment this for talk,
 Lest he discern my coming, and I lose
 The scheme, wherewith I think to catch him soon.
 Now most behoves thy service, to explore
 This headland for a cave with double mouth,
 Whose twofold aperture, on wintry days,
 Gives choice of sunshine, and in summer noons
 The breeze wafts slumber through the airy cell.
 Then, something lower down, upon the left,
 Unless 'tis dried, thine eye may note a spring.
 Go near now silently, and make me know
 If still he persevere, and hold this spot,
 Or have roamed elsewhere, that informed of this
 I may proceed with what remains to say,
 And we may act in concert.
 
 NEOPTOLEMUS.               Lord Odysseus,
 Thy foremost errand will not task me far.
 Methinks I see the cave whereof thou speakest.
 
 OD. Where? let me see it. Above there, or below?
 
 NEO. Yonder, above. And yet I hear no tread.
                                   [NEOPTOLEMUS _climbs up to the cave_
 
 OD. Look if he be not lodged in slumber there.
 
 NEO. I find no inmate, but an empty room.
 
 OD. What? no provision for a dwelling-place?
 
 NEO. A bed of leaves for some one harbouring here.
 
 OD. Nought else beneath the roof? Is all forlorn?
 
 NEO. A cup of wood, some untaught craftsman's skill,
 And, close at hand, these embers of a fire.
 
 OD. That store is his. I read the token clear.
 
 NEO. Oh! and these festering rags give evidence,
 Steeped as with dressing some malignant sore.
 
 OD. The man inhabits here: I know it now.
 And sure he's not far off. How can he range,
 Whose limb drags heavy with an ancient harm?
 But he's gone, either to bring forage home,
 Or where he hath found some plant of healing power.
 Send therefore thine attendant to look forth,
 Lest unawares he find me. All our host
 Were not so fair a prize for him as I.
 
 NEO. My man is going, and shall watch the path.
 What more dost thou require of me? Speak on.
 
 OD. Son of Achilles, know that thou art come
 To serve us nobly, not with strength alone,
 But, faithful to thy mission, if so be,
 To do things strange, unwonted to thine ear.
 
 NEO. What dost thou bid me?
 
 OD.                         'Tis thy duty now
 To entrap the mind of Poeas' son with words.
 When he shall ask thee, who and whence thou art,
 Declare thy name and father. 'Tis not that
 I charge thee to conceal. But for thy voyage,
 'Tis homeward, leaving the Achaean host,
 With perfect hatred hating them, because
 They who had drawn thee with strong prayers from home,
 Their hope for taking Troy, allowed thee not
 Thy just demand to have thy father's arms,
 But, e'er thy coming, wrongly gave them o'er
 Unto Odysseus: and thereon launch forth
 With boundless execration against me.
 That will not pain me, but if thou reject
 This counsel, thou wilt trouble all our host,
 Since, if his bow shall not be ta'en, thy life
 Will ne'er be crowned through Troy's discomfiture.
   Now let me show, why thine approach to him
 Is safe and trustful as mine cannot be
 Thou didst sail forth, not to redeem thine oath,
 Nor by constraint, nor with the foremost band.
 All which reproaches I must bear: and he,
 But seeing me, while master of his bow,
 Will slay me, and my ruin will be thine.
 This point then craves our cunning, to acquire
 By subtle means the irresistible bow--
 Thy nature was not framed, I know it well,
 For speaking falsehood, or contriving harm.
 Yet, since the prize of victory is so dear,
 Endure it--We'll be just another day
 But now, for one brief hour, devote thyself
 To serve me without shame, and then for aye
 Hereafter be the pearl of righteousness.
 
 NEO. The thing that, being named, revolts mine ear,
 Son of Laertes, I abhor to do
 'Tis not my nature, no, nor, as they tell,
 My father's, to work aught by craft and guile.
 I'll undertake to bring him in by force,
 Not by deceit. For, sure, with his one foot,
 He cannot be a match for all our crew
 Being sent, my lord, to serve thee, I am loth
 To seem rebellious. But I rather choose
 To offend with honour, than to win by wrong.
 
 OD. Son of a valiant sire, I, too, in youth,
 Had once a slow tongue and an active hand.
 But since I have proved the world, I clearly see
 Words and not deeds give mastery over men.
 
 NEO. What then is thy command? To lie? No more?
 
 OD. To entangle Philoctetes with deceit.
 
 NEO. Why through deceit? May not persuasion fetch him?
 
 OD. Never. And force as certainly will fail.
 
 NEO. What lends him such assurance of defence?
 
 OD. Arrows, the unerring harbingers of Death.
 
 NEO. Then to go near him is a perilous thing.
 
 OD. Unless with subtlety, as I have said.
 
 NEO. And is not lying shameful to thy soul?
 
 OD. Not if by lying I can save my soul.
 
 NEO. How must one look in speaking such a word?
 
 OD. Where gain invites, this shrinking is not good.
 
 NEO. What gain I through his coming back to Troy?
 
 OD. His arms alone have power to take Troy-town.
 
 NEO. Then am not I the spoiler, as ye said?
 
 OD. Thou without them, they without thee, are powerless.
 
 NEO. If it be so, they must be sought and won.
 
 OD. Yea, for in this two prizes will be thine.
 
 NEO. What? When I learn them, I will not refuse.
 
 OD. Wisdom and valour joined in one good name.
 
 NEO. Shame, to the winds! Come, I will do this thing.
 
 OD. Say, dost thou bear my bidding full in mind?
 
 NEO. Doubt not, since once for all I have embraced it.
 
 OD. Thou, then, await him here. I will retire,
 For fear my hated presence should be known,
 And take back our attendant to the ship.
 And then once more, should ye appear to waste
 The time unduly, I will send again
 This same man hither in disguise, transformed
 To the strange semblance of a merchantman;
 From dark suggestion of whose crafty tongue,
 Thou, O my son, shalt gather timely counsel.
   Now to my ship. This charge I leave to thee.
 May secret Hermes guide us to our end,
 And civic Pallas, named of victory,
 The sure protectress of my devious way.
 
 CHORUS (_entering_).
       Strange in the stranger land,                                I 1
       What shall I speak? What hide
       From a heart suspicious of ill?
       Tell me, O master mine!
       Wise above all is the man,
       Peerless in searching thought,
       Who with the Zeus-given wand
       Wieldeth a Heaven-sent power.
       This unto thee, dear son,
       Fraught with ancestral might,
       This to thy life hath come.
       Wherefore I bid thee declare,
       What must I do for thy need?
 
 NEO. Even now methinks thou longest to espy
 Near ocean's marge the place where he doth lie.
 Gaze without fear. But when the traveller stern,
 Who from this roof is parted, shall return,
 Advancing still as I the signal give,
 To serve each moment's mission thou shalt strive.
 
 CH.   That, O my son, from of old                                  I 2
       Hath been my care, to take note
       What by thy beck'ning is told;
       Still thy success to promote.
       But for our errand to-day
       Behoves thee, master, to say
       Where is the hearth of his home;
       Or where even now doth he roam?
       O tell me, lest all unaware
       He spring like a wolf from his lair
       And I by surprise should be ta'en,
       Where doth he move or remain,
       Here lodging, or wandering away?
 
 NEO. Thou seest yon double doorway of his cell,
 Poor habitation of the rock.
 
 CH. 2.                       But tell
 Where is the pain-worn wight himself abroad?
 
 NEO. To me 'tis clear, that, in his quest for food,
 Here, not far off, he trails yon furrowed path.
 For, so 'tis told, this mode the sufferer hath
 Of sustenance, oh hardness! bringing low
 Wild creatures with wing'd arrows from his bow;
 Nor findeth healer for his troublous woe.
 
 CH.     I feel his misery.                                        II 1
         With no companion eye,
         Far from all human care,
         He pines with fell disease;
         Each want he hourly sees
         Awakening new despair.
         How can he bear it still?
         O cruel Heavens! O pain
         Of that afflicted mortal train
         Whose life sharp sorrows fill!
 
         Born in a princely hall,                                  II 2
         Highest, perchance, of all,
         Now lies he comfortless
         Alone in deep distress,
         'Mongst rough and dappled brutes,
         With pangs and hunger worn;
         While from far distance shoots,
         On airy pinion borne,
         The unbridled Echo, still replying
         To his most bitter crying.
 
 NEO. At nought of this I marvel--for if I
 Judge rightly, there assailed him from on high
 That former plague through Chrysa's cruel sting[1]:
 And if to-day he suffer anything
 With none to soothe, it must be from the will
 Of some great God, so caring to fulfil
 The word of prophecy, lest he should bend
 On Troy the shaft no mortal may forfend,
 Before the arrival of Troy's destined hour,
 When she must fall, o'er-mastered by their power.
 
 CH. 1. Hush, my son!                                             III 1
 
 NEO.                 Why so?
 
 CH. 1.                       A sound
 Gendered of some mortal woe,
 Started from the neighbouring ground.
 Here, or there? Ah! now I know.
 Hark! 'tis the voice of one in pain,
 Travelling hardly, the deep strain
 Of human anguish, all too clear,
 That smites my heart, that wounds mine ear.
 
 CH. 2. From far it peals. But thou, my son!                      III 2
 
 NEO. What?
 
 CH. 2.     Think again. He moveth nigh:
 He holds the region: not with tone
 Of piping shepherd's rural minstrelsy,
 But belloweth his far cry,
 Stumbling perchance with mortal pain,
   Or else in wild amaze,
   As he our ship surveys
 Unwonted on the inhospitable main.
 
 _Enter_ PHILOCTETES.
 
 PHILOCTETES. Ho!
 What men are ye that to this desert shore,
 Harbourless, uninhabited, are come
 On shipboard? Of what country or what race
 Shall I pronounce ye? For your outward garb
 Is Grecian, ever dearest to this heart
 That hungers now to hear your voices' tune.
 Ah! do not fear me, do not shrink away
 From my wild looks: but, pitying one so poor,
 Forlorn and desolate in nameless woe,
 Speak, if with friendly purpose ye are come.
 Oh answer! 'Tis not meet that I should lose
 This kindness from your lips, or ye from mine.
 
 NEO. Then know this first, O stranger, as thou wouldest,
 That we are Greeks.
 
 PHI.                O dear, dear name! Ah me!
 In all these years, once, only once, I hear it!
 My son, what fairest gale hath wafted thee?
 What need hath brought thee to the shore? What mission?
 Declare all this, that I may know thee well.
 
 NEO. The sea-girt Scyros is my native home.
 Thitherward I make voyage:--Achilles' son,
 Named Neoptolemus.--I have told thee all.
 
 PHI. Dear is that shore to me, dear is thy father
 O ancient Lycomedes' foster-child,
 Whence cam'st thou hither? How didst thou set forth?
 
 NEO. From Troy we made our course in sailing hither.
 
 PHI. How? Sure thou wast not with us, when at first
 We launched our vessels on the Troyward way?
 
 NEO. Hadst thou a share in that adventurous toil?
 
 PHI. And know'st thou not whom thou behold'st in me,
 Young boy?
 
 NEO.       How should I know him whom I ne'er
 Set eye on?
 
 PHI.        Hast not even heard my name,
 Nor echoing rumour of my ruinous woe?
 
 NEO. Nay, I know nought of all thy questioning.
 
 PHI. How full of griefs am I, how Heaven-abhorred,
 When of my piteous state no faintest sound
 Hath reached my home, or any Grecian land!
 But they, who pitilessly cast me forth,
 Keep silence and are glad, while this my plague
 Blooms ever, and is strengthened more and more.
 Boy, great Achilles' offspring, in this form
 Thou seest the man, of whom, methinks, erewhile
 Thou hast been told, to whom the Herculean bow
 Descended, Philoctetes, Poeas' son;
 Whom the two generals and the Ithacan king
 Cast out thus shamefully forlorn, afflicted
 With the fierce malady and desperate wound
 Made by the cruel basilisk's murderous tooth.
 With this for company they left me, child!
 Exposed upon this shore, deserted, lone.
   From seaward Chrysa came they with their fleet
 And touched at Lemnos. I had fallen to rest
 From the long tossing, in a shadowy cave
 On yonder cliff by the shore. Gladly they saw,
 And left me, having set forth for my need,
 Poor man, some scanty rags, and a thin store
 Of provender. Such food be theirs, I pray!
 Imagine, O my son, when they were gone,
 What wakening, what arising, then was mine;
 What weeping, what lamenting of my woe!
 When I beheld the ships, wherewith I sailed,
 Gone, one and all! and no man in the place,
 None to bestead me, none to comfort me
 In my sore sickness. And where'er I looked,
 Nought but distress was present with me still.
 No lack of that, for one thing!--Ah! my son,
 Time passed, and there I found myself alone
 Within my narrow lodging, forced to serve
 Each pressing need. For body's sustenance
 This bow supplied me with sufficient store,
 Wounding the feathered doves, and when the shaft,
 From the tight string, had struck, myself, ay me!
 Dragging this foot, would crawl to my swift prey.
 Then water must be fetched, and in sharp frost
 Wood must be found and broken,--all by me.
 Nor would fire come unbidden, but with flint
 From flints striking dim sparks, I hammered forth
 The struggling flame that keeps the life in me.
 For houseroom with the single help of fire
 Gives all I need, save healing for my sore.
   Now learn, my son, the nature of this isle.
 No mariner puts in here willingly.
 For it hath neither moorage, nor sea-port,
 For traffic or kind shelter or good cheer.
 Not hitherward do prudent men make voyage.
 Perchance one may have touched against his will.
 Many strange things may happen in long time.
 These, when they come, in words have pitied me,
 And given me food, or raiment, in compassion.
 But none is willing, when I speak thereof,
 To take me safely home. Wherefore I pine
 Now this tenth year, in famine and distress,
 Feeding the hunger of my ravenous plague.
   Such deeds, my son, the Atridae, and the might
 Of sage Odysseus, have performed on me.
 Wherefore may all the Olympian gods, one day,
 Plague them with stern requital for my wrong!
 
 CH. Methinks my feeling for thee, Poeas' child,
 Is like that of thy former visitants.
 
 NEO. I, too, a witness to confirm his words,
 Know them for verities, since I have found
 The Atridae and Odysseus evil men.
 
 PHI. Art thou, too, wroth with the all-pestilent sons
 Of Atreus? Have they given thee cause to grieve?
 
 NEO. Would that my hand might ease the wrath I feel!
 Then Sparta and Mycenae should be ware
 That Scyros too breeds valiant sons for war.
 
 PHI. Brave youth! I love thee. Tell me the great cause
 Why thou inveighest against them with such heat?
 
 NEO. O son of Poeas, hardly shall I tell
 What outrage I endured when I had come;
 Yet I will speak it. When the fate of death
 O'ertook Achilles--
 
 PHI.                Out, alas! no more!
 Hold, till thou first hast made me clearly know,
 Is Peleus' offspring dead?
 
 NEO.                       Alas! he is,
 Slain by no mortal, felled by Phoebus' shaft:
 So men reported--
 
 PHI.              Well, right princely was he!
 And princely is he who slew him. Shall I mourn
 Him first, or wait till I have heard thy tale?
 
 NEO. Methinks thou hast thyself enough to mourn,
 Without the burden of another's woe.
 
 PHI. Well spoken. Then renew thine own complaint,
 And tell once more wherein they insulted thee.
 
 NEO. There came to fetch me, in a gallant ship,
 Odysseus and the fosterer of my sire[2],
 Saying, whether soothly, or in idle show,
 That, since my father perished, it was known
 None else but I should take Troy's citadel.
 Such words from them, my friend, thou may'st believe,
 Held me not long from making voyage with speed,
 Chiefly through longing for my father's corse,
 To see him yet unburied,--for I ne'er
 Had seen him[3]. Then, besides, 'twas a fair cause,
 If, by my going, I should vanquish Troy.
 One day I had sailed, and on the second came
 To sad Sigeum with wind-favoured speed,
 When straightway all the host, surrounding me
 As I set foot on shore, saluted me,
 And swore the dead Achilles was in life,
 Their eyes being witness, when they looked on me.
 He lay there in his shroud: but I, unhappy,
 Soon ending lamentation for the dead,
 Went near to those Atridae, as to friends,
 To obtain my father's armour and all else
 That had been his. And then,--alas the while,
 That men should be so hard!--they spake this word:
 'Seed of Achilles, thou may'st freely take
 All else thy father owned, but for those arms,
 Another wields them now, Laertes' son.'
 Tears rushed into mine eyes, and in hot wrath
 I straightway rose, and bitterly outspake:
 'O miscreant! What? And have ye dared to give
 Mine arms to some man else, unknown to me?'
 Then said Odysseus, for he chanced to be near,
 'Yea, child, and justly have they given me these.
 I saved them and their master in the field.'
 Then in fierce anger all at once I launched
 All terms of execration at his head,
 Bating no word, being maddened by the thought
 That I should lose this heirloom,--and to him!
 He, at this pass, though not of wrathful mood,
 Stung by such utterance, made rejoinder thus:
 'Thou wast not with us here, but wrongfully
 Didst bide afar. And, since thou mak'st so bold,
 I tell thee, never shalt thou, as thou sayest,
 Sail with these arms to Scyros.'--Thus reviled,
 With such an evil echo in mine ear,
 I voyage homeward, robbed of mine own right
 By that vile offset of an evil tree[4].
 Yet less I blame him than the men in power.
 For every multitude, be it army or state,
 Takes tone from those who rule it, and all taint
 Of disobedience from bad counsel springs.
 I have spoken. May the Atridae's enemy
 Be dear to Heaven, as he is loved by me!
 
 CH.   Mother of mightiest Zeus,                                      1
             Feeder of all that live,
             Who from thy mountainous breast
             Rivers of gold dost give!
       To thee, O Earth, I cried that shameful day,
       When insolence from Atreus' sons went forth
       Full on our lord: when they bestowed away
       His father's arms to crown Odysseus' worth;
       Thou, whom bull-slaughtering lions yoked bear,
             O mighty mother, hear!
 
 PHI. Your coming is commended by a grief
 That makes you kindly welcome. For I feel
 A chord that vibrates to your voice, and tells,
 Thus have Odysseus and the Atridae wrought.
 Full well I know, Odysseus' poisoned tongue
 Shrinks from no mischief nor no guileful word
 That leads to bad achievement in the end.
 This moves not my main marvel, but if one
 Saw this and bore it,--Aias of the shield.
 
 NEO. Ah, friend, he was no more. Had he but lived,
 This robbery had ne'er been wrought on me.
 
 PHI. What? Is he too departed?
 
 NEO.                           He is dead.
 The light no more beholds him.
 
 PHI.                           Oh! alas!
 But Tydeus' offspring, and the rascal birth
 Laertes bought of Sisyphus, they live:
 I know it. For their death were to be wished.
 
 NEO. Yea, be assured, they live and flourish high
 Exalted in the host of Argive men.
 
 PHI. And Nestor, my old friend, good aged man,
 Is he yet living? Oft he would prevent
 Their evils, by the wisdom of his thought.
 
 NEO. He too is now in trouble, having lost
 Antilochus, the comfort of his age.
 
 PHI. There, there! In one brief word thou hast revealed
 The mournful case of twain, whom I would last
 Have chosen to hear of as undone. Ah me!
 Where must one look? when these are dead, and he,
 Odysseus, lives,--and in a time like this,
 That craves their presence, and his death for theirs.
 
 NEO. He wrestles cleverly; but, O my friend,
 Even ablest wits are ofttimes snared at last.
 
 PHI. Tell me, I pray, what was become of him,
 Patroclus, whom thy father loved so well?
 
 NEO. He, too, was gone. I'll teach thee in a word
 One truth for all. War doth not willingly
 Snatch off the wicked, but still takes the good.
 
 PHI. True! and to prove thy saying, I will inquire
 The fate of a poor dastard, of mean worth,
 But ever shrewd and nimble with his tongue.
 
 NEO. Whom but Odysseus canst thou mean by this?
 
 PHI. I meant not him. But there was one Thersites,
 Who ne'er made conscience to stint speech, where all
 Cried 'Silence!' Is he living, dost thou know?
 
 NEO. I saw him not, but knew he was alive.
 
 PHI. He must be: for no evil yet was crushed.
 The Heavens will ever shield it. 'Tis their sport
 To turn back all things rancorous and malign
 From going down to the grave, and send instead
 The good and true. Oh, how shall we commend
 Such dealings, how defend them? When I praise
 Things god-like, I find evil in the Gods.
 
 NEO. I, O thou child of a Trachinian sire,
 Henceforth will take good care, from far away
 To look on Troy and Atreus' children twain.
 Yea, where the trickster lords it o'er the just,
 And goodness languishes and rascals rule,
 --Such courses I will nevermore endure.
 But rock-bound Scyros henceforth shall suffice
 To yield me full contentment in my home.
 Now, to my vessel! And thou, Poeas' child,
 Farewell, right heartily farewell! May Heaven
 Grant thy desire, and rid thee of thy plague!
 Let us be going, that when God shall give
 Fair voyage, that moment we may launch away.
 
 PHI. My son, are ye now setting forth?
 
 NEO.                                   Our time
 Bids us go near and look to sail erelong.
 
 PHI. Now, by thy father, by thy mother,--nay,
 By all thy love e'er cherished in thy home,
 Suppliant I beg thee, leave me not thus lone,
 Forlorn in all my misery which thou seest,
 In all thou hast heard of here surrounding me!
 Stow me with other freightage. Full of care,
 I know, and burdensome the charge may prove.
 Yet venture! Surely to the noble mind
 All shame is hateful and all kindness blest.
 And shame would be thy meed, didst thou fail here
 But, doing this, thou shalt have glorious fame,
 When I return alive to Oeta's vale.
 Come, 'tis the labour not of one whole day.
 So thou durst take me, fling me where thou wilt
 O' the ship, in hold, prow, stern, or wheresoe'er
 I least may trouble those on board with me.
 Ah! by great Zeus, the suppliant's friend, comply,
 My son, be softened! See, where I am fall'n
 Thus on my knees before thee, though so weak,
 Crippled and powerless. Ah! forsake me not
 Thus far from human footstep. Take me, take me!
 If only to thy home, or to the town
 Of old Chalcodon[5] in Euboea.--From thence
 I have not far to Oeta, and the ridge
 Of Trachis, and Spercheius' lordly flood.
 So thou shalt bless my father with my sight.
 And yet long since I fear he may be gone.
 For oft I sent him suppliant prayers by men
 Who touched this isle, entreating him to fetch
 And bear me safely home with his own crew.
 But either he is dead, or else, methinks,
 It well may be, my messengers made light
 Of my concerns, and hastened onward home.
 But now in thee I find both messenger
 And convoy, thou wilt pity me and save.
 For, well thou knowest, danger never sleeps,
 And fear of dark reverse is always nigh.
 Mortals, when free, should look where mischief lurks,
 And in their happiest hour consider well
 Their life, lest ruin unsuspected come.
 
 CH. Pity him, O my king!                                             2
           Many a crushing woe
           He telleth, such as I pray
           None of my friends may know.
     And if, dear master, thou mislikest sore
     Yon cruel-hearted lordly pair, I would,
     Turning their plan of evil to his good,
     On swift ship bear him to his native shore,
     Meeting his heart's desire; and free thy path
           From fear of heavenly wrath.
 
 NEO. Thou mak'st small scruple here; but be advised:
 Lest, when this plague on board shall weary thee,
 Thy voice should alter from this liberal tone.
 
 CH. No, truly! Fear not thou shalt ever have
 Just cause to utter such reproach on me.
 
 NEO. Then sure 'twere shame, should I more backward prove
 Than thou, to labour for the stranger's need.
 Come, if thou wilt, let us make voyage, and he,
 Let him set forth with speed. Our ship shall take him.
 He shall not be refused. Only may Heaven
 Lead safely hence and to our destined port!
 
 PHI. O morning full of brightness! Kindest friend,
 Sweet mariners, how can I make you feel,
 In act, how dearly from my heart I love you!
 Ye have won my soul. Let us be gone, my son,--
 First having said farewell to this poor cave,
 My homeless dwelling-place, that thou may'st know,
 How barely I have lived, how firm my heart!
 Methinks another could not have endured
 The very sight of what I bore. But I
 Through strong necessity have conquered pain.
 
 CH. Stay: let us understand. There come two men
 A stranger, with a shipmate of thy crew.
 When ye have heard them, ye may then go in.
 
 _Enter_ Messenger, _disguised as a merchantman_.
 
 MERCHANTMAN. Son of Achilles, my companion here,
 Who with two more remained to guard thy ship,
 Agreed to help me find thee where thou wert,
 Since unexpectedly, through fortune's will,
 I meet thee, mooring by the self-same shore.
 For like a merchantman, with no great sail,
 Making my course from Ilion to my home,
 Grape-clustered Peparethos, when I heard
 The mariners declare that one and all
 Were of thy crew, I would not launch again,
 Without a word, till we had told our news.--
 Methinks thou knowest nought of thine own case,
 What new devices of the Argive chiefs
 Surround thee; nor devices only now,
 But active deeds, no longer unperformed.
 
 NEO. Well, stranger, for the kindness thou hast shown,--
 Else were I base,--my heart must thank thee still.
 But tell me what thou meanest, that I may learn
 What new-laid plot thou bring'st me from the camp.
 
 MER. Old Phoenix, Acamas and Demophon
 Are gone in thy pursuit with ships and men.
 
 NEO. To bring me back with reasons or perforce?
 
 MER. I know not. What I heard, I am here to tell.
 
 NEO. How? And is this in act? Are they set forth
 To please the Atridae, Phoenix and the rest?
 
 MER. The thing is not to do, but doing now.
 
 NEO. What kept Odysseus back, if this be so,
 From going himself? Had he some cause for fear?
 
 MER. He and the son of Tydeus, when our ship
 Hoist sail, were gone to fetch another man.
 
 NEO. For whom could he himself be sailing forth?
 
 MER. For some one,--but first tell me, whispering low
 Whate'er thou speakest,--who is this I see?
 
 NEO. (_speaking aloud_).
 This, sir, is Philoctetes the renowned.
 
 MER. (_aside to_ NEOPTOLEMUS).
 Without more question, snatch thyself away
 And sail forth from this land.
 
 PHI.                           What saith he, boy?
 Through what dark traffic is the mariner
 Betraying me with whispering in thine ear?
 
 NEO. I have not caught it, but whate'er he speaks
 He must speak openly to us and thee.
 
 MER. Seed of Achilles, let me not offend
 The army by my words! Full many a boon,
 Being poor, I reap from them for service done.
 
 NEO. The Atridae are my foes; the man you see
 Is my fast friend, because he hates them sore.
 Then, if you come in kindness, you must hide
 Nothing from him or me of all thou hast heard.
 
 MER. Look what thou doest, my son!
 
 NEO.                               I mark it well.
 
 MER. Thou shalt be answerable.
 
 NEO.                           Content: but speak.
 
 MER. Then hear me. These two men whom I have named,
 Diomedes and Odysseus, are set forth
 Engaged on oath to bring this man by force
 If reasons fail. The Achaeans every one
 Have heard this plainly from Odysseus' mouth.
 He was the louder and more confident.
 
 NEO. Say, for what cause, after so long a time,
 Can Atreus' sons have turned their thoughts on him,
 Whom long they had cast forth? What passing touch
 Of conscience moved them, or what stroke from Heaven,
 Whose wrath requites all wicked deeds of men?
 
 MER. Methinks thou hast not heard what I will now
 Unfold to thee. There was a princely seer,
 A son of Priam, Helenus by name,
 Whom he for whom no word is bad enough,
 Crafty Odysseus, sallying forth alone
 One night, had taken, and in bonds displayed
 'Fore all the Achaeans, a right noble prey.
 He, 'mid his other prophecies, foretold
 No Grecian force should sack Troy's citadel,
 Till with fair reasons they had brought this man
 From Lemnos isle, his lonely dwelling-place.
   When thus the prophet spake, Laertes' son
 Straight undertook to fetch this man, and show him
 To all the camp:--he hoped, with fair consent:
 But else, perforce.--And, if he failed in this,
 Whoever would might smite him on the head.
   My tale is told, dear youth. I counsel speed
 To thee and to the friend for whom thou carest.
 
 PHI. Ah me, unhappy! has that rascal knave
 Sworn to fetch me with reasons to their camp?
 As likely might his reasons bring me back,
 Like his begetter, from the house of death.
 
 MER. You talk of what I know not. I will go
 Shipward. May God be with you for all good.                    [_Exit_
 
 PHI. Is not this terrible, Laertes' son
 Should ever think to bring me with soft words
 And show me from his deck to all their host?
 No! Sooner will I listen to the tongue
 Of the curs'd basilisk that thus hath maim'd me.
   Ay, but he'll venture anything in word
 Or deed. And now I know he will be here.
 Come, O my son, let us be gone, while seas
 And winds divide us from Odysseus' ship.
 Let us depart. Sure timely haste brings rest
 And quiet slumber when the toil is done.
 
 NEO. Shall we not sail when this south-western wind
 Hath fallen, that now is adverse to our course?
 
 PHI. All winds are fair to him who flies from woe.
 
 NEO. Nay, but this head-wind hinders them no less.
 
 PHI. No head-wind hinders pirates on their way,
 When violence and rapine lead them on.
 
 NEO. Well, then, let us be going, if you will;
 When you have taken from within the cave
 What most you need and value.
 
 PHI.                          Though my all
 Be little, there is that I may not lose.
 
 NEO. What can there be that we have not on board?
 
 PHI. A leaf I have found, wherewith I still the rage
 Of my sore plague, and lull it quite to rest.
 
 NEO. Well, bring it forth.--What? Is there something more?
 
 PHI. If any of these arrows here are fallen,
 I would not leave them for a casual prey.
 
 NEO. How? Do I see thee with the marvellous bow?
 
 PHI. Here in my hand. The world hath only one.
 
 NEO. And may one touch and handle it, and gaze
 With reverence, as on a thing from Heaven?
 
 PHI. Thou mayest, my son. This and whate'er of mine
 May stead thee, 'tis thy privilege to enjoy.
 
 NEO. In very truth I long for it, but so,
 That longing waits on leave. Am I permitted?
 
 PHI. Thou art, my son,--and well thou speakest,--thou art.
 Thou, that hast given me light and life, the joy
 Of seeing Mount Oeta and my father's home,
 With all I love there, and his aged head,--
 Thou that hast raised me far above my foes
 Who triumphed! Thou may'st take it in thine hand,
 And,--when thou hast given it back to me,--may'st vaunt
 Alone of mortals for thine excellence
 To have held this in thy touch. I, too, at first,
 Received it as a boon for kindness done.
 
 NEO. Well, go within.
 
 PHI.                  Nay, I must take thee too.
 My sickness craves thee for its comforter.
                                [PHILOCTETES _and_ NEOPTOLEMUS _go into
                                                              the cave_
 
 CHORUS.
     In fable I have heard,                                         I 1
     Though sight hath ne'er confirmed the word,
     How he who attempted once the couch supreme,
     To a whirling wheel by Zeus the all-ruler bound,
     Tied head and heel, careering ever round,
     Atones his impious unsubstantial dream.
     Of no man else, through eye or ear,
     Have I discerned a fate more full of fear
     Than yonder sufferer's of the cureless wound:
     Who did no violence, defrauded none:--
     A just man, had he dwelt among the just
     Unworthily behold him thrust
     Alone to hear the billows roar
     That break around a rugged shore!
 How could he live, whose life was thus consumed with moan?
 
     Where neighbour there was none:                                I 2
     No arm to stay him wandering lone,
     Unevenly, with stumbling steps and sore;
     No friend in need, no kind inhabitant,
     To minister to his importunate want,
     No heart whereto his pangs he might deplore.
     None who, whene'er the gory flow
     Was rushing hot, might healing herbs bestow,
     Or cull from teeming Earth some genial plant
     To allay the anguish of malignant pain
     And soothe the sharpness of his poignant woe.
     Like infant whom the nurse lets go,
     With tottering movement here and there,
     He crawled for comfort, whensoe'er
 His soul-devouring plague relaxed its cruel strain.
 
   Not fed with foison of all-teeming Earth                        II 1
   Whence we sustain us, ever-toiling men,
   But only now and then
 With winged things, by his wing'd shafts brought low,
   He stayed his hunger from his bow.
   Poor soul, that never through ten years of dearth
   Had pleasure from the fruitage of the vine,
   But seeking to some standing pool,
             Nor clear nor cool,
 Foul water heaved to head for lack of heartening wine.
 
   But now, consorted with the hero's child,                       II 2
   He winneth greatness and a joyful change;
   Over the water wild
 Borne by a friendly bark beneath the range
   Of Oeta, where Spercheius fills
   Wide channels winding among lovely hills
   Haunted of Melian nymphs, till he espies
   The roof-tree of his father's hall,
             And high o'er all
 Shines the bronze shield of him, whose home is in the skies[6].
                          [NEOPTOLEMUS _comes out of the cave, followed
                                              by_ PHILOCTETES _in pain_
 
 NEO. Prithee, come on! Why dost thou stand aghast,
 Voiceless, and thus astonied in thine air?
 
 PHI. Oh! oh!
 
 NEO.         What?
 
 PHI.               Nothing. Come my son, fear nought.
 
 NEO. Is pain upon thee? Hath thy trouble come?
 
 PHI. No pain, no pain! 'Tis past; I am easy now.
 Ye heavenly powers!
 
 NEO.                Why dost thou groan aloud,
 And cry to Heaven?
 
 PHI.               To come and save. Kind Heaven!
 Oh, oh!
 
 NEO.    What is 't? Why silent? Wilt not speak?
 I see thy misery.
 
 PHI.              Oh! I am lost, my son!
 I cannot hide it from you. Oh! it shoots,
 It pierces. Oh unhappy! Oh! my woe!
 I am lost, my son, I am devoured. Oh me!
 Oh! Oh! Oh! Oh! Pain! pain! Oh pain! oh pain!
 Child, if a sword be to thine hand, smite hard,
 Shear off my foot! heed not my life! Quick, come!
 
 NEO. What hath so suddenly arisen, that thus
 Thou mak'st ado and groanest o'er thyself?
 
 PHI. Thou knowest.
 
 NEO.               What know I?
 
 PHI.                            O! thou knowest, my son!
 
 NEO. I know not.
 
 PHI.             How? Not know? Ah me! Pain, pain!
 
 NEO. Thy plague is a sore burden, heavy and sore.
 
 PHI. Sore? 'Tis unutterable. Have pity on me!
 
 NEO. What shall I do?
 
 PHI.                  Do not in fear forsake me.
 This wandering evil comes in force again,
 Hungry as ere it fed.
 
 NEO.                  O hapless one!
 Thrice hapless in thy manifold distress!
 What wilt thou? Shall I raise thee on mine arm?
 
 PHI. Nay, but receiving from my hand the bow,
 As late thou didst desire me, keep it safe
 And guard it, till the fury of my pain
 Pass over me and cease. For when 'tis spent,
 Slumber will seize me, else it ne'er would end.
 I must sleep undisturbed. But if meanwhile
 They come,--by Heaven I charge thee, in no wise,
 Willingly nor perforce, let them have this!
 Else thou wilt be the slayer of us both;
 Of me thy suppliant, and of thyself.
 
 NEO. Fear not my care. No hand shall hold these arms
 But thine and mine. Give, and Heaven bless the deed!
 
 PHI. I give them; there, my son! But look to Heaven
 And pray no envy smite thee, nor such bane
 In having them, as fell on me and him
 Who bore them formerly.
 
 NEO.                    O grant it, Gods!
 And grant us fair and happy voyage, where'er
 Our course is shaped and righteous Heaven shall guide.
 
 PHI. Ah! but I fear, my son, thy prayer is vain:
 For welling yet again from depths within,
 This gory ooze is dripping. It will come!
 I know it will. O, foot, torn helpless thing,
 What wilt thou do to me? Ah! ah! It comes,
 It is at hand. 'Tis here! Woe's me, undone!
 I have shown you all. Stay near me. Go not far:
 Ah! ah!
 O island king, I would this agony
 Might cleave thy bosom through and through! Woe, woe!
 Woe! Ah! ye two commanders of the host,
 Agamemnon, Menelaues, O that ye,
 Another ten years' durance in my room
 Might nurse this malady! O Death, Death, Death!
 I call thee daily--wilt thou never come?
 Will it not be?--My son, thou noble boy,
 If thou art noble, take and burn me there
 Aloft in yon all-worshipped Lemnian fire!
 Yea, when the bow thou keep'st was my reward,
 I did like service for the child of Heaven.
 How now, my son?
 What say'st? Art silent? Where--where art thou, boy?
 
 NEO. My heart is full, and groaning o'er thy woes.
 
 PHI. Nay, yet have comfort. This affliction oft
 Goes no less swiftly than it came. I pray thee,
 Stand fast and leave me not alone!
 
 NEO.                               Fear nought.
 We will not stir.
 
 PHI.              Wilt thou remain?
 
 NEO.                                Be sure of it.
 
 PHI. I'll not degrade thee with an oath, my son.
 
 NEO. Rest satisfied. I may not go without thee.
 
 PHI. Thy hand, to pledge me that!
 
 NEO.                              There, I will stay.
 
 PHI. Now, now, aloft!
 
 NEO.                  Where mean'st thou?
 
 PHI.                                      Yonder aloft!
 
 NEO. Whither? Thou rav'st. Why starest thou at the sky?
 
 PHI. Now, let me go.
 
 NEO.                 Where?
 
 PHI.                        Let me go, I say!
 
 NEO. I will not.
 
 PHI.             You will kill me. Let me go!
 
 NEO. Well, thou know'st best I hold thee not.
 
 PHI.                                          O Earth,
 I die. receive me to thy breast! This pain
 Subdues me utterly, I cannot stand.
 
 NEO. Methinks he will be fast in slumber soon
 That head sinks backward, and a clammy sweat
 Bathes all his limbs, while from his foot hath burst
 A vein, dark bleeding. Let us leave him, friends,
 In quietness, till he hath fallen to sleep.
 
 CHORUS
     Lord of the happiest life,                                       I
     Sleep, thou that know'st not strife,
         That know'st not grief,
     Still wafting sure relief,
         Come, saviour now!
     Thy healing balm is spread
     Over this pain worn head,
 Quench not the beam that gives calm to his brow.
 
     Look, O my lord, to thy path,
     Either to go or to stay
     How is my thought to proceed?
     What is our cause for delay?
     Look! Opportunity's power,
     Fitting the task to the hour,
     Giveth the race to the swift.
 
 NEO. He hears not. But I see that to have ta'en
 His bow without him were a bootless gain
 He must sail with us. So the god hath said
 Heaven hath decreed this garland for his head:
 And to have failed with falsehood were a meed
 Of shameful soilure for a shameless deed.
 
 CH. God shall determine the end--                                   II
     But for thine answer, friend,
         Waft soft words low!
     All sick men's sleep, we know,
         Hath open eye;
     Their quickly ruffling mind
     Quivers in lightest wind,
 Sleepless in slumber new danger to spy.
 
     Think, O my lord, of thy path,
     Secretly look forth afar,
     What wilt thou do for thy need?
     How with the wise wilt thou care?
     If toward the nameless thy heart
     Chooseth this merciful part,
     Huge are the dangers that drift.
 
 The wind is fair, my son, the wind is fair,
 The man is dark and helpless, stretched in night.
 (O kind, warm sleep that calmest human care!)
 Powerless of hand and foot and ear and sight,
 Blind, as one lying in the house of death.
 (Think well if here thou utterest timely breath.)
 This, O my son, is all my thought can find,
 Best are the toils that without frightening bind.
 
 NEO. Hush! One word more were madness. He revives.
 His eye hath motion. He uplifts his head.
 
 PHI. Fair daylight following sleep, and ye, dear friends,
 Faithful beyond all hope in tending me!
 I never could have dreamed that thou, dear youth,
 Couldst thus have borne my sufferings and stood near
 So full of pity to relieve my pain.
 Not so the worthy generals of the host;--
 This princely patience was not theirs to show.
 Only thy noble nature, nobly sprung,
 Made light of all the trouble, though oppressed
 With fetid odours and unceasing cries.
 And now, since this my plague would seem to yield
 Some pause and brief forgetfulness of pain,
 With thine own hand, my son, upraise me here,
 And set me on my feet, that, when my strength
 After exhaustion shall return again,
 We may move shoreward and launch forth with speed.
 
 NEO. I feel unhoped-for gladness when I see
 Thy painless gaze, and hear thy living breath,
 For thine appearance and surroundings both
 Were deathlike. But arise! Or, if thou wilt,
 These men shall raise thee. For they will not shrink
 From toil which thou and I at once enjoin.
 
 PHI. Right, right, my son! But lift me thine own self,
 As I am sure thou meanest. Let these be,
 Lest they be burdened with the noisome smell
 Before the time. Enough for them to bear
 The trouble on board.
 
 NEO.                  I will; stand up, endure!
 
 PHI. Fear not. Old habit will enable me.
 
 NEO. O me!
 What shall I do? Now 'tis my turn to exclaim!
 
 PHI. What canst thou mean? What change is here, my son?
 
 NEO. I know not how to shift the troublous word.
 'Tis hopeless.
 
 PHI.           What is hopeless? Speak not so,
 Dear child!
 
 NEO.        But so my wretched lot hath fallen.
 
 PHI. Ah! Can it be, the offence of my disease
 Hath moved thee not to take me now on board?
 
 NEO. All is offence to one who hath forced himself
 From the true bent to an unbecoming deed.
 
 PHI. Nought misbecoming to thyself or sire
 Doest thou or speak'st, befriending a good man.
 
 NEO. My baseness will appear. That wrings my soul.
 
 PHI. Not in thy deeds. But for thy words, I fear me!
 
 NEO. O Heaven! Must double vileness then be mine
 Both shameful silence and most shameful speech?
 
 PHI. Or my discernment is at fault, or thou
 Mean'st to betray me and make voyage without me.
 
 NEO. Nay, not without thee, there is my distress!
 Lest I convey thee to thy bitter grief.
 
 PHI. How? How, dear youth? I do not understand.
 
 NEO. Here I unveil it. Thou art to sail to Troy,
 To join the chieftains and the Achaean host.
 
 PHI. What do I hear? Ah!
 
 NEO.                     Grieve not till you learn.
 
 PHI. Learn what? What wilt thou make of me? What mean'st thou?
 
 NEO. First to release thee from this plague, and then
 With thee to go and take the realm of Troy.
 
 PHI. And is this thine intent?
 
 NEO.                           'Tis so ordained
 Unchangeably. Be not dismayed! 'Tis so.
 
 PHI. Me miserable! I am betrayed, undone!
 What guile is here? My bow! give back my bow!
 
 NEO. I may not. Interest, and duty too,
 Force me to obey commandment.
 
 PHI.                          O thou fire,
 Thou terror of the world! Dark instrument
 Of ever-hateful guile!--What hast thou done?
 How thou hast cheated me! Art not ashamed
 To look on him that sued to thee for shelter?
 O heart of stone, thou hast stolen my life away
 With yonder bow!--Ah, yet I beg of thee,
 Give it me back, my son, I entreat thee, give!
 By all thy father worshipped, rob me not
 Of life!--Ah me! Now he will speak no more,
 But turns away, obdurate to retain it.
 O ye, my comrades in this wilderness,
 Rude creatures of the rocks, O promontories,
 Creeks, precipices of the hills, to you
 And your familiar presence I complain
 Of this foul trespass of Achilles' son.
 Sworn to convey me home, to Troy he bears me.
 And under pledge of his right hand hath ta'en
 And holds from me perforce my wondrous bow,
 The sacred gift of Zeus-born Heracles,
 Thinking to wave it midst the Achaean host
 Triumphantly for his. In conquering me
 He vaunts as of some valorous feat, and knows not
 He is spoiling a mere corse, an empty dream,
 The shadow of a vapour. In my strength
 He ne'er had vanquished me. Even as I am,
 He could not, but by guile. Now, all forlorn,
 I am abused, deceived. What must I do?
 Nay, give it me. Nay, yet be thy true self!
 Thou art silent. I am lost. O misery!
 Rude face of rock, back I return to thee
 And thy twin gateway, robbed of arms and food,
 To wither in thy cave companionless:--
 No more with these mine arrows to destroy
 Or flying bird or mountain-roving beast.
 But, all unhappy! I myself must be
 The feast of those on whom I fed, the chase
 Of that I hunted, and shall dearly pay
 In bloody quittance for their death, through one
 Who seemed all ignorant of sinful guile.
 Perish,--not till I am certain if thy heart
 Will change once more,--if not, my curse on thee!
 
 CH. What shall we do, my lord? We wait thy word
 Or to sail now, or yield to his desire.
 
 NEO. My heart is pressed with a strange pity for him,
 Not now beginning, but long since begun.
 
 PHI. Ay, pity me, my son! by all above,
 Make not thy name a scorn by wronging me!
 
 NEO. O! I am troubled sore. What must I do?
 Would I had never left mine island home!
 
 PHI. Thou art not base, but seemest to have learnt
 Some baseness from base men. Now, as 'tis meet,
 Be better guided--leave me mine arms, and go.
 
 NEO. (_to Chorus_).
 What shall we do?
 
 _Enter_ ODYSSEUS.
 
 ODYSSEUS.         What art thou doing, knave?
 Give me that bow, and haste thee back again.
 
 PHI. Alas! What do I hear? Odysseus' voice?
 
 OD. Be sure of that, Odysseus, whom thou seest.
 
 PHI. Oh, I am bought and sold, undone! 'Twas he
 That kidnapped me, and robbed me of my bow.
 
 OD. Yea. I deny it not. Be sure, 'twas I.
 
 PHI. Give back, my son, the bow; release it!
 
 OD.                                          That,
 Though he desire it, he shall never do.
 Thou too shalt march along, or these shall force thee.
 
 PHI. They force me! O thou boldest of bad men!
 They force me?
 
 OD.            If thou com'st not willingly.
 
 PHI. O Lemnian earth and thou almighty flame,
 Hephaestos' workmanship, shall this be borne,
 That he by force must drag me from your care?
 
 OD. 'Tis Zeus, I tell thee, monarch of this isle,
 Who thus hath willed. I am his minister.
 
 PHI. Wretch, what vile words thy wit hath power to say!
 The gods are liars when invoked by thee.
 
 OD. Nay, 'tis their truth compels thee to this voyage.
 
 PHI. I will not have it so.
 
 OD.                         I will. Thou shalt.
 
 PHI. Woe for my wretchedness! My father, then,
 Begat no freeman, but a slave in me.
 
 OD. Nay, but the peer of noblest men, with whom
 Thou art to take and ravage Troy with might.
 
 PHI. Never,--though I must suffer direst woe,--
 While this steep Lemnian ground is mine to tread!
 
 OD. What now is thine intent?
 
 PHI.                          Down from the crag
 This head shall plunge and stain the crag beneath.
 
 OD. (_to the Attendants_.)
 Ay, seize and bind him. Baffle him in this.
 
 PHI. Poor hands, for lack of your beloved string,
 Caught by this craven! O corrupted soul!
 How thou hast undermined me, having taken
 To screen thy quest this youth to me unknown,
 Far worthier of my friendship than of thine,
 Who knew no better than to obey command.
 Even now 'tis manifest he burns within
 With pain for his own error and my wrong.
 But, though unwilling and mapt for ill,
 Thy crafty, mean, and cranny spying soul
 Too well hath lessoned him in sinful lore.
 Now thou hast bound me, O thou wretch, and thinkest
 To take me from this coast, where thou didst cast me
 Outlawed and desolate, a corpse 'mongst men.
   Oh!
 I curse thee now, as ofttimes in the past:
 But since Heaven yields me nought but bitterness,
 Thou livest and art blithe, while 'tis my pain
 To live on in my misery, laughed to scorn
 By thee and Atreus' sons, those generals twain
 Whom thou art serving in this chase. But thou
 With strong compulsion and deceit was driven
 Troyward, whilst I, poor victim, of free will
 Took my seven ships and sailed there, yet was thrown
 Far from all honour,--as thou sayest, by them,
 But, as they turn the tale, by thee.--And now
 Why fetch me hence and take me? To what end?
 I am nothing, dead to you this many a year.
 How, O thou Heaven-abhorred! am I not now
 Lame and of evil smell? how shall ye vaunt
 Before the gods drink-offering or the fat
 Of victims, if I sail among your crew?
 For this, as ye professed, was the chief cause
 Why ye disowned me. Perish!--So ye shall,
 For the wrong done me, if the Heavens be just.
 And that they are, I know. Else had ye ne'er
 Sailed on this errand for an outcast wretch,
 Had they not pricked your heart with thoughts of me.
 Oh, if ye pity me, chastising powers,
 And thou, the Genius of my land, revenge,
 Revenge this crime on all their heads at once!
 My life is pitiable; but if I saw
 Their ruin, I would think me well and strong.
 
 CH. How full of bitterness is his resolve,
 Wrathfully spoken with unbending will!
 
 OD. I might speak long in answer, did the time
 Give scope, but now one thing is mine to say.
 I am known to vary with the varying need;
 And when 'tis tried, who can be just and good,
 My peer will not be found for piety.
 But though on all occasions covetous
 Of victory, this once I yield to thee,
 And willingly. Unhand him there. Let go!
 Leave him to stay. What further use of thee,
 When we have ta'en these arms? Have we not Teucer,
 Skilled in this mystery? Yea, I may boast
 Myself thine equal both in strength and aim
 To wield them. Fare thee well, then! Thou art free
 To roam thy barren isle. We need thee not.
 Let us be going! And perchance thy gift
 May bring thy destined glory to my brow.
 
 PHI. What shall I do? Alas, shalt thou be seen
 Graced with mine arms amongst Achaean men?
 
 OD. No more! I am going.
 
 PHI.                     O Achilles' child!
 Wilt thou, too, vanish? Must I lose thy voice?
 
 OD. Come on, and look not, noble though thou be,
 Lest thou undo our fortune.
 
 PHI.                        Mariners,
 Must ye, too, leave me thus disconsolate?
 Will ye not pity me?
 
 CH.                  Our captain's here.
 Whate'er he saith to thee, that we too speak.
 
 NEO. My chief will call me weakling, soft of heart;
 But go not yet, since our friend bids you stay.
 Till we have prayed, and all be ready on board.
 Meanwhile, perchance, he may conceive some thought
 That favours our design. We two will start;
 And ye, be swift to speed forth at our call.                   [_Exit_
 
 MONODY.
 
 PHI. O cavern of the hollow rock,                                  I 1
 Frosty and stifling in the seasons' change!
 How I seem fated never more to range
 From thy sad covert, that hath felt the shock
 Of pain on pain, steeped with my wretchedness.
 Now thou wilt be my comforter in death!
 Grief haunted harbour, choked with my distress!
 Tell me, what hope is mine of daily food,
 Who will be careful for my good?
 I fail. Ye cowering creatures of the sky,
           Oh, as ye fly,
 Snatch me, borne upward on the blast's sharp breath!
 
 CH. 1. Thou child of misery!
         No mightier power hath this decreed,
         But thine own will and deed
         Hath bound thee thus in grief,
 Since, when kind Heaven had sent relief
 And shown the path of wisdom firm and sure,
 Thou still hast chosen this evil to endure.
 
 PHI. O hapless life, sore bruised with pain!                       I 2
 No more with living mortal may I dwell,
 But ever pining in this desert cell
 With lonely grief, all famished must remain
 And perish; for what food is mine to share,
 When this strong arm no longer wields my bow,
 Whose fleet shafts flew to smite the birds of air
 I was o'erthrown by words, words dark and blind,
 Low-creeping from a traitorous mind!
 O might I see him, whose unrighteous thought
           This ruin wrought,
 Plagued for no less a period with like woe!
 
 CH. 2. Not by our craft thou art caught,
 But Destiny divine hath wrought
         The net that holds thee bound.
         Aim not at us the sound
 Of thy dread curse with dire disaster fraught.
 On others let that light! 'Tis our true care
 Thou should'st not scorn our love in thy despair.
 
 PHI. Now, seated by the shore                                     II 1
     Of heaving ocean hoar,
     He mocks me, waving high
     The sole support of my precarious being,
     The bow which none e'er held but I.
 O treasure of my heart, torn from this hand,
 That loved thy touch,--if thou canst understand,
 How sad must be thy look in seeing
 Thy master destined now no more,
 Like Heracles of yore,
 To wield thee with an archer's might!
 But in the grasp of an all-scheming wight,
 O bitter change! thou art plied;
 And swaying ever by his side,
 Shalt view his life of dark malignity,
 Teeming with guileful shames, like those he wrought on me.
 
 CH. 3. Nobly to speak for the right
     Is manly and strong;
     But not with an envious blight
     To envenom the tongue;
     He to serve all his friends of the fleet,
     One obeying a many-voiced word,
     Through the minist'ring craft of our lord
     Hath but done what was meet.
 
 PHI. Come, legions of the wild,                                   II 2
     Of aspect fierce or mild,
     Fowl from the fields of air,
     And beasts that roam with bright untroubled gaze,
     No longer bounding from my lair
     Fly mine approach! Now freely without fear
     Ye may surround my covert and come near,
     Treading the savage rock-strewn ways.
     The might I had is no more mine,
     Stolen with those arms divine.
     This fort hath no man to defend.
     Come satisfy your vengeful jaws, and rend
     These quivering tainted limbs!
     Already hovering death bedims
     My fainting sense. Who thus can live on air,
     Tasting no gift of earth that breathing mortals share?
 
 CH. 4.  Ah! do not shrink from thy friend,
         If love thou reverest,
         But know 'tis for thee to forfend
         The fate which thou fearest.
         The lot thou hast here to deplore,
         Is sad evermore to maintain,
         And hardship in sickness is sore,
         But sorest in pain.
 
 PHI. Kindest of all that e'er before                               III
 Have trod this shore,
 Again thou mind'st me of mine ancient woe!
 Why wilt thou ruin me? What wouldst thou do?
 
 CH. 5. How mean'st thou?
 
 PHI.                     If to Troy, of me abhorred
 Thou e'er hast hoped to lead me with thy lord.
 
 CH. 6. So I judge best.
 
 PHI.                    Begone at once, begone!
 
 CH. 7. Sweet is that word, and swiftly shall be done!
 Let us be gone, each to his place on board.
                               [The Chorus _make as if they were going_
 
 PHI. Nay, by dear Zeus, to whom all suppliants moan
 Leave me not yet!
 
 CH. 8.            Keep measure in thy word.
 
 PHI. Stay, by Heaven, stay!
 
 CH. 9. What wilt thou say?
 
 PHI. O misery! O cruel power
 That rul'st this hour!
 I am destroyed. Ah me!
 O poor torn limb, what shall I do with thee
 Through all my days to be?
 Ah, strangers, come, return, return!
 
 CH. 10. What new command are we to learn
 Crossing thy former mind?
 
 PHI. Ah! yet be kind.
 Reprove not him, whose tongue, with grief distraught,
 Obeys not, in dark storms, the helm of thought!
 
 CH. 11. Come, poor friend, the way we call.
 
 PHI. Never, learn it once for all!
 Not though he, whom Heaven obeys,
 Blast me with fierce lightning's blaze!
 Perish Troy, and all your host,
 That have chosen, to their cost,
 To despise and cast me forth,
 Since my wound obscured my worth!
 Ah, but, strangers, if your sense
 Hath o'er-mastered this offence,
 Yield but one thing to my prayer!
 
 CH. 12. What wouldst thou have?
 
 PHI.                            Some weapon bare,
 Axe or sword or sharpened dart,
 Bring it to content my heart.
 
 CH. 13. What is thy new intent?
 
 PHI. To sever point by point
 This body, joint from joint.
 On bloody death my mind is bent.
 
 CH. 14. Wherefore?
 
 PHI.               To see my father's face.
 
 CH. 15. Where upon earth?
 
 PHI.                      He hath no place
 Where sun doth shine, but in the halls of night.
 O native country, land of my delight,
 Would I were blest one moment with thy sight!
 Why did I leave thy sacred dew
 And loose my vessels from thy shore,
 To join the hateful Danaaen crew
 And lend them succour? Oh, I am no more!
 
 LEADER OF CH.
 Long since thou hadst seen me nearing yonder ship,
 Had I not spied Odysseus and the son
 Of great Achilles hastening to our side.
 
 OD. Wilt thou not tell me why thou art hurrying
 This backward journey with reverted speed?
 
 NEO. To undo what I have wrongly done to-day.
 
 OD. Thy words appal me. What is wrongly done?
 
 NEO. When in obeying thee and all the host--
 
 OD. Thou didst what deed that misbecame thy life?
 
 NEO. I conquered with base stratagem and fraud--
 
 OD. Whom? What new plan is rising in thy mind?
 
 NEO. Not new. But to the child of Poeas here--
 
 OD. What wilt thou do? I quake with strange alarm.
 
 NEO. From whom I took these weapons, back again----
 
 OD. O Heaven! thou wilt not give them! Mean'st thou this?
 
 NEO. Yea, for I have them through base sinful means.
 
 OD. I pray thee, speak'st thou thus to anger me?
 
 NEO. If the truth anger thee, the truth is said.
 
 OD. Achilles' son! What word is fallen from thee?
 
 NEO. Must the same syllables be thrice thrown forth?
 
 OD. Once was too much. Would they had ne'er been said!
 
 NEO. Enough. Thou hast heard my purpose clearly told.
 
 OD. I know what power shall thwart thee in the deed.
 
 NEO. Whose will shall hinder me?
 
 OD.                              The Achaean host
 And I among them.
 
 NEO.              Thou'rt sharp-witted, sure!
 But little wit or wisdom show'st thou here.
 
 OD. Neither thy words nor thy design is wise.
 
 NEO. But if 'tis righteous, that is better far.
 
 OD. How righteous, to release what thou hast ta'en
 By my device?
 
 NEO.          I sinned a shameful sin,
 And I will do mine utmost to retrieve it.
 
 OD. How? Fear'st thou not the Achaeans in this act?
 
 NEO. In doing right I fear not them nor thee.
 
 OD. I call thy power in question.
 
 NEO.                              Then I'll fight,
 Not with Troy's legions, but with thee.
 
 OD.                                     Come on!
 Let fortune arbitrate.
 
 NEO.                   Thou seest my hand
 Feeling the hilt.
 
 OD.               And me thou soon shalt see
 Doing the like and dallying not!--And yet
 I will not touch thee, but will go and tell
 The army, that shall wreak this on thy head.                   [_Exit_
 
 NEO. Thou show'st discretion: which if thou preserve,
 Thou may'st maintain a path exempt from pain.
 Ho! son of Poeas, Philoctetes, come
 And leave thy habitation in the rock.
 
 PHI. What noise again is troubling my poor cave?
 Why do ye summon me? What crave ye, sirs?
 Ha! 'tis some knavery. Are ye come to add
 Some monster evil to my mountainous woe?
 
 NEO. Fear not, but hearken to what now I speak.
 
 PHI. I needs must fear thee, whose fair words erewhile
 Brought me to bitter fortune.
 
 NEO.                          May not men
 Repent and change?
 
 PHI.               Such wast thou in thy talk,
 When thou didst rob me of my bow,--so bright
 Without, so black within.
 
 NEO.                      Ah, but not now,
 Assure thee! Only let me hear thy will,
 Is 't constant to remain here and endure,
 Or to make voyage with us?
 
 PHI.                       Stop, speak no more!
 Idle and vain will all thine utterance be.
 
 NEO. Thou art so resolved?
 
 PHI.                       More firmly than I say.
 
 NEO. I would I might have brought thee to my mind,
 But since my words are out of tune, I have done.
 
 PHI. Thou wert best. No word of thine can touch my soul
 Or win me to thy love, who by deceit
 Hast reft my life away. And then thou com'st
 To school me,--of noblest father, basest son!
 Perish, the Atridae first of all, and then
 Laertes' child, and thou!
 
 NEO.                      Curse me no more,
 But take this hallowed weapon from my hand.
 
 PHI. What words are these? Am I again deceived?
 
 NEO. No, by the holiest name of Zeus on high!
 
 PHI. O voice of gladness, if thy speech be true!
 
 NEO. The deed shall prove it. Only reach thy hand,
 And be again sole master of thy bow.               [ODYSSEUS _appears_
 
 OD. But I make protest, in the sight of Heaven,
 For Atreus' sons, and all the Achaean host.
 
 PHI. Dear son, whose voice disturbs us? Do I hear
 Odysseus?
 
 OD.       Ay, and thou behold'st him nigh,
 And he shall force thee to the Trojan plain,
 Howe'er Achilles' offspring make or mar.
 
 PHI. This shaft shall bear thee sorrow for that boast.
 
 NEO. Let it not fly, by Heaven!
 
 PHI.                            Dear child, let go
 Mine arm!
 
 NEO.      I will not.                                 [_Exit_ ODYSSEUS
 
 PHI.                  Ah! Why hast thou robbed
 My bow of bringing down mine enemy?
 
 NEO. This were ignoble both for thee and me.
 
 PHI. One thing is manifest, the first o' the host
 Lying forerunners of the Achaean band,
 Are brave with words, but cowards with the steel.
 
 NEO. Well, now the bow is thine. Thou hast no cause
 For blame or anger any more 'gainst me.
 
 PHI. None. Thou hast proved thy birthright, dearest boy.
 Not from the loins of Sisyphus thou earnest,
 But from Achilles, who in life was held
 Noblest of men alive, and now o' the dead.
 
 NEO. It gladdens me that thou shouldst speak in praise
 Both of my sire and me. But hear me tell
 The boon for which I sue thee.--Mortal men
 Must bear such evils as high Heaven ordains;
 But those afflicted by self-chosen ills,
 Like thine to-day, receive not from just men
 Or kind indulgence or compassionate thought.
 And thou art restive grown, and wilt not hearken,
 But though one counsel thee with kind'st intent,
 Wilt take him for a dark malignant foe.
 Yet, calling Zeus to witness for my soul,
 Once more I will speak. Know this, and mark it well:
 Thou bear'st this sickness by a heavenly doom,
 Through coming near to Chrysa's sentinel,
 The lurking snake, that guards the sky-roofed fold[7].
 And from this plague thou ne'er shall find reprieve
 While the same Sun god rears him from the east
 And droops to west again, till thou be come
 Of thine own willing mind to Troia's plain,
 Where our physicians, sons of Phoebus' child[8],
 Shall soothe thee from thy sore, and thou with me
 And with this bow shalt take Troy's citadel.
 How do I know this? I will tell thee straight
 We have a Trojan captive, Helenus,
 Both prince and prophet, who hath clearly told
 This must be so, yea, and ere harvest time
 This year, great Troy must fall, else if his words
 Be falsified, who will may slay the seer.
 Now, since thou know'st of this, yield thy consent;
 For glorious is the gain, being singled forth
 From all the Greeks as noblest, first to come
 To healing hands, and then to win renown
 Unrivalled, vanquishing all tearful Troy.
 
 PHI. Oh how I hate my life! Why must it keep
 This breathing form from sinking to the shades?
 How can I prove a rebel to his mind
 Who thus exhorts me with affectionate heart?
 And yet, oh misery! must I give way?
 Then how could I endure the light of heaven?
 With whom could I exchange a word? Ay me!
 Eyes that have seen each act of my sad life,
 How could ye bear it, to behold the sons
 Of Atreus, my destroyers, comrades now
 And friends! Laertes' wicked son, my friend!
 And less I feel the grief of former wrong
 Than shudder with expectance of fresh harm
 They yet may work on me. For when the mind
 Hath once been mother of an evil brood,
 It nurses nought but evils. Yea, at thee
 I marvel. Thou should'st ne'er return to Troy,
 Nor suffer me to go, when thou remember'st
 What insult they have done thee, ravishing
 Thy father's rights from thee. And wilt thou then
 Sail to befriend them, pressing me in aid?
 Nay, do not, son; but, even as thou hast sworn,
 Convey me home, and thou, in Scyros dwelling,
 Leave to their evil doom those evil men.
 So thou shalt win a twofold gratitude
 From me and from my father, and not seem,
 Helping vile men, to be as vile as they.
 
 NEO. 'Tis fairly spoken. Yet I would that thou
 Relying on my word and on Heaven's aid,
 Would'st voyage forth from Lemnos with thy friend.
 
 PHI. Mean'st thou to Troy, and to the hateful sons
 Of Atreus, me, with this distressful limb?
 
 NEO. Nay, but to those that will relieve the pain
 Of thy torn foot and heal thee of thy plague.
 
 PHI. Thy words are horrible. What mean'st thou, boy?
 
 NEO. The act I deem the noblest for us both.
 
 PHI. Wilt thou speak so? Where is thy fear of Heaven?
 
 NEO. Why should I fear, when I see certain gain?
 
 PHI. Gain for the sons of Atreus, or for me?
 
 NEO. Methinks a friend should give thee friendly counsel.
 
 PHI. Friendly, to hand me over to my foes?
 
 NEO. Ah, be not hardened in thy misery!
 
 PHI. I know thou wilt ruin me by what thou speakest.
 
 NEO. Not I. The case is dark to thee, I see.
 
 PHI. I know the Atreidae cast me on this rock.
 
 NEO. But how, if they should save thee afterward?
 
 PHI. They ne'er shall make me see Troy with my will.
 
 NEO. Hard is my fortune, then, if by no sleight
 Of reasoning I can draw thee to my mind.
 For me, 'twere easiest to end speech, that thou
 Might'st live on as thou livest in hopeless pain.
 
 PHI. Then leave me to my fate!--But thou hast touched
 My right hand with thine own, and given consent
 To bear me to my home. Do this, dear son!
 And do not linger to take thought of Troy.
 Enough that name hath echoed in my groans.
 
 NEO. If thou wilt, let us be going.
 
 PHI.                                Nobly hast thou said the word.
 
 NEO. Lean thy steps on mine.
 
 PHI.                        As firmly as my foot will strength afford.
 
 NEO. Ah! but how shall I escape Achaean anger?
 
 PHI.                                           Do not care!
 
 NEO. Ah! but should they spoil my country!
 
 PHI.                                   I to shield thee will be there.
 
 NEO. How to shield me, how to aid me?
 
 PHI.                                  With the shafts of Heracles
 I will scare them.
 
 NEO.                Give thy blessing to this isle, and come in peace.
 
 HERACLES _appears from above._
 
 HERACLES. First, son of Poeas, wait till thou hast heard
 The voice of Heracles, and weighed his word.
 Him thou beholdest from the Heavenly seat
 Come down, for thee leaving the blest retreat,
 To tell thee all high Zeus intends, and stay
 Thy purpose in the journey of to-day.
   Then hear me, first how after my long toils
 By strange adventure I have found and won
 Immortal glory, which thine eyes perceive;
 And the like lot, I tell thee, shall be thine,
 After these pains to rise to glorious fame.
 Sailing with this thy comrade to Troy-town,
 First thou shalt heal thee from thy grievous sore,
 And then, being singled forth from all the host
 As noblest, thou shalt conquer with that bow
 Paris, prime author of these years of harm,
 And capture Troy, and bear back to thy hall
 The choicest guerdon, for thy valour's meed,
 To Oeta's vale and thine own father's home.
 But every prize thou tak'st be sure thou bear
 Unto my pyre, in memory of my bow.
   This word, Achilles' offspring, is for thee
 No less. For, as thou could'st not without him,
 So, without thee, he cannot conquer Troy.
 Then, like twin lions hunting the same hill,
 Guard thou him, and he thee! and I will send
 Asclepius Troyward to relieve thy pain.
 For Ilion now a second time must fall
 Before the Herculean bow. But, take good heed,
 Midst all your spoil to hold the gods in awe.
 For our great Father counteth piety
 Far above all. This follows men in death,
 And fails them not when they resign their breath.
 
 PHI. Thou whom I have longed to see,
     Thy dear voice is law to me.
 
 NEO. I obey with gladdened heart.
 
 HER. Lose no time: at once depart!
     Bright occasion and fair wind
     Urge your vessel from behind.
 
 PHI. Come, let me bless the region ere I go.
     Poor house, sad comrade of my watch, farewell!
     Ye nymphs of meadows where soft waters flow
     Thou ocean headland, pealing thy deep knell,
     Where oft within my cavern as I lay
     My hair was moist with dashing south-wind's spray,
     And ofttimes came from Hermes' foreland high
     Sad replication of my storm-vext cry;
     Ye fountains and thou Lycian water sweet,--
     I never thought to leave you, yet my feet
     Are turning from your paths,--we part for aye.
     Farewell! and waft me kindly on my way,
     O Lemnian earth enclosed by circling seas,
     To sail, where mighty Fate my course decrees,
     And friendly voices point me, and the will
     Of that heroic power, who doth this act fulfil.
 
 CH. Come now all in one strong band;
     Then, ere loosing from the land,
     Pray we to the nymphs of sea
     Kind protectresses to be,
     Till we touch the Trojan strand.
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                           OEDIPUS AT COLONOS
 
 
                              THE PERSONS
 
 OEDIPUS, _old and blind._
 ANTIGONE, _his daughter, a young girl._
 ISMENE, _his daughter, a young girl._
 CHORUS _of Village Guardians._
 _An Athenian._
 THESEUS, _King of Athens._
 CREON, _Envoy from Thebes._
 POLYNICES, _the elder son of Oedipus._
 _Messenger._
 
 
 SCENE. Colonos.
 
 
 
 
 Oedipus had remained at Thebes for some time after his fall. But he
 was afterwards banished by the command of Creon, with the consent of
 his own sons. Their intention at first was to lay no claim to the
 throne. But by-and-by ambition prevailed with Eteocles, the younger-
 born, and he persuaded Creon and the citizens to banish his elder
 brother. Polynices took refuge at Argos, where he married the daughter
 of Adrastus, and levied an army of auxiliaries to support his
 pretensions to the throne of Thebes. Before going into exile Oedipus
 had cursed his sons.
 
 Antigone after a while fled forth to join her father and support him
 in his wanderings. Ismene also once brought him secret intelligence.
 
 Years have now elapsed, and the Delphian oracle proclaims that if
 Oedipus dies in a foreign land the enemies of Thebes shall overcome
 her.
 
 In ignorance of this fact, Oedipus, now aged as well as blind, and led
 by his daughter Antigone, appears before the grove of the Eumenides,
 at Colonos, in the neighbourhood of Athens. He has felt an inward
 intimation, which is strengthened by some words of the oracle received
 by him long since at Delphi, that his involuntary crimes have been
 atoned for, and that the Avenging Deities will now receive him kindly
 and make his cause their own.
 
 After some natural hesitation on the part of the village-councillors
 of Colonos, Oedipus is received with princely magnanimity by Theseus,
 who takes him under the protection of Athens, and defends him against
 the machinations of Creon.
 
 Thus the blessing of the Gods, which Oedipus carried with him, is
 secured to Athens, and denied to Thebes. The craft of Creon and the
 prayers of Polynices alike prove unavailing. Then the man of many
 sorrows, whose essential nobleness has survived them all, passes away
 mysteriously from the sight of men.
 
 The scene is laid at Colonos, a suburb of Athens much frequented by
 the upper classes, especially the Knights (see Thuc. viii. 67); and
 before the sacred grove of the Eumenides, or Gentle Goddesses, a
 euphemistic title for the Erinyes, or Goddesses of Vengeance.
 
 
 
 
                           OEDIPUS AT COLONOS
 
 
 OEDIPUS. ANTIGONE.
 
 OEDIPUS. Antigone, child of the old blind sire,
 What land is here, what people? Who to-day
 Shall dole to Oedipus, the wandering exile,
 Their meagre gifts? Little I ask, and less
 Receive with full contentment; for my woes,
 And the long years ripening the noble mind,
 Have schooled me to endure.--But, O my child,
 If thou espiest where we may sit, though near
 Some holy precinct, stay me and set me there,
 Till we may learn where we are come. 'Tis ours
 To hear the will of strangers and to obey.
 
 ANTIGONE. Woe-wearied father, yonder city's wall
 That shields her, looks far distant; but this ground
 Is surely sacred, thickly planted over
 With olive, bay and vine, within whose bowers
 Thick-fluttering song-birds make sweet melody.
 Here then repose thee on this unhewn stone.
 Thou hast travelled far to-day for one so old.
 
 OED. Seat me, my child, and be the blind man's guard.
 
 ANT. Long time hath well instructed me in that.
 
 OED. Now, canst thou tell me where we have set our feet?
 
 ANT. Athens I know, but not the nearer ground.
 
 OED. Ay, every man that met us in the way
 Named Athens.
 
 ANT.          Shall I go, then, and find out
 The name of the spot?
 
 OED.                  Yes, if 'tis habitable.
 
 ANT. It is inhabited. Yet I need not go.
 I see a man even now approaching here.
 
 OED. How? Makes he towards us? Is he drawing nigh?
 
 ANT. He is close beside us. Whatsoe'er thou findest
 Good to be spoken, say it. The man is here.
 
 _Enter an_ Athenian.
 
 OED. O stranger, learning from this maid, who sees
 Both for herself and me, that thou art come
 With timely light to clear our troubled thought--
 
 ATHENIAN. Ere thou ask more, come forth from where thou sittest!
 Ye trench on soil forbidden human tread.
 
 OED. What soil? And to what Power thus consecrate?
 
 ATH. None may go near, nor dwell there. 'Tis possessed
 By the dread sisters, children of Earth and Night.
 
 OED. What holy name will please them, if I pray?
 
 ATH. 'All seeing Gentle Powers' the dwellers here
 Would call them. But each land hath its own rule.
 
 OED. And gently may they look on him who now
 Implores them, and will never leave this grove!
 
 ATH. What saying is this?
 
 OED.                      The watchword of my doom.
 
 ATH. Yet dare I not remove thee, till the town
 Have heard my purpose and confirm the deed.
 
 OED. By Heaven, I pray thee, stranger, scorn me not,
 Poor wanderer that I am, but answer me.
 
 ATH. Make clear thy drift. Thou'lt get no scorn from me.
 
 OED. Then, pray thee, tell me how ye name the place
 Where now I sit.
 
 ATH.             The region all around
 Is sacred. For 'tis guarded and possessed
 By dread Poseidon, and the Titan mind
 That brought us fire--Prometheus. But that floor
 Whereon thy feet are resting, hath been called
 The brazen threshold of our land, the stay
 Of glorious Athens, and the neighbouring fields
 Are fain to honour for their patron-god
 Thee, O Colonos, first of Knights, whose name  [_Pointing to a statue_
 They bear in brotherhood and own for theirs.
 Such, friend, believe me, is this place, not praised
 In story, but of many a heart beloved.
 
 OED. Then is the land inhabited of men?
 
 ATH. By men, who name them from Colonos there.
 
 OED. Have they a lord, or sways the people's voice?
 
 ATH. Lord Theseus, child of Aegeus, our late king.
 
 OED. Will some one of your people bring him hither?
 
 ATH. Wherefore? What urgent cause requires his presence?
 
 OED. He shall gain mightily by granting little.
 
 ATH. Who can gain profit from the blind?
 
 OED.                                     The words
 These lips shall utter, shall be full of sight.
 
 ATH. Well, thou look'st nobly, but for thy hard fate.
 This course is safe. Thus do. Stay where I found thee,
 Till I go tell the neighbour townsmen here
 Not of the city, but Colonos. They
 Shall judge for thee to abide or to depart.                    [_Exit_
 
 OED. Tell me, my daughter, is the man away?
 
 ANT. He is gone, father. I alone am near.
 Speak what thou wilt in peace and quietness.
 
 OED. Dread Forms of holy Fear, since in this land
 Your sanctuary first gave my limbs repose,
 Be not obdurate to my prayer, nor spurn
 The voice of Phoebus, who that fateful day,
 When he proclaimed my host of ills to come,
 Told me of rest after a weary time,
 Where else but here? 'When I should reach my bourne,
 And find repose and refuge with the Powers
 Of reverend name, my troubled life should end
 With blessing to the men who sheltered me,
 And curses on their race who banished me
 and sent me wandering forth.' Whereof he vouched me
 Sure token, or by earthquake, or by fire
 From heaven, or thundrous voices. And I know
 Some aery message from your shrine hath drawn me
 With winged whisper to this grove. Not else
 Had ye first met me coming, nor had I
 Sate on your dread unchiselled seat of stone,
 With dry cold lips greeting your sober shrine.
 Then give Apollo's word due course, and give
 Completion to my life, if in your sight
 These toils and sorrows past the human bound
 Seem not too little. Kindly, gentle powers,
 Offspring of primal darkness, hear my prayer!
 Hear it, Athenai, of all cities queen,
 Great Pallas' foster-city! Look with ruth
 On this poor shadow of great Oedipus,
 This fading semblance of his kingly form.
 
 ANT. Be silent now. There comes an aged band
 With jealous looks to know thine errand here.
 
 OED. I will be silent, and thine arm shall guide
 My footstep under covert of the grove
 Out of the path, till I make sure what words
 These men will utter. Warily to observe
 Is the prime secret of the prudent mind.                     [_Exeunt_
 
 CHORUS (_entering_).
     Keep watch! Who is it? Look!                                     1
 Where is he? Vanished! Gone! Oh where?
     Most uncontrolled of men!
     Look well, inquire him out,
     Search keenly in every nook!
     --Some wanderer is the aged wight,
     A wanderer surely, not a native here.
     Else never had he gone within
     The untrodden grove
 Of these--unmarried, unapproachable in might,
     --Whose name we dare not breathe,
     But pass their shrine
     Without a look, without a word,
 Uttering the unheard voice of reverential thought.
     But now, one comes, they tell, devoid of awe,
     Whom, peering all around this grove
     I find not, where he abideth.
 
 OED. (_behind_).
 Behold me! For I 'see by sound,'
 As mortals say.
 
 CH. Oh, Oh!
 With horror I see him, with horror hear him speak.
 
 OED. Pray you, regard me not as a transgressor!
 
 CH. Defend us, Zeus! Who is that aged wight?
 
 OED. Not one of happiest fate,
 Or enviable, O guardians of this land!
 'Tis manifest; else had I not come hither
 Led by another's eyes, not moored my bark
 On such a slender stay.
 
 CH. Alas! And are thine eyes                                         2
 Sightless? O full of misery,
     As thou look'st full of years!
     But not, if I prevail,
     Shalt thou bring down this curse.
     Thou art trespassing. Yet keep thy foot
     From stumbling in that verdant, voiceless dell,
     Where running water as it fills
     The hallowed bowl,
 Mingles with draughts[1] of honey. Stranger, hapless one!
     Avoid that with all care.
     Away! Remove!
     Distance impedes the sound. Dost hear,
 Woe-burdened wanderer? If aught thou carest to bring
     Before our council, leave forbidden ground,
     And there, where all have liberty,
     Speak,--but till then, avaunt thee!
 
 OED. Daughter, what must I think, or do?
 
 ANT.                                     My sire!
 We must conform us to the people's will,
 Yielding ere they compel.
 
 OED.                      Give me thy hand.
 
 ANT. Thou hast it.
 
 OED.              --Strangers, let me not
 Be wronged, when I have trusted you
 And come from where I stood!
 
 CH. Assure thee, from this seat
 No man shall drag thee off against thy will.
 
 OED. Farther?
 
 CH.           Advance thy foot.
 
 OED.                            Yet more?
 
 CH.                                       Assist him onward
 Maiden, thou hast thy sight.
 
 ANT. Come, follow, this way follow with thy darkened steps,
 Father, the way I am leading thee.
 
 CH. Content thee, sojourning in a strange land,
 O man of woe!
 To eschew whate'er the city holds in hate,
 And honour what she loves!
 
 OED.                       Then do thou lead me, child,
 Where with our feet secure from sin
 We may be suffered both to speak and hear.
 Let us not war against necessity.
 
 CH. There! From that bench of rock
 Go not again astray.
 
 OED. Even here?
 
 CH.             Enough, I tell thee.
 
 OED.                                 May I sit?
 
 CH. Ay, crouch thee low adown
 Crooking thy limbs, upon the stone.
 
 ANT. Father, this task is mine--
 Sink gently down into thy resting-place,
 
 OED. Woe is me!
 
 ANT. Supporting on this loving hand
 Thy reverend aged form.
 
 OED. Woe, for my cruel fate!                      [OEDIPUS _is seated_
 
 CH. Now thou unbendest from thy stubborn ways,
 O man of woe!
 Declare, what mortal wight thou art,
 That, marked by troublous fortune, here art led.
 What native country, shall we learn, is thine?
 
 OED. O strangers, I have none!
 But do not--
 
 CH.         What dost thou forbid, old sir?
 
 OED. Do not, oh, do not ask me who I am,
 Nor probe me with more question.
 
 CH.                              What dost thou mean?
 
 OED. My birth is dreadful.
 
 CH.                        Tell it forth.
 
 OED. What should I utter, O my child? Woe is me!
 
 CH. Thy seed, thy father's name, stranger, pronounce!
 
 OED. Alas! What must I do? My child!
 
 ANT. Since no resource avails thee, speak!
 
 OED. I will. I cannot hide it further.
 
 CH. Ye are long about it. Haste thee!
 
 OED.                                  Know ye of one
 Begotten of Laius?
 
 CH.                Horror! Horror! Oh!
 
 OED. Derived from Labdacus?
 
 CH.                         O Heaven!
 
 OED. Fate-wearied Oedipus?
 
 CH.                        Art thou he?
 
 OED. Fear not my words.
 
 CH.                     Oh! Oh!
 
 OED. Unhappy me!
 
 CH.              Oh!
 
 OED.                 Daughter, what is coming?
 
 CH. Away! Go forth. Leave ye the land. Begone!
 
 OED. And where, then, is the promise thou hast given?
 
 CH. No doom retributive attends the deed
 That wreaks prevenient wrong.
 Deceit, matched with deceit, makes recompense
 Of evil, not of kindness. Get thee forth!
 Desert that seat again, and from this land
 Unmooring speed thee away, lest on our state
 Thou bring some further bale!
 
 MONODY.
 
 ANT. O strangers, full of reverent care!
 Since ye cannot endure my father here,
 Aged and blind,
 Because ye have heard a rumour of the deeds
 He did unknowingly,--yet, we entreat you.
 Strangers, have pity on me, the hapless girl,
 Who pray for mine own sire and for none else,
 --Pray, looking in your eyes with eyes not blind.
 As if a daughter had appeared to you.
 Pleading for mercy to the unfortunate.
 We are in your hands as in the hand of God,
 Helpless. O then accord the unhoped for boon!
 By what is dear to thee, thy veriest own,
 I pray thee,--chattel or child, or holier name!
 Search through the world, thou wilt not find the man
 Who could resist the leading of a God.
 
 CH. Daughter of Oedipus, be well assured
 We view with pity both thy case and his,
 But fear of Heavenly wrath confines our speech
 To that we have already said to you.
 
 OED. What profit lives in fame and fair renown
 By unsubstantial rumour idly spread?
 When Athens is extolled with peerless praise
 For reverence, and for mercy!--She alone
 The sufferer's shield, the exile's comforter!
 What have I reaped hereof? Ye have raised me up
 From yonder seat, and now would drive me forth
 Fearing a name! For there is nought in me
 Or deeds of mine to make you fear. My life
 Hath more of wrong endured than of wrong done,
 Were it but lawful to disclose to you
 Wherefore ye dread me,--not my sin but theirs,
 My mother's and my sire's. I know your thought.
 Yet never can ye fasten guilt on me,
 Who, though I had acted with the clear'st intent,
 Were guiltless, for my deed requited wrong.
 But as it was, all blindly I went forth
 On that dire road, while they who planned my death
 Planned it with perfect knowledge. Therefore, sirs,
 By Heaven I pray you, as ye have bid me rise,
 Protect your suppliant without fail; and do not
 In jealous reverence for the blessed Gods
 Rob them of truest reverence, but know this:--
 God looks upon the righteousness of men
 And their unrighteousness, nor ever yet
 Hath one escaped who wrought iniquity.
 Take part, then, with the Gods, nor overcloud
 The golden fame of Athens with dark deeds;
 But as ye have pledged your faith to shelter me,
 Defend me and rescue, not rejecting me
 Through mere abhorrence of my ruined face.
 For on a holy mission am I come,
 Sent with rich blessings for your neighbours here.
 And when the head and sovereign of your folk
 Is present, ye shall learn the truth at full.
 Till then, be gracious to me, and not perverse.
 
 CH. Thy meaning needs must strike our hearts with awe,
 Old wanderer! so weighty are the words
 That body it forth. Therefore we are content
 The Lord of Athens shall decide this case.
 
 OED. And where is he who rules this country, sirs?
 
 CH. He keeps his father's citadel. But one
 Is gone to fetch him, he who brought us hither.
 
 OED. Think you he will consider the blind man,
 And come in person here to visit him?
 
 CH. Be sure he will,--when he hath heard thy name.
 
 OED. And who will carry that?
 
 CH.                           'Tis a long road;
 But rumour from the lips of wayfarers
 Flies far and wide, so that he needs must hear;
 And hearing, never doubt but he will come.
 So noised in every land hath been thy name,
 Old sovereign,--were he sunk in drowsiness,
 That sound would bring him swiftly to thy side.
 
 OED. Well, may he come to bless his city and me!
 When hath not goodness blessed the giver of good?
 
 ANT. O Heavens! What shall I say, what think, my father?
 
 OED. Daughter Antigone, what is it?
 
 ANT.                                I see
 A woman coming toward us, mounted well
 On a fair Sicilian palfrey, and her face
 With brow-defending hood of Thessaly
 Is shadowed from the sun. What must I think?
 Is it she or no? Can the eye so far deceive?
 It is. 'Tis not. Unhappy that I am,
 I know not.--Yes, 'tis she. For drawing near
 She greets me with bright glances, and declares
 Beyond a doubt, Ismene's self is here.
 
 OED. What say'st thou, daughter?
 
 ANT.                             That I see thy child,
 My sister. Soon her voice will make thee sure.
 
 _Enter_ ISMENE.
 
 ISMENE. Father and sister!--names for ever dear!
 Hard hath it been to find you, yea, and hard
 I feel it now to look on you for grief.
 
 OED. Child, art thou here?
 
 ISM.                       Father! O sight of pain!
 
 OED. Offspring and sister!
 
 ISM.                       Woe for thy dark fate!
 
 OED. Hast thou come, daughter?
 
 ISM.                           On a troublous way.
 
 OED. Touch me, my child!
 
 ISM.                     I give a hand to both.
 
 OED. To her and me?
 
 ISM.                Three linked in one sad knot.
 
 OED. Child, wherefore art thou come?
 
 ISM.                                 In care for thee.
 
 OED. Because you missed me?
 
 ISM.                        Ay, and to bring thee tidings,
 With the only slave whom I could trust.
 
 OED.                                    And they,
 Thy brethren, what of them? Were they not there
 To take this journey for their father's good?
 
 ISM. Ask not of them. Dire deeds are theirs to day.
 
 OED. How in all points their life obeys the law
 Of Egypt, where the men keep house and weave
 Sitting within doors, while the wives abroad
 Provide with ceaseless toil the means of life.
 So in your case, my daughters, they who should
 Have ta'en this burden on them, bide at home
 Like maidens, while ye take their place, and lighten
 My miseries by your toil. Antigone,
 E'er since her childhood ended, and her frame
 Was firmly knit, with ceaseless ministry
 Still tends upon the old man's wandering,
 Oft in the forest ranging up and down
 Fasting and barefoot through the burning heat
 Or pelting rain, nor thinks, unhappy maid,
 Of home or comfort, so her father's need
 Be satisfied. And thou, that camest before,
 Eluding the Cadmeans, and didst tell me
 What words Apollo had pronounced on me.
 And when they banished me, stood'st firm to shield me,
 What news, Ismene, bring'st thou to thy sire
 To day? What mission sped thee forth? I know
 Thou com'st not idly, but with fears for me.
 
 ISM. Father, I will not say what I endured
 In searching out the place that sheltered thee.
 To tell it o'er would but renew the pain.
 But of the danger now encompassing
 Thine ill starred sons,--of that I came to speak.
 At first they strove with Creon and declared
 The throne should be left vacant and the town
 Freed from pollution,--paying deep regard
 In their debate to the dark heritage
 Of ruin that o'ershadowed all thy race.
 Far different is the strife which holds them now,
 Since some great Power, joined to their sinful mind,
 Incites them both to seize on sovereign sway.
 Eteocles, in pride of younger years,
 Robbed elder Polynices of his right,
 Dethroned and banished him. To Argos then
 Goes exiled Polynices, and obtains
 Through intermarriage a strong favouring league,
 Whose word is, 'Either Argos vanquishes
 The seed of Cadmus or exalts their fame'
 This, father, is no tissue of empty talk,
 But dreadful truth, nor can I tell where Heaven
 Is to reveal his mercy to thy woe.
 
 OED. And hadst thou ever hoped the Gods would care
 For mine affliction, and restore my life?
 
 ISM. I hope it now since this last oracle.
 
 OED. What oracle hath been declared, my child?
 
 ISM. That they shall seek thee forth, alive or dead,
 To bring salvation to the Theban race.
 
 OED. Who can win safety through such help as mine?
 
 ISM. 'Tis said their victory depends on thee.
 
 OED. When shrunk to nothing, am I indeed a man?
 
 ISM. Yea, for the Gods uphold thee, who then destroyed.
 
 OED. Poor work, to uphold in age who falls when young!
 
 ISM. Know howsoe'er that Creon will be here
 For this same end, ere many an hour be spent.
 
 OED. For what end, daughter? Tell me in plain speech.
 
 ISM. To set thee near their land, that thou may'st be
 Beyond their borders, but within their power.
 
 OED. What good am I, thus lying at their gate?
 
 ISM. Thine inauspicious burial brings them woe.
 
 OED. There needs no oracle to tell one that.
 
 ISM. And therefore they would place thee near their land,
 Where thou may'st have no power upon thyself.
 
 OED. Say then, shall Theban dust o'ershadow me?
 
 ISM. The blood of kindred cleaving to thy hand,
 Father, forbids thee.
 
 OED.                  Never, then, henceforth,
 Shall they lay hold on me!
 
 ISM.                       If that be true,
 The brood of Cadmus shall have bale.
 
 OED.                                 What cause
 Having appeared, will bring this doom to pass?
 
 ISM. Thy wrath, when they are marshalled at thy tomb.
 
 OED. From whom hast thou heard this?
 
 ISM.                                 Sworn messengers
 Brought such report from Delphi's holy shrine.
 
 OED. Hath Phoebus so pronounced my destiny?
 
 ISM. So they declare who brought the answer back.
 
 OED. Did my sons hear?
 
 ISM.                   They know it, both of them.
 
 OED. Villains, who, being informed of such a word,
 Turned not their thoughts toward me, but rather chose
 Ambition and a throne!
 
 ISM.                   It wounds mine ear
 To hear it spoken, but the news I bring
 Is to that stern effect.
 
 OED.                     Then I pray Heaven
 The fury of their fate-appointed strife
 May ne'er be quenched, but that the end may come
 According to my wish upon them twain
 To this contention and arbitrament
 Of battle which they now assay and lift
 The threatening spear! So neither he who wields
 The sceptred power should keep possession still,
 Nor should his brother out of banishment
 Ever return:--who, when their sire--when I
 Was shamefully thrust from my native land,
 Checked not my fall nor saved me, but, for them,
 I was driven homeless and proclaimed an exile.
 Ye will tell me 'twas in reason that the State
 Granted this boon to my express desire.
 Nay; for in those first hours of agony,
 When my heart raged, and it seemed sweetest to me
 To die the death, and to be stoned with stones,
 No help appeared to yield me that relief.
 But after lapse of days, when all my pain
 Was softened, and I felt that my hot spirit
 Had run to fierce excess of bitterness
 In wreaking mine offence--then, then the State
 Drove me for ever from the land, and they,
 Their father's sons, who might have saved their father,
 Cared not to help him, but betrayed by them,
 For lack of one light word, I wandered forth
 To homeless banishment and beggary.
 But these weak maidens to their nature's power
 Have striven to furnish me with means to live
 And dwell securely, girded round with love.
 My sons have chosen before their father's life
 A lordly throne and sceptred sovereignty.
 But never shall they win me to their aid,
 Nor shall the Theban throne for which they strive
 Bring them desired content. That well I know,
 Comparing with my daughter's prophecies
 Those ancient oracles which Phoebus once
 Spake in mine ear. Then let them send to seek me
 Creon, or who is strongest in their State.
 For if ye, strangers, will but add your might
 To the protection of these awful Powers,
 The guardians of your soil, to shelter me,
 Ye shall acquire for this your State a saviour
 Mighty to save, and ye shall vex my foes.
 
 CH. Thou art worthy of all compassion, Oedipus,
 Thyself and these thy daughters. Now, moreover
 Since thou proclaim'st thyself our country's saviour
 I would advise thee for the best.
 
 OED.                              Kind sir,
 Be my good guide. I will do all thou biddest.
 
 CH. Propitiate then these holy powers, whose grove
 Received thee when first treading this their ground.
 
 OED. What are the appointed forms? Advise me, sirs.
 
 CH. First see to it that from some perennial fount
 Clean hands provide a pure drink-offering.
 
 OED. And when I have gotten this unpolluted draught?
 
 CH. You will find bowls, formed by a skilful hand,
 Whose brims and handles you must duly wreathe.
 
 OED. With leaves or flocks of wool, or in what way?
 
 CH. With tender wool ta'en from a young ewe-lamb.
 
 OED. Well, and what follows to complete the rite?
 
 CH. Next, make libation toward the earliest dawn.
 
 OED. Mean'st thou from those same urns whereof thou speakest?
 
 CH. From those three vessels pour three several streams,
 Filling the last to the brim.
 
 OED.                          With what contents
 Must this be filled? Instruct me.
 
 CH.                               Not with wine,
 But water and the treasure of the bee.
 
 OED. And when leaf-shadowed Earth has drunk of this,
 What follows?
 
 CH.           Thou shalt lay upon her then
 From both thy hands a row of olive-twigs--
 Counting thrice nine in all--and add this prayer--
 
 OED. That is the chief thing,--that I long to hear.
 
 CH. As we have named them Gentle, so may they
 From gentle hearts accord their suppliant aid;--
 Be this thy prayer, or whoso prays for thee,
 Spoken not aloud, but so that none may hear;
 And in departing, turn not. This being done,
 I can stand by thee without dread. But else,
 I needs must fear concerning thee.
 
 OED.                               My daughters,
 Have ye both heard our friends who inhabit here?
 
 ANT. Yea, father; and we wait for thy command.
 
 OED. I cannot go. Two losses hinder me,
 Two evils, want of strength and want of sight.
 Let one of you go and perform this service.
 One soul, methinks, in paying such a debt
 May quit a million, if the heart be pure.
 Haste, then, to do it. Only leave me not
 Untended. For I cannot move alone
 Nor without some one to support me and guide.
 
 ISM. I will be ministrant. But let me know
 Where I must find the place of offering.
 
 CH. Beyond this grove. And, stranger maid, if aught
 Seem wanting, there is one at hand to show it.
 
 ISM. Then to my task. Meantime, Antigone,
 Watch by our sire. We must not make account
 Of labour that supplies a parent's need.                       [_Exit_
 
 CH. Thy long since slumbering woe I would not wake again,          I 1
 But yet I long to learn.
 
 OED.                     What hidden lore?
 
 CH.                                        The pain
 That sprang against thy life with spirit-mastering force.
 
 OED. Ah, sirs, as ye are kind, re-open not that source
 Of unavoided shame.
 
 CH.                 Friend, we would hear the tale
 Told truly, whose wide voice doth hourly more prevail.
 
 OED. Misery!
 
 CH.          Be not loth!
 
 OED.                      O bitterness!
 
 CH.                                     Consent.
 For all thou didst require we gave to thy content.
 
 OED. Oh, strangers, I have borne an all-too-willing brand,         I 2
 Yet not of mine own choice.
 
 CH.                         Whence? We would understand.
 
 OED. Nought knowing of the curse she fastened on my head
 Thebe in evil bands bound me.
 
 CH.                           Thy mother's bed,
 Say, didst thou fill? mine ear still echoes to the noise.
 
 OED. 'Tis death to me to hear, but, these, mine only joys,
 Friends, are my curse.
 
 CH.                    O Heaven!
 
 OED.                             The travail of one womb
 Hath gendered all you see, one mother, one dark doom.
 
 CH. How? Are they both thy race, and--                            II 1
 
 OED.                                  Sister branches too,
 Nursed at the self-same place with him from whom they grew.
 
 CH. O horror!
 
 OED.          Ay, not one, ten thousand charged me then!
 
 CH. O sorrow!
 
 OED.          Never done, an ever-sounding strain.
 
 CH. O crime!
 
 OED.         By me ne'er wrought.
 
 CH.                               But how?
 
 OED.                                       The guerdon fell.
 Would I had earned it not from those I served too well.
 
 CH. But, hapless, didst thou slay--                               II 2
 
 OED.                               What seek ye more to know?
 
 CH. Thy father?
 
 OED.            O dismay! Ye wound me, blow on blow.
 
 CH. Thy hand destroyed him.
 
 OED.                        Yes. Yet lacks there not herein
 A plea for my redress.
 
 CH.                    How canst thou clear that sin?
 
 OED. I'll tell thee. For the deed, 'twas proved mine,--Oh 'tis true!
 Yet by Heaven's law I am freed:--I wist not whom I slew.
 
 CH. Enough. For lo! where Aegeus' princely son,
 Theseus, comes hither, summoned at thy word.
 
 _Enter_ THESEUS.
 
 THESEUS. From many voices in the former time
 Telling thy cruel tale of sight destroyed
 I have known thee, son of Laius, and to-day
 I know thee anew, in learning thou art here.
 Thy raiment, and the sad change in thy face,
 Proclaim thee who thou art, and pitying thee,
 Dark-fated Oedipus, I fain would hear
 What prayer or supplication thou preferrest
 To me and to my city, thou and this
 Poor maid who moves beside thee. Full of dread
 Must be that fortune thou canst name, which I
 Would shrink from, since I know of mine own youth,
 How in strange lands a stranger as thou art
 I bore the brunt of perilous circumstance
 Beyond all others; nor shall any man,
 Like thee an alien from his native home,
 Find me to turn my face from succouring him.
 I am a man and know it. To-morrow's good
 Is no more mine than thine or any man's.
 
 OED. Thy noble spirit, Theseus, in few words
 Hath made my task of utterance brief indeed.
 Thou hast told aright my name and parentage
 And native city. Nought remains for me
 But to make known mine errand, and our talk
 Is ended.
 
 THE.      Tell me plainly thy desire.
 
 OED. I come to offer thee this woe-worn frame,
 As a free boon,--not goodly in outward view.
 A better gift than beauty is that I bring.
 
 THE. What boon dost thou profess to have brought with thee?
 
 OED. Thou shalt know by and by,--not yet awhile.
 
 THE. When comes the revelation of thine aid?
 
 OED. When I am dead, and thou hast buried me.
 
 THE. Thou cravest the last kindness. What's between
 Thou dost forget or else neglect.
 
 OED.                              Herein
 One word conveys the assurance of the whole.
 
 THE. You sum up your petition in brief form.
 
 OED. Look to it. Great issues hang upon this hour.
 
 THE. Mean'st thou in this the fortune of thy sons
 Or mine?
 
 OED.     I mean the force of their behest
 Compelling my removal hence to Thebes.
 
 THE. So thy consent were sought, 'twere fair to yield.
 
 OED. Once I was ready enough. They would not then.
 
 THE. Wrath is not wisdom in misfortune, man!
 
 OED. Nay, chide not till thou knowest.
 
 THE.                                   Inform me, then!
 I must not speak without just grounds.
 
 OED.                                   O Theseus,
 I am cruelly harassed with wrong heaped on wrong.
 
 THE. Mean'st thou that prime misfortune of thy birth?
 
 OED. No. That hath long been rumoured through the world.
 
 THE. What, then, can be thy grief? If more than that,
 'Tis more than human.
 
 OED.                  Here is my distress:--
 I am made an outcast from my native land
 By mine own offspring. And return is barred
 For ever to the man who slew his sire.
 
 THE. How then should they require thee to go near,
 And yet dwell separate?
 
 OED.                    The voice of Heaven
 Will drive them to it.
 
 THE.                   As fearing what reverse
 Prophetically told?
 
 OED.                Destined defeat
 By Athens in the Athenian land.
 
 THE.                            What source
 Of bitterness 'twixt us and Thebes can rise?
 
 OED. Dear son of Aegeus, to the Gods alone
 Comes never Age nor Death. All else i' the world
 Time, the all subduer, merges in oblivion.
 Earth and men's bodies weaken, fail, and perish.
 Faith withers, breach of faith springs up and glows
 And neither men nor cities that are friends
 Breathe the same spirit with continuing breath.
 Love shall be turned to hate, and hate to love
 With many hereafter, as with some to-day.
 And though, this hour, between great Thebes and thee
 No cloud be in the heaven, yet moving Time
 Enfolds a countless brood of days to come,
 Wherein for a light cause they shall destroy
 Your now harmonious league with severing war,
 Even where my slumbering form, buried in death,
 Coldly shall drink the life blood of my foes,
 If Zeus be Zeus, and his son Phoebus true.
 I would not speak aloud of mysteries.
 Then let me leave where I began. Preserve
 Thine own good faith, and thou shalt never say,
 Unless Heaven's promise fail me, that for nought
 Athens took Oedipus to dwell with her.
 
 CH. My lord, long since the stranger hath professed
 Like augury of blessings to our land.
 
 THE. And who would dare reject his proffered good?
 Whose bond with us of warrior amity
 Hath ne'er been sundered,--and to day he comes
 A God-sent suppliant, whose sacred hand
 Is rich with gifts for Athens and for me.
 In reverent heed whereof I ne'er will scorn
 The boon he brings, but plant him in our land.
 And if it please our friend to linger here,
 Ye shall protect him:--if to go with me
 Best likes thee, Oedipus,--ponder, and use
 Thy preference. For my course shall join with thine.
 
 OED. Ye Heavens, reward such excellence!
 
 THE.                                     How, then?
 Is it thy choice now to go home with me?
 
 OED. Yea, were it lawful. But in this same spot--
 
 THE. What wouldst thou do? I'll not withstand thy will.
 
 OED. I must have victory o'er my banishers.
 
 THE. Thy dwelling with us, then, is our great gain?
 
 OED. Yes, if thou fail me not, but keep thy word.
 
 THE. Nay, fear not me! I will aye be true to thee.
 
 OED. I will not bind thee, like a knave, with oaths.
 
 THE. Oaths were no stronger than my simple word.
 
 OED. What will ye do, then?
 
 THE.                        What is that thou fearest?
 
 OED. They will come hither.
 
 THE.                        Thy guards will see to that.
 
 OED. Beware, lest, if you leave me--
 
 THE.                                Tell not me,
 I know my part.
 
 OED.            Terror will have me speak.
 
 THE. Terror and I are strangers.
 
 OED.                             But their threats!
 Thou canst not know--
 
 THE.                 I know that none shall force
 Thee from this ground against thy will. Full oft
 Have threatening words in wrath been voluble,
 Yet, when the mind regained her place again,
 The threatened evil vanished. So to-day
 Bold words of boastful meaning have proclaimed
 Thy forcible abduction by thy kin.
 Yet shall they find (I know it) the voyage from Thebes,
 On such a quest, long and scarce navigable.
 Whate'er my thought, if Phoebus sent thee forth,
 I would bid thee have no fear. And howsoe'er,
 My name will shield thee from all injury.
 
 CHORUS.
 Friend! in our land of conquering steeds thou art come             I 1
 To this Heaven-fostered haunt, Earth's fairest home,
 Gleaming Colonos, where the nightingale
 In cool green covert warbleth ever clear,
 True to the clustering ivy and the dear
     Divine, impenetrable shade,
 From wildered boughs and myriad fruitage made,
 Sunless at noon, stormless in every gale.
 Wood-roving Bacchus there, with mazy round,
 And his nymph nurses range the unoffended ground.
 
 And nourished day by day with heavenly dew                         I 2
 Bright flowers their never-failing bloom renew,
 From eldest time Deo and Cora's crown
 Full-flowered narcissus, and the golden beam
 Of crocus, while Cephisus' gentle stream
     In runnels fed by sleepless springs
 Over the land's broad bosom daily brings
 His pregnant waters, never dwindling down.
 The quiring Muses love to seek the spot
 And Aphrodite's golden car forsakes it not.
 
 Here too a plant, nobler than e'er was known                      II 1
 On Asian soil, grander than yet hath grown
 In Pelops' mighty Dorian isle, unsown,
   Free, self-create, the conquering foeman's fear,
 The kind oil-olive, silvery-green,
 Chief nourisher of childish life, is seen
 To burgeon best in this our mother-land.
 No warrior, young, nor aged in command,
   Shall ravage this, or scathe it with the spear;
   For guardian Zeus' unslumbering eye
   Beholds it everlastingly,
 And Athens' grey-eyed Queen, dwelling for ever near.
 
 Yet one more praise mightier than all I tell                      II 2
 O'er this my home, that Ocean loves her well,
   And coursers love her, children of the wave
 To grace these roadways Prince Poseidon first
 Framed for the horse, that else had burst
 From man's control, the spirit taming bit
 And the trim bark, rowed by strong arms, doth flit
   O'er briny seas with glancing motion brave
   Lord of the deep! by that thy glorious gift
 Thou hast established our fair town
 For ever in supreme renown--
 The Sea nymphs' plashing throng glide not more smoothly swift.
 
 ANT. O land exalted thus in blessing and praise,
 Now is thy time to prove these brave words true.
 
 OED. What hath befallen, my daughter?
 
 ANT.                                  Here at hand,
 Not unaccompanied, is Creon, father.
 
 OED. Dear aged friends, be it yours now to provide
 My safety and the goal of my desire!
 
 CH. It shall be so. Fear nought. I am old and weak,
 But Athens in her might is ever young.
 
 _Enter_ CREON.
 
 CREON. Noble inhabiters of Attic ground
 I see as 'twere conceived within your eyes
 At mine approach some new engendered fear
 Nay, shrink not, nor let fall one fretful word.
 I bring no menace with me, for mine age
 Is feeble, and the state whereto I come
 Is mighty,--none in Hellas mightier,--
 That know I well. But I am sent to bring
 By fair persuasion to our Theban plain
 The reverend form of him now present here.
 Nor came this mission from one single will,
 But the commands of all my citizens
 Are on me, seeing that it becomes my birth
 To mourn his sorrows most of all the state
 Thou, then, poor sufferer, lend thine ear to me
 And come. All Cadmus' people rightfully
 Invite thee with one voice unto thy home,
 I before all,--since I were worst of men,
 Were I not pained at thy misfortunes, sir,
 --To see thee wandering in the stranger's land
 Aged and miserable, unhoused, unfed,
 Singly attended by this girl, whose fall
 To such a depth of undeserved woe
 I could not have imagined! Hapless maid!
 Evermore caring for thy poor blind head,
 Roving in beggary, so young, with no man
 To marry her,--a mark for all mischance.
 O misery, what deep reproach I have laid
 On thee and me and our whole ill-starred race!
 But who can hide evil that courts the day?
 Thou, therefore, Oedipus, without constraint,
 (By all the Gods of Cadmus' race I pray thee)
 Remove this horror from the sight of men
 By coming to the ancestral city and home
 Of thy great sires,--bidding a kind farewell
 To worthiest Athens, as is meet. But Thebes,
 Thy native land, yet more deserves thy love.
 
 OED. Thou unabashed in knavery, who canst frame
 For every cause the semblance of a plea
 Pranked up with righteous seeming, why again
 Would'st thou contrive my ruin, and attempt
 To catch me where I most were grieved being caught?
 Beforetime, when my self-procured woes
 Were plaguing me, and I would fain have rushed
 To instant banishment, thou wouldst not then
 Grant this indulgence to my keen desire.
 But when I had fed my passion to the full,
 And all my pleasure was to live at home,
 Then 'twas thy cue to expel and banish me,
 Nor was this name of kindred then so dear.
 Now once again, when thou behold'st this city
 And people joined in friendly bands with me,
 Thou wouldst drag me from my promised resting-place,
 Hiding hard policy with courtly show.
 Strange kindness, to love men against their will!
 Suppose, when thou wert eager in some suit,
 No grace were granted thee, but all denied,
 And when thy soul was sated, then the boon
 Were offered, when such grace were graceless now;
 --Poor satisfaction then were thine, I ween!
 Even such a gift thou profferest me to-day,
 Kind in pretence, but really full of evil.
 These men shall hear me tell thy wickedness.
 Thou comest to take me, not unto my home,
 But to dwell outlawed at your gate, that so
 Your Thebe may come off untouched of harm
 From her encounter with Athenian men.
 Ye shall not have me thus. But you shall have
 My vengeful spirit ever in your land
 Abiding for destruction,--and my sons
 Shall have this portion in their father's ground,
 To die thereon. Know I not things in Thebes
 Better than thou? Yea, for 'tis mine to hear
 Safer intelligencers,--Zeus himself,
 And Phoebus, high interpreter of Heaven.
 Thou bring'st a tongue suborned with false pretence,
 Sharpened with insolence;--but in shrewd speech
 Thou shalt find less of profit than of bane.
 This thou wilt ne'er believe. Therefore begone!
 Let me live here. For even such life as mine
 Were not amiss, might I but have my will.
 
 CR. Which of us twain, believ'st thou, in this talk
 Hath more profoundly sinned against thy peace?
 
 OED. If thou prevail'st with these men present here
 Even as with me, I shall be well content.
 
 CR. Unhappy man, will not even Time bring forth
 One spark of wisdom to redeem thine age?
 
 OED. Thou art a clever talker. But I know
 No just man who in every cause abounds
 With eloquent speech.
 
 CR.                   'Tis not to abound in speech,
 When one speaks fitting words in season.
 
 OED.                                     Oh!
 As if thy words were few and seasonable!
 
 CR. Not in the dotard's judgement.
 
 OED.                               Get thee gone!
 I speak their mind as well--and dog not me
 Beleaguering mine appointed dwelling-place!
 
 CR. These men shall witness--for thy word is naught;
 And for thy spiteful answer to thy friends,
 If once I seize thee--
 
 OED.                  Who shall seize on me
 Without the will of my protectors here?
 
 CR. Well, short of that, thou shalt have pain, I trow.
 
 OED. What hast thou done, that thou canst threaten thus?
 
 CR. One of thy daughters I have sent in charge.
 This other, I myself will quickly take.
 
 OED. Oh, cruel!
 
 CR.             Soon thou'lt have more cause to cry.
 
 OED. Hast thou my child?
 
 CR.                      I will have both ere long.
 
 OED. Dear friends, what will ye do? Will ye forsake me?
 Will you not drive the offender from your land?
 
 CH. Stranger, depart at once! Thou hast done wrong,
 And wrong art doing.
 
 CR. (_to attendants_).
                      Now then, lead her away
 By force, if she refuse to go with you.
 
 ANT. Ah me! unhappy! Whither shall I flee?
 What aid of God or mortal can I find?
 
 CH. What dost thou, stranger?
 
 CR.                           I will lay no hand
 On him, but on my kinswoman.
 
 OED.                         Alas!
 Lords of Colonos, will ye suffer it?
 
 CH. Thou art transgressing, stranger.
 
 CR.                                   Nay, I stand
 Within my right.
 
 CH.              How so?
 
 CR.                      I take mine own.
 
 OED. Athens to aid!
 
 CH.                 Stranger, forbear! What dost thou?
 Let go, or thou shalt try thy strength with us.
 
 CR. Unhand me!
 
 CH.            Not while this intent is thine.
 
 CR. If you harm me, you will have war with Thebes.
 
 OED. Did I not tell you this would come?
 
 CH.                                      Release
 The maid with speed.
 
 CR.                  Command where you have power.
 
 CH. Leave hold, I say!
 
 CR.                    Away with her, say I!
 
 CH. Come hither, neighbours, come!
 My city suffers violence. Wrongful men
 Are hurting her with force. Come hither to me!
 
 ANT. Unhappy, I am dragged away,--O strangers!
 
 OED. Where art thou, O my child?
 
 ANT.                             I go away
 Against my will.
 
 OED.             Reach forth thy hands, my daughter!
 
 ANT. I cannot.
 
 CR.            Off with her!
 
 OED.                         Alas, undone! [_Exit_ ANTIGONE, _guarded_
 
 CR. Thou shalt not have these staves henceforth to prop
 Thy roaming to and fro. Take thine own way!
 Since thou hast chosen to thwart thy nearest kin,--
 Beneath whose orders, though a royal man,
 I act herein,--and thine own native land.
 The time will surely come when thou shalt find
 That in this deed and all that thou hast done
 In opposition to their friendly will,
 Thou hast counselled foolishly against thy peace,
 Yielding to anger, thy perpetual bane.                        [_Going_
 
 CH. Stranger, stand where thou art!
 
 CR.                                 Hands off, I say!
 
 CH. Thou shalt not go, till thou restore the maids.
 
 CR. Soon, then, my city shall retain from you
 A weightier cause of war. I will lay hands
 Not on the maidens only.
 
 CH.                      What wilt thou do?
 
 CR. Oedipus I will seize and bear away.
 
 CH. Great Heaven forfend!
 
 CR.                       It shall be done forthwith,
 Unless the ruler of this land prevent me.
 
 OED. O shameless utterance! Wilt thou lay thy hold
 On me?
 
 CR.    Be silent! Speak no more!
 
 OED.                             No more?
 May these dread Goddesses not close my lips
 To this one prayer of evil against thee,
 Thou villain, who, when I have lost mine eyes,
 Bereavest me of all that I had left
 To make my darkness light! Therefore I pray,
 For this thy wrongful act, may He in heaven
 Whose eye sees all things, Helios, give to thee
 Slowly to wither in an age like mine!
 
 CR. Men of this land, bear witness to his rage!
 
 OED. They see us both, and are aware that I
 Repay thee but with words for deeds of wrong.
 
 CR. No longer will I curb my wrath. Though lonely
 And cumbered by mine age, I will bear off
 This man!
 
 OED.      Me miserable!
 
 CH.                     How bold thou art,
 If standing here thou think'st to do this thing!
 
 CR. I do.
 
 CH.       Then Athens is to me no city.
 
 CR. Slight men prevail o'er strength in a just cause.
 
 OED. Hear ye his words?
 
 CH.                     He shall not make them good.
 Be witness, Zeus!
 
 CR.               Zeus knows more things than thou.
 
 OED. Is not this violence?
 
 CR.                        Violence you must bear.
 
 CH. Come, chieftain of our land!
 Come hither with all speed. They pass the bound.
 
 _Enter_ THESEUS.
 
 THE. Wherefore that shouting? Daunted by what fear
 Stayed ye me sacrificing to the God[2]
 Who guards this deme Colonos? Let me know
 What cause so hastened my reluctant foot.
 
 OED. Dear friend (I know thy voice addressing us),
 One here hath lately done me cruel wrong.
 
 THE. Who is the wrong-doer, say, and what the deed?
 
 OED. This Creon, whom thou seest, hath torn away
 Two children that were all in all to me.
 
 THE. Can this be possible?
 
 OED.                       Thou hear'st the truth.
 
 THE. Then one of you run to the altar-foot
 Hard by, and haste the people from the rite,
 Horsemen and footmen at the height of speed
 To race unto the parting of the roads
 Where travellers from both gorges wont to meet.
 Lest there the maidens pass beyond our reach
 And I be worsted by this stranger's might
 And let him laugh at me. Be swift! Away!
 --For him, were I as wroth as he deserves,
 He should not go unpunished from my hand.
 But now he shall be ruled by the same law
 He thought to enforce. Thou goest not from this ground
 Till thou hast set these maids in presence here;
 Since by thine act thou hast disgraced both me
 And thine own lineage and thy native land,
 Who with unlicensed inroad hast assailed
 An ancient city, that hath still observed
 Justice and equity, and apart from law
 Ratifies nothing; and, being here, hast cast
 Authority to the winds, and made thine own
 Whate'er thou wouldst, bearing it off perforce,--
 Deeming of me forsooth as nothing worth,
 And of my city as one enslaved to foes
 Or void of manhood. Not of Thebe's will
 Come such wild courses. It is not her way
 To foster men in sin, nor would she praise
 Thy doing, if she knew that thou hast robbed
 Me and the gods, dragging poor suppliant wights
 From their last refuge at thy will--I would not,
 Had I perchance set foot within thy land,
 Even were my cause most righteous, have presumed,
 Without consent of him who bore chief sway,
 To seize on any man, but would have known
 How men should act who tread on foreign soil.
 Thou bring'st disgrace on thine own mother state
 All undeservedly, and the lapse of years
 Hath left thee aged, but not wise--Again
 I bid those maids now to be brought with speed,
 Unless thou would'st be made a sojourner
 In Athens by compulsion. This I speak
 Not with my lips alone, but from my will.
 
 CH. Stranger, dost thou perceive? Thy parentage
 Is owned as noble, but thine evil deeds
 Are blazoned visibly.
 
 CR.                   Great Aegeus' son!
 Not as misprising this thy city's strength
 In arms, or wisdom in debate, I dared
 This capture, but in simple confidence
 Thy citizens would not so envy me
 My blood relations, as to harbour them
 Against my will,--nor welcome to their hearths
 A man incestuous and a parricide,
 The proved defiler of his mother's bed
 Such was the mount of Ares that I knew,
 Seat of high wisdom, planted in their soil,
 That suffers no such lawless runaways
 To haunt within the borders of your realm.
 Relying on that I laid my hands upon
 This quarry, nor had done so, were it not
 That bitterly he cursed myself and mine.
 That moved me to requital, since even Age
 Still bears resentment, till the power of death
 Frees men from anger, as from all annoy.
 Being sovereign here thou wilt do thy pleasure. I,
 Though I have justice on my side, am weak
 Through being alone. Yet if you meddle with me,
 Old as I am, you'll find me dangerous.
 
 OED. O boldness void of shame! Whom dost thou think
 Thy obloquy most harms, this aged head
 Or thine, who hast thus let pass thy lips the crimes
 I have borne unwittingly. So Heaven was pleased
 To wreak some old offence upon our race.
 Since in myself you will find no stain of sin
 For which such ruinous error 'gainst myself
 And mine own house might be the recompense.
 Tell me, I pray thee, if a word from Heaven
 Came to my father through the oracle
 That he should die by his son's hand,--what right
 Hast thou to fasten that reproach on me,
 The child not yet begotten of my sire,
 An unborn nothing, unconceived? Or if,
 Born as I was to misery, I encountered
 And killed my father in an angry fray,
 Nought knowing of what I did or whom I slew,
 What reason is't to blame the unwitting deed?
 And, oh, thou wretch! art not ashamed to force me
 To speak that of my mother, thine own sister,
 Which I will speak, for I will not keep silence,
 Since thou hast been thus impious with thy tongue.
 She was my mother, oh, the bitter word!
 Though neither knew it, and having borne me, she
 Became the mother of children to her son,
 An infamous birth! Yet this I know, thy crime
 Of speech against us both is voluntary.
 But all involuntary was my deed
 In marriage and is this mine utterance now.
 No,--that shall not be called a bosom-sin,
 Nor shall my name be sullied with the deed,
 Thy tongue would brand on me, against my sire.
 For answer me one question. If to-day,
 Here, now, one struck at thee a murderous stroke,--
 At thee, the righteous person,--wouldst thou ask
 If such assailant were thy sire, or strike
 Forthwith? Methinks, as one who cares to live,
 You would strike before you questioned of the right,
 Or reasoned of his kindred whom you slew.
 Such was the net that snared me: such the woes
 Heaven drew me to fulfil. My father's spirit,
 Came he to life, would not gainsay my word.
 But thou, to whom, beneath the garb of right,
 No matter is too dreadful or too deep
 For words, so rail'st on me, in such a presence.
 Well thou dost flatter the great name of Theseus,
 And Athens in her glory stablished here,
 But midst thy fulsome praises thou forgettest
 How of all lands that yield the immortal Gods
 Just homage of true piety, this land
 Is foremost. Yet from hence thou would'st beguile
 Me, the aged suppliant. Nay, from hence thou would'st drag
 Myself with violence, and hast reft away
 My children. Wherefore I conjure these powers,
 With solemn invocation and appeal,
 To come and take my part, that thou may'st know
 What men they are who guard this hallowed realm.
 
 CH. My lord, the stranger deserves well. His fate
 Is grievous, but the more demands our aid.
 
 THE. Enough of words. The captors and their prey
 Are hasting;--we, they have wronged, are standing still.
 
 CR. I am powerless here. What dost thou bid me do?
 
 THE. Lead us the way they are gone. I too must be
 Thine escort, that if hereabout thou hast
 Our maidens, thou mayest show them to my sight.
 But if men flee and bear them, we may spare
 Superfluous labour. Others hotly urge
 That business, whom those robbers shall not boast
 Before their Gods to have 'scaped out of this land.
 Come, be our guide! Thou hast and hast not. Fortune
 Hath seized thee seizing on thy prey. So quickly
 Passes the gain that's got by wrongful guile.
 Nay, thou shalt have no helper. Well I wot
 Thou flew'st not to this pitch of truculent pride
 Alone, or unsupported by intrigue;
 But thy bold act hath some confederate here.
 This I must look into, nor let great Athens
 Prove herself weaker than one single man.
 Hast caught my drift? Or is my voice as vain
 Now, as you thought it when you planned this thing?
 
 CR. I will gainsay nought of what thou utterest here.
 But once in Thebes, I too shall know my course.
 
 THE. Threaten, but go! Thou, Oedipus, remain
 In quietness and perfect trust that I,
 If death do not prevent me, will not rest
 Till I restore thy children to thy hand.
 
 CHORUS.
   Soon shall the wheeling foes                                     I 1
 Clash with the din of brazen-throated War.
   Would I were there to see them close,
 Be the onset near or far!
 Whether at Daphne's gorge to Phoebus dear,
   Or by the torch-lit shore
 Where kind maternal powers for evermore
 Guard golden mysteries of holy fear
   To nourish mortal souls
 Whose voice the seal of silent awe controls
 Imprinted by the Eumolpid minister.
   There, on that sacred way,
   Shall the divinest head
 Of royal Theseus, rouser of the fray,
 And those free maids, in their two squadrons led,
   Meet in the valorous fight
   That conquers for the right.
 
   Else, by the snow-capped rock,                                   I 2
 Passing to westward, they are drawing nigh
 The tract beyond the pasture high
   Where Oea feeds her flock.
 The riders ride, the rattling chariots flee
   At racing speed.--'Tis done!
 He shall be vanquished. Our land's chivalry
   Are valiant, valiant every warrior son
   Of Theseus.--On they run?
 Frontlet and bridle glancing to the light,
 Forward each steed is straining to the fight,
   Forward each eye and hand
   Of all that mounted band,
 Athena's knighthood, champions of her name
 And his who doth the mighty waters tame,
   Rhea's son that from of old
   Doth the Earth with seas enfold.
 
 Strive they? Or is the battle still to be?                        II 1
     An eager thought in me
 Is pleading, 'Soon must they restore
 The enduring maid, whose kinsmen vex her sore!'
 To-day shall Zeus perform his will.
 The noble cause wins my prophetic skill.
 Oh! had I wings, and like a storm-swift dove
 Poised on some aery cloud might there descry
     The conflict from above,
 Scouring the region with mine eye!
 
 Sovran of Heaven, all-seeing Zeus, afford                         II 2
     Unto this nation's lord
 Puissance to crown the fair emprise,
 Thou, and all-knowing Pallas, thy dread child!
 Apollo, huntsman of the wild,
 --Thou and thy sister, who doth still pursue
 Swift many-spotted stags,--arise, arise,
 With love we pray you, be our champions true!
     Yea, both together come
 To aid our people and our home!
 
 LEADER OF CH.
 Ah! wanderer friend, thou wilt not have to accuse
 Thy seer of falsehood. I behold the maids
 This way once more in safe protection brought.
 
 OED. Where? Is it true? How say you?
 
 ANT.                                 Father, father!
 Oh that some God would give thee once to see
 The man whose royal virtue brings us hither!
 
 OED. My daughters, are ye there?
 
 ANT.                             Saved by the arm
 Of Theseus and his most dear ministers.
 
 OED. Come near me, child, and let your father feel
 The treasure he had feared for ever gone.
 
 ANT. Not hard the boon which the heart longs to give.
 
 OED. Where are ye, where?
 
 ANT.                      Together we draw near.
 
 OED. Loved saplings of a solitary tree!
 
 ANT. A father's heart hides all.
 
 OED.                             Staves of mine age!
 
 ANT. Forlorn supporters of an ill-starred life!
 
 OED. I have all I love; nor would the stroke of death
 Be wholly bitter, with you standing by.
 Press close to either side of me, my children;
 Grow to your sire, and ye shall give me rest
 From mine else lonely, hapless, wandering life.
 And tell your tale as briefly as ye may,
 Since at your age short speaking is enough.
 
 ANT. Here is our saviour. He shall tell thee all,
 And shorten labour both for us and thee.
 
 OED. Think it not strange, dear friend, that I prolong
 The unhoped-for greeting with my children here.
 Full well I know, the joy I find in them
 Springs from thee only, and from none beside.
 Thou, thou alone hast saved them. May the Gods
 Fulfil my prayer for thee and for thy land!
 Since only in Athens, only here i' the world,
 Have I found pious thought and righteous care,
 And truth in word and deed. From a full heart
 And thankful mind I thus requite thy love,
 Knowing all I have is due to none but thee.
 Extend to me, I pray thee, thy right hand,
 O King, that I may feel thee, and may kiss,
 If that be lawful, thy dear head! And yet
 What am I asking? How can one like me
 Desire of thee to touch an outlawed man,
 On whose dark life all stains of sin and woe
 Are fixed indelibly? I will not dare--
 No, nor allow thee!--None but only they
 Who have experience of such woes as mine
 May share their wretchedness. Thou, where thou art
 Receive my salutation, and henceforth
 Continue in thy promised care of me
 As true as to this moment thou hast proved.
 
 THE. I marvel not at all if mere delight
 In these thy daughters lengthened thy discourse,
 Or led thee to address them before me.
 That gives me not the shadow of annoy.
 Nor am I careful to adorn my life
 With words of praise, but with the light of deeds.
 And thou hast proof of this. For I have failed
 In nought of all I promised, aged King!
 Here stand I with thy children in full life
 Unharmed in aught the foe had threatened them.
 And now why vaunt the deeds that won the day,
 When these dear maids will tell them in thine ear?
 But let me crave thy counsel on a thing
 That crossed me as I came. Small though it seem
 When told, 'tis worthy of some wonder, too.
 Be it small or great, men should not let things pass.
 
 OED. What is it, O son of Aegeus? Let me hear,
 I am wholly ignorant herein.
 
 THE.                         We are told
 One, not thy townsman, but of kin to thee,
 Hath come in unawares, and now is found
 Kneeling at great Poseidon's altar, where
 I sacrificed, what time ye called me hither.
 
 OED. What countryman, and wherefore suppliant there?
 
 THE. One thing alone I know. He craves of thee
 Some speech, they say, that will not hold thee long.
 
 OED. His kneeling there imports no trivial suit.
 
 THE. All he desires, they tell me, is to come,
 Have speech with thee, and go unharmed away.
 
 OED. Who can he be that kneels for such a boon?
 
 THE. Think, if at Argos thou a kinsman hast
 Who might desire to obtain so much of thee.
 
 OED. Dear friend! Hold there! No more!
 
 THE.                                   What troubles thee?
 
 OED. Ask it not of me!
 
 THE.                   What? Speak plainly forth.
 
 OED. Thy words have shown me who the stranger is.
 
 THE. And who is he that I should say him nay?
 
 OED. My son, O King,--hateful to me, whose tongue
 Least of the world I could endure to hear.
 
 THE. What pain is there in hearing? Canst thou not
 Hear, and refuse to do what thou mislikest?
 
 OED. My Lord, I have come to loathe his very voice.
 I pray thee, urge me not to yield in this.
 
 THE. Think that the God must be considered too,
 The right of suppliants may compel thy care.
 
 ANT. Father, give ear, though I be young that speak.
 Yield to the scruple of the King, who claims
 This reverence for his people's God, and yield
 To us who beg our brother may come near.
 Take heart! He will not force thee from thy will.
 What harm can come of hearkening? Wisdom's ways
 Reveal themselves through words. He is thy son.
 Whence, were his heartless conduct against thee
 Beyond redemption impious, O my sire,
 Thy vengeance still would be unnatural.
 Oh let him!--Others have had evil sons
 And passionate anger, but the warning voice
 Of friends hath charmed their mood. Then do not thou
 Look narrowly upon thy present griefs,
 But on those ancient wrongs thou didst endure
 From father and from mother. Thence thou wilt learn
 That evil passion ever ends in woe.
 Thy sightless eyes are no light argument
 To warn thee through the feeling of thy loss.
 Relent and hear us! 'Tis a mere disgrace
 To beg so long for a just boon. The King
 Is kind to thee. Be generous in return.
 
 OED. Child, your dear pleading to your hard request
 Hath won me. Let this be as ye desire.
 Only, my lord, if he is to come near,
 Let no man's power molest my liberty.
 
 THE. I need no repetition, aged friend,
 Of that request. Vaunt will I not, but thou
 Be sure, if Heaven protect me, thou art free.
 
 CHORUS.
         Who, loving life, hath sought                              I 1
           To outlive the appointed span,
         Shall be arraigned before my thought
           For an infatuate man.
         Since the added years entail
           Much that is bitter,--joy
         Flies out of ken, desire doth fail,
           The longed-for moments cloy.
         But when the troublous life,
           Be it less or more, is past,
         With power to end the strife
           Comes rescuing Death at last.
 Lo! the dark bridegroom waits! No festal choir
 Shall grace his destined hour, no dance, no lyre!
 
         Far best were ne'er to be,                                 I 2
           But, having seen the day,
         Next best by far for each to flee
           As swiftly as each may,
         Yonder from whence he came:
           For once let Youth be there
         With her light fooleries, who shall name
           The unnumbered brood of Care?
         No trial spared, no fall!
           Feuds, battles, murders, rage,
         Envy, and last of all,
           Despised, dim, friendless age!
 Ay, there all evils, crowded in one room,
 Each at his worst of ill, augment the gloom.
 
 Such lot is mine, and round this man of woe,                        II
   --As some grey headland of a northward shore
 Bears buffets of all-wintry winds that blow,--
   New storms of Fate are bursting evermore
     In thundrous billows, borne
     Some from the waning light,
 Some through mid-noon, some from the rising morn,
     Some from the realm of Night.
 
 ANT. Ah! Who comes here? Sure 'tis the Argive man
 Approaching hitherward, weeping amain.
 And, father, it is he!
 
 OED.                   Whom dost thou mean?
 
 ANT. The same our thoughts have dwelt on all this while,
 Polynices. He is here.
 
 POLYNICES.             What shall I do?
 I stand in doubt which first I should lament,
 My own misfortune or my father's woe,
 Whom here I find an outcast in his age
 With you, my sisters, in the stranger land,
 Clothed in such raiment, whose inveterate filth
 Horridly clings, wasting his reverend form,
 While the grey locks over the eye-reft brow
 Wave all unkempt upon the ruffling breeze.
 And likewise miserable appears the store
 He bears to nourish that time-wasted frame.
 Wretch that I am! Too late I learn the truth,
 And here give witness to mine own disgrace,
 Which is as deep as thy distress. Myself
 Declare it. Ask not others of my guilt.
 But seeing that Zeus on his almighty throne
 Keeps Mercy in all he doth to counsel him,
 Thou, too, my father, let her plead with thee!
 The evil that is done may yet be healed;
 It cannot be augmented. Art thou silent?
 O turn not from me, father! Speak but once!
 Wilt thou not answer, but with shame dismiss me
 Voiceless, nor make known wherefore thou art wroth?
 O ye his daughters, one with me in blood,
 Say, will not ye endeavour to unlock
 The stern lips of our unrelenting sire?
 Let him not thus reject in silent scorn
 Without response the suppliant of Heaven!
 
 ANT. Thyself, unhappy one, say why thou camest.
 Speech ofttimes, as it flows, touching some root
 Of pity or joy, or even of hate, hath stirred
 The dumb to utterance.
 
 POL.                   I will tell my need:--
 First claiming for protector the dread God
 From whose high altar he who rules this land
 Hath brought me under safe-guard of his power,
 Scatheless to speak and hear and go my way.
 His word, I am well assured, will be made good,
 Strangers, by you, and by my sisters twain,
 And by our sire.--Now let me name mine errand.
 I am banished, father, from our native land,
 Because, being elder-born, I claimed to sit
 Upon thy sovereign throne. For this offence
 Eteocles, thy younger son, exiled me,
 Not having won the advantage in debate
 Or trial of manhood, but through guileful art
 Gaining the people's will. Whereof I deem
 Thy Fury the chief author; and thereto
 Prophetic voices also testify.
 For when I had come to Dorian Argolis,
 I raised, through marriage with Adrastus' child,
 An army bound in friendly league with me,
 Led by the men who in the Apian land
 Hold first pre-eminence and honour in war,
 With whose aid levying all that mighty host
 Of seven battalions, I have deeply sworn
 Either to die, or drive from Theban ground
 Those who such wrongs have wrought. So far, so well.
 But why come hither? Father, to crave thine aid
 With earnest supplication for myself
 And for my firm allies, who at this hour,
 Seven leaders of seven bands embattled there,
 Encompass Thebe's plain. Amphiaraus,
 Foremost in augury, foremost in war,
 First wields his warlike spear. Next, Oeneus' son,
 Aetolian Tydeus; then Eteoclus
 Of Argive lineage; fourth, Hippomedon,
 Sent by his father Talaues, and the fifth
 Is Capancus, who brags he will destroy
 Thebe with desolating fire. The sixth,
 Parthonopaeus, from the Arcadian glen
 Comes bravely down, swift Atalanta's child,
 Named from his mother's lingering maidenhood
 Ere she conceived him. And the seventh am I,
 Thy son, or if not thine, but the dire birth
 Of evil Destiny, yet named thy son,
 Who lead this dauntless host from Argolis
 Against the Theban land. Now one and all
 We pray thee on our knees, conjuring thee
 As thou dost love these maids and thine own life,
 My father, to forgive me, ere I go
 To be revenged upon my brother there
 Who drave me forth and robbed me of my throne.
 If aught in prophecy deserves belief,
 'Tis certain, whom thou favourest, those shall win.
 Now by the wells whereof our fathers drank
 And by the Gods they worshipped, hear our prayer,
 Grant this petition: since alike in woe,
 Alike in poverty and banishment,
 Partakers of one destiny, thou and I
 Cringe to the stranger for a dwelling place.
 Whilst he at home, the tyrant, woe is me,
 Laughs at us both in soft luxurious pride.
 Whose might, so thou wilt favour my design,
 I will lightly scatter in one little hour;
 And plant thee in thy Theban palace home
 Near to myself, hurling the usurper forth.
 All this with thy consent I shall achieve,
 But without thee, I forfeit life and all.
 
 CH. For his sake who hath brought him, Oedipus,
 Say what is meet, and let him go in peace.
 
 OED. Ay, were it not the lord of all this land
 Theseus, that brought him to me and desired
 He might hear words from me,--never again
 Had these tones fallen upon his ear. But now
 That boon is granted him: he shall obtain,
 Ere he depart, such utterance of my tongue,
 As ne'er shall give him joy,--ne'er comfort thee,
 Villain, who when possessed of the chief power
 Which now thy brother holds o'er Theban land,
 Didst banish me, thy father, who stand here,
 To live in exile, clothed with such attire,
 That moves thy tears now that thine own estate
 Is fallen into like depth of struggling woe.
 But tears are bootless. Howsoe'er I live,
 I must endure, and hold thee still my murderer.
 'Tis thou hast girt me round with misery,
 'Tis thou didst drive me forth, and driven by thee
 I beg my bread, a wandering sojourner.
 Yea, had these daughters not been born to me
 To tend me, I were dead, for all thou hast done.
 They have rescued, they have nursed me. They are men,
 Not women, in the strength of ministry.
 Ye are another's, not my sons--For this
 The eye of Destiny pursues thee still
 Eager to light on thee with instant doom
 If once that army move toward the town
 Of ancient Thebes,--the _town_, no dearer name,
 'City' or 'Country' shall beseem thy lip
 Till ye both fall, stained with fraternal gore
 Long since I launched that curse against you twain
 Which here again I summon to mine aid,
 That ye may learn what duty children owe
 To a parent, nor account it a light thing
 That ye were cruel sons to your blind sire.
 These maidens did not so. Wherefore my curse
 Prevails against thy prayer for Thebe's throne,
 If ancient Zeus, the eternal lawgiver,
 Have primal Justice for his counsellor.
 Begone, renounced and fatherless for me,
 And take with thee, vilest of villanous men,
 This imprecation:--Vain be thine attempt
 In levying war against thy father's race,
 Frustrate be thy return to Argos' vale:
 Die foully by a fratricidal hand
 And foully slay him who hath banished thee!
 Further, I bid the horror breathing gloom
 Tartarean, of the vault that holds my sire,
 To banish thee from that last home: I invoke
 The Spirits who haunt this ground, and the fierce God
 Who hath filled you both with this unnatural hate.--
 Go now with all this in thine ears, and tell
 The people of Cadmus and thy firm allies
 In whom thou trustest, what inheritance
 Oedipus hath divided to his sons.
 
 CH. 'Tis pity for thee, prince, to have come at all;
 And now we bid thee go the way thou camest.
 
 POL. Alas! Vain enterprise, and hope undone!
 Oh, my poor comrades! To what fatal end
 I led you forth from Argos, woe is me!
 I may not tell it you,--no, nor return.
 In silence I must go to meet my doom.
 Daughters of this inexorable sire,
 Since now ye have heard his cruel curse on me,
 Ah! in Heaven's name, my sisters, do not you
 Treat me despitefully, but if, one day,
 Our father's execration is fulfilled
 And ye shall be restored to Theban ground,
 Grace me with funeral honours and a tomb!
 So shall this ample praise which ye receive
 For filial ministration, in that day
 Be more than doubled through your care for me.
 
 ANT. Brother, I beg thee, listen to my prayer!
 
 POL. Dearest Antigone, speak what thou wilt.
 
 ANT. Turn back thy host to Argos with all speed,
 And ruin not thyself and Thebe too.
 
 POL. Impossible. If once I shrink for fear,
 No longer may I lead them to the war.
 
 ANT. But why renew thy rage? What benefit
 Comes to thee from o'erturning thine own land?
 
 POL. 'Tis shameful to remain in banishment,
 And let my brother mock my right of birth.
 
 ANT. Then seest thou not how true unto their aim
 Our father's prophecies of mutual death
 Against you both are sped?
 
 POL.                       He speaks his wish.
 'Tis not for me to yield.
 
 ANT.                      O me, unhappy!
 But who that hears the deep oracular sound
 Of his dark words, will dare to follow thee?
 
 POL. They will not hear of danger from my mouth.
 Wise generals tell of vantage, not of bale.
 
 ANT. Art thou then so resolved, O brother mine?
 
 POL. I am. Retard me not! I must attend
 To my dark enterprise, blasted and foiled
 Beforehand by my father's angry curse.
 But as for you, Heaven prosper all your way,
 If ye will show this kindness in my death,
 For nevermore in life shall ye befriend me!
 Nay, cling to me no longer. Fare ye well.
 Ye will behold my living form no more.
 
 ANT. O misery!
 
 POL.           Bewail me not.
 
 ANT.                          And who
 That saw thee hurrying forth to certain death
 Would not bewail thee, brother?
 
 POL.                            If Fate wills,
 Why, I must die.
 
 ANT.             Nay, but be ruled by me.
 
 POL. Give me not craven counsel.
 
 ANT.                             Woe is me,
 To lose thee!
 
 POL.          Heaven hath power to guide the event
 Or thus or otherwise. Howe'er it prove,
 I pray that ye may ne'er encounter ill.
 All men may know, ye merit nought but good.
                    [_Exit. The sky is overcast--a storm is threatened_
 
 CHORUS.
 New trouble, strange trouble, deep laden with doom,                I 1
 From the sight-bereft stranger seems dimly to loom!
       Or peers Fate through the gloom?
 She will move toward her mark or through shining or shade;
 Since no purpose of Gods ever idly was made.
 Time sees the fulfilment, who lifteth to-day
 What was lowly, and trampleth the lofty to clay.
       Thunder! Heavens! what a sound!
 
 OED. My children! Would but some one in the place
 Haste hither Theseus, noblest among men!
 
 ANT. Wherefore, my father? What is thy desire?
 
 OED. These winged thunders of the Highest will soon
 Bear me away to the Unseen. Send quickly!
 
 CHORUS.
 Again, yonder crash through the fire-startled air                  I 2
 Wing'd from Zeus, rushes down, till my thin locks of hair,
       Stiff with fear, upward stare.
 My soul shrinks and cowers, for yon gleam from on high
 Darts again! Ne'er in vain hath it leapt from the sky,
 But flies forth amain to what task Zeus hath given.
 I fear the unknown fatal edict of Heaven!
       Lightning glares all around!
 
 OED. My daughters, the divinely promised end
 Here unavoidably descends on me.
 
 ANT. How dost thou know it? By what certain sign?
 
 OED. I know it perfectly. Let some one go
 With speed to bring the lord of Athens hither.
 
 CHORUS.
 Great Heaven, how above me, beside me, around,                    II 1
       Peals redoubled the soul-thrilling sound!
 O our God, to this land, to our mother, if aught
 Thou wouldst send with some darkness of destiny fraught,
 Smile gently once more! With the good let me bear
       What of fortune soe'er,--
 Taste no cup, touch no food, the doomed sinner may share.
       Zeus, to thee, Lord, I cry!
 
 OED. Is the King coming? Will he find me alive,
 My daughters, and with reason undisturbed?
 
 ANT. Say wherefore dost thou crave with such desire
 The clearness of an undistracted mind?
 
 OED. I would fully render from a grateful soul
 The boon I promised, when I gained my suit.
 
 CHORUS (_looking towards Athens_).
 Come, my chief! come with speed! Or, if haply at hand,            II 2
       On the height where the curved altars stand,
 Thou art hallowing with oxen in sacrifice slain
 Yonder shrine of Poseidon, dread lord of the main,
 Hie thee hither! Be swift! The blind stranger intends
       To thee, to thy friends,
 To thy city, for burdens imposed, just amends.
       Haste thee, King! Hear our cry!
 
 _Enter_ THESEUS.
 
 THE. Why sounds again from hence your joint appeal,
 Wherein the stranger's voice is loudly heard?
 Is it some lightning-bolt new-fallen from Zeus,
 Or cloud-born hail that is come rattling down?
 From Heavens so black with storm nought can surprise.
 
 OED. Prince, thou art come to my desire. Some God
 Hath happily directed this thy way.
 
 THE. What is befallen? Son of Laius, tell!
 
 OED. My path slopes downward, and before my death
 I would confirm to Athens and to thee
 My promised boon.
 
 THE.              What sign dost thou perceive
 That proves thine end so near?
 
 OED.                           The Gods themselves
 With herald voices are proclaiming it,
 Nought failing of the fore-appointed signs.
 
 THE. What are these tokens, aged monarch, say?
 
 OED. The loud continual thunder, and the darts
 That flash in volleys from the unconquered hand.
 
 THE. I may not doubt thee; for thy speech, I feel,
 Hath ample witness of prophetic power.
 What must I do?
 
 OED.            I will instruct thee now,
 Aegeus' great son! in rites that shall remain
 An ageless treasure to thy countrymen.
 I will presently, with no man guiding me,
 Conduct thee to the spot, where I must die.
 This is thy secret, not to be revealed
 To any one of men, or where 'tis hid
 Or whereabout it lies. So through all time
 This neighbouring[3] mound shall yield thee mightier aid
 Than many a shield and help of alien spears.
 More shalt thou learn, too sacred to divulge,
 When yonder thou art come thyself alone.
 Since to none other of these citizens
 Nor even unto the children of my love
 May I disclose it. 'Tis for thee to keep
 Inviolate while thou livest, and when thy days
 Have ending, breathe it to the foremost man
 Alone, and he in turn unto the next
 Successively. So shalt thou ever hold
 Athens unravaged by the dragon brood[4].
 Cities are numberless, and any one
 May lightly insult even those who dwell secure.
 For the eye of Heaven though late yet surely sees
 When, casting off respect, men turn to crime.
 Erechtheus' heir! let that be far from thee!
 A warning needless to a man so wise!
 Now go we--for this leading of the God
 Is urgent--to the place, nor loiter more.
 This way, my children! follow me! For I
 Am now your guide, as ye were mine. Come on!
 Nay, touch me not, but leave me of myself
 To find the holy sepulchre, wherein
 This form must rest beneath Athenian soil.
 Come this way! Come! This way are leading me
 Guide Hermes and the Queen of realms below.
 O Light, all dark to me! In former time
 Bright seemed thy shining! Now thy latest ray
 Sheds vital influence o'er this frame. I go
 To hide the close of my disastrous life
 With Hades. Kind Athenian friend, farewell!
 May'st thou, thy followers, and this glorious land
 Be happy, and in your endless happiness
 Remember him who blessed you in his death.                   [_Exeunt_
 
 CHORUS.
 Prince of the Powers Unseen,                                         1
   Durst we with prayers adore
 Thee and thy viewless Queen,
   Your aid, Aidoneus, would our lips implore!
 By no harsh-sounding doom
     Let him we love descend,
     With calm and cloudless end,
   In deep Plutonian dwelling evermore
 To abide among the people of the tomb!
 Long worn with many an undeserved woe,
 Just Gods will give thee glory there below.
 
 Dread Forms, who haunt this floor,                                   2
   And thou, the Unconquered Beast,
   That hugely liest at rest
 By the dim shining adamantine door,
 --Still from thy cavernous lair
   Gnarling, so legends tell,
   A tameless guard of Hell,--
 Mayest thou this once thy vigilance forbear,
 And leave large room for him now entering there.
 Hear us, great Son of Darkness and the Deep;
 On thee we call, God of the dreamless sleep!
 
 _Enter_ Messenger.
 
 MESS. Athenian citizens, my briefest tale
 Were to say singly, Oedipus is gone;
 But to describe the scene enacted yonder
 Craves no brief speech, nor was the action brief.
 
 CH. Then he is gone! Poor man!
 
 MESS.                          Know it once for all,
 He hath left eternally the light of day.
 
 CH. Poor soul! What? Ended he with peace divine?
 
 MESS. Ay, there is the main marvel. How he moved
 From hence, thou knowest, for thou too wert here,
 And saw'st that of his friends none guided him,
 But he they loved was leader to them all.
 Now, when he came to the steep pavement, rooted
 With adamant foundation deep in Earth,
 On one of many paths he took his stand
 Near the stone basin, where Peirithoues
 And Theseus graved their everlasting league.
 There, opposite the mass of Laurian ore,
 Turned from the hollow pear-tree and the tomb
 Of marble, he sate down, and straight undid
 His travel-soiled attire, then called aloud
 On both his children, and bade some one fetch
 Pure water from a running stream. And they,
 Hasting together to the neighbouring hill
 Of green Demeter, goddess of the Spring,
 Brought back their sire's commission speedily,
 And bathed, and clothed him with the sacred robe.
 When he was satisfied, and nothing now
 Remained undone of all he bade them do,
 The God of darkness thundered, and the maids
 Stood horror-stricken on hearing; then together
 Fell at their father's knees and wept and wailed
 Loudly and long with beating of the breast.
 He, when that sound of sorrow pierced his ear,
 Caressed them in his arms and said:--'My daughters,
 From this day forth you have no more a father.
 All that was mine is ended, and no longer
 Shall ye continue your hard ministry
 Of labour for my life.--And yet, though hard,
 Not unendurable, since all the toil
 Was rendered light through love, which ye can never
 Receive on earth so richly, as from him
 Bereaved of whom ye now shall live forlorn.'
 Such was the talk, mingled with sobs and crying,
 As each clung fast to each. But when they came
 To an end of weeping and those sounds were stilled,
 First all was silent; then a sudden voice
 Hurried him onward, making each man's hair
 Bristle on end with force of instant fear.
 Now here, now there, not once but oftentimes,
 A God called loudly, 'Oedipus, Oedipus!
 Why thus delay our going? This long while
 We are stayed for and thou tarriest. Come away!'
 He, when he knew the summons of the God,
 Gave word for royal Theseus to go near;
 And when he came, said: 'Friend for ever kind,
 Reach thy right hand, I pray thee (that first pledge)
 To these my children:--daughters, yours to him!--
 And give thy sacred word that thou wilt never
 Betray these willingly: but still perform
 All that thou mayest with true thought for their good.'
 He, with grand calmness like his noble self,
 Promised on oath to keep this friendly bond.
 And when he had done so, Oedipus forthwith
 Stroking his children with his helpless hands
 Spake thus:--'My daughters, you must steel your hearts
 To noble firmness, and depart from hence,
 Nor ask to see or hear forbidden things.
 Go, go at once! Theseus alone must stay
 Sole rightful witness of these mysteries.'
 Those accents were the last we all might hear.
 Then, following the two maids, with checkless tears
 And groans we took our way. But by and by,
 At distance looking round, we saw,--not him,
 Who was not there,--but Theseus all alone
 Holding his hand before his eyes, as if
 Some apparition unendurable
 Had dazed his vision. In a little while,
 We marked him making reverence in one prayer
 To the Earth, and to the home of Gods on high.
 But by what fate He perished, mortal man,
 Save Theseus, none can say. No lightning-flash
 From heaven, no tempest rising from the deep,
 Caused his departure in that hour, but either
 Some messenger from heaven, or, from beneath,
 The lower part of Earth, where comes no pain,
 Opening kindly to receive him in.
 Not to be mourned, nor with a tearful end
 Of sickness was he taken from the Earth,
 But wondrously, beyond recorded fate.
 If any deem my words unwise, I care not
 In that man's judgement to be counted wise.
 
 CH. Where are those maidens and their escort? Say.
 
 MESS. They are not far off, but here. The voice of weeping
 Betokens all too plainly their approach.
 
 ANT. Alas!
 How manifold, the inheritance of woe
 Drawn from the troubled fountain of our birth!
 Indelible, ineradicable grief!
 For him erewhile
 We had labour infinite and unrelieved,
 And now in his last hour we have to tell
 Of sights and sorrows beyond thought.
 
 CH.                                   How then?
 
 ANT. Friends, ye might understand.
 
 CH.                                Speak. Is he gone?
 
 ANT. Gone! Even as heart could wish, had wishes power.
 How else, when neither war, nor the wide sea
 Encountered him, but viewless realms enwrapt him,
 Wafted away to some mysterious doom?
 Whence on our hearts a horror of night is fallen.
 Woe 's me! For whither wandering shall we find
 Hard livelihood, by land or over sea?
 
 ISM. I know not. Let dark Hades take me off
 To lie in death with mine age honoured sire!
 Death were far better than my life to be.
 
 CH. Noblest of maidens, ye must learn to bear
 Meekly the sending of the Gods. Be not
 On fire with grief. Your state is well assured.
 
 ANT. If to be thus is well, then may one long
 For evil to return. Things nowise dear
 Were dear to me, whiles I had him to embrace.
 O father! loved one! that art wearing now
 The eternal robe of darkness underground,
 Old as thou wert, think not this maid and I
 Will cease from loving thee!
 
 CH.                          He met his doom.
 
 ANT. He met the doom he longed for.
 
 CH.                                 How was that?
 
 ANT. In the strange land where he desired to die
 He died. He rests in shadow undisturbed;
 Nor hath he left a tearless funeral.
 For these mine eyes, father, unceasingly
 Mourn thee with weeping, nor can I subdue
 This ever-mounting sorrow for thy loss.
 Ah me! Would thou hadst not desired to die
 Here among strangers, but alone with thee
 There, in the desert, I had seen thee die!
 
 ISM. Unhappy me! What destiny, dear girl,
 Awaits us both, bereaved and fatherless?
 
 CH. His end was fortunate. He rests in peace.
 Dear maidens, then desist from your complaint.
 Sorrow is swift to overtake us all.
 
 ANT. Thither again, dear girl, let us go speedily!
 
 ISM. Say, for what end?
 
 ANT.                    Desire possesses me--
 
 ISM. Whereof?
 
 ANT. To see the darksome dwelling-place--
 
 ISM. Of whom?
 
 ANT.          Woe is me! Of him, our sire!
 
 ISM.                                       But how
 Can this be lawful? Seest thou not?
 
 ANT.                                How say'st thou?
 Why this remonstrance?
 
 ISM.                   Seest thou not, again,
 He hath no grave and no man buried him.
 
 ANT. Take me but where he lies. Then slay me there.
 
 ISM. Ah! woe is me, doubly unfortunate,
 Forlorn and destitute, whither henceforth
 For wretched comfort must we go?
 
 CH.                              Fear nought,
 Dear maidens!
 
 ISM.          Where shall we find refuge?
 
 CH.                                       Here,
 Long since, your refuge is secure.
 
 ANT.                               How so?
 
 CH. No harm shall touch you.
 
 ANT.                         I know that.
 
 CH.                                       What then
 Further engrosseth thee?
 
 ANT.                     How to get home
 I know not.
 
 CH.         Seek not for it.
 
 ANT.                         Weariness
 O'erweighs me.
 
 CH.            Hath it not before oppressed thee?
 
 ANT. Before, it vexed me; now it overwhelms.
 
 CH. A mighty sea of misery is your lot.
 
 ANT. Woe is me! O Zeus! And whither must we go?
 Unto what doom doth my Fate drive me now?
 
 CH. Children, lament no longer. 'Tis not well
 To mourn 'mongst those with whom the honoured dead
 Hath left the heirloom of his benison.
 
 _Enter_ THESEUS.
 
 ANT. Theseus, behold us falling at thy feet.
 
 THE. What boon, my children, are ye bent to obtain?
 
 ANT. Our eyes would see our father's burial-place.
 
 THE. 'Tis not permitted to go near that spot.
 
 ANT. O Athens' sovereign lord, what hast thou said?
 
 THE. Dear children, 'twas your father's spoken will
 That no man should approach his resting-place,
 Nor human voice should ever violate
 The mystery of the tomb wherein he lies.
 He promised, if I truly kept this word,
 My land would evermore be free from harm.
 The power which no man may transgress and live,
 The oath of Zeus, bore witness to our troth.
 
 ANT. His wishes are enough. Then, pray thee, send
 An escort to convey us to our home,
 Primeval Thebes, if so we may prevent
 The death that menaces our brethren there.
 
 THE. That will I; and in all that I may do
 To prosper you and solace him beneath,--
 Who even now passes to eternity,--
 I must not falter. Come, lament no more.
 His destiny hath found a perfect end.
 
                   *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
                                 NOTES
 
 
                           SOME PROPER NAMES
 
 AIDONEUS, Hades or Pluto.
 ARES, The War-God, a destructive Power.
 DEO, Demeter.
 ERINYES, the Furies.
 HELIOS, The Sun-God.
 RHEA, the Mother of the Gods.
 THEBE, the town of Thebes personified.
 
 
                               ANTIGONE.
 
 1 P. 6, l. 126. _The serpent._ The dragon, the emblem of Thebes.
 
 2   l. 130. _Idly caparisoned._ Reading [Greek: huperopliais].
 
 3 P. 7, l. 140. _Self-harnessed helper._ An allusion to the [Greek:
   seiraphoros], or side trace-horse, in a chariot-race.
 
 4 P. 13, l. 342. _Children of the steed._ Mules are so-called by
   Homer.
 
 5 P. 30, l. 955. _Dryas' hasty son._ Lycurgus. See Homer, _Iliad_, vi.
 
 6   l. 971. _Phineus' two sons._ Idothea, the second wife of Phineus,
   persecuted his two sons by Cleopatra, a daughter of Boreas, whom he
   had repudiated and immured. The Argonauts saw them in the condition
   here described.
 
 7 P. 34, l. 1120. _The all-gathering bosom wide._ The plain of
   Eleusis, where mysteries were held in honour of Deo or Demeter.
 
 8 P. 39, l. 1301. Reading [Greek: *oxuthekto ... peri*xiphei].
 
 9   l. 1303. _The glorious bed of buried Megareus._ Megareus, son of
   Creon and Eurydice, sacrificed himself for Thebes by falling into a
   deep cave called the Dragon's Lair.
 
 
                                 AIAS.
 
 1 P. 48, l. 172. _Her blood-stained temple._ In some of her temples
   Artemis was worshipped with sacrifices of bulls, and, according to
   an old tradition, also with human sacrifices.
 
 2 P. 49. l. 190. _The brood of Sisyphus._ Amongst his enemies,
   Odysseus was reputed to be the offspring of Sisyphus and not of
   Laertes.
 
 3 P. 59, l. 574. _Named of the shield._ Eurysakes means Broadshield.
 
 4 P. 71, l. 1011. _Who smiles no more._ Compare a fragment of the
   _Teucer_ of Sophocles (519, Nauck),
 
                    'How vain then, O my son,
        How vain was my delight in thy proud fame,
        While I supposed thee living! The fell Fury
        From her dark shroud beguiled me with sweet lies.'
 
 
                             KING OEDIPUS.
 
 1 P. 86, l. 36. _That stern songstress._ The Sphinx. See also
   'minstrel hound.'
 
 2 P. 96, l. 402. _Will hunt | Pollution forth._ The party cry of
   'driving out the pollution' was raised against the Alcmaeonidae and
   other families in Athens, who were supposed to lie under a
   traditional curse.
 
 3 P. 99. l. 525. _Who durst declare it._ [Greek: Tou pros d'
   ephanthe]. Though the emphatic order of words is unusual, this seems
   more forcible than the var. [Greek: toupos d' ephanthe].
 
 4 P. 102, l. 625. [CR. _You'll ne'er relent nor listen to my plea._] A
   line has here been lost in the original.
 
 5 P. 113, l. 1025. _Your purchase or your child?_ Oedipus is not to be
   supposed to have weighed the import of the Corinthian shepherd's
   words, 'Nor I nor he,' &c., _supra_.
 
 6 P. 128. l. 1526. _His envied fortune mounted beaming._ Reading
   [Greek: en zelo politon] (with 2 MSS) and [Greek: epiphlegon] from
   my conjecture.
 
 
                                ELECTRA.
 
 1 P. 131, l. 6. _The wolf-slaying God._ Apollo Lyceius, from _Lycos_,
   a wolf.
 
 2 P. 140, l. 363. _Ne'er be it mine,_ &c. Reading [Greek: toume me
   *lupoun monon | boskema].
 
 3 P. 143, l. 451. _That lingers on my brow._ A somewhat forced
   interpretation of [Greek: tende lipare tricha]. Possibly [Greek:
   tend' alamprunton tricha]: 'And this--unkempt and poor--yet give it
   to him.'
 
 4 P. 144, l. 504. _Chariot course of Pelops, full of toil._ Pelops won
   his bride Hippodameia by bribing Myrtilus, his charioteer; whom, in
   order to conceal his fault, he flung into the sea.
 
 5 P. 150, l. 722. _That pulled the side-rope._ See on Ant., p. 7, l.
   140.
 
 6   l. 151. _In letting loose again the left-hand rein._ The near
   horse (see above) knows his business, and, when the slackening of
   the rein shows that the goal is cleared, makes eagerly for the
   direct downward course. But if he is let go an instant too soon, he
   brings the car into contact with the stone.
 
 7   l. 746. _Caught in the reins._ In an ancient chariot-race, the
   reins were often passed round the body of the charioteer, so as to
   give more purchase. See this described in the _Hippolytus_ of
   Euripides.
 
 8 P. 154, l. 837. _One in a woman's toils | was tangled._ Amphiaraus,
   betrayed by Eriphyle for a necklace.
 
 9 P. 160, l. 1085. _Through homeless misery._ I read [Greek: aion'
   aoikon] for [Greek: aiona koinon] of the MSS.
 
 10   l. 1086. _Purging the sin and shame._ I read [Greek: kathagnisasa]
   for the impossible [Greek: kathoplisasa].
 
 11 P. 172, l. 1478. _Thou hast been taking,_ &c. Otherwise, reading
   with the MSS [Greek: zon tois thanousin ounek' antaudas isa], _At
   point to die, thou art talking with the dead._
 
 
                          TRACHINIAN MAIDENS.
 
 1 P. 180, l. 104. _Bride of battle-wooing._ 'Deanira' signifies 'Cause
   of strife to heroes.'
 
 2 P. 185, l. 303. _Ne'er may I see thee._ The Spartan captives from
   Pylos had lately been at Athens, and some of them were reputed
   descendants of Hyllus, the son of Deanira.
 
 3 P. 195, l. 654. _Frees him for ever._ His last contest brings his
   final deliverance.
 
 4 P. 201, l. 860. _From Love's dread minister,_ i.e. from Aphrodite,
   working through the concealed and silent Iole.
 
 
                              PHILOCTETES.
 
 1 P. 222, l. 194. _Through Chrysa's cruel sting._ Chrysa was an island
   near the Troad, sacred to a goddess of the name. Her precinct was
   guarded by a serpent, whose bite, from which Philoctetes suffered,
   was incurable. See below p. 254, l. 1327.
 
 2 P. 226, l. 344. _The fosterer of my sire._ Phoenix, the tutor of
   Achilles.
 
 3 P. 227, l. 351. _For I ne'er | Had seen him._ The legend which makes
   Achilles go to Troy from Scyros is probably ignored.
 
 4   l. 384. _Vile offset of an evil tree._ Alluding to the supposed
   birth of Odysseus. See on Ai., l. 190, p. 60 [sic. should be p. 49].
 
 5 P. 230, l. 489. _Of old Chalcodon._ One of the former generation, a
   friend and neighbour of Poeas the father of Philoctetes.
 
 6 P. 237, l. 729. _Of him, whose home is in the skies._ Heracles,
   imagined as transfigured on Mount Oeta.
 
 7 P. 254, l. 1328. _The sky-roofed fold._ The open precinct that was
   sacred to the goddess, merely surrounded by a wall. See above, note
   on p. 222, l. 194.
 
 8 P. 255, l. 1333. _Phoebus' child._ Asclepius.
 
 
                          OEDIPUS AT COLONOS.
 
 1 P. 265, l. 158. _Mingles with draughts,_ &c. Where libations are
   mixed of water and honey.
 
 2 P. 288, l. 888. _The God._ Poseidon. See above, p. 282 [sic. should
   be p. 262], l. 55.
 
 3 P. 306, l. 1525. _neighbouring._ [Greek: geitonon] (the participle).
 
 4   l. 1534. _The dragon-brood._ The Cadmeian race at Thebes, sprung
   from the dragon's teeth sown by Cadmus.
 
 
 N.B.--For other questionable points the student is referred to the
 small edition of _Sophocles_, by Campbell and Abbott (2 vols.,
 Clarendon Press, 1900).
 
 
 Oxford: HORACE HART, Printer to the University.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by An Anonymous Volunteer and David Widger
 
 
 
 
 
                               SOPHOCLES
 
                            OEDIPUS THE KING
 
                      Translation by F. Storr, BA
             Formerly Scholar of Trinity College, Cambridge
                     From the Loeb Library Edition
                        Originally published by
                Harvard University Press, Cambridge, MA
                                  and
                     William Heinemann Ltd, London
 
                        First published in 1912
 
                                *****
 
                                ARGUMENT
 
 To Laius, King of Thebes, an oracle foretold that the child born to him
 by his queen Jocasta would slay his father and wed his mother. So when
 in time a son was born the infant's feet were riveted together and he
 was left to die on Mount Cithaeron. But a shepherd found the babe and
 tended him, and delivered him to another shepherd who took him to his
 master, the King of Corinth. Polybus being childless adopted the boy,
 who grew up believing that he was indeed the King's son. Afterwards
 doubting his parentage he inquired of the Delphic god and heard himself
 the word declared before to Laius. Wherefore he fled from what he
 deemed his father's house and in his flight he encountered and
 unwillingly slew his father Laius. Arriving at Thebes he answered the
 riddle of the Sphinx and the grateful Thebans made their deliverer king.
 So he reigned in the room of Laius, and espoused the widowed queen.
 Children were born to them and Thebes prospered under his rule, but
 again a grievous plague fell upon the city. Again the oracle was
 consulted and it bade them purge themselves of blood-guiltiness. Oedipus
 denounces the crime of which he is unaware, and undertakes to track out
 the criminal. Step by step it is brought home to him that he is the man.
 The closing scene reveals Jocasta slain by her own hand and Oedipus
 blinded by his own act and praying for death or exile.
 
                               *****
 
                           DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
                                Oedipus.
 
                          The Priest of Zeus.
 
                                 Creon.
 
                        Chorus of Theban Elders.
 
                               Teiresias.
 
                                Jocasta.
 
                               Messenger.
 
                             Herd of Laius.
 
                           Second Messenger.
 
             Scene:  Thebes.  Before the Palace of Oedipus.
 
                               *****
 
                            OEDIPUS THE KING
 
 
 
 Suppliants of all ages are seated round the altar at the palace doors,
 at their head a PRIEST OF ZEUS.  To them enter OEDIPUS.
 
 OEDIPUS
 My children, latest born to Cadmus old,
 Why sit ye here as suppliants, in your hands
 Branches of olive filleted with wool?
 What means this reek of incense everywhere,
 And everywhere laments and litanies?
 Children, it were not meet that I should learn
 From others, and am hither come, myself,
 I Oedipus, your world-renowned king.
 Ho! aged sire, whose venerable locks
 Proclaim thee spokesman of this company,
 Explain your mood and purport.  Is it dread
 Of ill that moves you or a boon ye crave?
 My zeal in your behalf ye cannot doubt;
 Ruthless indeed were I and obdurate
 If such petitioners as you I spurned.
 
 PRIEST
 Yea, Oedipus, my sovereign lord and king,
 Thou seest how both extremes of age besiege
 Thy palace altars--fledglings hardly winged,
 and greybeards bowed with years; priests, as am I
 of Zeus, and these the flower of our youth.
 Meanwhile, the common folk, with wreathed boughs
 Crowd our two market-places, or before
 Both shrines of Pallas congregate, or where
 Ismenus gives his oracles by fire.
 For, as thou seest thyself, our ship of State,
 Sore buffeted, can no more lift her head,
 Foundered beneath a weltering surge of blood.
 A blight is on our harvest in the ear,
 A blight upon the grazing flocks and herds,
 A blight on wives in travail; and withal
 Armed with his blazing torch the God of Plague
 Hath swooped upon our city emptying
 The house of Cadmus, and the murky realm
 Of Pluto is full fed with groans and tears.
      Therefore, O King, here at thy hearth we sit,
 I and these children; not as deeming thee
 A new divinity, but the first of men;
 First in the common accidents of life,
 And first in visitations of the Gods.
 Art thou not he who coming to the town
 of Cadmus freed us from the tax we paid
 To the fell songstress?  Nor hadst thou received
 Prompting from us or been by others schooled;
 No, by a god inspired (so all men deem,
 And testify) didst thou renew our life.
 And now, O Oedipus, our peerless king,
 All we thy votaries beseech thee, find
 Some succor, whether by a voice from heaven
 Whispered, or haply known by human wit.
 Tried counselors, methinks, are aptest found [1]
 To furnish for the future pregnant rede.
 Upraise, O chief of men, upraise our State!
 Look to thy laurels! for thy zeal of yore
 Our country's savior thou art justly hailed:
 O never may we thus record thy reign:--
 "He raised us up only to cast us down."
 Uplift us, build our city on a rock.
 Thy happy star ascendant brought us luck,
 O let it not decline!  If thou wouldst rule
 This land, as now thou reignest, better sure
 To rule a peopled than a desert realm.
 Nor battlements nor galleys aught avail,
 If men to man and guards to guard them tail.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ah! my poor children, known, ah, known too well,
 The quest that brings you hither and your need.
 Ye sicken all, well wot I, yet my pain,
 How great soever yours, outtops it all.
 Your sorrow touches each man severally,
 Him and none other, but I grieve at once
 Both for the general and myself and you.
 Therefore ye rouse no sluggard from day-dreams.
 Many, my children, are the tears I've wept,
 And threaded many a maze of weary thought.
 Thus pondering one clue of hope I caught,
 And tracked it up; I have sent Menoeceus' son,
 Creon, my consort's brother, to inquire
 Of Pythian Phoebus at his Delphic shrine,
 How I might save the State by act or word.
 And now I reckon up the tale of days
 Since he set forth, and marvel how he fares.
 'Tis strange, this endless tarrying, passing strange.
 But when he comes, then I were base indeed,
 If I perform not all the god declares.
 
 PRIEST
 Thy words are well timed; even as thou speakest
 That shouting tells me Creon is at hand.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O King Apollo! may his joyous looks
 Be presage of the joyous news he brings!
 
 PRIEST
 As I surmise, 'tis welcome; else his head
 Had scarce been crowned with berry-laden bays.
 
 OEDIPUS
 We soon shall know; he's now in earshot range.
 [Enter CREON]
 My royal cousin, say, Menoeceus' child,
 What message hast thou brought us from the god?
 
 CREON
 Good news, for e'en intolerable ills,
 Finding right issue, tend to naught but good.
 
 OEDIPUS
 How runs the oracle? thus far thy words
 Give me no ground for confidence or fear.
 
 CREON
 If thou wouldst hear my message publicly,
 I'll tell thee straight, or with thee pass within.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Speak before all; the burden that I bear
 Is more for these my subjects than myself.
 
 CREON
 Let me report then all the god declared.
 King Phoebus bids us straitly extirpate
 A fell pollution that infests the land,
 And no more harbor an inveterate sore.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What expiation means he?  What's amiss?
 
 CREON
 Banishment, or the shedding blood for blood.
 This stain of blood makes shipwreck of our state.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Whom can he mean, the miscreant thus denounced?
 
 CREON
 Before thou didst assume the helm of State,
 The sovereign of this land was Laius.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I heard as much, but never saw the man.
 
 CREON
 He fell; and now the god's command is plain:
 Punish his takers-off, whoe'er they be.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Where are they?  Where in the wide world to find
 The far, faint traces of a bygone crime?
 
 CREON
 In this land, said the god; "who seeks shall find;
 Who sits with folded hands or sleeps is blind."
 
 OEDIPUS
 Was he within his palace, or afield,
 Or traveling, when Laius met his fate?
 
 CREON
 Abroad; he started, so he told us, bound
 For Delphi, but he never thence returned.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Came there no news, no fellow-traveler
 To give some clue that might be followed up?
 
 CREON
 But one escape, who flying for dear life,
 Could tell of all he saw but one thing sure.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And what was that?  One clue might lead us far,
 With but a spark of hope to guide our quest.
 
 CREON
 Robbers, he told us, not one bandit but
 A troop of knaves, attacked and murdered him.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Did any bandit dare so bold a stroke,
 Unless indeed he were suborned from Thebes?
 
 CREON
 So 'twas surmised, but none was found to avenge
 His murder mid the trouble that ensued.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What trouble can have hindered a full quest,
 When royalty had fallen thus miserably?
 
 CREON
 The riddling Sphinx compelled us to let slide
 The dim past and attend to instant needs.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Well, _I_ will start afresh and once again
 Make dark things clear.  Right worthy the concern
 Of Phoebus, worthy thine too, for the dead;
 I also, as is meet, will lend my aid
 To avenge this wrong to Thebes and to the god.
 Not for some far-off kinsman, but myself,
 Shall I expel this poison in the blood;
 For whoso slew that king might have a mind
 To strike me too with his assassin hand.
 Therefore in righting him I serve myself.
 Up, children, haste ye, quit these altar stairs,
 Take hence your suppliant wands, go summon hither
 The Theban commons.  With the god's good help
 Success is sure; 'tis ruin if we fail.
 [Exeunt OEDIPUS and CREON]
 
 PRIEST
 Come, children, let us hence; these gracious words
 Forestall the very purpose of our suit.
 And may the god who sent this oracle
 Save us withal and rid us of this pest.
 [Exeunt PRIEST and SUPPLIANTS]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Sweet-voiced daughter of Zeus from thy gold-paved Pythian shrine
           Wafted to Thebes divine,
 What dost thou bring me?  My soul is racked and shivers with fear.
           (Healer of Delos, hear!)
 Hast thou some pain unknown before,
 Or with the circling years renewest a penance of yore?
 Offspring of golden Hope, thou voice immortal, O tell me.
 
 (Ant. 1)
 First on Athene I call; O Zeus-born goddess, defend!
           Goddess and sister, befriend,
 Artemis, Lady of Thebes, high-throned in the midst of our mart!
           Lord of the death-winged dart!
             Your threefold aid I crave
      From death and ruin our city to save.
 If in the days of old when we nigh had perished, ye drave
 From our land the fiery plague, be near us now and defend us!
 
 (Str. 2)
      Ah me, what countless woes are mine!
      All our host is in decline;
      Weaponless my spirit lies.
      Earth her gracious fruits denies;
      Women wail in barren throes;
      Life on life downstriken goes,
      Swifter than the wind bird's flight,
      Swifter than the Fire-God's might,
      To the westering shores of Night.
 
 (Ant. 2)
      Wasted thus by death on death
      All our city perisheth.
      Corpses spread infection round;
      None to tend or mourn is found.
      Wailing on the altar stair
      Wives and grandams rend the air--
      Long-drawn moans and piercing cries
      Blent with prayers and litanies.
      Golden child of Zeus, O hear
      Let thine angel face appear!
 
 (Str. 3)
 And grant that Ares whose hot breath I feel,
           Though without targe or steel
 He stalks, whose voice is as the battle shout,
 May turn in sudden rout,
 To the unharbored Thracian waters sped,
           Or Amphitrite's bed.
      For what night leaves undone,
      Smit by the morrow's sun
 Perisheth.  Father Zeus, whose hand
 Doth wield the lightning brand,
 Slay him beneath thy levin bold, we pray,
           Slay him, O slay!
 
 (Ant. 3)
 O that thine arrows too, Lycean King,
           From that taut bow's gold string,
 Might fly abroad, the champions of our rights;
           Yea, and the flashing lights
 Of Artemis, wherewith the huntress sweeps
           Across the Lycian steeps.
 Thee too I call with golden-snooded hair,
           Whose name our land doth bear,
 Bacchus to whom thy Maenads Evoe shout;
           Come with thy bright torch, rout,
                Blithe god whom we adore,
                The god whom gods abhor.
 
 [Enter OEDIPUS.]
 OEDIPUS
 Ye pray; 'tis well, but would ye hear my words
 And heed them and apply the remedy,
 Ye might perchance find comfort and relief.
 Mind you, I speak as one who comes a stranger
 To this report, no less than to the crime;
 For how unaided could I track it far
 Without a clue?  Which lacking (for too late
 Was I enrolled a citizen of Thebes)
 This proclamation I address to all:--
 Thebans, if any knows the man by whom
 Laius, son of Labdacus, was slain,
 I summon him to make clean shrift to me.
 And if he shrinks, let him reflect that thus
 Confessing he shall 'scape the capital charge;
 For the worst penalty that shall befall him
 Is banishment--unscathed he shall depart.
 But if an alien from a foreign land
 Be known to any as the murderer,
 Let him who knows speak out, and he shall have
 Due recompense from me and thanks to boot.
 But if ye still keep silence, if through fear
 For self or friends ye disregard my hest,
 Hear what I then resolve; I lay my ban
 On the assassin whosoe'er he be.
 Let no man in this land, whereof I hold
 The sovereign rule, harbor or speak to him;
 Give him no part in prayer or sacrifice
 Or lustral rites, but hound him from your homes.
 For this is our defilement, so the god
 Hath lately shown to me by oracles.
 Thus as their champion I maintain the cause
 Both of the god and of the murdered King.
 And on the murderer this curse I lay
 (On him and all the partners in his guilt):--
 Wretch, may he pine in utter wretchedness!
 And for myself, if with my privity
 He gain admittance to my hearth, I pray
 The curse I laid on others fall on me.
 See that ye give effect to all my hest,
 For my sake and the god's and for our land,
 A desert blasted by the wrath of heaven.
 For, let alone the god's express command,
 It were a scandal ye should leave unpurged
 The murder of a great man and your king,
 Nor track it home.  And now that I am lord,
 Successor to his throne, his bed, his wife,
 (And had he not been frustrate in the hope
 Of issue, common children of one womb
 Had forced a closer bond twixt him and me,
 But Fate swooped down upon him), therefore I
 His blood-avenger will maintain his cause
 As though he were my sire, and leave no stone
 Unturned to track the assassin or avenge
 The son of Labdacus, of Polydore,
 Of Cadmus, and Agenor first of the race.
 And for the disobedient thus I pray:
 May the gods send them neither timely fruits
 Of earth, nor teeming increase of the womb,
 But may they waste and pine, as now they waste,
 Aye and worse stricken; but to all of you,
 My loyal subjects who approve my acts,
 May Justice, our ally, and all the gods
 Be gracious and attend you evermore.
 
 CHORUS
 The oath thou profferest, sire, I take and swear.
 I slew him not myself, nor can I name
 The slayer.  For the quest, 'twere well, methinks
 That Phoebus, who proposed the riddle, himself
 Should give the answer--who the murderer was.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Well argued; but no living man can hope
 To force the gods to speak against their will.
 
 CHORUS
 May I then say what seems next best to me?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Aye, if there be a third best, tell it too.
 
 CHORUS
 My liege, if any man sees eye to eye
 With our lord Phoebus, 'tis our prophet, lord
 Teiresias; he of all men best might guide
 A searcher of this matter to the light.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Here too my zeal has nothing lagged, for twice
 At Creon's instance have I sent to fetch him,
 And long I marvel why he is not here.
 
 CHORUS
 I mind me too of rumors long ago--
 Mere gossip.
 
 OEDIPUS
                Tell them, I would fain know all.
 
 CHORUS
 'Twas said he fell by travelers.
 
 OEDIPUS
                                    So I heard,
 But none has seen the man who saw him fall.
 
 CHORUS
 Well, if he knows what fear is, he will quail
 And flee before the terror of thy curse.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Words scare not him who blenches not at deeds.
 
 CHORUS
 But here is one to arraign him.  Lo, at length
 They bring the god-inspired seer in whom
 Above all other men is truth inborn.
 [Enter TEIRESIAS, led by a boy.]
 
 OEDIPUS
 Teiresias, seer who comprehendest all,
 Lore of the wise and hidden mysteries,
 High things of heaven and low things of the earth,
 Thou knowest, though thy blinded eyes see naught,
 What plague infects our city; and we turn
 To thee, O seer, our one defense and shield.
 The purport of the answer that the God
 Returned to us who sought his oracle,
 The messengers have doubtless told thee--how
 One course alone could rid us of the pest,
 To find the murderers of Laius,
 And slay them or expel them from the land.
 Therefore begrudging neither augury
 Nor other divination that is thine,
 O save thyself, thy country, and thy king,
 Save all from this defilement of blood shed.
 On thee we rest.  This is man's highest end,
 To others' service all his powers to lend.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Alas, alas, what misery to be wise
 When wisdom profits nothing!  This old lore
 I had forgotten; else I were not here.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What ails thee?  Why this melancholy mood?
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Let me go home; prevent me not; 'twere best
 That thou shouldst bear thy burden and I mine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 For shame! no true-born Theban patriot
 Would thus withhold the word of prophecy.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 _Thy_ words, O king, are wide of the mark, and I
 For fear lest I too trip like thee...
 
 OEDIPUS
                                         Oh speak,
 Withhold not, I adjure thee, if thou know'st,
 Thy knowledge.  We are all thy suppliants.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Aye, for ye all are witless, but my voice
 Will ne'er reveal my miseries--or thine. [2]
 
 OEDIPUS
 What then, thou knowest, and yet willst not speak!
 Wouldst thou betray us and destroy the State?
 
 TEIRESIAS
 I will not vex myself nor thee.  Why ask
 Thus idly what from me thou shalt not learn?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Monster! thy silence would incense a flint.
 Will nothing loose thy tongue?  Can nothing melt thee,
 Or shake thy dogged taciturnity?
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Thou blam'st my mood and seest not thine own
 Wherewith thou art mated; no, thou taxest me.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And who could stay his choler when he heard
 How insolently thou dost flout the State?
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Well, it will come what will, though I be mute.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Since come it must, thy duty is to tell me.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 I have no more to say; storm as thou willst,
 And give the rein to all thy pent-up rage.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yea, I am wroth, and will not stint my words,
 But speak my whole mind.  Thou methinks thou art he,
 Who planned the crime, aye, and performed it too,
 All save the assassination; and if thou
 Hadst not been blind, I had been sworn to boot
 That thou alone didst do the bloody deed.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Is it so?  Then I charge thee to abide
 By thine own proclamation; from this day
 Speak not to these or me.  Thou art the man,
 Thou the accursed polluter of this land.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Vile slanderer, thou blurtest forth these taunts,
 And think'st forsooth as seer to go scot free.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Yea, I am free, strong in the strength of truth.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Who was thy teacher? not methinks thy art.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Thou, goading me against my will to speak.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What speech? repeat it and resolve my doubt.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Didst miss my sense wouldst thou goad me on?
 
 OEDIPUS
 I but half caught thy meaning; say it again.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 I say thou art the murderer of the man
 Whose murderer thou pursuest.
 
 OEDIPUS
                               Thou shalt rue it
 Twice to repeat so gross a calumny.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Must I say more to aggravate thy rage?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Say all thou wilt; it will be but waste of breath.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 I say thou livest with thy nearest kin
 In infamy, unwitting in thy shame.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Think'st thou for aye unscathed to wag thy tongue?
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Yea, if the might of truth can aught prevail.
 OEDIPUS
 With other men, but not with thee, for thou
 In ear, wit, eye, in everything art blind.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Poor fool to utter gibes at me which all
 Here present will cast back on thee ere long.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Offspring of endless Night, thou hast no power
 O'er me or any man who sees the sun.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 No, for thy weird is not to fall by me.
 I leave to Apollo what concerns the god.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Is this a plot of Creon, or thine own?
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Not Creon, thou thyself art thine own bane.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O wealth and empiry and skill by skill
 Outwitted in the battlefield of life,
 What spite and envy follow in your train!
 See, for this crown the State conferred on me.
 A gift, a thing I sought not, for this crown
 The trusty Creon, my familiar friend,
 Hath lain in wait to oust me and suborned
 This mountebank, this juggling charlatan,
 This tricksy beggar-priest, for gain alone
 Keen-eyed, but in his proper art stone-blind.
 Say, sirrah, hast thou ever proved thyself
 A prophet?  When the riddling Sphinx was here
 Why hadst thou no deliverance for this folk?
 And yet the riddle was not to be solved
 By guess-work but required the prophet's art;
 Wherein thou wast found lacking; neither birds
 Nor sign from heaven helped thee, but _I_ came,
 The simple Oedipus; _I_ stopped her mouth
 By mother wit, untaught of auguries.
 This is the man whom thou wouldst undermine,
 In hope to reign with Creon in my stead.
 Methinks that thou and thine abettor soon
 Will rue your plot to drive the scapegoat out.
 Thank thy grey hairs that thou hast still to learn
 What chastisement such arrogance deserves.
 
 CHORUS
 To us it seems that both the seer and thou,
 O Oedipus, have spoken angry words.
 This is no time to wrangle but consult
 How best we may fulfill the oracle.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 King as thou art, free speech at least is mine
 To make reply; in this I am thy peer.
 I own no lord but Loxias; him I serve
 And ne'er can stand enrolled as Creon's man.
 Thus then I answer:  since thou hast not spared
 To twit me with my blindness--thou hast eyes,
 Yet see'st not in what misery thou art fallen,
 Nor where thou dwellest nor with whom for mate.
 Dost know thy lineage?  Nay, thou know'st it not,
 And all unwitting art a double foe
 To thine own kin, the living and the dead;
 Aye and the dogging curse of mother and sire
 One day shall drive thee, like a two-edged sword,
 Beyond our borders, and the eyes that now
 See clear shall henceforward endless night.
 Ah whither shall thy bitter cry not reach,
 What crag in all Cithaeron but shall then
 Reverberate thy wail, when thou hast found
 With what a hymeneal thou wast borne
 Home, but to no fair haven, on the gale!
 Aye, and a flood of ills thou guessest not
 Shall set thyself and children in one line.
 Flout then both Creon and my words, for none
 Of mortals shall be striken worse than thou.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Must I endure this fellow's insolence?
 A murrain on thee!  Get thee hence!  Begone
 Avaunt! and never cross my threshold more.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 I ne'er had come hadst thou not bidden me.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I know not thou wouldst utter folly, else
 Long hadst thou waited to be summoned here.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Such am I--as it seems to thee a fool,
 But to the parents who begat thee, wise.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What sayest thou--"parents"?  Who begat me, speak?
 
 TEIRESIAS
 This day shall be thy birth-day, and thy grave.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thou lov'st to speak in riddles and dark words.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 In reading riddles who so skilled as thou?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Twit me with that wherein my greatness lies.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 And yet this very greatness proved thy bane.
 
 OEDIPUS
 No matter if I saved the commonwealth.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 'Tis time I left thee.  Come, boy, take me home.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Aye, take him quickly, for his presence irks
 And lets me; gone, thou canst not plague me more.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 I go, but first will tell thee why I came.
 Thy frown I dread not, for thou canst not harm me.
 Hear then:  this man whom thou hast sought to arrest
 With threats and warrants this long while, the wretch
 Who murdered Laius--that man is here.
 He passes for an alien in the land
 But soon shall prove a Theban, native born.
 And yet his fortune brings him little joy;
 For blind of seeing, clad in beggar's weeds,
 For purple robes, and leaning on his staff,
 To a strange land he soon shall grope his way.
 And of the children, inmates of his home,
 He shall be proved the brother and the sire,
 Of her who bare him son and husband both,
 Co-partner, and assassin of his sire.
 Go in and ponder this, and if thou find
 That I have missed the mark, henceforth declare
 I have no wit nor skill in prophecy.
 [Exeunt TEIRESIAS and OEDIPUS]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Who is he by voice immortal named from Pythia's rocky cell,
 Doer of foul deeds of bloodshed, horrors that no tongue can tell?
           A foot for flight he needs
           Fleeter than storm-swift steeds,
           For on his heels doth follow,
 Armed with the lightnings of his Sire, Apollo.
           Like sleuth-hounds too
           The Fates pursue.
 
 (Ant. 1)
 Yea, but now flashed forth the summons from Parnassus' snowy peak,
 "Near and far the undiscovered doer of this murder seek!"
           Now like a sullen bull he roves
           Through forest brakes and upland groves,
           And vainly seeks to fly
           The doom that ever nigh
           Flits o'er his head,
 Still by the avenging Phoebus sped,
           The voice divine,
           From Earth's mid shrine.
 (Str. 2)
 Sore perplexed am I by the words of the master seer.
 Are  they true, are they false?  I know not and bridle my  tongue for
    fear,
 Fluttered with vague surmise; nor present nor future is clear.
 Quarrel of ancient date or in days still near know I none
 Twixt the Labdacidan house and our ruler, Polybus' son.
 Proof is there none:  how then can I challenge our King's good name,
 How in a blood-feud join for an untracked deed of shame?
 
 (Ant. 2)
 All wise are Zeus and Apollo, and nothing is hid from their ken;
 They are gods; and in wits a man may surpass his fellow men;
 But that a mortal seer knows more than I know--where
 Hath this been proven?  Or how without sign assured, can I blame
 Him who saved our State when the winged songstress came,
 Tested and tried in the light of us all, like gold assayed?
 How can I now assent when a crime is on Oedipus laid?
 
 CREON
 Friends, countrymen, I learn King Oedipus
 Hath laid against me a most grievous charge,
 And come to you protesting.  If he deems
 That I have harmed or injured him in aught
 By word or deed in this our present trouble,
 I care not to prolong the span of life,
 Thus ill-reputed; for the calumny
 Hits not a single blot, but blasts my name,
 If by the general voice I am denounced
 False to the State and false by you my friends.
 
 CHORUS
 This taunt, it well may be, was blurted out
 In petulance, not spoken advisedly.
 
 CREON
 Did any dare pretend that it was I
 Prompted the seer to utter a forged charge?
 
 CHORUS
 Such things were said; with what intent I know not.
 
 CREON
 Were not his wits and vision all astray
 When upon me he fixed this monstrous charge?
 
 CHORUS
 I know not; to my sovereign's acts I am blind.
 But lo, he comes to answer for himself.
 [Enter OEDIPUS.]
 
 OEDIPUS
 Sirrah, what mak'st thou here?  Dost thou presume
 To approach my doors, thou brazen-faced rogue,
 My murderer and the filcher of my crown?
 Come, answer this, didst thou detect in me
 Some touch of cowardice or witlessness,
 That made thee undertake this enterprise?
 I seemed forsooth too simple to perceive
 The serpent stealing on me in the dark,
 Or else too weak to scotch it when I saw.
 This _thou_ art witless seeking to possess
 Without a following or friends the crown,
 A prize that followers and wealth must win.
 
 CREON
 Attend me.  Thou hast spoken, 'tis my turn
 To make reply.  Then having heard me, judge.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thou art glib of tongue, but I am slow to learn
 Of thee; I know too well thy venomous hate.
 
 CREON
 First I would argue out this very point.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O argue not that thou art not a rogue.
 
 CREON
 If thou dost count a virtue stubbornness,
 Unschooled by reason, thou art much astray.
 
 OEDIPUS
 If thou dost hold a kinsman may be wronged,
 And no pains follow, thou art much to seek.
 
 CREON
 Therein thou judgest rightly, but this wrong
 That thou allegest--tell me what it is.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Didst thou or didst thou not advise that I
 Should call the priest?
 
 CREON
                          Yes, and I stand to it.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Tell me how long is it since Laius...
 
 CREON
 Since Laius...?  I follow not thy drift.
 
 OEDIPUS
 By violent hands was spirited away.
 
 CREON
 In the dim past, a many years agone.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Did the same prophet then pursue his craft?
 
 CREON
 Yes, skilled as now and in no less repute.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Did he at that time ever glance at me?
 
 CREON
 Not to my knowledge, not when I was by.
 
 OEDIPUS
 But was no search and inquisition made?
 
 CREON
 Surely full quest was made, but nothing learnt.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Why failed the seer to tell his story _then_?
 
 CREON
 I know not, and not knowing hold my tongue.
 
 OEDIPUS
 This much thou knowest and canst surely tell.
 
 CREON
 What's mean'st thou?  All I know I will declare.
 
 OEDIPUS
 But for thy prompting never had the seer
 Ascribed to me the death of Laius.
 
 CREON
 If so he thou knowest best; but I
 Would put thee to the question in my turn.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Question and prove me murderer if thou canst.
 
 CREON
 Then let me ask thee, didst thou wed my sister?
 
 OEDIPUS
 A fact so plain I cannot well deny.
 
 CREON
 And as thy consort queen she shares the throne?
 
 OEDIPUS
 I grant her freely all her heart desires.
 
 CREON
 And with you twain I share the triple rule?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yea, and it is that proves thee a false friend.
 
 CREON
 Not so, if thou wouldst reason with thyself,
 As I with myself.  First, I bid thee think,
 Would any mortal choose a troubled reign
 Of terrors rather than secure repose,
 If the same power were given him?  As for me,
 I have no natural craving for the name
 Of king, preferring to do kingly deeds,
 And so thinks every sober-minded man.
 Now all my needs are satisfied through thee,
 And I have naught to fear; but were I king,
 My acts would oft run counter to my will.
 How could a title then have charms for me
 Above the sweets of boundless influence?
 I am not so infatuate as to grasp
 The shadow when I hold the substance fast.
 Now all men cry me Godspeed! wish me well,
 And every suitor seeks to gain my ear,
 If he would hope to win a grace from thee.
 Why should I leave the better, choose the worse?
 That were sheer madness, and I am not mad.
 No such ambition ever tempted me,
 Nor would I have a share in such intrigue.
 And if thou doubt me, first to Delphi go,
 There ascertain if my report was true
 Of the god's answer; next investigate
 If with the seer I plotted or conspired,
 And if it prove so, sentence me to death,
 Not by thy voice alone, but mine and thine.
 But O condemn me not, without appeal,
 On bare suspicion.  'Tis not right to adjudge
 Bad men at random good, or good men bad.
 I would as lief a man should cast away
 The thing he counts most precious, his own life,
 As spurn a true friend.  Thou wilt learn in time
 The truth, for time alone reveals the just;
 A villain is detected in a day.
 
 CHORUS
 To one who walketh warily his words
 Commend themselves; swift counsels are not sure.
 
 OEDIPUS
 When with swift strides the stealthy plotter stalks
 I must be quick too with my counterplot.
 To wait his onset passively, for him
 Is sure success, for me assured defeat.
 
 CREON
 What then's thy will?  To banish me the land?
 
 OEDIPUS
 I would not have thee banished, no, but dead,
 That men may mark the wages envy reaps.
 
 CREON
 I see thou wilt not yield, nor credit me.
 
 OEDIPUS
 [None but a fool would credit such as thou.] [3]
 
 CREON
 Thou art not wise.
 
 OEDIPUS
                     Wise for myself at least.
 
 CREON
 Why not for me too?
 
 OEDIPUS
                     Why for such a knave?
 
 CREON
 Suppose thou lackest sense.
 
 OEDIPUS
                               Yet kings must rule.
 
 CREON
 Not if they rule ill.
 
 OEDIPUS
                          Oh my Thebans, hear him!
 
 CREON
 Thy Thebans? am not I a Theban too?
 
 CHORUS
 Cease, princes; lo there comes, and none too soon,
 Jocasta from the palace.  Who so fit
 As peacemaker to reconcile your feud?
 [Enter JOCASTA.]
 
 JOCASTA
 Misguided princes, why have ye upraised
 This wordy wrangle?  Are ye not ashamed,
 While the whole land lies striken, thus to voice
 Your private injuries?  Go in, my lord;
 Go home, my brother, and forebear to make
 A public scandal of a petty grief.
 
 CREON
 My royal sister, Oedipus, thy lord,
 Hath bid me choose (O dread alternative!)
 An outlaw's exile or a felon's death.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yes, lady; I have caught him practicing
 Against my royal person his vile arts.
 
 CREON
 May I ne'er speed but die accursed, if I
 In any way am guilty of this charge.
 
 JOCASTA
 Believe him, I adjure thee, Oedipus,
 First for his solemn oath's sake, then for mine,
 And for thine elders' sake who wait on thee.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Hearken, King, reflect, we pray thee, but not stubborn but relent.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Say to what should I consent?
 
 CHORUS
 Respect a man whose probity and troth
 Are known to all and now confirmed by oath.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Dost know what grace thou cravest?
 
 CHORUS
                                    Yea, I know.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Declare it then and make thy meaning plain.
 
 CHORUS
 Brand not a friend whom babbling tongues assail;
 Let not suspicion 'gainst his oath prevail.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Bethink you that in seeking this ye seek
 In very sooth my death or banishment?
 
 CHORUS
 No, by the leader of the host divine!
 (Str. 2)
 Witness, thou Sun, such thought was never mine,
 Unblest, unfriended may I perish,
 If ever I such wish did cherish!
 But O my heart is desolate
 Musing on our striken State,
 Doubly fall'n should discord grow
 Twixt you twain, to crown our woe.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Well, let him go, no matter what it cost me,
 Or certain death or shameful banishment,
 For your sake I relent, not his; and him,
 Where'er he be, my heart shall still abhor.
 
 CREON
 Thou art as sullen in thy yielding mood
 As in thine anger thou wast truculent.
 Such tempers justly plague themselves the most.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Leave me in peace and get thee gone.
 
 CREON
                                    I go,
 By thee misjudged, but justified by these.
 [Exeunt CREON]
 
 CHORUS
 (Ant. 1)
 Lady, lead indoors thy consort; wherefore longer here delay?
 
 JOCASTA
 Tell me first how rose the fray.
 
 CHORUS
 Rumors bred unjust suspicious and injustice rankles sore.
 
 JOCASTA
 Were both at fault?
 
 CHORUS
                     Both.
 
 JOCASTA
                          What was the tale?
 
 CHORUS
 Ask me no more.  The land is sore distressed;
 'Twere better sleeping ills to leave at rest.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Strange counsel, friend!  I know thou mean'st me well,
 And yet would'st mitigate and blunt my zeal.
 
 CHORUS
 (Ant. 2)
 King, I say it once again,
 Witless were I proved, insane,
 If I lightly put away
 Thee my country's prop and stay,
 Pilot who, in danger sought,
 To a quiet haven brought
 Our distracted State; and now
 Who can guide us right but thou?
 
 JOCASTA
 Let me too, I adjure thee, know, O king,
 What cause has stirred this unrelenting wrath.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I will, for thou art more to me than these.
 Lady, the cause is Creon and his plots.
 
 JOCASTA
 But what provoked the quarrel? make this clear.
 
 OEDIPUS
 He points me out as Laius' murderer.
 
 JOCASTA
 Of his own knowledge or upon report?
 
 OEDIPUS
 He is too cunning to commit himself,
 And makes a mouthpiece of a knavish seer.
 
 JOCASTA
 Then thou mayest ease thy conscience on that score.
 Listen and I'll convince thee that no man
 Hath scot or lot in the prophetic art.
 Here is the proof in brief.  An oracle
 Once came to Laius (I will not say
 'Twas from the Delphic god himself, but from
 His ministers) declaring he was doomed
 To perish by the hand of his own son,
 A child that should be born to him by me.
 Now Laius--so at least report affirmed--
 Was murdered on a day by highwaymen,
 No natives, at a spot where three roads meet.
 As for the child, it was but three days old,
 When Laius, its ankles pierced and pinned
 Together, gave it to be cast away
 By others on the trackless mountain side.
 So then Apollo brought it not to pass
 The child should be his father's murderer,
 Or the dread terror find accomplishment,
 And Laius be slain by his own son.
 Such was the prophet's horoscope.  O king,
 Regard it not.  Whate'er the god deems fit
 To search, himself unaided will reveal.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What memories, what wild tumult of the soul
 Came o'er me, lady, as I heard thee speak!
 
 JOCASTA
 What mean'st thou?  What has shocked and startled thee?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Methought I heard thee say that Laius
 Was murdered at the meeting of three roads.
 
 JOCASTA
 So ran the story that is current still.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Where did this happen?  Dost thou know the place?
 
 JOCASTA
 Phocis the land is called; the spot is where
 Branch roads from Delphi and from Daulis meet.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And how long is it since these things befell?
 
 JOCASTA
 'Twas but a brief while were thou wast proclaimed
 Our country's ruler that the news was brought.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O Zeus, what hast thou willed to do with me!
 
 JOCASTA
 What is it, Oedipus, that moves thee so?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ask me not yet; tell me the build and height
 Of Laius?  Was he still in manhood's prime?
 
 JOCASTA
 Tall was he, and his hair was lightly strewn
 With silver; and not unlike thee in form.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O woe is me!  Mehtinks unwittingly
 I laid but now a dread curse on myself.
 
 JOCASTA
 What say'st thou?  When I look upon thee, my king,
 I tremble.
 
 OEDIPUS
           'Tis a dread presentiment
 That in the end the seer will prove not blind.
 One further question to resolve my doubt.
 
 JOCASTA
 I quail; but ask, and I will answer all.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Had he but few attendants or a train
 Of armed retainers with him, like a prince?
 
 JOCASTA
 They were but five in all, and one of them
 A herald; Laius in a mule-car rode.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Alas! 'tis clear as noonday now.  But say,
 Lady, who carried this report to Thebes?
 
 JOCASTA
 A serf, the sole survivor who returned.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Haply he is at hand or in the house?
 
 JOCASTA
 No, for as soon as he returned and found
 Thee reigning in the stead of Laius slain,
 He clasped my hand and supplicated me
 To send him to the alps and pastures, where
 He might be farthest from the sight of Thebes.
 And so I sent him.  'Twas an honest slave
 And well deserved some better recompense.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Fetch him at once.  I fain would see the man.
 
 JOCASTA
 He shall be brought; but wherefore summon him?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Lady, I fear my tongue has overrun
 Discretion; therefore I would question him.
 
 JOCASTA
 Well, he shall come, but may not I too claim
 To share the burden of thy heart, my king?
 
 OEDIPUS
 And thou shalt not be frustrate of thy wish.
 Now my imaginings have gone so far.
 Who has a higher claim that thou to hear
 My tale of dire adventures?  Listen then.
 My sire was Polybus of Corinth, and
 My mother Merope, a Dorian;
 And I was held the foremost citizen,
 Till a strange thing befell me, strange indeed,
 Yet scarce deserving all the heat it stirred.
 A roisterer at some banquet, flown with wine,
 Shouted "Thou art not true son of thy sire."
 It irked me, but I stomached for the nonce
 The insult; on the morrow I sought out
 My mother and my sire and questioned them.
 They were indignant at the random slur
 Cast on my parentage and did their best
 To comfort me, but still the venomed barb
 Rankled, for still the scandal spread and grew.
 So privily without their leave I went
 To Delphi, and Apollo sent me back
 Baulked of the knowledge that I came to seek.
 But other grievous things he prophesied,
 Woes, lamentations, mourning, portents dire;
 To wit I should defile my mother's bed
 And raise up seed too loathsome to behold,
 And slay the father from whose loins I sprang.
 Then, lady,--thou shalt hear the very truth--
 As I drew near the triple-branching roads,
 A herald met me and a man who sat
 In a car drawn by colts--as in thy tale--
 The man in front and the old man himself
 Threatened to thrust me rudely from the path,
 Then jostled by the charioteer in wrath
 I struck him, and the old man, seeing this,
 Watched till I passed and from his car brought down
 Full on my head the double-pointed goad.
      Yet was I quits with him and more; one stroke
 Of my good staff sufficed to fling him clean
 Out of the chariot seat and laid him prone.
 And so I slew them every one.  But if
 Betwixt this stranger there was aught in common
 With Laius, who more miserable than I,
 What mortal could you find more god-abhorred?
 Wretch whom no sojourner, no citizen
 May harbor or address, whom all are bound
 To harry from their homes.  And this same curse
 Was laid on me, and laid by none but me.
 Yea with  these hands all gory I pollute
 The bed of him I slew.  Say, am I vile?
 Am I not utterly unclean, a wretch
 Doomed to be banished, and in banishment
 Forgo the sight of all my dearest ones,
 And never tread again my native earth;
 Or else to wed my mother and slay my sire,
 Polybus, who begat me and upreared?
 If one should say, this is the handiwork
 Of some inhuman power, who could blame
 His judgment?  But, ye pure and awful gods,
 Forbid, forbid that I should see that day!
 May I be blotted out from living men
 Ere such a plague spot set on me its brand!
 
 CHORUS
 We too, O king, are troubled; but till thou
 Hast questioned the survivor, still hope on.
 
 OEDIPUS
 My hope is faint, but still enough survives
 To bid me bide the coming of this herd.
 
 JOCASTA
 Suppose him here, what wouldst thou learn of him?
 
 OEDIPUS
 I'll tell thee, lady; if his tale agrees
 With thine, I shall have 'scaped calamity.
 
 JOCASTA
 And what of special import did I say?
 
 OEDIPUS
 In thy report of what the herdsman said
 Laius was slain by robbers; now if he
 Still speaks of robbers, not a robber, I
 Slew him not; "one" with "many" cannot square.
 But if he says one lonely wayfarer,
 The last link wanting to my guilt is forged.
 
 JOCASTA
 Well, rest assured, his tale ran thus at first,
 Nor can he now retract what then he said;
 Not I alone but all our townsfolk heard it.
 E'en should he vary somewhat in his story,
 He cannot make the death of Laius
 In any wise jump with the oracle.
 For Loxias said expressly he was doomed
 To die by my child's hand, but he, poor babe,
 He shed no blood, but perished first himself.
 So much for divination.  Henceforth I
 Will look for signs neither to right nor left.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thou reasonest well.  Still I would have thee send
 And fetch the bondsman hither.  See to it.
 
 JOCASTA
 That will I straightway.  Come, let us within.
 I would do nothing that my lord mislikes.
 [Exeunt OEDIPUS and JOCASTA]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 My lot be still to lead
      The life of innocence and fly
 Irreverence in word or deed,
      To follow still those laws ordained on high
 Whose birthplace is the bright ethereal sky
      No mortal birth they own,
      Olympus their progenitor alone:
 Ne'er shall they slumber in oblivion cold,
 The god in them is strong and grows not old.
 
 (Ant. 1)
      Of insolence is bred
 The tyrant; insolence full blown,
      With empty riches surfeited,
 Scales the precipitous height and grasps the throne.
      Then topples o'er and lies in ruin prone;
      No foothold on that dizzy steep.
 But O may Heaven the true patriot keep
 Who burns with emulous zeal to serve the State.
 God is my help and hope, on him I wait.
 
 (Str. 2)
 But the proud sinner, or in word or deed,
      That will not Justice heed,
      Nor reverence the shrine
      Of images divine,
 Perdition seize his vain imaginings,
      If, urged by greed profane,
      He grasps at ill-got gain,
 And lays an impious hand on holiest things.
      Who when such deeds are done
      Can hope heaven's bolts to shun?
 If sin like this to honor can aspire,
 Why dance I still and lead the sacred choir?
 
 (Ant. 2)
 No more I'll seek earth's central oracle,
      Or Abae's hallowed cell,
      Nor to Olympia bring
      My votive offering.
 If before all God's truth be not bade plain.
      O Zeus, reveal thy might,
      King, if thou'rt named aright
 Omnipotent, all-seeing, as of old;
      For Laius is forgot;
      His weird, men heed it not;
 Apollo is forsook and faith grows cold.
 [Enter JOCASTA.]
 
 JOCASTA
 My lords, ye look amazed to see your queen
 With wreaths and gifts of incense in her hands.
 I had a mind to visit the high shrines,
 For Oedipus is overwrought, alarmed
 With terrors manifold.  He will not use
 His past experience, like a man of sense,
 To judge the present need, but lends an ear
 To any croaker if he augurs ill.
 Since then my counsels naught avail, I turn
 To thee, our present help in time of trouble,
 Apollo, Lord Lycean, and to thee
 My prayers and supplications here I bring.
 Lighten us, lord, and cleanse us from this curse!
 For now we all are cowed like mariners
 Who see their helmsman dumbstruck in the storm.
 [Enter Corinthian MESSENGER.]
 
 MESSENGER
 My masters, tell me where the palace is
 Of Oedipus; or better, where's the king.
 
 CHORUS
 Here is the palace and he bides within;
 This is his queen the mother of his children.
 
 MESSENGER
 All happiness attend her and the house,
 Blessed is her husband and her marriage-bed.
 
 JOCASTA
 My greetings to thee, stranger; thy fair words
 Deserve a like response.  But tell me why
 Thou comest--what thy need or what thy news.
 
 MESSENGER
 Good for thy consort and the royal house.
 
 JOCASTA
 What may it be?  Whose messenger art thou?
 
 MESSENGER
 The Isthmian commons have resolved to make
 Thy husband king--so 'twas reported there.
 
 JOCASTA
 What! is not aged Polybus still king?
 
 MESSENGER
 No, verily; he's dead and in his grave.
 
 JOCASTA
 What! is he dead, the sire of Oedipus?
 
 MESSENGER
 If I speak falsely, may I die myself.
 
 JOCASTA
 Quick, maiden, bear these tidings to my lord.
 Ye god-sent oracles, where stand ye now!
 This is the man whom Oedipus long shunned,
 In dread to prove his murderer; and now
 He dies in nature's course, not by his hand.
 [Enter OEDIPUS.]
 
 OEDIPUS
 My wife, my queen, Jocasta, why hast thou
 Summoned me from my palace?
 
 JOCASTA
                               Hear this man,
 And as thou hearest judge what has become
 Of all those awe-inspiring oracles.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Who is this man, and what his news for me?
 
 JOCASTA
 He comes from Corinth and his message this:
 Thy father Polybus hath passed away.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What? let me have it, stranger, from thy mouth.
 
 MESSENGER
 If I must first make plain beyond a doubt
 My message, know that Polybus is dead.
 
 OEDIPUS
 By treachery, or by sickness visited?
 
 MESSENGER
 One touch will send an old man to his rest.
 
 OEDIPUS
 So of some malady he died, poor man.
 
 MESSENGER
 Yes, having measured the full span of years.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Out on it, lady! why should one regard
 The Pythian hearth or birds that scream i' the air?
 Did they not point at me as doomed to slay
 My father? but he's dead and in his grave
 And here am I who ne'er unsheathed a sword;
 Unless the longing for his absent son
 Killed him and so _I_ slew him in a sense.
 But, as they stand, the oracles are dead--
 Dust, ashes, nothing, dead as Polybus.
 
 JOCASTA
 Say, did not I foretell this long ago?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thou didst:  but I was misled by my fear.
 
 JOCASTA
 Then let I no more weigh upon thy soul.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Must I not fear my mother's marriage bed.
 
 JOCASTA
 Why should a mortal man, the sport of chance,
 With no assured foreknowledge, be afraid?
 Best live a careless life from hand to mouth.
 This wedlock with thy mother fear not thou.
 How oft it chances that in dreams a man
 Has wed his mother!  He who least regards
 Such brainsick phantasies lives most at ease.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I should have shared in full thy confidence,
 Were not my mother living; since she lives
 Though half convinced I still must live in dread.
 
 JOCASTA
 And yet thy sire's death lights out darkness much.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Much, but my fear is touching her who lives.
 
 MESSENGER
 Who may this woman be whom thus you fear?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Merope, stranger, wife of Polybus.
 
 MESSENGER
 And what of her can cause you any fear?
 
 OEDIPUS
 A heaven-sent oracle of dread import.
 
 MESSENGER
 A mystery, or may a stranger hear it?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Aye, 'tis no secret.  Loxias once foretold
 That I should mate with mine own mother, and shed
 With my own hands the blood of my own sire.
 Hence Corinth was for many a year to me
 A home distant; and I trove abroad,
 But missed the sweetest sight, my parents' face.
 
 MESSENGER
 Was this the fear that exiled thee from home?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yea, and the dread of slaying my own sire.
 
 MESSENGER
 Why, since I came to give thee pleasure, King,
 Have I not rid thee of this second fear?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Well, thou shalt have due guerdon for thy pains.
 
 MESSENGER
 Well, I confess what chiefly made me come
 Was hope to profit by thy coming home.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Nay, I will ne'er go near my parents more.
 
 MESSENGER
 My son, 'tis plain, thou know'st not what thou doest.
 
 OEDIPUS
 How so, old man?  For heaven's sake tell me all.
 
 MESSENGER
 If this is why thou dreadest to return.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yea, lest the god's word be fulfilled in me.
 
 MESSENGER
 Lest through thy parents thou shouldst be accursed?
 
 OEDIPUS
 This and none other is my constant dread.
 
 MESSENGER
 Dost thou not know thy fears are baseless all?
 
 OEDIPUS
 How baseless, if I am their very son?
 
 MESSENGER
 Since Polybus was naught to thee in blood.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What say'st thou? was not Polybus my sire?
 
 MESSENGER
 As much thy sire as I am, and no more.
 
 OEDIPUS
 My sire no more to me than one who is naught?
 
 MESSENGER
 Since I begat thee not, no more did he.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What reason had he then to call me son?
 
 MESSENGER
 Know that he took thee from my hands, a gift.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yet, if no child of his, he loved me well.
 
 MESSENGER
 A childless man till then, he warmed to thee.
 
 OEDIPUS
 A foundling or a purchased slave, this child?
 
 MESSENGER
 I found thee in Cithaeron's wooded glens.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What led thee to explore those upland glades?
 
 MESSENGER
 My business was to tend the mountain flocks.
 
 OEDIPUS
 A vagrant shepherd journeying for hire?
 
 MESSENGER
 True, but thy savior in that hour, my son.
 
 OEDIPUS
 My savior? from what harm? what ailed me then?
 
 MESSENGER
 Those ankle joints are evidence enow.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ah, why remind me of that ancient sore?
 
 MESSENGER
 I loosed the pin that riveted thy feet.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yes, from my cradle that dread brand I bore.
 
 MESSENGER
 Whence thou deriv'st the name that still is thine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Who did it?  I adjure thee, tell me who
 Say, was it father, mother?
 
 MESSENGER
                               I know not.
 The man from whom I had thee may know more.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What, did another find me, not thyself?
 
 MESSENGER
 Not I; another shepherd gave thee me.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Who was he?  Would'st thou know again the man?
 
 MESSENGER
 He passed indeed for one of Laius' house.
 
 OEDIPUS
 The king who ruled the country long ago?
 
 MESSENGER
 The same:  he was a herdsman of the king.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And is he living still for me to see him?
 
 MESSENGER
 His fellow-countrymen should best know that.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Doth any bystander among you know
 The herd he speaks of, or by seeing him
 Afield or in the city? answer straight!
 The hour hath come to clear this business up.
 
 CHORUS
 Methinks he means none other than the hind
 Whom thou anon wert fain to see; but that
 Our queen Jocasta best of all could tell.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Madam, dost know the man we sent to fetch?
 Is the same of whom the stranger speaks?
 
 JOCASTA
 Who is the man?  What matter?  Let it be.
 'Twere waste of thought to weigh such idle words.
 
 OEDIPUS
 No, with such guiding clues I cannot fail
 To bring to light the secret of my birth.
 
 JOCASTA
 Oh, as thou carest for thy life, give o'er
 This quest.  Enough the anguish _I_ endure.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Be of good cheer; though I be proved the son
 Of a bondwoman, aye, through three descents
 Triply a slave, thy honor is unsmirched.
 
 JOCASTA
 Yet humor me, I pray thee; do not this.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I cannot; I must probe this matter home.
 
 JOCASTA
 'Tis for thy sake I advise thee for the best.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I grow impatient of this best advice.
 
 JOCASTA
 Ah mayst thou ne'er discover who thou art!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Go, fetch me here the herd, and leave yon woman
 To glory in her pride of ancestry.
 
 JOCASTA
 O woe is thee, poor wretch!  With that last word
 I leave thee, henceforth silent evermore.
 [Exit JOCASTA]
 
 CHORUS
 Why, Oedipus, why stung with passionate grief
 Hath the queen thus departed?  Much I fear
 From this dead calm will burst a storm of woes.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Let the storm burst, my fixed resolve still holds,
 To learn my lineage, be it ne'er so low.
 It may be she with all a woman's pride
 Thinks scorn of my base parentage.  But I
 Who rank myself as Fortune's favorite child,
 The giver of good gifts, shall not be shamed.
 She is my mother and the changing moons
 My brethren, and with them I wax and wane.
 Thus sprung why should I fear to trace my birth?
 Nothing can make me other than I am.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str.)
 If my soul prophetic err not, if my wisdom aught avail,
           Thee, Cithaeron, I shall hail,
 As the nurse and foster-mother of our Oedipus shall greet
 Ere tomorrow's full moon rises, and exalt thee as is meet.
 Dance and song shall hymn thy praises, lover of our royal race.
           Phoebus, may my words find grace!
 
 (Ant.)
 Child,  who bare thee, nymph or goddess? sure thy sure was  more  than
 man,
           Haply the hill-roamer Pan.
 Of did Loxias beget thee, for he haunts the upland wold;
 Or Cyllene's lord, or Bacchus, dweller on the hilltops cold?
 Did some Heliconian Oread give him thee, a new-born joy?
           Nymphs with whom he love to toy?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Elders, if I, who never yet before
 Have met the man, may make a guess, methinks
 I see the herdsman who we long have sought;
 His time-worn aspect matches with the years
 Of yonder aged messenger; besides
 I seem to recognize the men who bring him
 As servants of my own.  But you, perchance,
 Having in past days known or seen the herd,
 May better by sure knowledge my surmise.
 
 CHORUS
 I recognize him; one of Laius' house;
 A simple hind, but true as any man.
 [Enter HERDSMAN.]
 
 OEDIPUS
 Corinthian, stranger, I address thee first,
 Is this the man thou meanest!
 
 MESSENGER
                               This is he.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And now old man, look up and answer all
 I ask thee.  Wast thou once of Laius' house?
 
 HERDSMAN
 I was, a thrall, not purchased but home-bred.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What was thy business? how wast thou employed?
 
 HERDSMAN
 The best part of my life I tended sheep.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What were the pastures thou didst most frequent?
 
 HERDSMAN
 Cithaeron and the neighboring alps.
 
 OEDIPUS
                                    Then there
 Thou must have known yon man, at least by fame?
 
 HERDSMAN
 Yon man? in what way? what man dost thou mean?
 
 OEDIPUS
 The man here, having met him in past times...
 
 HERDSMAN
 Off-hand I cannot call him well to mind.
 
 MESSENGER
 No wonder, master.  But I will revive
 His blunted memories.  Sure he can recall
 What time together both we drove our flocks,
 He two, I one, on the Cithaeron range,
 For three long summers; I his mate from spring
 Till rose Arcturus; then in winter time
 I led mine home, he his to Laius' folds.
 Did these things happen as I say, or no?
 
 HERDSMAN
 'Tis long ago, but all thou say'st is true.
 
 MESSENGER
 Well, thou mast then remember giving me
 A child to rear as my own foster-son?
 
 HERDSMAN
 Why dost thou ask this question?  What of that?
 
 MESSENGER
 Friend, he that stands before thee was that child.
 
 HERDSMAN
 A plague upon thee!  Hold thy wanton tongue!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Softly, old man, rebuke him not; thy words
 Are more deserving chastisement than his.
 
 HERDSMAN
 O best of masters, what is my offense?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Not answering what he asks about the child.
 
 HERDSMAN
 He speaks at random, babbles like a fool.
 
 OEDIPUS
 If thou lack'st grace to speak, I'll loose thy tongue.
 
 HERDSMAN
 For mercy's sake abuse not an old man.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Arrest the villain, seize and pinion him!
 
 HERDSMAN
 Alack, alack!
 What have I done? what wouldst thou further learn?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Didst give this man the child of whom he asks?
 
 HERDSMAN
 I did; and would that I had died that day!
 
 OEDIPUS
 And die thou shalt unless thou tell the truth.
 
 HERDSMAN
 But, if I tell it, I am doubly lost.
 
 OEDIPUS
 The knave methinks will still prevaricate.
 
 HERDSMAN
 Nay, I confessed I gave it long ago.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Whence came it? was it thine, or given to thee?
 
 HERDSMAN
 I had it from another, 'twas not mine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 From whom of these our townsmen, and what house?
 
 HERDSMAN
 Forbear for God's sake, master, ask no more.
 
 OEDIPUS
 If I must question thee again, thou'rt lost.
 
 HERDSMAN
 Well then--it was a child of Laius' house.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Slave-born or one of Laius' own race?
 
 HERDSMAN
 Ah me!
 I stand upon the perilous edge of speech.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And I of hearing, but I still must hear.
 
 HERDSMAN
 Know then the child was by repute his own,
 But she within, thy consort best could tell.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What! she, she gave it thee?
 
 HERDSMAN
                               'Tis so, my king.
 
 OEDIPUS
 With what intent?
 
 HERDSMAN
                     To make away with it.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What, she its mother.
 
 HERDSMAN
                     Fearing a dread weird.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What weird?
 
 HERDSMAN
           'Twas told that he should slay his sire.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What didst thou give it then to this old man?
 
 HERDSMAN
 Through pity, master, for the babe.  I thought
 He'd take it to the country whence he came;
 But he preserved it for the worst of woes.
 For if thou art in sooth what this man saith,
 God pity thee! thou wast to misery born.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ah me! ah me! all brought to pass, all true!
 O light, may I behold thee nevermore!
 I stand a wretch, in birth, in wedlock cursed,
 A parricide, incestuously, triply cursed!
 [Exit OEDIPUS]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
           Races of mortal man
           Whose life is but a span,
 I count ye but the shadow of a shade!
           For he who most doth know
           Of bliss, hath but the show;
 A moment, and the visions pale and fade.
 Thy fall, O Oedipus, thy piteous fall
 Warns me none born of women blest to call.
 
 (Ant. 1)
           For he of marksmen best,
           O Zeus, outshot the rest,
 And won the prize supreme of wealth and power.
           By him the vulture maid
           Was quelled, her witchery laid;
 He rose our savior and the land's strong tower.
 We hailed thee king and from that day adored
 Of mighty Thebes the universal lord.
 
 (Str. 2)
           O heavy hand of fate!
           Who now more desolate,
 Whose tale more sad than thine, whose lot more dire?
           O Oedipus, discrowned head,
           Thy cradle was thy marriage bed;
 One harborage sufficed for son and sire.
 How could the soil thy father eared so long
 Endure to bear in silence such a wrong?
 
 (Ant. 2)
           All-seeing Time hath caught
           Guilt, and to justice brought
 The son and sire commingled in one bed.
           O child of Laius' ill-starred race
           Would I had ne'er beheld thy face;
 I raise for thee a dirge as o'er the dead.
 Yet, sooth to say, through thee I drew new breath,
 And now through thee I feel a second death.
 [Enter SECOND MESSENGER.]
 
 SECOND MESSENGER
 Most grave and reverend senators of Thebes,
 What Deeds ye soon must hear, what sights behold
 How will ye mourn, if, true-born patriots,
 Ye reverence still the race of Labdacus!
 Not Ister nor all Phasis' flood, I ween,
 Could wash away the blood-stains from this house,
 The ills it shrouds or soon will bring to light,
 Ills wrought of malice, not unwittingly.
 The worst to bear are self-inflicted wounds.
 
 CHORUS
 Grievous enough for all our tears and groans
 Our past calamities; what canst thou add?
 
 SECOND MESSENGER
 My tale is quickly told and quickly heard.
 Our sovereign lady queen Jocasta's dead.
 
 CHORUS
 Alas, poor queen! how came she by her death?
 
 SECOND MESSENGER
 By her own hand.  And all the horror of it,
 Not having seen, yet cannot comprehend.
 Nathless, as far as my poor memory serves,
 I will relate the unhappy lady's woe.
 When in her frenzy she had passed inside
 The vestibule, she hurried straight to win
 The bridal-chamber, clutching at her hair
 With both her hands, and, once within the room,
 She shut the doors behind her with a crash.
 "Laius," she cried, and called her husband dead
 Long, long ago; her thought was of that child
 By him begot, the son by whom the sire
 Was murdered and the mother left to breed
 With her own seed, a monstrous progeny.
 Then she bewailed the marriage bed whereon
 Poor wretch, she had conceived a double brood,
 Husband by husband, children by her child.
 What happened after that I cannot tell,
 Nor how the end befell, for with a shriek
 Burst on us Oedipus; all eyes were fixed
 On Oedipus, as up and down he strode,
 Nor could we mark her agony to the end.
 For stalking to and fro "A sword!" he cried,
 "Where is the wife, no wife, the teeming womb
 That bore a double harvest, me and mine?"
 And in his frenzy some supernal power
 (No mortal, surely, none of us who watched him)
 Guided his footsteps; with a terrible shriek,
 As though one beckoned him, he crashed against
 The folding doors, and from their staples forced
 The wrenched bolts and hurled himself within.
 Then we beheld the woman hanging there,
 A running noose entwined about her neck.
 But when he saw her, with a maddened roar
 He loosed the cord; and when her wretched corpse
 Lay stretched on earth, what followed--O 'twas dread!
 He tore the golden brooches that upheld
 Her queenly robes, upraised them high and smote
 Full on his eye-balls, uttering words like these:
 "No more shall ye behold such sights of woe,
 Deeds I have suffered and myself have wrought;
 Henceforward quenched in darkness shall ye see
 Those ye should ne'er have seen; now blind to those
 Whom, when I saw, I vainly yearned to know."
      Such was the burden of his moan, whereto,
 Not once but oft, he struck with his hand uplift
 His eyes, and at each stroke the ensanguined orbs
 Bedewed his beard, not oozing drop by drop,
 But one black gory downpour, thick as hail.
 Such evils, issuing from the double source,
 Have whelmed them both, confounding man and wife.
 Till now the storied fortune of this house
 Was fortunate indeed; but from this day
 Woe, lamentation, ruin, death, disgrace,
 All ills that can be named, all, all are theirs.
 
 CHORUS
 But hath he still no respite from his pain?
 
 SECOND MESSENGER
 He cries, "Unbar the doors and let all Thebes
 Behold the slayer of his sire, his mother's--"
 That shameful word my lips may not repeat.
 He vows to fly self-banished from the land,
 Nor stay to bring upon his house the curse
 Himself had uttered; but he has no strength
 Nor one to guide him, and his torture's more
 Than man can suffer, as yourselves will see.
 For lo, the palace portals are unbarred,
 And soon ye shall behold a sight so sad
 That he who must abhorred would pity it.
 [Enter OEDIPUS blinded.]
 
 CHORUS
           Woeful sight! more woeful none
           These sad eyes have looked upon.
           Whence this madness?  None can tell
           Who did cast on thee his spell,
           prowling all thy life around,
           Leaping with a demon bound.
           Hapless wretch! how can I brook
           On thy misery to look?
           Though to gaze on thee I yearn,
           Much to question, much to learn,
           Horror-struck away I turn.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ah me! ah woe is me!
 Ah whither am I borne!
 How like a ghost forlorn
 My voice flits from me on the air!
 On, on the demon goads.  The end, ah where?
 
 CHORUS
 An end too dread to tell, too dark to see.
 
 OEDIPUS
 (Str. 1)
 Dark, dark!  The horror of darkness, like a shroud,
 Wraps me and bears me on through mist and cloud.
 Ah me, ah me!  What spasms athwart me shoot,
 What pangs of agonizing memory?
 
 CHORUS
 No marvel if in such a plight thou feel'st
 The double weight of past and present woes.
 
 OEDIPUS
 (Ant. 1)
 Ah friend, still loyal, constant still and kind,
           Thou carest for the blind.
 I know thee near, and though bereft of eyes,
           Thy voice I recognize.
 
 CHORUS
 O doer of dread deeds, how couldst thou mar
 Thy vision thus?  What demon goaded thee?
 
 OEDIPUS
 (Str. 2)
 Apollo, friend, Apollo, he it was
           That brought these ills to pass;
 But the right hand that dealt the blow
           Was mine, none other.  How,
 How, could I longer see when sight
           Brought no delight?
 
 CHORUS
 Alas! 'tis as thou sayest.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Say, friends, can any look or voice
 Or touch of love henceforth my heart rejoice?
           Haste, friends, no fond delay,
           Take the twice cursed away
                Far from all ken,
 The man abhorred of gods, accursed of men.
 
 CHORUS
 O thy despair well suits thy desperate case.
 Would I had never looked upon thy face!
 
 OEDIPUS
 (Ant. 2)
 My curse on him whoe'er unrived
 The waif's fell fetters and my life revived!
 He meant me well, yet had he left me there,
 He had saved my friends and me a world of care.
 
 CHORUS
 I too had wished it so.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Then had I never come to shed
 My father's blood nor climbed my mother's bed;
 The monstrous offspring of a womb defiled,
 Co-mate of him who gendered me, and child.
 Was ever man before afflicted thus,
 Like Oedipus.
 
 CHORUS
 I cannot say that thou hast counseled well,
 For thou wert better dead than living blind.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What's done was well done.  Thou canst never shake
 My firm belief.  A truce to argument.
 For, had I sight, I know not with what eyes
 I could have met my father in the shades,
 Or my poor mother, since against the twain
 I sinned, a sin no gallows could atone.
 Aye, but, ye say, the sight of children joys
 A parent's eyes.  What, born as mine were born?
 No, such a sight could never bring me joy;
 Nor this fair city with its battlements,
 Its temples and the statues of its gods,
 Sights from which I, now wretchedst of all,
 Once ranked the foremost Theban in all Thebes,
 By my own sentence am cut off, condemned
 By my own proclamation 'gainst the wretch,
 The miscreant by heaven itself declared
 Unclean--and of the race of Laius.
 Thus branded as a felon by myself,
 How had I dared to look you in the face?
 Nay, had I known a way to choke the springs
 Of hearing, I had never shrunk to make
 A dungeon of this miserable frame,
 Cut off from sight and hearing; for 'tis bliss
 to bide in regions sorrow cannot reach.
 Why didst thou harbor me, Cithaeron, why
 Didst thou not take and slay me?  Then I never
 Had shown to men the secret of my birth.
 O Polybus, O Corinth, O my home,
 Home of my ancestors (so wast thou called)
 How fair a nursling then I seemed, how foul
 The canker that lay festering in the bud!
 Now is the blight revealed of root and fruit.
 Ye triple high-roads, and thou hidden glen,
 Coppice, and pass where meet the three-branched ways,
 Ye drank my blood, the life-blood these hands spilt,
 My father's; do ye call to mind perchance
 Those deeds of mine ye witnessed and the work
 I wrought thereafter when I came to Thebes?
 O fatal wedlock, thou didst give me birth,
 And, having borne me, sowed again my seed,
 Mingling the blood of fathers, brothers, children,
 Brides, wives and mothers, an incestuous brood,
 All horrors that are wrought beneath the sun,
 Horrors so foul to name them were unmeet.
 O, I adjure you, hide me anywhere
 Far from this land, or slay me straight, or cast me
 Down to the depths of ocean out of sight.
 Come hither, deign to touch an abject wretch;
 Draw near and fear not; I myself must bear
 The load of guilt that none but I can share.
 [Enter CREON.]
 
 CREON
 Lo, here is Creon, the one man to grant
 Thy prayer by action or advice, for he
 Is left the State's sole guardian in thy stead.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ah me! what words to accost him can I find?
 What cause has he to trust me?  In the past
 I have bee proved his rancorous enemy.
 
 CREON
 Not in derision, Oedipus, I come
 Nor to upbraid thee with thy past misdeeds.
 (To BYSTANDERS)
 But shame upon you! if ye feel no sense
 Of human decencies, at least revere
 The Sun whose light beholds and nurtures all.
 Leave not thus nakedly for all to gaze at
 A horror neither earth nor rain from heaven
 Nor light will suffer.  Lead him straight within,
 For it is seemly that a kinsman's woes
 Be heard by kin and seen by kin alone.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O listen, since thy presence comes to me
 A shock of glad surprise--so noble thou,
 And I so vile--O grant me one small boon.
 I ask it not on my behalf, but thine.
 
 CREON
 And what the favor thou wouldst crave of me?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Forth from thy borders thrust me with all speed;
 Set me within some vasty desert where
 No mortal voice shall greet me any more.
 
 CREON
 This had I done already, but I deemed
 It first behooved me to consult the god.
 
 OEDIPUS
 His will was set forth fully--to destroy
 The parricide, the scoundrel;  and I am he.
 
 CREON
 Yea, so he spake, but in our present plight
 'Twere better to consult the god anew.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Dare ye inquire concerning such a wretch?
 
 CREON
 Yea, for thyself wouldst credit now his word.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Aye, and on thee in all humility
 I lay this charge:  let her who lies within
 Receive such burial as thou shalt ordain;
 Such rites 'tis thine, as brother, to perform.
 But for myself, O never let my Thebes,
 The city of my sires, be doomed to bear
 The burden of my presence while I live.
 No, let me be a dweller on the hills,
 On yonder mount Cithaeron, famed as mine,
 My tomb predestined for me by my sire
 And mother, while they lived, that I may die
 Slain as they sought to slay me, when alive.
 This much I know full surely, nor disease
 Shall end my days, nor any common chance;
 For I had ne'er been snatched from death, unless
 I was predestined to some awful doom.
      So be it.  I reck not how Fate deals with me
 But my unhappy children--for my sons
 Be not concerned, O Creon, they are men,
 And for themselves, where'er they be, can fend.
 But for my daughters twain, poor innocent maids,
 Who ever sat beside me at the board
 Sharing my viands, drinking of my cup,
 For them, I pray thee, care, and, if thou willst,
 O might I feel their touch and make my moan.
 Hear me, O prince, my noble-hearted prince!
 Could I but blindly touch them with my hands
 I'd think they still were mine, as when I saw.
 [ANTIGONE and ISMENE are led in.]
 What say I? can it be my pretty ones
 Whose sobs I hear?  Has Creon pitied me
 And sent me my two darlings?  Can this be?
 
 CREON
 'Tis true; 'twas I procured thee this delight,
 Knowing the joy they were to thee of old.
 
 OEDIPUS
 God speed thee! and as meed for bringing them
 May Providence deal with thee kindlier
 Than it has dealt with me!  O children mine,
 Where are ye?  Let me clasp you with these hands,
 A brother's hands, a father's; hands that made
 Lack-luster sockets of his once bright eyes;
 Hands of a man who blindly, recklessly,
 Became your sire by her from whom he sprang.
 Though I cannot behold you, I must weep
 In thinking of the evil days to come,
 The slights and wrongs that men will put upon you.
 Where'er ye go to feast or festival,
 No merrymaking will it prove for you,
 But oft abashed in tears ye will return.
 And when ye come to marriageable years,
 Where's the bold wooers who will jeopardize
 To take unto himself such disrepute
 As to my children's children still must cling,
 For what of infamy is lacking here?
 "Their father slew his father, sowed the seed
 Where he himself was gendered, and begat
 These maidens at the source wherefrom he sprang."
 Such are the gibes that men will cast at you.
 Who then will wed you?  None, I ween, but ye
 Must pine, poor maids, in single barrenness.
 O Prince, Menoeceus' son, to thee, I turn,
 With the it rests to father them, for we
 Their natural parents, both of us, are lost.
 O leave them not to wander poor, unwed,
 Thy kin, nor let them share my low estate.
 O pity them so young, and but for thee
 All destitute.  Thy hand upon it, Prince.
 To you, my children I had much to say,
 Were ye but ripe to hear.  Let this suffice:
 Pray ye may find some home and live content,
 And may your lot prove happier than your sire's.
 
 CREON
 Thou hast had enough of weeping; pass within.
 
 OEDIPUS
                                              I must obey,
 Though 'tis grievous.
 
 CREON
                          Weep not, everything must have its day.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Well I go, but on conditions.
 
 CREON
                               What thy terms for going, say.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Send me from the land an exile.
 
 CREON
                               Ask this of the gods, not me.
 
 OEDIPUS
 But I am the gods' abhorrence.
 
 CREON
                               Then they soon will grant thy plea.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Lead me hence, then, I am willing.
 
 CREON
                                    Come, but let thy children go.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Rob me not of these my children!
 
 CREON
                                    Crave not mastery in all,
 For the mastery that raised thee was thy bane and wrought thy fall.
 
 CHORUS
 Look ye, countrymen and Thebans, this is Oedipus the great,
 He who knew the Sphinx's riddle and was mightiest in our state.
 Who of all our townsmen gazed not on his fame with envious eyes?
 Now, in what a sea of troubles sunk and overwhelmed he lies!
 Therefore wait to see life's ending ere thou count one mortal blest;
 Wait till free from pain and sorrow he has gained his final rest.
 
 
 
 
 FOOTNOTES
 ---------
 
 [Footnote 1:  Dr. Kennedy and others render "Since to men of experience
 I  see that also comparisons of their counsels are in most lively use."]
 
 [Footnote 2:  Literally "not to call them thine," but the Greek may be
 rendered "In order not to reveal thine."]
 
 [Footnote 3:  The Greek text that occurs in this place has been lost.]
 
 
 
 
 
                               SOPHOCLES
 
                           OEDIPUS AT COLONUS
 
                      Translation by F. Storr, BA
             Formerly Scholar of Trinity College, Cambridge
                     From the Loeb Library Edition
                        Originally published by
                Harvard University Press, Cambridge, MA
                                  and
                     William Heinemann Ltd, London
 
                        First published in 1912
 
                                *****
 
                                ARGUMENT
 
 Oedipus, the blind and banished King of Thebes, has come in his
 wanderings to Colonus, a deme of Athens, led by his daughter Antigone.
 He sits to rest on a rock just within a sacred grove of the Furies and
 is bidden depart by a passing native. But Oedipus, instructed by an
 oracle that he had reached his final resting-place, refuses to stir, and
 the stranger consents to go and consult the Elders of Colonus (the
 Chorus of the Play). Conducted to the spot they pity at first the blind
 beggar and his daughter, but on learning his name they are horror-
 striken and order him to quit the land. He appeals to the world-famed
 hospitality of Athens and hints at the blessings that his coming will
 confer on the State. They agree to await the decision of King Theseus.
 From Theseus Oedipus craves protection in life and burial in Attic soil;
 the benefits that will accrue shall be told later. Theseus departs
 having promised to aid and befriend him. No sooner has he gone than
 Creon enters with an armed guard who seize Antigone and carry her off
 (Ismene, the other sister, they have already captured) and he is about
 to lay hands on Oedipus, when Theseus, who has heard the tumult, hurries
 up and, upbraiding Creon for his lawless act, threatens to detain him
 till he has shown where the captives are and restored them. In the next
 scene Theseus returns bringing with him the rescued maidens. He informs
 Oedipus that a stranger who has taken sanctuary at the altar of Poseidon
 wishes to see him. It is Polyneices who has come to crave his father's
 forgiveness and blessing, knowing by an oracle that victory will fall to
 the side that Oedipus espouses. But Oedipus spurns the hypocrite, and
 invokes a dire curse on both his unnatural sons. A sudden clap of
 thunder is heard, and as peal follows peal, Oedipus is aware that his
 hour is come and bids Antigone summon Theseus. Self-guided he leads the
 way to the spot where death should overtake him, attended by Theseus and
 his daughters. Halfway he bids his daughters farewell, and what followed
 none but Theseus knew. He was not (so the Messenger reports) for the
 gods took him.
 
                               *****
 
                           DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
 OEDIPUS, banished King of Thebes.
 ANTIGONE, his daughter.
 ISMENE, his daughter.
 THESEUS, King of Athens.
 CREON, brother of Jocasta, now reigning at Thebes.
 POLYNEICES, elder son of Oedipus.
 STRANGER, a native of Colonus.
 MESSENGER, an attendant of Theseus.
 CHORUS, citizens of Colonus.
 
      Scene:  In front of the grove of the Eumenides.
 
                                *****
 
                           OEDIPUS AT COLONUS
 
 Enter the blind OEDIPUS led by his daughter, ANTIGONE.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Child of an old blind sire, Antigone,
 What region, say, whose city have we reached?
 Who will provide today with scanted dole
 This wanderer?  'Tis little that he craves,
 And less obtains--that less enough for me;
 For I am taught by suffering to endure,
 And the long years that have grown old with me,
 And last not least, by true nobility.
 My daughter, if thou seest a resting place
 On common ground or by some sacred grove,
 Stay me and set me down.  Let us discover
 Where we have come, for strangers must inquire
 Of denizens, and do as they are bid.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Long-suffering father, Oedipus, the towers
 That fence the city still are faint and far;
 But where we stand is surely holy ground;
 A wilderness of laurel, olive, vine;
 Within a choir or songster nightingales
 Are warbling.  On this native seat of rock
 Rest; for an old man thou hast traveled far.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Guide these dark steps and seat me there secure.
 
 ANTIGONE
 If time can teach, I need not to be told.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Say, prithee, if thou knowest, where we are.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Athens I recognize, but not the spot.
 
 OEDIPUS
 That much we heard from every wayfarer.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Shall I go on and ask about the place?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yes, daughter, if it be inhabited.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Sure there are habitations; but no need
 To leave thee; yonder is a man hard by.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What, moving hitherward and on his way?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Say rather, here already.  Ask him straight
 The needful questions, for the man is here.
 [Enter STRANGER]
 
 OEDIPUS
 O stranger, as I learn from her whose eyes
 Must serve both her and me, that thou art here
 Sent by some happy chance to serve our doubts--
 
 STRANGER
 First quit that seat, then question me at large:
 The spot thou treadest on is holy ground.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What is the site, to what god dedicate?
 
 STRANGER
 Inviolable, untrod; goddesses,
 Dread brood of Earth and Darkness, here abide.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Tell me the awful name I should invoke?
 
 STRANGER
 The Gracious Ones, All-seeing, so our folk
 Call them, but elsewhere other names are rife.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Then may they show their suppliant grace, for I
 From this your sanctuary will ne'er depart.
 
 STRANGER
 What word is this?
 
 OEDIPUS
                     The watchword of my fate.
 
 STRANGER
 Nay, 'tis not mine to bid thee hence without
 Due warrant and instruction from the State.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Now in God's name, O stranger, scorn me not
 As a wayfarer; tell me what I crave.
 
 STRANGER
 Ask; your request shall not be scorned by me.
 
 OEDIPUS
 How call you then the place wherein we bide?
 
 STRANGER
 Whate'er I know thou too shalt know; the place
 Is all to great Poseidon consecrate.
 Hard by, the Titan, he who bears the torch,
 Prometheus, has his worship; but the spot
 Thou treadest, the Brass-footed Threshold named,
 Is Athens' bastion, and the neighboring lands
 Claim as their chief and patron yonder knight
 Colonus, and in common bear his name.
 Such, stranger, is the spot, to fame unknown,
 But dear to us its native worshipers.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thou sayest there are dwellers in these parts?
 
 STRANGER
 Surely; they bear the name of yonder god.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ruled by a king or by the general voice?
 
 STRANGER
 The lord of Athens is our over-lord.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Who is this monarch, great in word and might?
 
 STRANGER
 Theseus, the son of Aegeus our late king.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Might one be sent from you to summon him?
 
 STRANGER
 Wherefore?  To tell him aught or urge his coming?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Say a slight service may avail him much.
 
 STRANGER
 How can he profit from a sightless man?
 
 OEDIPUS
 The blind man's words will be instinct with sight.
 
 STRANGER
 Heed then; I fain would see thee out of harm;
 For by the looks, marred though they be by fate,
 I judge thee noble; tarry where thou art,
 While I go seek the burghers--those at hand,
 Not in the city.  They will soon decide
 Whether thou art to rest or go thy way.
 [Exit STRANGER]
 
 OEDIPUS
 Tell me, my daughter, has the stranger gone?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Yes, he has gone; now we are all alone,
 And thou may'st speak, dear father, without fear.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Stern-visaged queens, since coming to this land
 First in your sanctuary I bent the knee,
 Frown not on me or Phoebus, who, when erst
 He told me all my miseries to come,
 Spake of this respite after many years,
 Some haven in a far-off land, a rest
 Vouchsafed at last by dread divinities.
 "There," said he, "shalt thou round thy weary life,
 A blessing to the land wherein thou dwell'st,
 But to the land that cast thee forth, a curse."
 And of my weird he promised signs should come,
 Earthquake, or thunderclap, or lightning flash.
 And now I recognize as yours the sign
 That led my wanderings to this your grove;
 Else had I never lighted on you first,
 A wineless man on your seat of native rock.
 O goddesses, fulfill Apollo's word,
 Grant me some consummation of my life,
 If haply I appear not all too vile,
 A thrall to sorrow worse than any slave.
 Hear, gentle daughters of primeval Night,
 Hear, namesake of great Pallas; Athens, first
 Of cities, pity this dishonored shade,
 The ghost of him who once was Oedipus.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Hush! for I see some grey-beards on their way,
 Their errand to spy out our resting-place.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I will be mute, and thou shalt guide my steps
 Into the covert from the public road,
 Till I have learned their drift.  A prudent man
 Will ever shape his course by what he learns.
 [Enter CHORUS]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Ha!  Where is he?  Look around!
 Every nook and corner scan!
 He the all-presumptuous man,
 Whither vanished? search the ground!
 A wayfarer, I ween,
 A wayfarer, no countryman of ours,
 That old man must have been;
 Never had native dared to tempt the Powers,
           Or enter their demesne,
 The Maids in awe of whom each mortal cowers,
           Whose name no voice betrays nor cry,
           And as we pass them with averted eye,
 We move hushed lips in reverent piety.
           But now some godless man,
                'Tis rumored, here abides;
           The precincts through I scan,
                Yet wot not where he hides,
                     The wretch profane!
                     I search and search in vain.
 
 OEDIPUS
           I am that man; I know you near
           Ears to the blind, they say, are eyes.
 
 CHORUS
           O dread to see and dread to hear!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Oh sirs, I am no outlaw under ban.
 
 CHORUS
 Who can he be--Zeus save us!--this old man?
 
 OEDIPUS
 No favorite of fate,
 That ye should envy his estate,
 O, Sirs, would any happy mortal, say,
 Grope by the light of other eyes his way,
 Or face the storm upon so frail a stay?
 
 CHORUS
 (Ant. 1)
 Wast thou then sightless from thy birth?
 Evil, methinks, and long
 Thy pilgrimage on earth.
 Yet add not curse to curse and wrong to wrong.
           I warn thee, trespass not
           Within this hallowed spot,
 Lest thou shouldst find the silent grassy glade
           Where offerings are laid,
 Bowls of spring water mingled with sweet mead.
           Thou must not stay,
           Come, come away,
           Tired wanderer, dost thou heed?
 (We are far off, but sure our voice can reach.)
           If aught thou wouldst beseech,
 Speak where 'tis right; till then refrain from speech.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Daughter, what counsel should we now pursue?
 
 ANTIGONE
 We must obey and do as here they do.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thy hand then!
 
 ANTIGONE
                Here, O father, is my hand,
 
 OEDIPUS
 O Sirs, if I come forth at your command,
 Let me not suffer for my confidence.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 2)
 Against thy will no man shall drive thee hence.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Shall I go further?
 
 CHORUS
                     Aye.
 
 OEDIPUS
                          What further still?
 
 CHORUS
 Lead maiden, thou canst guide him where we will.
 
 ANTIGONE [4]
 *       *        *        *        *        *
 
 OEDIPUS
 *       *        *        *        *        *
 
 ANTIGONE
 *       *        *        *        *        *
 Follow with blind steps, father, as I lead.
 
 OEDIPUS
 
 *       *        *        *        *        *
 
 CHORUS
 In a strange land strange thou art;
 To her will incline thy heart;
 Honor whatso'er the State
 Honors, all she frowns on hate.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Guide me child, where we may range
 Safe within the paths of right;
 Counsel freely may exchange
 Nor with fate and fortune fight.
 
 CHORUS
 (Ant. 2)
 Halt!  Go no further than that rocky floor.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Stay where I now am?
 
 CHORUS
                     Yes, advance no more.
 
 OEDIPUS
 May I sit down?
 
 CHORUS
                Move sideways towards the ledge,
 And sit thee crouching on the scarped edge.
 
 ANTIGONE
 This is my office, father, O incline--
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ah me! ah me!
 
 ANTIGONE
 Thy steps to my steps, lean thine aged frame on mine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Woe on my fate unblest!
 
 CHORUS
 Wanderer, now thou art at rest,
 Tell me of thy birth and home,
 From what far country art thou come,
 Led on thy weary way, declare!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Strangers, I have no country.  O forbear--
 
 CHORUS
 What is it, old man, that thou wouldst conceal?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Forbear, nor urge me further to reveal--
 
 CHORUS
 Why this reluctance?
 
 OEDIPUS
                     Dread my lineage.
 
 CHORUS
                                         Say!
 
 OEDIPUS
 What must I answer, child, ah welladay!
 
 CHORUS
 Say of what stock thou comest, what man's son--
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ah me, my daughter, now we are undone!
 
 ANTIGONE
 Speak, for thou standest on the slippery verge.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I will; no plea for silence can I urge.
 
 CHORUS
 Will neither speak?  Come, Sir, why dally thus!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Know'st one of Laius'--
 
 CHORUS
                          Ha?  Who!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Seed of Labdacus--
 
 CHORUS
                     Oh Zeus!
 
 OEDIPUS
 The hapless Oedipus.
 
 CHORUS
                     Art he?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Whate'er I utter, have no fear of me.
 
 CHORUS
 Begone!
 
 OEDIPUS
           O wretched me!
 
 CHORUS
                          Begone!
 
 OEDIPUS
 O daughter, what will hap anon?
 
 CHORUS
 Forth from our borders speed ye both!
 
 OEDIPUS
 How keep you then your troth?
 
 CHORUS
 Heaven's justice never smites
 Him who ill with ill requites.
 But if guile with guile contend,
 Bane, not blessing, is the end.
 Arise, begone and take thee hence straightway,
 Lest on our land a heavier curse thou lay.
 
 ANTIGONE
      O sirs! ye suffered not my father blind,
      Albeit gracious and to ruth inclined,
      Knowing the deeds he wrought, not innocent,
           But with no ill intent;
           Yet heed a maiden's moan
           Who pleads for him alone;
           My eyes, not reft of sight,
 Plead with you as a daughter's might
 You are our providence,
 O make us not go hence!
 O with a gracious nod
 Grant us the nigh despaired-of boon we crave?
           Hear us, O hear,
 But all that ye hold dear,
 Wife, children, homestead, hearth and God!
 Where will you find one, search ye ne'er so well.
 Who 'scapes perdition if a god impel!
 
 CHORUS
 Surely we pity thee and him alike
 Daughter of Oedipus, for your distress;
 But as we reverence the decrees of Heaven
 We cannot say aught other than we said.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O what avails renown or fair repute?
 Are they not vanity?  For, look you, now
 Athens is held of States the most devout,
 Athens alone gives hospitality
 And shelters the vexed stranger, so men say.
 Have I found so?  I whom ye dislodged
 First from my seat of rock and now would drive
 Forth from your land, dreading my name alone;
 For me you surely dread not, nor my deeds,
 Deeds of a man more sinned against than sinning,
 As I might well convince you, were it meet
 To tell my mother's story and my sire's,
 The cause of this your fear.  Yet am I then
 A villain born because in self-defense,
 Striken, I struck the striker back again?
 E'en had I known, no villainy 'twould prove:
 But all unwitting whither I went, I went--
 To ruin; my destroyers knew it well,
 Wherefore, I pray you, sirs, in Heaven's name,
 Even as ye bade me quit my seat, defend me.
 O pay not a lip service to the gods
 And wrong them of their dues.  Bethink ye well,
 The eye of Heaven beholds the just of men,
 And the unjust, nor ever in this world
 Has one sole godless sinner found escape.
 Stand then on Heaven's side and never blot
 Athens' fair scutcheon by abetting wrong.
 I came to you a suppliant, and you pledged
 Your honor; O preserve me to the end,
 O let not this marred visage do me wrong!
 A holy and god-fearing man is here
 Whose coming purports comfort for your folk.
 And when your chief arrives, whoe'er he be,
 Then shall ye have my story and know all.
 Meanwhile I pray you do me no despite.
 
 CHORUS
 The plea thou urgest, needs must give us pause,
 Set forth in weighty argument, but we
 Must leave the issue with the ruling powers.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Where is he, strangers, he who sways the realm?
 
 CHORUS
 In his ancestral seat; a messenger,
 The same who sent us here, is gone for him.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And think you he will have such care or thought
 For the blind stranger as to come himself?
 
 CHORUS
 Aye, that he will, when once he learns thy name.
 
 OEDIPUS
 But who will bear him word!
 
 CHORUS
                               The way is long,
 And many travelers pass to speed the news.
 Be sure he'll hear and hasten, never fear;
 So wide and far thy name is noised abroad,
 That, were he ne'er so spent and loth to move,
 He would bestir him when he hears of thee.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Well, may he come with blessing to his State
 And me!  Who serves his neighbor serves himself. [5]
 
 ANTIGONE
 Zeus!  What is this?  What can I say or think?
 
 OEDIPUS
 What now, Antigone?
 
 ANTIGONE
                     I see a woman
 Riding upon a colt of Aetna's breed;
 She wears for headgear a Thessalian hat
 To shade her from the sun.  Who can it be?
 She or a stranger?  Do I wake or dream?
 'This she; 'tis not--I cannot tell, alack;
 It is no other!  Now her bright'ning glance
 Greets me with recognition, yes, 'tis she,
 Herself, Ismene!
 
 OEDIPUS
                     Ha! what say ye, child?
 
 ANTIGONE
 That I behold thy daughter and my sister,
 And thou wilt know her straightway by her voice.
 [Enter ISMENE]
 
 ISMENE
 Father and sister, names to me most sweet,
 How hardly have I found you, hardly now
 When found at last can see you through my tears!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Art come, my child?
 
 ISMENE
                     O father, sad thy plight!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Child, thou art here?
 
 ISMENE
                     Yes, 'twas a weary way.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Touch me, my child.
 
 ISMENE
                     I give a hand to both.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O children--sisters!
 
 ISMENE
                     O disastrous plight!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Her plight and mine?
 
 ISMENE
                     Aye, and my own no less.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What brought thee, daughter?
 
 ISMENE
                               Father, care for thee.
 
 OEDIPUS
 A daughter's yearning?
 
 ISMENE
                          Yes, and I had news
 I would myself deliver, so I came
 With the one thrall who yet is true to me.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thy valiant brothers, where are they at need?
 
 ISMENE
 They are--enough, 'tis now their darkest hour.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Out on the twain!  The thoughts and actions all
 Are framed and modeled on Egyptian ways.
 For there the men sit at the loom indoors
 While the wives slave abroad for daily bread.
 So you, my children--those whom I behooved
 To bear the burden, stay at home like girls,
 While in their stead my daughters moil and drudge,
 Lightening their father's misery.  The one
 Since first she grew from girlish feebleness
 To womanhood has been the old man's guide
 And shared my weary wandering, roaming oft
 Hungry and footsore through wild forest ways,
 In drenching rains and under scorching suns,
 Careless herself of home and ease, if so
 Her sire might have her tender ministry.
 And thou, my child, whilom thou wentest forth,
 Eluding the Cadmeians' vigilance,
 To bring thy father all the oracles
 Concerning Oedipus, and didst make thyself
 My faithful lieger, when they banished me.
 And now what mission summons thee from home,
 What news, Ismene, hast thou for thy father?
 This much I know, thou com'st not empty-handed,
 Without a warning of some new alarm.
 
 ISMENE
 The toil and trouble, father, that I bore
 To find thy lodging-place and how thou faredst,
 I spare thee; surely 'twere a double pain
 To suffer, first in act and then in telling;
 'Tis the misfortune of thine ill-starred sons
 I come to tell thee.  At the first they willed
 To leave the throne to Creon, minded well
 Thus to remove the inveterate curse of old,
 A canker that infected all thy race.
 But now some god and an infatuate soul
 Have stirred betwixt them a mad rivalry
 To grasp at sovereignty and kingly power.
 Today the hot-branded youth, the younger born,
 Is keeping Polyneices from the throne,
 His elder, and has thrust him from the land.
 The banished brother (so all Thebes reports)
 Fled to the vale of Argos, and by help
 Of new alliance there and friends in arms,
 Swears he will stablish Argos straight as lord
 Of the Cadmeian land, or, if he fail,
 Exalt the victor to the stars of heaven.
 This is no empty tale, but deadly truth,
 My father; and how long thy agony,
 Ere the gods pity thee, I cannot tell.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Hast thou indeed then entertained a hope
 The gods at last will turn and rescue me?
 
 ISMENE
 Yea, so I read these latest oracles.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What oracles?  What hath been uttered, child?
 
 ISMENE
 Thy country (so it runs) shall yearn in time
 To have thee for their weal alive or dead.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And who could gain by such a one as I?
 
 ISMENE
 On thee, 'tis said, their sovereignty depends.
 
 OEDIPUS
 So, when I cease to be, my worth begins.
 
 ISMENE
 The gods, who once abased, uplift thee now.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Poor help to raise an old man fallen in youth.
 
 ISMENE
 Howe'er that be, 'tis for this cause alone
 That Creon comes to thee--and comes anon.
 
 OEDIPUS
 With what intent, my daughter?  Tell me plainly.
 
 ISMENE
 To plant thee near the Theban land, and so
 Keep thee within their grasp, yet now allow
 Thy foot to pass beyond their boundaries.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What gain they, if I lay outside?
 
 OEDIPUS
                                    Thy tomb,
 If disappointed, brings on them a curse.
 
 OEDIPUS
 It needs no god to tell what's plain to sense.
 
 ISMENE
 Therefore they fain would have thee close at hand,
 Not where thou wouldst be master of thyself.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Mean they to shroud my bones in Theban dust?
 
 ISMENE
 Nay, father, guilt of kinsman's blood forbids.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Then never shall they be my masters, never!
 
 ISMENE
 Thebes, thou shalt rue this bitterly some day!
 
 OEDIPUS
 When what conjunction comes to pass, my child?
 
 ISMENE
 Thy angry wraith, when at thy tomb they stand. [6]
 
 OEDIPUS
 And who hath told thee what thou tell'st me, child?
 
 ISMENE
 Envoys who visited the Delphic hearth.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Hath Phoebus spoken thus concerning me?
 
 ISMENE
 So say the envoys who returned to Thebes.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And can a son of mine have heard of this?
 
 ISMENE
 Yea, both alike, and know its import well.
 
 OEDIPUS
 They knew it, yet the ignoble greed of rule
 Outweighed all longing for their sire's return.
 
 ISMENE
 Grievous thy words, yet I must own them true.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Then may the gods ne'er quench their fatal feud,
 And mine be the arbitrament of the fight,
 For which they now are arming, spear to spear;
 That neither he who holds the scepter now
 May keep this throne, nor he who fled the realm
 Return again.  _They_ never raised a hand,
 When I their sire was thrust from hearth and home,
 When I was banned and banished, what recked they?
 Say you 'twas done at my desire, a grace
 Which the state, yielding to my wish, allowed?
 Not so; for, mark you, on that very day
 When in the tempest of my soul I craved
 Death, even death by stoning, none appeared
 To further that wild longing, but anon,
 When time had numbed my anguish and I felt
 My wrath had all outrun those errors past,
 Then, then it was the city went about
 By force to oust me, respited for years;
 And then my sons, who should as sons have helped,
 Did nothing: and, one little word from them
 Was all I needed, and they spoke no word,
 But let me wander on for evermore,
 A banished man, a beggar.  These two maids
 Their sisters, girls, gave all their sex could give,
 Food and safe harborage and filial care;
 While their two brethren sacrificed their sire
 For lust of power and sceptred sovereignty.
 No! me they ne'er shall win for an ally,
 Nor will this Theban kingship bring them gain;
 That know I from this maiden's oracles,
 And those old prophecies concerning me,
 Which Phoebus now at length has brought to pass.
 Come Creon then, come all the mightiest
 In Thebes to seek me; for if ye my friends,
 Championed by those dread Powers indigenous,
 Espouse my cause; then for the State ye gain
 A great deliverer, for my foemen bane.
 
 CHORUS
 Our pity, Oedipus, thou needs must move,
 Thou and these maidens; and the stronger plea
 Thou urgest, as the savior of our land,
 Disposes me to counsel for thy weal.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Aid me, kind sirs; I will do all you bid.
 
 CHORUS
 First make atonement to the deities,
 Whose grove by trespass thou didst first profane.
 
 OEDIPUS
 After what manner, stranger?  Teach me, pray.
 
 CHORUS
 Make a libation first of water fetched
 With undefiled hands from living spring.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And after I have gotten this pure draught?
 
 CHORUS
 Bowls thou wilt find, the carver's handiwork;
 Crown thou the rims and both the handles crown--
 
 OEDIPUS
 With olive shoots or blocks of wool, or how?
 
 CHORUS
 With wool from fleece of yearling freshly shorn.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What next? how must I end the ritual?
 
 CHORUS
 Pour thy libation, turning to the dawn.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Pouring it from the urns whereof ye spake?
 
 CHORUS
 Yea, in three streams; and be the last bowl drained
 To the last drop.
 
 OEDIPUS
                     And wherewith shall I fill it,
 Ere in its place I set it?  This too tell.
 
 CHORUS
 With water and with honey; add no wine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 And when the embowered earth hath drunk thereof?
 
 CHORUS
 Then lay upon it thrice nine olive sprays
 With both thy hands, and offer up this prayer.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I fain would hear it; that imports the most.
 
 CHORUS
 That, as we call them Gracious, they would deign
 To grant the suppliant their saving grace.
 So pray thyself or whoso pray for thee,
 In whispered accents, not with lifted voice;
 Then go and look back.  Do as I bid,
 And I shall then be bold to stand thy friend;
 Else, stranger, I should have my fears for thee.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Hear ye, my daughters, what these strangers say?
 
 ANTIGONE
 We listened, and attend thy bidding, father.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I cannot go, disabled as I am
 Doubly, by lack of strength and lack of sight;
 But one of you may do it in my stead;
 For one, I trow, may pay the sacrifice
 Of thousands, if his heart be leal and true.
 So to your work with speed, but leave me not
 Untended; for this frame is all too week
 To move without the help of guiding hand.
 
 ISMENE
 Then I will go perform these rites, but where
 To find the spot, this have I yet to learn.
 
 CHORUS
 Beyond this grove; if thou hast need of aught,
 The guardian of the close will lend his aid.
 
 ISMENE
 I go, and thou, Antigone, meanwhile
 Must guard our father.  In a parent's cause
 Toil, if there be toil, is of no account.
 [Exit ISMENE]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Ill it is, stranger, to awake
 Pain that long since has ceased to ache,
 And yet I fain would hear--
 
 OEDIPUS
 What thing?
 
 CHORUS
 Thy tale of cruel suffering
 For which no cure was found,
 The fate that held thee bound.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O bid me not (as guest I claim
 This grace) expose my shame.
 
 CHORUS
 The tale is bruited far and near,
 And echoes still from ear to ear.
 The truth, I fain would hear.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ah me!
 
 CHORUS
      I prithee yield.
 
 OEDIPUS
                     Ah me!
 
 CHORUS
 Grant my request, I granted all to thee.
 
 OEDIPUS
 (Ant. 1)
 Know then I suffered ills most vile, but none
 (So help me Heaven!) from acts in malice done.
 
 CHORUS
 Say how.
 
 OEDIPUS
           The State around
 An all unwitting bridegroom bound
 An impious marriage chain;
           That was my bane.
 
 CHORUS
 Didst thou in sooth then share
 A bed incestuous with her that bare--
 
 OEDIPUS
 It stabs me like a sword,
 That two-edged word,
 O stranger, but these maids--my own--
 
 CHORUS
 Say on.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Two daughters, curses twain.
 
 CHORUS
 Oh God!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Sprang from the wife and mother's travail-pain.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 2)
 What, then thy offspring are at once--
 
 OEDIPUS
                                         Too true.
 Their father's very sister's too.
 
 CHORUS
 Oh horror!
 
 OEDIPUS
           Horrors from the boundless deep
 Back on my soul in refluent surges sweep.
 
 CHORUS
 Thou hast endured--
 
 OEDIPUS
                     Intolerable woe.
 
 CHORUS
 And sinned--
 
 OEDIPUS
                I sinned not.
 
 CHORUS
                               How so?
 
 OEDIPUS
 I served the State; would I had never won
 That graceless grace by which I was undone.
 
 CHORUS
 (Ant. 2)
 And next, unhappy man, thou hast shed blood?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Must ye hear more?
 
 CHORUS
                     A father's?
 
 OEDIPUS
                                    Flood on flood
 Whelms me; that word's a second mortal blow.
 
 CHORUS
 Murderer!
 
 OEDIPUS
           Yes, a murderer, but know--
 
 CHORUS
 What canst thou plead?
 
 OEDIPUS
                          A plea of justice.
 
 CHORUS
                                              How?
 
 OEDIPUS
 I slew who else would me have slain;
 I slew without intent,
 A wretch, but innocent
 In the law's eye, I stand, without a stain.
 
 CHORUS
 Behold our sovereign, Theseus, Aegeus' son,
 Comes at thy summons to perform his part.
 [Enter THESEUS]
 
 THESEUS
 Oft had I heard of thee in times gone by--
 The bloody mutilation of thine eyes--
 And therefore know thee, son of Laius.
 All that I lately gathered on the way
 Made my conjecture doubly sure; and now
 Thy garb and that marred visage prove to me
 That thou art he.  So pitying thine estate,
 Most ill-starred Oedipus, I fain would know
 What is the suit ye urge on me and Athens,
 Thou and the helpless maiden at thy side.
 Declare it; dire indeed must be the tale
 Whereat _I_ should recoil.  I too was reared,
 Like thee, in exile, and in foreign lands
 Wrestled with many perils, no man more.
 Wherefore no alien in adversity
 Shall seek in vain my succor, nor shalt thou;
 I know myself a mortal, and my share
 In what the morrow brings no more than thine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Theseus, thy words so apt, so generous
 So comfortable, need no long reply
 Both who I am and of what lineage sprung,
 And from what land I came, thou hast declared.
 So without prologue I may utter now
 My brief petition, and the tale is told.
 
 THESEUS
 Say on, and tell me what I fain would learn.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I come to offer thee this woe-worn frame,
 A gift not fair to look on; yet its worth
 More precious far than any outward show.
 
 THESEUS
 What profit dost thou proffer to have brought?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Hereafter thou shalt learn, not yet, methinks.
 
 THESEUS
 When may we hope to reap the benefit?
 
 OEDIPUS
 When I am dead and thou hast buried me.
 
 THESEUS
 Thou cravest life's last service; all before--
 Is it forgotten or of no account?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yea, the last boon is warrant for the rest.
 
 THESEUS
 The grace thou cravest then is small indeed.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Nay, weigh it well; the issue is not slight.
 
 THESEUS
 Thou meanest that betwixt thy sons and me?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Prince, they would fain convey me back to Thebes.
 
 THESEUS
 If there be no compulsion, then methinks
 To rest in banishment befits not thee.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Nay, when _I_ wished it _they_ would not consent.
 
 THESEUS
 For shame! such temper misbecomes the faller.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Chide if thou wilt, but first attend my plea.
 
 THESEUS
 Say on, I wait full knowledge ere I judge.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O Theseus, I have suffered wrongs on wrongs.
 
 THESEUS
 Wouldst tell the old misfortune of thy race?
 
 OEDIPUS
 No, that has grown a byword throughout Greece.
 
 THESEUS
 What then can be this more than mortal grief?
 
 OEDIPUS
 My case stands thus; by my own flesh and blood
 I was expelled my country, and can ne'er
 Thither return again, a parricide.
 
 THESEUS
 Why fetch thee home if thou must needs obey.
 
 THESEUS
 What are they threatened by the oracle?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Destruction that awaits them in this land.
 
 THESEUS
 What can beget ill blood 'twixt them and me?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Dear son of Aegeus, to the gods alone
 Is given immunity from eld and death;
 But nothing else escapes all-ruinous time.
 Earth's might decays, the might of men decays,
 Honor grows cold, dishonor flourishes,
 There is no constancy 'twixt friend and friend,
 Or city and city; be it soon or late,
 Sweet turns to bitter, hate once more to love.
 If now 'tis sunshine betwixt Thebes and thee
 And not a cloud, Time in his endless course
 Gives birth to endless days and nights, wherein
 The merest nothing shall suffice to cut
 With serried spears your bonds of amity.
 Then shall my slumbering and buried corpse
 In its cold grave drink their warm life-blood up,
 If Zeus be Zeus and Phoebus still speak true.
 No more:  'tis ill to tear aside the veil
 Of mysteries; let me cease as I began:
 Enough if thou wilt keep thy plighted troth,
 Then shall thou ne'er complain that Oedipus
 Proved an unprofitable and thankless guest,
 Except the gods themselves shall play me false.
 
 CHORUS
 The man, my lord, has from the very first
 Declared his power to offer to our land
 These and like benefits.
 
 THESEUS
                          Who could reject
 The proffered amity of such a friend?
 First, he can claim the hospitality
 To which by mutual contract we stand pledged:
 Next, coming here, a suppliant to the gods,
 He pays full tribute to the State and me;
 His favors therefore never will I spurn,
 But grant him the full rights of citizen;
 And, if it suits the stranger here to bide,
 I place him in your charge, or if he please
 Rather to come with me--choose, Oedipus,
 Which of the two thou wilt.  Thy choice is mine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Zeus, may the blessing fall on men like these!
 
 THESEUS
 What dost thou then decide--to come with me?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Yea, were it lawful--but 'tis rather here--
 
 THESEUS
 What wouldst thou here?  I shall not thwart thy wish.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Here shall I vanquish those who cast me forth.
 
 THESEUS
 Then were thy presence here a boon indeed.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Such shall it prove, if thou fulfill'st thy pledge.
 
 THESEUS
 Fear not for me; I shall not play thee false.
 
 OEDIPUS
 No need to back thy promise with an oath.
 
 THESEUS
 An oath would be no surer than my word.
 
 OEDIPUS
 How wilt thou act then?
 
 THESEUS
                          What is it thou fear'st?
 
 OEDIPUS
 My foes will come--
 
 THESEUS
                     Our friends will look to that.
 
 OEDIPUS
 But if thou leave me?
 
 THESEUS
                     Teach me not my duty.
 
 OEDIPUS
 'Tis fear constrains me.
 
 THESEUS
                          _My_ soul knows no fear!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thou knowest not what threats--
 
 THESEUS
                               I know that none
 Shall hale thee hence in my despite.  Such threats
 Vented in anger oft, are blusterers,
 An idle breath, forgot when sense returns.
 And for thy foemen, though their words were brave,
 Boasting to bring thee back, they are like to find
 The seas between us wide and hard to sail.
 Such my firm purpose, but in any case
 Take heart, since Phoebus sent thee here.  My name,
 Though I be distant, warrants thee from harm.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
      Thou hast come to a steed-famed land for rest,
           O stranger worn with toil,
      To a land of all lands the goodliest
           Colonus' glistening soil.
      'Tis the haunt of the clear-voiced nightingale,
           Who hid in her bower, among
      The wine-dark ivy that wreathes the vale,
           Trilleth her ceaseless song;
      And she loves, where the clustering berries nod
           O'er a sunless, windless glade,
      The spot by no mortal footstep trod,
      The pleasance kept for the Bacchic god,
      Where he holds each night his revels wild
      With the nymphs who fostered the lusty child.
 
 (Ant. 1)
      And fed each morn by the pearly dew
           The starred narcissi shine,
      And a wreath with the crocus' golden hue
           For the Mother and Daughter twine.
      And never the sleepless fountains cease
           That feed Cephisus' stream,
      But they swell earth's bosom with quick increase,
           And their wave hath a crystal gleam.
      And the Muses' quire will never disdain
      To visit this heaven-favored plain,
      Nor the Cyprian queen of the golden rein.
 
 (Str. 2)
      And here there grows, unpruned, untamed,
           Terror to foemen's spear,
      A tree in Asian soil unnamed,
      By Pelops' Dorian isle unclaimed,
           Self-nurtured year by year;
      'Tis the grey-leaved olive that feeds our boys;
      Nor youth nor withering age destroys
      The plant that the Olive Planter tends
      And the Grey-eyed Goddess herself defends.
 
 (Ant. 2)
      Yet another gift, of all gifts the most
      Prized by our fatherland, we boast--
      The might of the horse, the might of the sea;
      Our fame, Poseidon, we owe to thee,
      Son of Kronos, our king divine,
      Who in these highways first didst fit
      For the mouth of horses the iron bit;
      Thou too hast taught us to fashion meet
      For the arm of the rower the oar-blade fleet,
      Swift as the Nereids' hundred feet
      As they dance along the brine.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Oh land extolled above all lands, 'tis now
 For thee to make these glorious titles good.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Why this appeal, my daughter?
 
 ANTIGONE
                               Father, lo!
 Creon approaches with his company.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Fear not, it shall be so; if we are old,
 This country's vigor has no touch of age.
 [Enter CREON with attendants]
 
 CREON
 Burghers, my noble friends, ye take alarm
 At my approach (I read it in your eyes),
 Fear nothing and refrain from angry words.
 I come with no ill purpose; I am old,
 And know the city whither I am come,
 Without a peer amongst the powers of Greece.
 It was by reason of my years that I
 Was chosen to persuade your guest and bring
 Him back to Thebes; not the delegate
 Of one man, but commissioned by the State,
 Since of all Thebans I have most bewailed,
 Being his kinsman, his most grievous woes.
 O listen to me, luckless Oedipus,
 Come home!  The whole Cadmeian people claim
 With right to have thee back, I most of all,
 For most of all (else were I vile indeed)
 I mourn for thy misfortunes, seeing thee
 An aged outcast, wandering on and on,
 A beggar with one handmaid for thy stay.
 Ah! who had e'er imagined she could fall
 To such a depth of misery as this,
 To tend in penury thy stricken frame,
 A virgin ripe for wedlock, but unwed,
 A prey for any wanton ravisher?
 Seems it not cruel this reproach I cast
 On thee and on myself and all the race?
 Aye, but an open shame cannot be hid.
 Hide it, O hide it, Oedipus, thou canst.
 O, by our fathers' gods, consent I pray;
 Come back to Thebes, come to thy father's home,
 Bid Athens, as is meet, a fond farewell;
 Thebes thy old foster-mother claims thee first.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O front of brass, thy subtle tongue would twist
 To thy advantage every plea of right
 Why try thy arts on me, why spread again
 Toils where 'twould gall me sorest to be snared?
 In old days when by self-wrought woes distraught,
 I yearned for exile as a glad release,
 Thy will refused the favor then I craved.
 But when my frenzied grief had spent its force,
 And I was fain to taste the sweets of home,
 Then thou wouldst thrust me from my country, then
 These ties of kindred were by thee ignored;
 And now again when thou behold'st this State
 And all its kindly people welcome me,
 Thou seek'st to part us, wrapping in soft words
 Hard thoughts.  And yet what pleasure canst thou find
 In forcing friendship on unwilling foes?
 Suppose a man refused to grant some boon
 When you importuned him, and afterwards
 When you had got your heart's desire, consented,
 Granting a grace from which all grace had fled,
 Would not such favor seem an empty boon?
 Yet such the boon thou profferest now to me,
 Fair in appearance, but when tested false.
 Yea, I will proved thee false, that these may hear;
 Thou art come to take me, not to take me home,
 But plant me on thy borders, that thy State
 May so escape annoyance from this land.
 _That_ thou shalt never gain, but _this_ instead--
 My ghost to haunt thy country without end;
 And for my sons, this heritage--no more--
 Just room to die in.  Have not I more skill
 Than thou to draw the horoscope of Thebes?
 Are not my teachers surer guides than thine--
 Great Phoebus and the sire of Phoebus, Zeus?
 Thou art a messenger suborned, thy tongue
 Is sharper than a sword's edge, yet thy speech
 Will bring thee more defeats than victories.
 Howbeit, I know I waste my words--begone,
 And leave me here; whate'er may be my lot,
 He lives not ill who lives withal content.
 
 CREON
 Which loses in this parley, I o'erthrown
 By thee, or thou who overthrow'st thyself?
 
 OEDIPUS
 I shall be well contented if thy suit
 Fails with these strangers, as it has with me.
 
 CREON
 Unhappy man, will years ne'er make thee wise?
 Must thou live on to cast a slur on age?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thou hast a glib tongue, but no honest man,
 Methinks, can argue well on any side.
 
 CREON
 'Tis one thing to speak much, another well.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thy words, forsooth, are few and all well aimed!
 
 CREON
 Not for a man indeed with wits like thine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Depart!  I bid thee in these burghers' name,
 And prowl no longer round me to blockade
 My destined harbor.
 
 CREON
                     I protest to these,
 Not thee, and for thine answer to thy kin,
 If e'er I take thee--
 
 OEDIPUS
                     Who against their will
 Could take me?
 
 CREON
                Though untaken thou shalt smart.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What power hast thou to execute this threat?
 
 CREON
 One of thy daughters is already seized,
 The other I will carry off anon.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Woe, woe!
 
 CREON
           This is but prelude to thy woes.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Hast thou my child?
 
 CREON
                     And soon shall have the other.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ho, friends! ye will not surely play me false?
 Chase this ungodly villain from your land.
 
 CHORUS
 Hence, stranger, hence avaunt!  Thou doest wrong
 In this, and wrong in all that thou hast done.
 
 CREON (to his guards)
 'Tis time by force to carry off the girl,
 If she refuse of her free will to go.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Ah, woe is me! where shall I fly, where find
 Succor from gods or men?
 
 CHORUS
                          What would'st thou, stranger?
 
 CREON
 I meddle not with him, but her who is mine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O princes of the land!
 
 CHORUS
                          Sir, thou dost wrong.
 
 CREON
 Nay, right.
 
 CHORUS
                How right?
 
 CREON
                          I take but what is mine.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Help, Athens!
 
 CHORUS
 What means this, sirrah? quick unhand her, or
 We'll fight it out.
 
 CREON
                     Back!
 
 CHORUS
                          Not till thou forbear.
 
 CREON
 'Tis war with Thebes if I am touched or harmed.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Did I not warn thee?
 
 CHORUS
                     Quick, unhand the maid!
 
 CREON
 Command your minions; I am not your slave.
 
 CHORUS
 Desist, I bid thee.
 
 CREON (to the guard)
                     And O bid thee march!
 
 CHORUS
           To the rescue, one and all!
           Rally, neighbors to my call!
           See, the foe is at the gate!
           Rally to defend the State.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Ah, woe is me, they drag me hence, O friends.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Where art thou, daughter?
 
 ANTIGONE
                          Haled along by force.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thy hands, my child!
 
 ANTIGONE
                     They will not let me, father.
 
 CREON
 Away with her!
 
 OEDIPUS
                Ah, woe is me, ah woe!
 
 CREON
 So those two crutches shall no longer serve thee
 For further roaming.  Since it pleaseth thee
 To triumph o'er thy country and thy friends
 Who mandate, though a prince, I here discharge,
 Enjoy thy triumph; soon or late thou'lt find
 Thou art an enemy to thyself, both now
 And in time past, when in despite of friends
 Thou gav'st the rein to passion, still thy bane.
 
 CHORUS
 Hold there, sir stranger!
 
 CREON
                          Hands off, have a care.
 
 CHORUS
 Restore the maidens, else thou goest not.
 
 CREON
 Then Thebes will take a dearer surety soon;
 I will lay hands on more than these two maids.
 
 CHORUS
 What canst thou further?
 
 CREON
                          Carry off this man.
 
 CHORUS
 Brave words!
 
 CREON
                And deeds forthwith shall make them good.
 
 CHORUS
 Unless perchance our sovereign intervene.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O shameless voice!  Would'st lay an hand on me?
 
 CREON
 Silence, I bid thee!
 
 OEDIPUS
                     Goddesses, allow
 Thy suppliant to utter yet one curse!
 Wretch, now my eyes are gone thou hast torn away
 The helpless maiden who was eyes to me;
 For these to thee and all thy cursed race
 May the great Sun, whose eye is everywhere,
 Grant length of days and old age like to mine.
 
 CREON
 Listen, O men of Athens, mark ye this?
 
 OEDIPUS
 They mark us both and understand that I
 Wronged by the deeds defend myself with words.
 
 CREON
 Nothing shall curb my will; though I be old
 And single-handed, I will have this man.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O woe is me!
 
 CHORUS
 Thou art a bold man, stranger, if thou think'st
 To execute thy purpose.
 
 CREON
                          So I do.
 
 CHORUS
 Then shall I deem this State no more a State.
 
 CREON
 With a just quarrel weakness conquers might.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ye hear his words?
 
 CHORUS
                     Aye words, but not yet deeds,
 Zeus knoweth!
 
 CREON
                Zeus may haply know, not thou.
 
 CHORUS
 Insolence!
 
 CREON
           Insolence that thou must bear.
 
 CHORUS
           Haste ye princes, sound the alarm!
           Men of Athens, arm ye, arm!
           Quickly to the rescue come
           Ere the robbers get them home.
 [Enter THESEUS]
 
 THESEUS
 Why this outcry?  What is forward? wherefore was I called away
 From the altar of Poseidon, lord of your Colonus?  Say!
 On what errand have I hurried hither without stop or stay.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Dear friend--those accents tell me who thou art--
 Yon man but now hath done me a foul wrong.
 
 THESEUS
 What is this wrong and who hath wrought it?  Speak.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Creon who stands before thee.  He it is
 Hath robbed me of my all, my daughters twain.
 
 THESEUS
 What means this?
 
 OEDIPUS
                Thou hast heard my tale of wrongs.
 
 THESEUS
 Ho! hasten to the altars, one of you.
 Command my liegemen leave the sacrifice
 And hurry, foot and horse, with rein unchecked,
 To where the paths that packmen use diverge,
 Lest the two maidens slip away, and I
 Become a mockery to this my guest,
 As one despoiled by force.  Quick, as I bid.
 As for this stranger, had I let my rage,
 Justly provoked, have play, he had not 'scaped
 Scathless and uncorrected at my hands.
 But now the laws to which himself appealed,
 These and none others shall adjudicate.
 Thou shalt not quit this land, till thou hast fetched
 The maidens and produced them in my sight.
 Thou hast offended both against myself
 And thine own race and country.  Having come
 Unto a State that champions right and asks
 For every action warranty of law,
 Thou hast set aside the custom of the land,
 And like some freebooter art carrying off
 What plunder pleases thee, as if forsooth
 Thou thoughtest this a city without men,
 Or manned by slaves, and me a thing of naught.
 Yet not from Thebes this villainy was learnt;
 Thebes is not wont to breed unrighteous sons,
 Nor would she praise thee, if she learnt that thou
 Wert robbing me--aye and the gods to boot,
 Haling by force their suppliants, poor maids.
 Were I on Theban soil, to prosecute
 The justest claim imaginable, I
 Would never wrest by violence my own
 Without sanction of your State or King;
 I should behave as fits an outlander
 Living amongst a foreign folk, but thou
 Shamest a city that deserves it not,
 Even thine own, and plentitude of years
 Have made of thee an old man and a fool.
 Therefore again I charge thee as before,
 See that the maidens are restored at once,
 Unless thou would'st continue here by force
 And not by choice a sojourner; so much
 I tell thee home and what I say, I mean.
 
 CHORUS
 Thy case is perilous; though by birth and race
 Thou should'st be just, thou plainly doest wrong.
 
 CREON
 Not deeming this city void of men
 Or counsel, son of Aegeus, as thou say'st
 I did what I have done; rather I thought
 Your people were not like to set such store
 by kin of mine and keep them 'gainst my will.
 Nor would they harbor, so I stood assured,
 A godless parricide, a reprobate
 Convicted of incestuous marriage ties.
 For on her native hill of Ares here
 (I knew your far-famed Areopagus)
 Sits Justice, and permits not vagrant folk
 To stay within your borders.  In that faith
 I hunted down my quarry; and e'en then
 I had refrained but for the curses dire
 Wherewith he banned my kinsfolk and myself:
 Such wrong, methought, had warrant for my act.
 Anger has no old age but only death;
 The dead alone can feel no touch of spite.
 So thou must work thy will; my cause is just
 But weak without allies; yet will I try,
 Old as I am, to answer deeds with deeds.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O shameless railer, think'st thou this abuse
 Defames my grey hairs rather than thine own?
 Murder and incest, deeds of horror, all
 Thou blurtest forth against me, all I have borne,
 No willing sinner; so it pleased the gods
 Wrath haply with my sinful race of old,
 Since thou could'st find no sin in me myself
 For which in retribution I was doomed
 To trespass thus against myself and mine.
 Answer me now, if by some oracle
 My sire was destined to a bloody end
 By a son's hand, can this reflect on me,
 Me then unborn, begotten by no sire,
 Conceived in no mother's womb?  And if
 When born to misery, as born I was,
 I met my sire, not knowing whom I met
 or what I did, and slew him, how canst thou
 With justice blame the all-unconscious hand?
 And for my mother, wretch, art not ashamed,
 Seeing she was thy sister, to extort
 From me the story of her marriage, such
 A marriage as I straightway will proclaim.
 For I will speak; thy lewd and impious speech
 Has broken all the bonds of reticence.
 She was, ah woe is me! she was my mother;
 I knew it not, nor she; and she my mother
 Bare children to the son whom she had borne,
 A birth of shame.  But this at least I know
 Wittingly thou aspersest her and me;
 But I unwitting wed, unwilling speak.
 Nay neither in this marriage or this deed
 Which thou art ever casting in my teeth--
 A murdered sire--shall I be held to blame.
 Come, answer me one question, if thou canst:
 If one should presently attempt thy life,
 Would'st thou, O man of justice, first inquire
 If the assassin was perchance thy sire,
 Or turn upon him?  As thou lov'st thy life,
 On thy aggressor thou would'st turn, no stay
 Debating, if the law would bear thee out.
 Such was my case, and such the pass whereto
 The gods reduced me; and methinks my sire,
 Could he come back to life, would not dissent.
 Yet thou, for just thou art not, but a man
 Who sticks at nothing, if it serve his plea,
 Reproachest me with this before these men.
 It serves thy turn to laud great Theseus' name,
 And Athens as a wisely governed State;
 Yet in thy flatteries one thing is to seek:
 If any land knows how to pay the gods
 Their proper rites, 'tis Athens most of all.
 This is the land whence thou wast fain to steal
 Their aged suppliant and hast carried off
 My daughters.  Therefore to yon goddesses,
 I turn, adjure them and invoke their aid
 To champion my cause, that thou mayest learn
 What is the breed of men who guard this State.
 
 CHORUS
 An honest man, my liege, one sore bestead
 By fortune, and so worthy our support.
 
 THESEUS
 Enough of words; the captors speed amain,
 While we the victims stand debating here.
 
 CREON
 What would'st thou?  What can I, a feeble man?
 
 THESEUS
 Show us the trail, and I'll attend thee too,
 That, if thou hast the maidens hereabouts,
 Thou mayest thyself discover them to me;
 But if thy guards outstrip us with their spoil,
 We may draw rein; for others speed, from whom
 They will not 'scape to thank the gods at home.
 Lead on, I say, the captor's caught, and fate
 Hath ta'en the fowler in the toils he spread;
 So soon are lost gains gotten by deceit.
 And look not for allies; I know indeed
 Such height of insolence was never reached
 Without abettors or accomplices;
 Thou hast some backer in thy bold essay,
 But I will search this matter home and see
 One man doth not prevail against the State.
 Dost take my drift, or seem these words as vain
 As seemed our warnings when the plot was hatched?
 
 CREON
 Nothing thou sayest can I here dispute,
 But once at home I too shall act my part.
 
 THESEUS
 Threaten us and--begone!  Thou, Oedipus,
 Stay here assured that nothing save my death
 Will stay my purpose to restore the maids.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Heaven bless thee, Theseus, for thy nobleness
 And all thy loving care in my behalf.
 [Exeunt THESEUS and CREON]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
           O when the flying foe,
           Turning at last to bay,
           Soon will give blow for blow,
           Might I behold the fray;
           Hear the loud battle roar
           Swell, on the Pythian shore,
           Or by the torch-lit bay,
           Where the dread Queen and Maid
           Cherish the mystic rites,
           Rites they to none betray,
           Ere on his lips is laid
           Secrecy's golden key
           By their own acolytes,
           Priestly Eumolpidae.
 
           There I might chance behold
           Theseus our captain bold
           Meet with the robber band,
           Ere they have fled the land,
           Rescue by might and main
           Maidens, the captives twain.
 
 (Ant. 1)
           Haply on swiftest steed,
           Or in the flying car,
           Now they approach the glen,
           West of white Oea's scaur.
           They will be vanquished:
           Dread are our warriors, dread
           Theseus our chieftain's men.
           Flashes each bridle bright,
           Charges each gallant knight,
           All that our Queen adore,
           Pallas their patron, or
           Him whose wide floods enring
           Earth, the great Ocean-king
           Whom Rhea bore.
 
 (Str. 2)
           Fight they or now prepare
           To fight? a vision rare
           Tells me that soon again
           I shall behold the twain
           Maidens so ill bestead,
           By their kin buffeted.
 Today, today Zeus worketh some great thing
      This day shall victory bring.
 O for the wings, the wings of a dove,
 To be borne with the speed of the gale,
 Up and still upwards to sail
      And gaze on the fray from the clouds above.
 (Ant. 2)
 All-seeing Zeus, O lord of heaven,
 To our guardian host be given
 Might triumphant to surprise
 Flying foes and win their prize.
 Hear us, Zeus, and hear us, child
 Of Zeus, Athene undefiled,
 Hear, Apollo, hunter, hear,
 Huntress, sister of Apollo,
 Who the dappled swift-foot deer
 O'er the wooded glade dost follow;
 Help with your two-fold power
 Athens in danger's hour!
 O wayfarer, thou wilt not have to tax
 The friends who watch for thee with false presage,
 For lo, an escort with the maids draws near.
 [Enter ANTIGONE and ISMENE with THESEUS]
 
 OEDIPUS
 Where, where? what sayest thou?
 
 ANTIGONE
                               O father, father,
 Would that some god might grant thee eyes to see
 This best of men who brings us back again.
 
 OEDIPUS
 My child! and are ye back indeed!
 
 ANTIGONE
                                    Yes, saved
 By Theseus and his gallant followers.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Come to your father's arms, O let me feel
 A child's embrace I never hoped for more.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Thou askest what is doubly sweet to give.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Where are ye then?
 
 ANTIGONE
                     We come together both.
 
 OEDIPUS
 My precious nurslings!
 
 ANTIGONE
                          Fathers aye were fond.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Props of my age!
 
 ANTIGONE
                So sorrow sorrow props.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I have my darlings, and if death should come,
 Death were not wholly bitter with you near.
 Cling to me, press me close on either side,
 There rest ye from your dreary wayfaring.
 Now tell me of your ventures, but in brief;
 Brief speech suffices for young maids like you.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Here is our savior; thou should'st hear the tale
 From his own lips; so shall my part be brief.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I pray thee do not wonder if the sight
 Of children, given o'er for lost, has made
 My converse somewhat long and tedious.
 Full well I know the joy I have of them
 Is due to thee, to thee and no man else;
 Thou wast their sole deliverer, none else.
 The gods deal with thee after my desire,
 With thee and with this land! for fear of heaven
 I found above all peoples most with you,
 And righteousness and lips that cannot lie.
 I speak in gratitude of what I know,
 For all I have I owe to thee alone.
 Give me thy hand, O Prince, that I may touch it,
 And if thou wilt permit me, kiss thy cheek.
 What say I?  Can I wish that thou should'st touch
 One fallen like me to utter wretchedness,
 Corrupt and tainted with a thousand ills?
 Oh no, I would not let thee if thou would'st.
 They only who have known calamity
 Can share it.  Let me greet thee where thou art,
 And still befriend me as thou hast till now.
 
 THESEUS
 I marvel not if thou hast dallied long
 In converse with thy children and preferred
 Their speech to mine; I feel no jealousy,
 I would be famous more by deeds than words.
 Of this, old friend, thou hast had proof; my oath
 I have fulfilled and brought thee back the maids
 Alive and nothing harmed for all those threats.
 And how the fight was won, 'twere waste of words
 To boast--thy daughters here will tell thee all.
 But of a matter that has lately chanced
 On my way hitherward, I fain would have
 Thy counsel--slight 'twould seem, yet worthy thought.
 A wise man heeds all matters great or small.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What is it, son of Aegeus?  Let me hear.
 Of what thou askest I myself know naught.
 
 THESEUS
 'Tis said a man, no countryman of thine,
 But of thy kin, hath taken sanctuary
 Beside the altar of Poseidon, where
 I was at sacrifice when called away.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What is his country? what the suitor's prayer?
 
 THESEUS
 I know but one thing; he implores, I am told,
 A word with thee--he will not trouble thee.
 
 OEDIPUS
 What seeks he?  If a suppliant, something grave.
 
 THESEUS
 He only waits, they say, to speak with thee,
 And then unharmed to go upon his way.
 
 OEDIPUS
 I marvel who is this petitioner.
 
 THESEUS
 Think if there be not any of thy kin
 At Argos who might claim this boon of thee.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Dear friend, forbear, I pray.
 
 THESEUS
                               What ails thee now?
 
 OEDIPUS
 Ask it not of me.
 
 THESEUS
                     Ask not what? explain.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thy words have told me who the suppliant is.
 
 THESEUS
 Who can he be that I should frown on him?
 
 OEDIPUS
 My son, O king, my hateful son, whose words
 Of all men's most would jar upon my ears.
 
 THESEUS
 Thou sure mightest listen.  If his suit offend,
 No need to grant it.  Why so loth to hear him?
 
 OEDIPUS
 That voice, O king, grates on a father's ears;
 I have come to loathe it.  Force me not to yield.
 
 THESEUS
 But he hath found asylum.  O beware,
 And fail not in due reverence to the god.
 
 ANTIGONE
 O heed me, father, though I am young in years.
 Let the prince have his will and pay withal
 What in his eyes is service to the god;
 For our sake also let our brother come.
 If what he urges tend not to thy good
 He cannot surely wrest perforce thy will.
 To hear him then, what harm?  By open words
 A scheme of villainy is soon bewrayed.
 Thou art his father, therefore canst not pay
 In kind a son's most impious outrages.
 O listen to him; other men like thee
 Have thankless children and are choleric,
 But yielding to persuasion's gentle spell
 They let their savage mood be exorcised.
 Look thou to the past, forget the present, think
 On all the woe thy sire and mother brought thee;
 Thence wilt thou draw this lesson without fail,
 Of evil passion evil is the end.
 Thou hast, alas, to prick thy memory,
 Stern monitors, these ever-sightless orbs.
 O yield to us; just suitors should not need
 To be importunate, nor he that takes
 A favor lack the grace to make return.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Grievous to me, my child, the boon ye win
 By pleading.  Let it be then; have your way
 Only if come he must, I beg thee, friend,
 Let none have power to dispose of me.
 
 THESEUS
 No need, Sir, to appeal a second time.
 It likes me not to boast, but be assured
 Thy life is safe while any god saves mine.
 [Exit THESEUS]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str.)
 Who craves excess of days,
           Scorning the common span
           Of life, I judge that man
 A giddy wight who walks in folly's ways.
 For the long years heap up a grievous load,
           Scant pleasures, heavier pains,
           Till not one joy remains
 For him who lingers on life's weary road
      And come it slow or fast,
           One doom of fate
           Doth all await,
           For dance and marriage bell,
           The dirge and funeral knell.
 Death the deliverer freeth all at last.
 (Ant.)
           Not to be born at all
           Is best, far best that can befall,
           Next best, when born, with least delay
           To trace the backward way.
 For when youth passes with its giddy train,
      Troubles on troubles follow, toils on toils,
           Pain, pain for ever pain;
           And none escapes life's coils.
           Envy, sedition, strife,
 Carnage and war, make up the tale of life.
 Last comes the worst and most abhorred stage
           Of unregarded age,
 Joyless, companionless and slow,
           Of woes the crowning woe.
 
 (Epode)
 Such ills not I alone,
 He too our guest hath known,
 E'en as some headland on an iron-bound shore,
 Lashed by the wintry blasts and surge's roar,
 So is he buffeted on every side
 By drear misfortune's whelming tide,
           By every wind of heaven o'erborne
           Some from the sunset, some from orient morn,
           Some from the noonday glow.
 Some from Rhipean gloom of everlasting snow.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Father, methinks I see the stranger coming,
 Alone he comes and weeping plenteous tears.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Who may he be?
 
 ANTIGONE
                The same that we surmised.
 From the outset--Polyneices.  He is here.
 [Enter POLYNEICES]
 
 POLYNEICES
 Ah me, my sisters, shall I first lament
 My own afflictions, or my aged sire's,
 Whom here I find a castaway, with you,
 In a strange land, an ancient beggar clad
 In antic tatters, marring all his frame,
 While o'er the sightless orbs his unkept locks
 Float in the breeze; and, as it were to match,
 He bears a wallet against hunger's pinch.
 All this too late I learn, wretch that I am,
 Alas!  I own it, and am proved most vile
 In my neglect of thee:  I scorn myself.
 But as almighty Zeus in all he doth
 Hath Mercy for co-partner of this throne,
 Let Mercy, father, also sit enthroned
 In thy heart likewise.  For transgressions past
 May be amended, cannot be made worse.
 
 Why silent?  Father, speak, nor turn away,
 Hast thou no word, wilt thou dismiss me then
 In mute disdain, nor tell me why thou art wrath?
 O ye his daughters, sisters mine, do ye
 This sullen, obstinate silence try to move.
 Let him not spurn, without a single word
 Of answer, me the suppliant of the god.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Tell him thyself, unhappy one, thine errand;
 For large discourse may send a thrill of joy,
 Or stir a chord of wrath or tenderness,
 And to the tongue-tied somehow give a tongue.
 
 POLYNEICES
 Well dost thou counsel, and I will speak out.
 First will I call in aid the god himself,
 Poseidon, from whose altar I was raised,
 With warrant from the monarch of this land,
 To parley with you, and depart unscathed.
 These pledges, strangers, I would see observed
 By you and by my sisters and my sire.
 Now, father, let me tell thee why I came.
 I have been banished from my native land
 Because by right of primogeniture
 I claimed possession of thy sovereign throne
 Wherefrom Etocles, my younger brother,
 Ousted me, not by weight of precedent,
 Nor by the last arbitrament of war,
 But by his popular acts; and the prime cause
 Of this I deem the curse that rests on thee.
 So likewise hold the soothsayers, for when
 I came to Argos in the Dorian land
 And took the king Adrastus' child to wife,
 Under my standard I enlisted all
 The foremost captains of the Apian isle,
 To levy with their aid that sevenfold host
 Of spearmen against Thebes, determining
 To oust my foes or die in a just cause.
 Why then, thou askest, am I here today?
 Father, I come a suppliant to thee
 Both for myself and my allies who now
 With squadrons seven beneath their seven spears
 Beleaguer all the plain that circles Thebes.
 Foremost the peerless warrior, peerless seer,
 Amphiaraiis with his lightning lance;
 Next an Aetolian, Tydeus, Oeneus' son;
 Eteoclus of Argive birth the third;
 The fourth Hippomedon, sent to the war
 By his sire Talaos; Capaneus, the fifth,
 Vaunts he will fire and raze the town; the sixth
 Parthenopaeus, an Arcadian born
 Named of that maid, longtime a maid and late
 Espoused, Atalanta's true-born child;
 Last I thy son, or thine at least in name,
 If but the bastard of an evil fate,
 Lead against Thebes the fearless Argive host.
 Thus by thy children and thy life, my sire,
 We all adjure thee to remit thy wrath
 And favor one who seeks a just revenge
 Against a brother who has banned and robbed him.
 For victory, if oracles speak true,
 Will fall to those who have thee for ally.
 So, by our fountains and familiar gods
 I pray thee, yield and hear; a beggar I
 And exile, thou an exile likewise; both
 Involved in one misfortune find a home
 As pensioners, while he, the lord of Thebes,
 O agony! makes a mock of thee and me.
 I'll scatter with a breath the upstart's might,
 And bring thee home again and stablish thee,
 And stablish, having cast him out, myself.
 This will thy goodwill I will undertake,
 Without it I can scare return alive.
 
 CHORUS
 For the king's sake who sent him, Oedipus,
 Dismiss him not without a meet reply.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Nay, worthy seniors, but for Theseus' sake
 Who sent him hither to have word of me.
 Never again would he have heard my voice;
 But now he shall obtain this parting grace,
 An answer that will bring him little joy.
 O villain, when thou hadst the sovereignty
 That now thy brother holdeth in thy stead,
 Didst thou not drive me, thine own father, out,
 An exile, cityless, and make we wear
 This beggar's garb thou weepest to behold,
 Now thou art come thyself to my sad plight?
 Nothing is here for tears; it must be borne
 By _me_ till death, and I shall think of thee
 As of my murderer; thou didst thrust me out;
 'Tis thou hast made me conversant with woe,
 Through thee I beg my bread in a strange land;
 And had not these my daughters tended me
 I had been dead for aught of aid from thee.
 They tend me, they preserve me, they are men
 Not women in true service to their sire;
 But ye are bastards, and no sons of mine.
 Therefore just Heaven hath an eye on thee;
 Howbeit not yet with aspect so austere
 As thou shalt soon experience, if indeed
 These banded hosts are moving against Thebes.
 That city thou canst never storm, but first
 Shall fall, thou and thy brother, blood-imbrued.
 Such curse I lately launched against you twain,
 Such curse I now invoke to fight for me,
 That ye may learn to honor those who bear thee
 Nor flout a sightless father who begat
 Degenerate sons--these maidens did not so.
 Therefore my curse is stronger than thy "throne,"
 Thy "suppliance," if by right of laws eterne
 Primeval Justice sits enthroned with Zeus.
 Begone, abhorred, disowned, no son of mine,
 Thou vilest of the vile! and take with thee
 This curse I leave thee as my last bequest:--
 Never to win by arms thy native land,
 No, nor return to Argos in the Vale,
 But by a kinsman's hand to die and slay
 Him who expelled thee.  So I pray and call
 On the ancestral gloom of Tartarus
 To snatch thee hence, on these dread goddesses
 I call, and Ares who incensed you both
 To mortal enmity.  Go now proclaim
 What thou hast heard to the Cadmeians all,
 Thy staunch confederates--this the heritage
 that Oedipus divideth to his sons.
 
 CHORUS
 Thy errand, Polyneices, liked me not
 From the beginning; now go back with speed.
 
 POLYNEICES
 Woe worth my journey and my baffled hopes!
 Woe worth my comrades!  What a desperate end
 To that glad march from Argos!  Woe is me!
 I dare not whisper it to my allies
 Or turn them back, but mute must meet my doom.
 My sisters, ye his daughters, ye have heard
 The prayers of our stern father, if his curse
 Should come to pass and ye some day return
 To Thebes, O then disown me not, I pray,
 But grant me burial and due funeral rites.
 So shall the praise your filial care now wins
 Be doubled for the service wrought for me.
 
 ANTIGONE
 One boon, O Polyneices, let me crave.
 
 POLYNEICES
 What would'st thou, sweet Antigone?  Say on.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Turn back thy host to Argos with all speed,
 And ruin not thyself and Thebes as well.
 
 POLYNEICES
 That cannot be.  How could I lead again
 An army that had seen their leader quail?
 
 ANTIGONE
 But, brother, why shouldst thou be wroth again?
 What profit from thy country's ruin comes?
 
 POLYNEICES
 'Tis shame to live in exile, and shall I
 The elder bear a younger brother's flouts?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Wilt thou then bring to pass his prophecies
 Who threatens mutual slaughter to you both?
 
 POLYNEICES
 Aye, so he wishes:--but I must not yield.
 
 ANTIGONE
 O woe is me! but say, will any dare,
 Hearing his prophecy, to follow thee?
 
 POLYNEICES
 I shall not tell it; a good general
 Reports successes and conceals mishaps.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Misguided youth, thy purpose then stands fast!
 
 POLYNEICES
 'Tis so, and stay me not.  The road I choose,
 Dogged by my sire and his avenging spirit,
 Leads me to ruin; but for you may Zeus
 Make your path bright if ye fulfill my hest
 When dead; in life ye cannot serve me more.
 Now let me go, farewell, a long farewell!
 Ye ne'er shall see my living face again.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Ah me!
 
 POLYNEICES
           Bewail me not.
 
 ANTIGONE
                          Who would not mourn
 Thee, brother, hurrying to an open pit!
 
 POLYNEICES
 If I must die, I must.
 
 ANTIGONE
                          Nay, hear me plead.
 
 POLYNEICES
 It may not be; forbear.
 
 ANTIGONE
                          Then woe is me,
 If I must lose thee.
 
 POLYNEICES
                     Nay, that rests with fate,
 Whether I live or die; but for you both
 I pray to heaven ye may escape all ill;
 For ye are blameless in the eyes of all.
 [Exit POLYNEICES]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
      Ills on ills! no pause or rest!
      Come they from our sightless guest?
      Or haply now we see fulfilled
      What fate long time hath willed?
      For ne'er have I proved vain
      Aught that the heavenly powers ordain.
      Time with never sleeping eye
      Watches what is writ on high,
      Overthrowing now the great,
      Raising now from low estate.
 Hark!  How the thunder rumbles!  Zeus defend us!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Children, my children! will no messenger
 Go summon hither Theseus my best friend?
 
 ANTIGONE
 And wherefore, father, dost thou summon him?
 
 OEDIPUS
 This winged thunder of the god must bear me
 Anon to Hades.  Send and tarry not.
 
 CHORUS
 (Ant. 1)
 Hark! with louder, nearer roar
 The bolt of Zeus descends once more.
 My spirit quails and cowers:  my hair
 Bristles for fear.  Again that flare!
 What doth the lightning-flash portend?
 Ever it points to issues grave.
 Dread powers of air!  Save, Zeus, O save!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Daughters, upon me the predestined end
 Has come; no turning from it any more.
 
 ANTIGONE
 How knowest thou?  What sign convinces thee?
 
 OEDIPUS
 I know full well.  Let some one with all speed
 Go summon hither the Athenian prince.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 2)
 Ha! once more the deafening sound
 Peals yet louder all around
 If thou darkenest our land,
 Lightly, lightly lay thy hand;
 Grace, not anger, let me win,
 If upon a man of sin
 I have looked with pitying eye,
 Zeus, our king, to thee I cry!
 
 OEDIPUS
 Is the prince coming?  Will he when he comes
 Find me yet living and my senses clear!
 
 ANTIGONE
 What solemn charge would'st thou impress on him?
 
 OEDIPUS
 For all his benefits I would perform
 The promise made when I received them first.
 
 CHORUS
 (Ant. 2)
           Hither haste, my son, arise,
           Altar leave and sacrifice,
           If haply to Poseidon now
           In the far glade thou pay'st thy vow.
           For our guest to thee would bring
           And thy folk and offering,
           Thy due guerdon.  Haste, O King!
 [Enter THESEUS]
 
 THESEUS
 Wherefore again this general din? at once
 My people call me and the stranger calls.
 Is it a thunderbolt of Zeus or sleet
 Of arrowy hail? a storm so fierce as this
 Would warrant all surmises of mischance.
 
 OEDIPUS
 Thou com'st much wished for, Prince, and sure some god
 Hath bid good luck attend thee on thy way.
 
 THESEUS
 What, son of Laius, hath chanced of new?
 
 OEDIPUS
 My life hath turned the scale.  I would do all
 I promised thee and thine before I die.
 
 THESEUS
 What sign assures thee that thine end is near?
 
 OEDIPUS
 The gods themselves are heralds of my fate;
 Of their appointed warnings nothing fails.
 
 THESEUS
 How sayest thou they signify their will?
 
 OEDIPUS
 This thunder, peal on peal, this lightning hurled
 Flash upon flash, from the unconquered hand.
 
 THESEUS
 I must believe thee, having found thee oft
 A prophet true; then speak what must be done.
 
 OEDIPUS
 O son of Aegeus, for this state will I
 Unfold a treasure age cannot corrupt.
 Myself anon without a guiding hand
 Will take thee to the spot where I must end.
 This secret ne'er reveal to mortal man,
 Neither the spot nor whereabouts it lies,
 So shall it ever serve thee for defense
 Better than native shields and near allies.
 But those dread mysteries speech may not profane
 Thyself shalt gather coming there alone;
 Since not to any of thy subjects,  nor
 To my own children, though I love them dearly,
 Can I reveal what thou must guard alone,
 And whisper to thy chosen heir alone,
 So to be handed down from heir to heir.
 Thus shalt thou hold this land inviolate
 From the dread Dragon's brood. [7]  The justest State
 By countless wanton neighbors may be wronged,
 For the gods, though they tarry, mark for doom
 The godless sinner in his mad career.
 Far from thee, son of Aegeus, be such fate!
 But to the spot--the god within me goads--
 Let us set forth no longer hesitate.
 Follow me, daughters, this way.  Strange that I
 Whom you have led so long should lead you now.
 Oh, touch me not, but let me all alone
 Find out the sepulcher that destiny
 Appoints me in this land.  Hither, this way,
 For this way Hermes leads, the spirit guide,
 And Persephassa, empress of the dead.
 O light, no light to me, but mine erewhile,
 Now the last time I feel thee palpable,
 For I am drawing near the final gloom
 Of Hades.  Blessing on thee, dearest friend,
 On thee and on thy land and followers!
 Live prosperous and in your happy state
 Still for your welfare think on me, the dead.
 [Exit THESEUS followed by ANTIGONE and ISMENE]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str.)
           If mortal prayers are heard in hell,
           Hear, Goddess dread, invisible!
           Monarch of the regions drear,
                Aidoneus, hear, O hear!
           By a gentle, tearless doom
           Speed this stranger to the gloom,
           Let him enter without pain
           The all-shrouding Stygian plain.
           Wrongfully in life oppressed,
           Be he now by Justice blessed.
 
 (Ant.)
           Queen infernal, and thou fell
           Watch-dog of the gates of hell,
           Who, as legends tell, dost glare,
           Gnarling in thy cavernous lair
           At all comers, let him go
           Scathless to the fields below.
           For thy master orders thus,
           The son of earth and Tartarus;
           In his den the monster keep,
           Giver of eternal sleep.
 [Enter MESSENGER]
 
 MESSENGER
 Friends, countrymen, my tidings are in sum
 That Oedipus is gone, but the event
 Was not so brief, nor can the tale be brief.
 
 CHORUS
 What, has he gone, the unhappy man?
 
 MESSENGER
                                    Know well
 That he has passed away from life to death.
 
 CHORUS
 How?  By a god-sent, painless doom, poor soul?
 
 MESSENGER
 Thy question hits the marvel of the tale.
 How he moved hence, you saw him and must know;
 Without a friend to lead the way, himself
 Guiding us all.  So having reached the abrupt
 Earth-rooted Threshold with its brazen stairs,
 He paused at one of the converging paths,
 Hard by the rocky basin which records
 The pact of Theseus and Peirithous.
 Betwixt that rift and the Thorician rock,
 The hollow pear-tree and the marble tomb,
 Midway he sat and loosed his beggar's weeds;
 Then calling to his daughters bade them fetch
 Of running water, both to wash withal
 And make libation; so they clomb the steep;
 And in brief space brought what their father bade,
 Then laved and dressed him with observance due.
 But when he had his will in everything,
 And no desire was left unsatisfied,
 It thundered from the netherworld; the maids
 Shivered, and crouching at their father's knees
 Wept, beat their breast and uttered a long wail.
 He, as he heard their sudden bitter cry,
 Folded his arms about them both and said,
 "My children, ye will lose your sire today,
 For all of me has perished, and no more
 Have ye to bear your long, long ministry;
 A heavy load, I know, and yet one word
 Wipes out all score of tribulations--_love_.
 And love from me ye had--from no man more;
 But now must live without me all your days."
 So clinging to each other sobbed and wept
 Father and daughters both, but when at last
 Their mourning had an end and no wail rose,
 A moment there was silence; suddenly
 A voice that summoned him; with sudden dread
 The hair of all stood up and all were 'mazed;
 For the call came, now loud, now low, and oft.
 "Oedipus, Oedipus, why tarry we?
 Too long, too long thy passing is delayed."
 But when he heard the summons of the god,
 He prayed that Theseus might be brought, and when
 The Prince came nearer:  "O my friend," he cried,
 "Pledge ye my daughters, giving thy right hand--
 And, daughters, give him yours--and promise me
 Thou never wilt forsake them, but do all
 That time and friendship prompt in their behoof."
 And he of his nobility repressed
 His tears and swore to be their constant friend.
 This promise given, Oedipus put forth
 Blind hands and laid them on his children, saying,
 "O children, prove your true nobility
 And hence depart nor seek to witness sights
 Unlawful or to hear unlawful words.
 Nay, go with speed; let none but Theseus stay,
 Our ruler, to behold what next shall hap."
 So we all heard him speak, and weeping sore
 We companied the maidens on their way.
 After brief space we looked again, and lo
 The man was gone, evanished from our eyes;
 Only the king we saw with upraised hand
 Shading his eyes as from some awful sight,
 That no man might endure to look upon.
 A moment later, and we saw him bend
 In prayer to Earth and prayer to Heaven at once.
 But by what doom the stranger met his end
 No man save Theseus knoweth.  For there fell
 No fiery bold that reft him in that hour,
 Nor whirlwind from the sea, but he was taken.
 It was a messenger from heaven, or else
 Some gentle, painless cleaving of earth's base;
 For without wailing or disease or pain
 He passed away--and end most marvelous.
 And if to some my tale seems foolishness
 I am content that such could count me fool.
 
 CHORUS
 Where are the maids and their attendant friends?
 
 MESSENGER
 They cannot be far off; the approaching sound
 Of lamentation tells they come this way.
 [Enter ANTIGONE and ISMENE]
 
 ANTIGONE
 (Str. 1)
 Woe, woe! on this sad day
      We sisters of one blasted stock
      must bow beneath the shock,
 Must weep and weep the curse that lay
      On him our sire, for whom
 In life, a life-long world of care
      'Twas ours to bear,
      In death must face the gloom
      That wraps his tomb.
 What tongue can tell
 That sight ineffable?
 
 CHORUS
 What mean ye, maidens?
 
 ANTIGONE
                          All is but surmise.
 
 CHORUS
 Is he then gone?
 
 ANTIGONE
                     Gone as ye most might wish.
 Not in battle or sea storm,
 But reft from sight,
 By hands invisible borne
 To viewless fields of night.
 Ah me! on us too night has come,
 The night of mourning.  Wither roam
 O'er land or sea in our distress
 Eating the bread of bitterness?
 
 ISMENE
 I know not.  O that Death
 Might nip my breath,
 And let me share my aged father's fate.
 I cannot live a life thus desolate.
 
 CHORUS
 Best of daughters, worthy pair,
 What heaven brings ye needs must bear,
 Fret no more 'gainst Heaven's will;
 Fate hath dealt with you not ill.
 
 ANTIGONE
 (Ant. 1)
 Love can turn past pain to bliss,
      What seemed bitter now is sweet.
 Ah me! that happy toil is sweet.
      The guidance of those dear blind feet.
 Dear father, wrapt for aye in nether gloom,
      E'en in the tomb
 Never shalt thou lack of love repine,
      Her love and mine.
 
 CHORUS
 His fate--
 
 ANTIGONE
           Is even as he planned.
 
 CHORUS
 How so?
 
 ANTIGONE
 He died, so willed he, in a foreign land.
 Lapped in kind earth he sleeps his long last sleep,
      And o'er his grave friends weep.
 How great our lost these streaming eyes can tell,
      This sorrow naught can quell.
 Thou hadst thy wish 'mid strangers thus to die,
      But I, ah me, not by.
 
 ISMENE
 Alas, my sister, what new fate
 *     *     *     *     *     *
 *     *     *     *     *     *
 Befalls us orphans desolate?
 
 CHORUS
 His end was blessed; therefore, children, stay
 Your sorrow.  Man is born to fate a prey.
 
 ANTIGONE
 (Str. 2)
 Sister, let us back again.
 
 ISMENE
 Why return?
 
 ANTIGONE
                My soul is fain--
 ISMENE
 Is fain?
 
 ANTIGONE
           To see the earthy bed.
 
 ISMENE
 Sayest thou?
 
 ANTIGONE
                Where our sire is laid.
 
 ISMENE
 Nay, thou can'st not, dost not see--
 
 ANTIGONE
 Sister, wherefore wroth with me?
 
 ISMENE
 Know'st not--beside--
 
 ANTIGONE
                     More must I hear?
 
 ISMENE
 Tombless he died, none near.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Lead me thither; slay me there.
 
 ISMENE
 How shall I unhappy fare,
 Friendless, helpless, how drag on
 A life of misery alone?
 
 CHORUS
 (Ant. 2)
 Fear not, maids--
 
 ANTIGONE
                     Ah, whither flee?
 
 CHORUS
 Refuge hath been found.
 
 ANTIGONE
                          For me?
 
 CHORUS
 Where thou shalt be safe from harm.
 
 ANTIGONE
 I know it.
 
 CHORUS
           Why then this alarm?
 
 ANTIGONE
 How again to get us home
 I know not.
 
 CHORUS
                Why then this roam?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Troubles whelm us--
 
 CHORUS
                     As of yore.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Worse than what was worse before.
 
 CHORUS
 Sure ye are driven on the breakers' surge.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Alas! we are.
 
 CHORUS
                Alas! 'tis so.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Ah whither turn, O Zeus?  No ray
 Of hope to cheer the way
 Whereon the fates our desperate voyage urge.
 [Enter THESEUS]
 
 THESEUS
 Dry your tears; when grace is shed
 On the quick and on the dead
 By dark Powers beneficent,
 Over-grief they would resent.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Aegeus' child, to thee we pray.
 
 THESEUS
 What the boon, my children, say.
 
 ANTIGONE
 With our own eyes we fain would see
 Our father's tomb.
 
 THESEUS
                     That may not be.
 
 ANTIGONE
 What say'st thou, King?
 
 THESEUS
                          My children, he
 Charged me straitly that no moral
 Should approach the sacred portal,
 Or greet with funeral litanies
 The hidden tomb wherein he lies;
 Saying, "If thou keep'st my hest
 Thou shalt hold thy realm at rest."
 The God of Oaths this promise heard,
 And to Zeus I pledged my word.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Well, if he would have it so,
 We must yield.  Then let us go
 Back to Thebes, if yet we may
 Heal this mortal feud and stay
 The self-wrought doom
 That drives our brothers to their tomb.
 
 THESEUS
 Go in peace; nor will I spare
 Ought of toil and zealous care,
 But on all your needs attend,
 Gladdening in his grave my friend.
 
 CHORUS
 Wail no more, let sorrow rest,
 All is ordered for the best.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES
 ---------
 
 [Footnote 4:  The Greek text for the passages marked here and later in
 the  text have been lost.]
 
 [Footnote 5:  To  avoid  the  blessing,  still  a  secret,  he  resorts
 to   a commonplace; literally, "For what generous man is not (in
 befriending others) a friend to himself?"]
 
 [Footnote 6:  Creon desires to bury Oedipus on the confines of Thebes so
 as  to avoid the pollution and yet offer due rites at his tomb.  Ismene
 tells him of the latest oracle and interprets to him its purport, that
 some day the Theban invaders of Athens will be routed in a battle near
 the grave of Oedipus.]
 
 [Footnote 7:  The Thebans sprung from the Dragon's teeth sown by
 Cadmus.]
 
 
 
 
 
                               SOPHOCLES
 
                               ANTIGONE
 
                      Translation by F. Storr, BA
             Formerly Scholar of Trinity College, Cambridge
                     From the Loeb Library Edition
                        Originally published by
                Harvard University Press, Cambridge, MA
                                  and
                     William Heinemann Ltd, London
 
                        First published in 1912
 
                                 *****
 
                                ARGUMENT
 
 Antigone, daughter of Oedipus, the late king of Thebes, in defiance of
 Creon who rules in his stead, resolves to bury her brother Polyneices,
 slain in his attack on Thebes. She is caught in the act by Creon's
 watchmen and brought before the king. She justifies her action,
 asserting that she was bound to obey the eternal laws of right and wrong
 in spite of any human ordinance. Creon, unrelenting, condemns her to be
 immured in a rock-hewn chamber. His son Haemon, to whom Antigone is
 betrothed, pleads in vain for her life and threatens to die with her.
 Warned by the seer Teiresias Creon repents him and hurries to release
 Antigone from her rocky prison. But he is too late: he finds lying side
 by side Antigone who had hanged herself and Haemon who also has perished
 by his own hand. Returning to the palace he sees within the dead body of
 his queen who on learning of her son's death has stabbed herself to the
 heart.
 
                                 *****
 
                           DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
 ANTIGONE  and ISMENE--daughters of Oedipus and sisters  of  Polyneices
       and Eteocles.
 
 CREON, King of Thebes.
 
 HAEMON, Son of Creon, betrothed to Antigone.
 
 EURYDICE, wife of Creon.
 
 TEIRESIAS, the prophet.
 
 CHORUS, of Theban elders.
 
 A WATCHMAN
 
 A MESSENGER
 
 A SECOND MESSENGER
 
                                  *****
 
                                ANTIGONE
 
 
              ANTIGONE and ISMENE before the Palace gates.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Ismene, sister of my blood and heart,
 See'st thou how Zeus would in our lives fulfill
 The weird of Oedipus, a world of woes!
 For what of pain, affliction, outrage, shame,
 Is lacking in our fortunes, thine and mine?
 And now this proclamation of today
 Made by our Captain-General to the State,
 What can its purport be?  Didst hear and heed,
 Or art thou deaf when friends are banned as foes?
 
 ISMENE
 To me, Antigone, no word of friends
 Has come, or glad or grievous, since we twain
 Were reft of our two brethren in one day
 By double fratricide; and since i' the night
 Our Argive leaguers fled, no later news
 Has reached me, to inspirit or deject.
 
 ANTIGONE
 I know 'twas so, and therefore summoned thee
 Beyond the gates to breathe it in thine ear.
 
 ISMENE
 What is it?  Some dark secret stirs thy breast.
 
 ANTIGONE
 What but the thought of our two brothers dead,
 The one by Creon graced with funeral rites,
 The other disappointed?  Eteocles
 He hath consigned to earth (as fame reports)
 With obsequies that use and wont ordain,
 So gracing him among the dead below.
 But Polyneices, a dishonored corse,
 (So by report the royal edict runs)
 No man may bury him or make lament--
 Must leave him tombless and unwept, a feast
 For kites to scent afar and swoop upon.
 Such is the edict (if report speak true)
 Of Creon, our most noble Creon, aimed
 At thee and me, aye me too; and anon
 He will be here to promulgate, for such
 As have not heard, his mandate; 'tis in sooth
 No passing humor, for the edict says
 Whoe'er transgresses shall be stoned to death.
 So stands it with us; now 'tis thine to show
 If thou art worthy of thy blood or base.
 
 ISMENE
 But how, my rash, fond sister, in such case
 Can I do anything to make or mar?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Say, wilt thou aid me and abet?  Decide.
 
 ISMENE
 In what bold venture?  What is in thy thought?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Lend me a hand to bear the corpse away.
 
 ISMENE
 What, bury him despite the interdict?
 
 ANTIGONE
 My brother, and, though thou deny him, thine
 No man shall say that _I_ betrayed a brother.
 
 ISMENE
 Wilt thou persist, though Creon has forbid?
 
 ANTIGONE
 What right has he to keep me from my own?
 
 ISMENE
 Bethink thee, sister, of our father's fate,
 Abhorred, dishonored, self-convinced of sin,
 Blinded, himself his executioner.
 Think of his mother-wife (ill sorted names)
 Done by a noose herself had twined to death
 And last, our hapless brethren in one day,
 Both in a mutual destiny involved,
 Self-slaughtered, both the slayer and the slain.
 Bethink thee, sister, we are left alone;
 Shall we not perish wretchedest of all,
 If in defiance of the law we cross
 A monarch's will?--weak women, think of that,
 Not framed by nature to contend with men.
 Remember this too that the stronger rules;
 We must obey his orders, these or worse.
 Therefore I plead compulsion and entreat
 The dead to pardon.  I perforce obey
 The powers that be.  'Tis foolishness, I ween,
 To overstep in aught the golden mean.
 
 ANTIGONE
 I urge no more; nay, wert thou willing still,
 I would not welcome such a fellowship.
 Go thine own way; myself will bury him.
 How sweet to die in such employ, to rest,--
 Sister and brother linked in love's embrace--
 A sinless sinner, banned awhile on earth,
 But by the dead commended; and with them
 I shall abide for ever.  As for thee,
 Scorn, if thou wilt, the eternal laws of Heaven.
 
 ISMENE
 I scorn them not, but to defy the State
 Or break her ordinance I have no skill.
 
 ANTIGONE
 A specious pretext.  I will go alone
 To lap my dearest brother in the grave.
 
 ISMENE
 My poor, fond sister, how I fear for thee!
 
 ANTIGONE
 O waste no fears on me; look to thyself.
 
 ISMENE
 At least let no man know of thine intent,
 But keep it close and secret, as will I.
 
 ANTIGONE
 O tell it, sister; I shall hate thee more
 If thou proclaim it not to all the town.
 
 ISMENE
 Thou hast a fiery soul for numbing work.
 
 ANTIGONE
 I pleasure those whom I would liefest please.
 
 ISMENE
 If thou succeed; but thou art doomed to fail.
 
 ANTIGONE
 When strength shall fail me, yes, but not before.
 
 ISMENE
 But, if the venture's hopeless, why essay?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Sister, forbear, or I shall hate thee soon,
 And the dead man will hate thee too, with cause.
 Say I am mad and give my madness rein
 To wreck itself; the worst that can befall
 Is but to die an honorable death.
 
 ISMENE
 Have thine own way then; 'tis a mad endeavor,
 Yet to thy lovers thou art dear as ever.
 [Exeunt]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Sunbeam, of all that ever dawn upon
           Our seven-gated Thebes the brightest ray,
                O eye of golden day,
 How fair thy light o'er Dirce's fountain shone,
 Speeding upon their headlong homeward course,
 Far quicker than they came, the Argive force;
                Putting to flight
 The argent shields, the host with scutcheons white.
 Against our land the proud invader came
 To vindicate fell Polyneices' claim.
           Like to an eagle swooping low,
           On pinions white as new fall'n snow.
 With clanging scream, a horsetail plume his crest,
 The aspiring lord of Argos onward pressed.
 
 (Ant. 1)
 Hovering around our city walls he waits,
 His spearmen raven at our seven gates.
 But ere a torch our crown of towers could burn,
 Ere they had tasted of our blood, they turn
 Forced by the Dragon; in their rear
 The din of Ares panic-struck they hear.
 For Zeus who hates the braggart's boast
 Beheld that gold-bespangled host;
 As at the goal the paean they upraise,
 He struck them with his forked lightning blaze.
 
 (Str. 2)
 To earthy from earth rebounding, down he crashed;
      The fire-brand from his impious hand was dashed,
 As like a Bacchic reveler on he came,
 Outbreathing hate and flame,
 And tottered.  Elsewhere in the field,
 Here, there, great Area like a war-horse wheeled;
           Beneath his car down thrust
           Our foemen bit the dust.
 
 Seven captains at our seven gates
 Thundered; for each a champion waits,
 Each left behind his armor bright,
 Trophy for Zeus who turns the fight;
 Save two alone, that ill-starred pair
 One mother to one father bare,
 Who lance in rest, one 'gainst the other
 Drave, and both perished, brother slain by brother.
 
 (Ant. 2)
 Now Victory to Thebes returns again
 And smiles upon her chariot-circled plain.
           Now let feast and festal should
           Memories of war blot out.
           Let us to the temples throng,
           Dance and sing the live night long.
           God of Thebes, lead thou the round.
           Bacchus, shaker of the ground!
           Let us end our revels here;
           Lo! Creon our new lord draws near,
           Crowned by this strange chance, our king.
           What, I marvel, pondering?
           Why this summons?  Wherefore call
           Us, his elders, one and all,
           Bidding us with him debate,
           On some grave concern of State?
 [Enter CREON]
 
 CREON
 Elders, the gods have righted one again
 Our storm-tossed ship of state, now safe in port.
 But you by special summons I convened
 As my most trusted councilors; first, because
 I knew you loyal to Laius of old;
 Again, when Oedipus restored our State,
 Both while he ruled and when his rule was o'er,
 Ye still were constant to the royal line.
 Now that his two sons perished in one day,
 Brother by brother murderously slain,
 By right of kinship to the Princes dead,
 I claim and hold the throne and sovereignty.
 Yet 'tis no easy matter to discern
 The temper of a man, his mind and will,
 Till he be proved by exercise of power;
 And in my case, if one who reigns supreme
 Swerve from the highest policy, tongue-tied
 By fear of consequence, that man I hold,
 And ever held, the basest of the base.
 And I contemn the man who sets his friend
 Before his country.  For myself, I call
 To witness Zeus, whose eyes are everywhere,
 If I perceive some mischievous design
 To sap the State, I will not hold my tongue;
 Nor would I reckon as my private friend
 A public foe, well knowing that the State
 Is the good ship that holds our fortunes all:
 Farewell to friendship, if she suffers wreck.
 Such is the policy by which I seek
 To serve the Commons and conformably
 I have proclaimed an edict as concerns
 The sons of Oedipus; Eteocles
 Who in his country's battle fought and fell,
 The foremost champion--duly bury him
 With all observances and ceremonies
 That are the guerdon of the heroic dead.
 But for the miscreant exile who returned
 Minded in flames and ashes to blot out
 His father's city and his father's gods,
 And glut his vengeance with his kinsmen's blood,
 Or drag them captive at his chariot wheels--
 For Polyneices 'tis ordained that none
 Shall give him burial or make mourn for him,
 But leave his corpse unburied, to be meat
 For dogs and carrion crows, a ghastly sight.
 So am I purposed; never by my will
 Shall miscreants take precedence of true men,
 But all good patriots, alive or dead,
 Shall be by me preferred and honored.
 
 CHORUS
 Son of Menoeceus, thus thou will'st to deal
 With him who loathed and him who loved our State.
 Thy word is law; thou canst dispose of us
 The living, as thou will'st, as of the dead.
 
 CREON
 See then ye execute what I ordain.
 
 CHORUS
 On younger shoulders lay this grievous charge.
 
 CREON
 Fear not, I've posted guards to watch the corpse.
 
 CHORUS
 What further duty would'st thou lay on us?
 
 CREON
 Not to connive at disobedience.
 
 CHORUS
 No man is mad enough to court his death.
 
 CREON
 The penalty _is_ death:  yet hope of gain
 Hath lured men to their ruin oftentimes.
 [Enter GUARD]
 
 GUARD
 My lord, I will not make pretense to pant
 And puff as some light-footed messenger.
 In sooth my soul beneath its pack of thought
 Made many a halt and turned and turned again;
 For conscience plied her spur and curb by turns.
 "Why hurry headlong to thy fate, poor fool?"
 She whispered.  Then again, "If Creon learn
 This from another, thou wilt rue it worse."
 Thus leisurely I hastened on my road;
 Much thought extends a furlong to a league.
 But in the end the forward voice prevailed,
 To face thee.  I will speak though I say nothing.
 For plucking courage from despair methought,
 'Let the worst hap, thou canst but meet thy fate.'
 
 CREON
 What is thy news?  Why this despondency?
 
 GUARD
 Let me premise a word about myself?
 I neither did the deed nor saw it done,
 Nor were it just that I should come to harm.
 
 CREON
 Thou art good at parry, and canst fence about
 Some matter of grave import, as is plain.
 
 GUARD
 The bearer of dread tidings needs must quake.
 
 CREON
 Then, sirrah, shoot thy bolt and get thee gone.
 
 GUARD
 Well, it must out; the corpse is buried; someone
 E'en now besprinkled it with thirsty dust,
 Performed the proper ritual--and was gone.
 
 CREON
 What say'st thou?  Who hath dared to do this thing?
 
 GUARD
 I cannot tell, for there was ne'er a trace
 Of pick or mattock--hard unbroken ground,
 Without a scratch or rut of chariot wheels,
 No sign that human hands had been at work.
 When the first sentry of the morning watch
 Gave the alarm, we all were terror-stricken.
 The corpse had vanished, not interred in earth,
 But strewn with dust, as if by one who sought
 To avert the curse that haunts the unburied dead:
 Of hound or ravening jackal, not a sign.
 Thereat arose an angry war of words;
 Guard railed at guard and blows were like to end it,
 For none was there to part us, each in turn
 Suspected, but the guilt brought home to none,
 From lack of evidence.  We challenged each
 The ordeal, or to handle red-hot iron,
 Or pass through fire, affirming on our oath
 Our innocence--we neither did the deed
 Ourselves, nor know who did or compassed it.
 Our quest was at a standstill, when one spake
 And bowed us all to earth like quivering reeds,
 For there was no gainsaying him nor way
 To escape perdition:  _Ye_are_bound_to_tell_
 _The_King,_ye_cannot_hide_it; so he spake.
 And he convinced us all; so lots were cast,
 And I, unlucky scapegoat, drew the prize.
 So here I am unwilling and withal
 Unwelcome; no man cares to hear ill news.
 
 CHORUS
 I had misgivings from the first, my liege,
 Of something more than natural at work.
 
 CREON
 O cease, you vex me with your babblement;
 I am like to think you dote in your old age.
 Is it not arrant folly to pretend
 That gods would have a thought for this dead man?
 Did they forsooth award him special grace,
 And as some benefactor bury him,
 Who came to fire their hallowed sanctuaries,
 To sack their shrines, to desolate their land,
 And scout their ordinances?  Or perchance
 The gods bestow their favors on the bad.
 No! no! I have long noted malcontents
 Who wagged their heads, and kicked against the yoke,
 Misliking these my orders, and my rule.
 'Tis they, I warrant, who suborned my guards
 By bribes.  Of evils current upon earth
 The worst is money.  Money 'tis that sacks
 Cities, and drives men forth from hearth and home;
 Warps and seduces native innocence,
 And breeds a habit of dishonesty.
 But they who sold themselves shall find their greed
 Out-shot the mark, and rue it soon or late.
 Yea, as I still revere the dread of Zeus,
 By Zeus I swear, except ye find and bring
 Before my presence here the very man
 Who carried out this lawless burial,
 Death for your punishment shall not suffice.
 Hanged on a cross, alive ye first shall make
 Confession of this outrage.  This will teach you
 What practices are like to serve your turn.
 There are some villainies that bring no gain.
 For by dishonesty the few may thrive,
 The many come to ruin and disgrace.
 
 GUARD
 May I not speak, or must I turn and go
 Without a word?--
 
 CREON
                     Begone! canst thou not see
 That e'en this question irks me?
 
 GUARD
                                    Where, my lord?
 Is it thy ears that suffer, or thy heart?
 
 CREON
 Why seek to probe and find the seat of pain?
 
 GUARD
 I gall thine ears--this miscreant thy mind.
 
 CREON
 What an inveterate babbler! get thee gone!
 
 GUARD
 Babbler perchance, but innocent of the crime.
 
 CREON
 Twice guilty, having sold thy soul for gain.
 
 GUARD
 Alas! how sad when reasoners reason wrong.
 
 CREON
 Go, quibble with thy reason.  If thou fail'st
 To find these malefactors, thou shalt own
 The wages of ill-gotten gains is death.
 [Exit CREON]
 
 GUARD
 I pray he may be found.  But caught or not
 (And fortune must determine that) thou never
 Shalt see me here returning; that is sure.
 For past all hope or thought I have escaped,
 And for my safety owe the gods much thanks.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Many wonders there be, but naught more wondrous than man;
 Over the surging sea, with a whitening south wind wan,
 Through the foam of the firth, man makes his perilous way;
 And the eldest of deities Earth that knows not toil nor decay
 Ever he furrows and scores, as his team, year in year out,
 With breed of the yoked horse, the ploughshare turneth about.
 
 (Ant. 1)
 The light-witted birds of the air, the beasts of the weald and the wood
 He traps with his woven snare, and the brood of the briny flood.
 Master of cunning he:  the savage bull, and the hart
 Who roams the mountain free, are tamed by his infinite art;
 And the shaggy rough-maned steed is broken to bear the bit.
 
 (Str. 2)
 Speech and the wind-swift speed of counsel and civic wit,
 He hath learnt for himself all these; and the arrowy rain to fly
 And the nipping airs that freeze, 'neath the open winter sky.
 He hath provision for all: fell plague he hath learnt to endure;
 Safe whate'er may befall: yet for death he hath found no cure.
 
 (Ant. 2)
 Passing the wildest flight thought are the cunning and skill,
 That guide man now to the light, but now to counsels of ill.
 If he honors the laws of the land, and reveres the Gods of the State
 Proudly his city shall stand; but a cityless outcast I rate
 Whoso bold in his pride from the path of right doth depart;
 Ne'er may I sit by his side, or share the thoughts of his heart.
 
           What strange vision meets my eyes,
           Fills me with a wild surprise?
           Sure I know her, sure 'tis she,
           The maid Antigone.
           Hapless child of hapless sire,
           Didst thou recklessly conspire,
           Madly brave the King's decree?
           Therefore are they haling thee?
 [Enter GUARD bringing ANTIGONE]
 
 GUARD
 Here is the culprit taken in the act
 Of giving burial.  But where's the King?
 
 CHORUS
 There from the palace he returns in time.
 [Enter CREON]
 
 CREON
 Why is my presence timely?  What has chanced?
 
 GUARD
 No man, my lord, should make a vow, for if
 He ever swears he will not do a thing,
 His afterthoughts belie his first resolve.
 When from the hail-storm of thy threats I fled
 I sware thou wouldst not see me here again;
 But the wild rapture of a glad surprise
 Intoxicates, and so I'm here forsworn.
 And here's my prisoner, caught in the very act,
 Decking the grave.  No lottery this time;
 This prize is mine by right of treasure-trove.
 So take her, judge her, rack her, if thou wilt.
 She's thine, my liege; but I may rightly claim
 Hence to depart well quit of all these ills.
 
 CREON
 Say, how didst thou arrest the maid, and where?
 
 GUARD
 Burying the man.  There's nothing more to tell.
 
 CREON
 Hast thou thy wits?  Or know'st thou what thou say'st?
 
 GUARD
 I saw this woman burying the corpse
 Against thy orders.  Is that clear and plain?
 
 CREON
 But how was she surprised and caught in the act?
 
 GUARD
 It happened thus.  No sooner had we come,
 Driven from thy presence by those awful threats,
 Than straight we swept away all trace of dust,
 And bared the clammy body.  Then we sat
 High on the ridge to windward of the stench,
 While each man kept he fellow alert and rated
 Roundly the sluggard if he chanced to nap.
 So all night long we watched, until the sun
 Stood high in heaven, and his blazing beams
 Smote us.  A sudden whirlwind then upraised
 A cloud of dust that blotted out the sky,
 And swept the plain, and stripped the woodlands bare,
 And shook the firmament.  We closed our eyes
 And waited till the heaven-sent plague should pass.
 At last it ceased, and lo! there stood this maid.
 A piercing cry she uttered, sad and shrill,
 As when the mother bird beholds her nest
 Robbed of its nestlings; even so the maid
 Wailed as she saw the body stripped and bare,
 And cursed the ruffians who had done this deed.
 Anon she gathered handfuls of dry dust,
 Then, holding high a well-wrought brazen urn,
 Thrice on the dead she poured a lustral stream.
 We at the sight swooped down on her and seized
 Our quarry.  Undismayed she stood, and when
 We taxed her with the former crime and this,
 She disowned nothing.  I was glad--and grieved;
 For 'tis most sweet to 'scape oneself scot-free,
 And yet to bring disaster to a friend
 Is grievous.  Take it all in all, I deem
 A man's first duty is to serve himself.
 
 CREON
 Speak, girl, with head bent low and downcast eyes,
 Does thou plead guilty or deny the deed?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Guilty.  I did it, I deny it not.
 
 CREON (to GUARD)
 Sirrah, begone whither thou wilt, and thank
 Thy luck that thou hast 'scaped a heavy charge.
 (To ANTIGONE)
 Now answer this plain question, yes or no,
 Wast thou acquainted with the interdict?
 
 ANTIGONE
 I knew, all knew; how should I fail to know?
 
 CREON
 And yet wert bold enough to break the law?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Yea, for these laws were not ordained of Zeus,
 And she who sits enthroned with gods below,
 Justice, enacted not these human laws.
 Nor did I deem that thou, a mortal man,
 Could'st by a breath annul and override
 The immutable unwritten laws of Heaven.
 They were not born today nor yesterday;
 They die not; and none knoweth whence they sprang.
 I was not like, who feared no mortal's frown,
 To disobey these laws and so provoke
 The wrath of Heaven.  I knew that I must die,
 E'en hadst thou not proclaimed it; and if death
 Is thereby hastened, I shall count it gain.
 For death is gain to him whose life, like mine,
 Is full of misery.  Thus my lot appears
 Not sad, but blissful; for had I endured
 To leave my mother's son unburied there,
 I should have grieved with reason, but not now.
 And if in this thou judgest me a fool,
 Methinks the judge of folly's not acquit.
 
 CHORUS
 A stubborn daughter of a stubborn sire,
 This ill-starred maiden kicks against the pricks.
 
 CREON
 Well, let her know the stubbornest of wills
 Are soonest bended, as the hardest iron,
 O'er-heated in the fire to brittleness,
 Flies soonest into fragments, shivered through.
 A snaffle curbs the fieriest steed, and he
 Who in subjection lives must needs be meek.
 But this proud girl, in insolence well-schooled,
 First overstepped the established law, and then--
 A second and worse act of insolence--
 She boasts and glories in her wickedness.
 Now if she thus can flout authority
 Unpunished, I am woman, she the man.
 But though she be my sister's child or nearer
 Of kin than all who worship at my hearth,
 Nor she nor yet her sister shall escape
 The utmost penalty, for both I hold,
 As arch-conspirators, of equal guilt.
 Bring forth the older; even now I saw her
 Within the palace, frenzied and distraught.
 The workings of the mind discover oft
 Dark deeds in darkness schemed, before the act.
 More hateful still the miscreant who seeks
 When caught, to make a virtue of a crime.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Would'st thou do more than slay thy prisoner?
 
 CREON
 Not I, thy life is mine, and that's enough.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Why dally then?  To me no word of thine
 Is pleasant:  God forbid it e'er should please;
 Nor am I more acceptable to thee.
 And yet how otherwise had I achieved
 A name so glorious as by burying
 A brother? so my townsmen all would say,
 Where they not gagged by terror,  Manifold
 A king's prerogatives, and not the least
 That all his acts and all his words are law.
 
 CREON
 Of all these Thebans none so deems but thou.
 
 ANTIGONE
 These think as I, but bate their breath to thee.
 
 CREON
 Hast thou no shame to differ from all these?
 
 ANTIGONE
 To reverence kith and kin can bring no shame.
 
 CREON
 Was his dead foeman not thy kinsman too?
 
 ANTIGONE
 One mother bare them and the self-same sire.
 
 CREON
 Why cast a slur on one by honoring one?
 
 ANTIGONE
 The dead man will not bear thee out in this.
 
 CREON
 Surely, if good and evil fare alive.
 
 ANTIGONE
 The slain man was no villain but a brother.
 
 CREON
 The patriot perished by the outlaw's brand.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Nathless the realms below these rites require.
 
 CREON
 Not that the base should fare as do the brave.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Who knows if this world's crimes are virtues there?
 
 CREON
 Not even death can make a foe a friend.
 
 ANTIGONE
 My nature is for mutual love, not hate.
 
 CREON
 Die then, and love the dead if thou must;
 No woman shall be the master while I live.
 [Enter ISMENE]
 
 CHORUS
           Lo from out the palace gate,
           Weeping o'er her sister's fate,
           Comes Ismene; see her brow,
           Once serene, beclouded now,
           See her beauteous face o'erspread
           With a flush of angry red.
 
 CREON
 Woman, who like a viper unperceived
 Didst harbor in my house and drain my blood,
 Two plagues I nurtured blindly, so it proved,
 To sap my throne.  Say, didst thou too abet
 This crime, or dost abjure all privity?
 
 ISMENE
 I did the deed, if she will have it so,
 And with my sister claim to share the guilt.
 
 ANTIGONE
 That were unjust.  Thou would'st not act with me
 At first, and I refused thy partnership.
 
 ISMENE
 But now thy bark is stranded, I am bold
 To claim my share as partner in the loss.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Who did the deed the under-world knows well:
 A friend in word is never friend of mine.
 
 ISMENE
 O sister, scorn me not, let me but share
 Thy work of piety, and with thee die.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Claim not a work in which thou hadst no hand;
 One death sufficeth.  Wherefore should'st thou die?
 
 ISMENE
 What would life profit me bereft of thee?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Ask Creon, he's thy kinsman and best friend.
 
 ISMENE
 Why taunt me?  Find'st thou pleasure in these gibes?
 
 ANTIGONE
 'Tis a sad mockery, if indeed I mock.
 
 ISMENE
 O say if I can help thee even now.
 
 ANTIGONE
 No, save thyself; I grudge not thy escape.
 
 ISMENE
 Is e'en this boon denied, to share thy lot?
 
 ANTIGONE
 Yea, for thou chosed'st life, and I to die.
 
 ISMENE
 Thou canst not say that I did not protest.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Well, some approved thy wisdom, others mine.
 
 ISMENE
 But now we stand convicted, both alike.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Fear not; thou livest, I died long ago
 Then when I gave my life to save the dead.
 
 CREON
 Both maids, methinks, are crazed.  One suddenly
 Has lost her wits, the other was born mad.
 
 ISMENE
 Yea, so it falls, sire, when misfortune comes,
 The wisest even lose their mother wit.
 
 CREON
 I' faith thy wit forsook thee when thou mad'st
 Thy choice with evil-doers to do ill.
 
 ISMENE
 What life for me without my sister here?
 
 CREON
 Say not thy sister _here_:  thy sister's dead.
 
 ISMENE
 What, wilt thou slay thy own son's plighted bride?
 
 CREON
 Aye, let him raise him seed from other fields.
 
 ISMENE
 No new espousal can be like the old.
 
 CREON
 A plague on trulls who court and woo our sons.
 
 ANTIGONE
 O Haemon, how thy sire dishonors thee!
 
 CREON
 A plague on thee and thy accursed bride!
 
 CHORUS
 What, wilt thou rob thine own son of his bride?
 
 CREON
 'Tis death that bars this marriage, not his sire.
 
 CHORUS
 So her death-warrant, it would seem, is sealed.
 
 CREON
 By you, as first by me; off with them, guards,
 And keep them close.  Henceforward let them learn
 To live as women use, not roam at large.
 For e'en the bravest spirits run away
 When they perceive death pressing on life's heels.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Thrice blest are they who never tasted pain!
      If once the curse of Heaven attaint a race,
      The infection lingers on and speeds apace,
 Age after age, and each the cup must drain.
 
 So when Etesian blasts from Thrace downpour
      Sweep o'er the blackening main and whirl to land
      From Ocean's cavernous depths his ooze and sand,
 Billow on billow thunders on the shore.
 
 (Ant. 1)
 On the Labdacidae I see descending
      Woe upon woe; from days of old some god
      Laid on the race a malison, and his rod
 Scourges each age with sorrows never ending.
 
 The light that dawned upon its last born son
      Is vanished, and the bloody axe of Fate
      Has felled the goodly tree that blossomed late.
 O Oedipus, by reckless pride undone!
 
 (Str. 2)
 Thy might, O Zeus, what mortal power can quell?
 Not sleep that lays all else beneath its spell,
 Nor moons that never tire:  untouched by Time,
           Throned in the dazzling light
           That crowns Olympus' height,
 Thou reignest King, omnipotent, sublime.
 
           Past, present, and to be,
           All bow to thy decree,
           All that exceeds the mean by Fate
           Is punished, Love or Hate.
 
 (Ant. 2)
 Hope flits about never-wearying wings;
 Profit to some, to some light loves she brings,
 But no man knoweth how her gifts may turn,
 Till 'neath his feet the treacherous ashes burn.
 Sure 'twas a sage inspired that spake this word;
           _If evil good appear_
           _To any, Fate is near_;
 And brief the respite from her flaming sword.
 
           Hither comes in angry mood
           Haemon, latest of thy brood;
           Is it for his bride he's grieved,
           Or her marriage-bed deceived,
           Doth he make his mourn for thee,
           Maid forlorn, Antigone?
 [Enter HAEMON]
 
 CREON
 Soon shall we know, better than seer can tell.
 Learning may fixed decree anent thy bride,
 Thou mean'st not, son, to rave against thy sire?
 Know'st not whate'er we do is done in love?
 
 HAEMON
 O father, I am thine, and I will take
 Thy wisdom as the helm to steer withal.
 Therefore no wedlock shall by me be held
 More precious than thy loving goverance.
 
 CREON
 Well spoken:  so right-minded sons should feel,
 In all deferring to a father's will.
 For 'tis the hope of parents they may rear
 A brood of sons submissive, keen to avenge
 Their father's wrongs, and count his friends their own.
 But who begets unprofitable sons,
 He verily breeds trouble for himself,
 And for his foes much laughter.  Son, be warned
 And let no woman fool away thy wits.
 Ill fares the husband mated with a shrew,
 And her embraces very soon wax cold.
 For what can wound so surely to the quick
 As a false friend?  So spue and cast her off,
 Bid her go find a husband with the dead.
 For since I caught her openly rebelling,
 Of all my subjects the one malcontent,
 I will not prove a traitor to the State.
 She surely dies.  Go, let her, if she will,
 Appeal to Zeus the God of Kindred, for
 If thus I nurse rebellion in my house,
 Shall not I foster mutiny without?
 For whoso rules his household worthily,
 Will prove in civic matters no less wise.
 But he who overbears the laws, or thinks
 To overrule his rulers, such as one
 I never will allow.  Whome'er the State
 Appoints must be obeyed in everything,
 But small and great, just and unjust alike.
 I warrant such a one in either case
 Would shine, as King or subject; such a man
 Would in the storm of battle stand his ground,
 A comrade leal and true; but Anarchy--
 What evils are not wrought by Anarchy!
 She ruins States, and overthrows the home,
 She dissipates and routs the embattled host;
 While discipline preserves the ordered ranks.
 Therefore we must maintain authority
 And yield to title to a woman's will.
 Better, if needs be, men should cast us out
 Than hear it said, a woman proved his match.
 
 CHORUS
 To me, unless old age have dulled wits,
 Thy words appear both reasonable and wise.
 
 HAEMON
 Father, the gods implant in mortal men
 Reason, the choicest gift bestowed by heaven.
 'Tis not for me to say thou errest, nor
 Would I arraign thy wisdom, if I could;
 And yet wise thoughts may come to other men
 And, as thy son, it falls to me to mark
 The acts, the words, the comments of the crowd.
 The commons stand in terror of thy frown,
 And dare not utter aught that might offend,
 But I can overhear their muttered plaints,
 Know how the people mourn this maiden doomed
 For noblest deeds to die the worst of deaths.
 When her own brother slain in battle lay
 Unsepulchered, she suffered not his corse
 To lie for carrion birds and dogs to maul:
 Should not her name (they cry) be writ in gold?
 Such the low murmurings that reach my ear.
 O father, nothing is by me more prized
 Than thy well-being, for what higher good
 Can children covet than their sire's fair fame,
 As fathers too take pride in glorious sons?
 Therefore, my father, cling not to one mood,
 And deemed not thou art right, all others wrong.
 For whoso thinks that wisdom dwells with him,
 That he alone can speak or think aright,
 Such oracles are empty breath when tried.
 The wisest man will let himself be swayed
 By others' wisdom and relax in time.
 See how the trees beside a stream in flood
 Save, if they yield to force, each spray unharmed,
 But by resisting perish root and branch.
 The mariner who keeps his mainsheet taut,
 And will not slacken in the gale, is like
 To sail with thwarts reversed, keel uppermost.
 Relent then and repent thee of thy wrath;
 For, if one young in years may claim some sense,
 I'll say 'tis best of all to be endowed
 With absolute wisdom; but, if that's denied,
 (And nature takes not readily that ply)
 Next wise is he who lists to sage advice.
 
 CHORUS
 If he says aught in season, heed him, King.
 (To HAEMON)
 Heed thou thy sire too; both have spoken well.
 
 CREON
 What, would you have us at our age be schooled,
 Lessoned in prudence by a beardless boy?
 
 HAEMON
 I plead for justice, father, nothing more.
 Weigh me upon my merit, not my years.
 
 CREON
 Strange merit this to sanction lawlessness!
 
 HAEMON
 For evil-doers I would urge no plea.
 
 CREON
 Is not this maid an arrant law-breaker?
 
 HAEMON
 The Theban commons with one voice say, No.
 
 CREON
 What, shall the mob dictate my policy?
 
 HAEMON
 'Tis thou, methinks, who speakest like a boy.
 
 CREON
 Am I to rule for others, or myself?
 
 HAEMON
 A State for one man is no State at all.
 
 CREON
 The State is his who rules it, so 'tis held.
 
 HAEMON
 As monarch of a desert thou wouldst shine.
 
 CREON
 This boy, methinks, maintains the woman's cause.
 
 HAEMON
 If thou be'st woman, yes.  My thought's for thee.
 
 CREON
 O reprobate, would'st wrangle with thy sire?
 
 HAEMON
 Because I see thee wrongfully perverse.
 
 CREON
 And am I wrong, if I maintain my rights?
 
 HAEMON
 Talk not of rights; thou spurn'st the due of Heaven
 
 CREON
 O heart corrupt, a woman's minion thou!
 
 HAEMON
 Slave to dishonor thou wilt never find me.
 
 CREON
 Thy speech at least was all a plea for her.
 
 HAEMON
 And thee and me, and for the gods below.
 
 CREON
 Living the maid shall never be thy bride.
 
 HAEMON
 So she shall die, but one will die with her.
 
 CREON
 Hast come to such a pass as threaten me?
 
 HAEMON
 What threat is this, vain counsels to reprove?
 
 CREON
 Vain fool to instruct thy betters; thou shall rue it.
 
 HAEMON
 Wert not my father, I had said thou err'st.
 
 CREON
 Play not the spaniel, thou a woman's slave.
 
 HAEMON
 When thou dost speak, must no man make reply?
 
 CREON
 This passes bounds.  By heaven, thou shalt not rate
 And jeer and flout me with impunity.
 Off with the hateful thing that she may die
 At once, beside her bridegroom, in his sight.
 
 HAEMON
 Think not that in my sight the maid shall die,
 Or by my side; never shalt thou again
 Behold my face hereafter.  Go, consort
 With friends who like a madman for their mate.
 [Exit HAEMON]
 
 CHORUS
 Thy son has gone, my liege, in angry haste.
 Fell is the wrath of youth beneath a smart.
 
 CREON
 Let him go vent his fury like a fiend:
 These sisters twain he shall not save from death.
 
 CHORUS
 Surely, thou meanest not to slay them both?
 
 CREON
 I stand corrected; only her who touched
 The body.
 
 CHORUS
           And what death is she to die?
 
 CREON
 She shall be taken to some desert place
 By man untrod, and in a rock-hewn cave,
 With food no more than to avoid the taint
 That homicide might bring on all the State,
 Buried alive.  There let her call in aid
 The King of Death, the one god she reveres,
 Or learn too late a lesson learnt at last:
 'Tis labor lost, to reverence the dead.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str.)
 Love resistless in fight, all yield at a glance of thine eye,
 Love who pillowed all night on a maiden's cheek dost lie,
 Over the upland holds.  Shall mortals not yield to thee?
 
 (Ant).
 Mad are thy subjects all, and even the wisest heart
 Straight to folly will fall, at a touch of thy poisoned dart.
 Thou didst kindle the strife, this feud of kinsman with kin,
 By the eyes of a winsome wife, and the yearning her heart to win.
 For as her consort still, enthroned with Justice above,
 Thou bendest man to thy will, O all invincible Love.
 
           Lo I myself am borne aside,
           From Justice, as I view this bride.
           (O sight an eye in tears to drown)
           Antigone, so young, so fair,
                Thus hurried down
           Death's bower with the dead to share.
 
 ANTIGONE
 (Str. 1)
 Friends, countrymen, my last farewell I make;
           My journey's done.
 One last fond, lingering, longing look I take
           At the bright sun.
 For Death who puts to sleep both young and old
           Hales my young life,
 And beckons me to Acheron's dark fold,
           An unwed wife.
 No youths have sung the marriage song for me,
           My bridal bed
 No maids have strewn with flowers from the lea,
           'Tis Death I wed.
 
 CHORUS
           But bethink thee, thou art sped,
           Great and glorious, to the dead.
           Thou the sword's edge hast not tasted,
           No disease thy frame hath wasted.
           Freely thou alone shalt go
           Living to the dead below.
 
 ANTIGONE
 (Ant. 1)
 Nay, but the piteous tale I've heard men tell
      Of Tantalus' doomed child,
 Chained upon Siphylus' high rocky fell,
      That clung like ivy wild,
 Drenched by the pelting rain and whirling snow,
      Left there to pine,
 While on her frozen breast the tears aye flow--
      Her fate is mine.
 
 CHORUS
           She was sprung of gods, divine,
           Mortals we of mortal line.
           Like renown with gods to gain
           Recompenses all thy pain.
           Take this solace to thy tomb
           Hers in life and death thy doom.
 
 ANTIGONE
 (Str. 2)
 Alack, alack!  Ye mock me.  Is it meet
      Thus to insult me living, to my face?
 Cease, by our country's altars I entreat,
      Ye lordly rulers of a lordly race.
 O fount of Dirce, wood-embowered plain
      Where Theban chariots to victory speed,
 Mark ye the cruel laws that now have wrought my bane,
      The friends who show no pity in my need!
 Was ever fate like mine?  O monstrous doom,
      Within a rock-built prison sepulchered,
 To fade and wither in a living tomb,
      And alien midst the living and the dead.
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 3)
           In thy boldness over-rash
           Madly thou thy foot didst dash
           'Gainst high Justice' altar stair.
           Thou a father's guild dost bear.
 
 ANTIGONE
 (Ant. 2)
 At this thou touchest my most poignant pain,
      My ill-starred father's piteous disgrace,
 The taint of blood, the hereditary stain,
      That clings to all of Labdacus' famed race.
 Woe worth the monstrous marriage-bed where lay
      A mother with the son her womb had borne,
 Therein I was conceived, woe worth the day,
      Fruit of incestuous sheets, a maid forlorn,
 And now I pass, accursed and unwed,
      To meet them as an alien there below;
 And thee, O brother, in marriage ill-bestead,
      'Twas thy dead hand that dealt me this death-blow.
 
 CHORUS
           Religion has her chains, 'tis true,
           Let rite be paid when rites are due.
           Yet is it ill to disobey
           The powers who hold by might the sway.
           Thou hast withstood authority,
           A self-willed rebel, thou must die.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Unwept, unwed, unfriended, hence I go,
      No longer may I see the day's bright eye;
 Not one friend left to share my bitter woe,
      And o'er my ashes heave one passing sigh.
 
 CREON
 If wail and lamentation aught availed
 To stave off death, I trow they'd never end.
 Away with her, and having walled her up
 In a rock-vaulted tomb, as I ordained,
 Leave her alone at liberty to die,
 Or, if she choose, to live in solitude,
 The tomb her dwelling.  We in either case
 Are guiltless as concerns this maiden's blood,
 Only on earth no lodging shall she find.
 
 ANTIGONE
 O grave, O bridal bower, O prison house
 Hewn from the rock, my everlasting home,
 Whither I go to join the mighty host
 Of kinsfolk, Persephassa's guests long dead,
 The last of all, of all more miserable,
 I pass, my destined span of years cut short.
 And yet good hope is mine that I shall find
 A welcome from my sire, a welcome too,
 From thee, my mother, and my brother dear;
 From with these hands, I laved and decked your limbs
 In death, and poured libations on your grave.
 And last, my Polyneices, unto thee
 I paid due rites, and this my recompense!
 Yet am I justified in wisdom's eyes.
 For even had it been some child of mine,
 Or husband mouldering in death's decay,
 I had not wrought this deed despite the State.
 What is the law I call in aid?  'Tis thus
 I argue.  Had it been a husband dead
 I might have wed another, and have borne
 Another child, to take the dead child's place.
 But, now my sire and mother both are dead,
 No second brother can be born for me.
 Thus by the law of conscience I was led
 To honor thee, dear brother, and was judged
 By Creon guilty of a heinous crime.
 And now he drags me like a criminal,
 A bride unwed, amerced of marriage-song
 And marriage-bed and joys of motherhood,
 By friends deserted to a living grave.
 What ordinance of heaven have I transgressed?
 Hereafter can I look to any god
 For succor, call on any man for help?
 Alas, my piety is impious deemed.
 Well, if such justice is approved of heaven,
 I shall be taught by suffering my sin;
 But if the sin is theirs, O may they suffer
 No worse ills than the wrongs they do to me.
 
 CHORUS
 The same ungovernable will
 Drives like a gale the maiden still.
 
 CREON
 Therefore, my guards who let her stay
 Shall smart full sore for their delay.
 
 ANTIGONE
 Ah, woe is me!  This word I hear
 Brings death most near.
 
 CHORUS
 I have no comfort.  What he saith,
 Portends no other thing than death.
 
 ANTIGONE
 My fatherland, city of Thebes divine,
 Ye gods of Thebes whence sprang my line,
 Look, puissant lords of Thebes, on me;
 The last of all your royal house ye see.
 Martyred by men of sin, undone.
 Such meed my piety hath won.
 [Exit ANTIGONE]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Like to thee that maiden bright,
           Danae, in her brass-bound tower,
 Once exchanged the glad sunlight
           For a cell, her bridal bower.
 And yet she sprang of royal line,
           My child, like thine,
           And nursed the seed
           By her conceived
 Of Zeus descending in a golden shower.
 Strange are the ways of Fate, her power
 Nor wealth, nor arms withstand, nor tower;
 Nor brass-prowed ships, that breast the sea
           From Fate can flee.
 
 (Ant. 1)
 Thus Dryas' child, the rash Edonian King,
 For words of high disdain
 Did Bacchus to a rocky dungeon bring,
 To cool the madness of a fevered brain.
           His frenzy passed,
           He learnt at last
 'Twas madness gibes against a god to fling.
 For once he fain had quenched the Maenad's fire;
 And of the tuneful Nine provoked the ire.
 
 (Str. 2)
 By the Iron Rocks that guard the double main,
           On Bosporus' lone strand,
 Where stretcheth Salmydessus' plain
           In the wild Thracian land,
 There on his borders Ares witnessed
           The vengeance by a jealous step-dame ta'en
 The gore that trickled from a spindle red,
           The sightless orbits of her step-sons twain.
 
 (Ant. 2)
 Wasting away they mourned their piteous doom,
 The blasted issue of their mother's womb.
 But she her lineage could trace
           To great Erecththeus' race;
 Daughter of Boreas in her sire's vast caves
           Reared, where the tempest raves,
 Swift as his horses o'er the hills she sped;
 A child of gods; yet she, my child, like thee,
                By Destiny
 That knows not death nor age--she too was vanquished.
 [Enter TEIRESIAS and BOY]
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Princes of Thebes, two wayfarers as one,
 Having betwixt us eyes for one, we are here.
 The blind man cannot move without a guide.
 
 CREON
 Why tidings, old Teiresias?
 
 TEIRESIAS
                               I will tell thee;
 And when thou hearest thou must heed the seer.
 
 CREON
 Thus far I ne'er have disobeyed thy rede.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 So hast thou steered the ship of State aright.
 
 CREON
 I know it, and I gladly own my debt.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Bethink thee that thou treadest once again
 The razor edge of peril.
 
 CREON
                          What is this?
 Thy words inspire a dread presentiment.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 The divination of my arts shall tell.
 Sitting upon my throne of augury,
 As is my wont, where every fowl of heaven
 Find harborage, upon mine ears was borne
 A jargon strange of twitterings, hoots, and screams;
 So knew I that each bird at the other tare
 With bloody talons, for the whirr of wings
 Could signify naught else.  Perturbed in soul,
 I straight essayed the sacrifice by fire
 On blazing altars, but the God of Fire
 Came not in flame, and from the thigh bones dripped
 And sputtered in the ashes a foul ooze;
 Gall-bladders cracked and spurted up:  the fat
 Melted and fell and left the thigh bones bare.
 Such are the signs, taught by this lad, I read--
 As I guide others, so the boy guides me--
 The frustrate signs of oracles grown dumb.
 O King, thy willful temper ails the State,
 For all our shrines and altars are profaned
 By what has filled the maw of dogs and crows,
 The flesh of Oedipus' unburied son.
 Therefore the angry gods abominate
 Our litanies and our burnt offerings;
 Therefore no birds trill out a happy note,
 Gorged with the carnival of human gore.
 O ponder this, my son.  To err is common
 To all men, but the man who having erred
 Hugs not his errors, but repents and seeks
 The cure, is not a wastrel nor unwise.
 No fool, the saw goes, like the obstinate fool.
 Let death disarm thy vengeance.  O forbear
 To vex the dead.  What glory wilt thou win
 By slaying twice the slain?  I mean thee well;
 Counsel's most welcome if I promise gain.
 
 CREON
 Old man, ye all let fly at me your shafts
 Like anchors at a target; yea, ye set
 Your soothsayer on me.  Peddlers are ye all
 And I the merchandise ye buy and sell.
 Go to, and make your profit where ye will,
 Silver of Sardis change for gold of Ind;
 Ye will not purchase this man's burial,
 Not though the winged ministers of Zeus
 Should bear him in their talons to his throne;
 Not e'en in awe of prodigy so dire
 Would I permit his burial, for I know
 No human soilure can assail the gods;
 This too I know, Teiresias, dire's the fall
 Of craft and cunning when it tries to gloss
 Foul treachery with fair words for filthy gain.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Alas! doth any know and lay to heart--
 
 CREON
 Is this the prelude to some hackneyed saw?
 
 TEIRESIAS
 How far good counsel is the best of goods?
 
 CREON
 True, as unwisdom is the worst of ills.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Thou art infected with that ill thyself.
 
 CREON
 I will not bandy insults with thee, seer.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 And yet thou say'st my prophesies are frauds.
 
 CREON
 Prophets are all a money-getting tribe.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 And kings are all a lucre-loving race.
 
 CREON
 Dost know at whom thou glancest, me thy lord?
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Lord of the State and savior, thanks to me.
 
 CREON
 Skilled prophet art thou, but to wrong inclined.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Take heed, thou wilt provoke me to reveal
 The mystery deep hidden in my breast.
 
 CREON
 Say on, but see it be not said for gain.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Such thou, methinks, till now hast judged my words.
 
 CREON
 Be sure thou wilt not traffic on my wits.
 
 TEIRESIAS
 Know then for sure, the coursers of the sun
 Not many times shall run their race, before
 Thou shalt have given the fruit of thine own loins
 In quittance of thy murder, life for life;
 For that thou hast entombed a living soul,
 And sent below a denizen of earth,
 And wronged the nether gods by leaving here
 A corpse unlaved, unwept, unsepulchered.
 Herein thou hast no part, nor e'en the gods
 In heaven; and thou usurp'st a power not thine.
 For this the avenging spirits of Heaven and Hell
 Who dog the steps of sin are on thy trail:
 What these have suffered thou shalt suffer too.
 And now, consider whether bought by gold
 I prophesy.  For, yet a little while,
 And sound of lamentation shall be heard,
 Of men and women through thy desolate halls;
 And all thy neighbor States are leagues to avenge
 Their mangled warriors who have found a grave
 I' the maw of wolf or hound, or winged bird
 That flying homewards taints their city's air.
 These are the shafts, that like a bowman I
 Provoked to anger, loosen at thy breast,
 Unerring, and their smart thou shalt not shun.
 Boy, lead me home, that he may vent his spleen
 On younger men, and learn to curb his tongue
 With gentler manners than his present mood.
 [Exit TEIRESIAS]
 
 CHORUS
 My liege, that man hath gone, foretelling woe.
 And, O believe me, since these grizzled locks
 Were like the raven, never have I known
 The prophet's warning to the State to fail.
 
 CREON
 I know it too, and it perplexes me.
 To yield is grievous, but the obstinate soul
 That fights with Fate, is smitten grievously.
 
 CHORUS
 Son of Menoeceus, list to good advice.
 
 CHORUS
 What should I do.  Advise me.  I will heed.
 
 CHORUS
 Go, free the maiden from her rocky cell;
 And for the unburied outlaw build a tomb.
 
 CREON
 Is that your counsel?  You would have me yield?
 
 CHORUS
 Yea, king, this instant.  Vengeance of the gods
 Is swift to overtake the impenitent.
 
 CREON
 Ah! what a wrench it is to sacrifice
 My heart's resolve; but Fate is ill to fight.
 
 CHORUS
 Go, trust not others.  Do it quick thyself.
 
 CREON
 I go hot-foot.  Bestir ye one and all,
 My henchmen!  Get ye axes!  Speed away
 To yonder eminence!  I too will go,
 For all my resolution this way sways.
 'Twas I that bound, I too will set her free.
 Almost I am persuaded it is best
 To keep through life the law ordained of old.
 [Exit CREON]
 
 CHORUS
 (Str. 1)
 Thou by many names adored,
           Child of Zeus the God of thunder,
           Of a Theban bride the wonder,
 Fair Italia's guardian lord;
 
 In the deep-embosomed glades
           Of the Eleusinian Queen
 Haunt of revelers, men and maids,
           Dionysus, thou art seen.
 
 Where Ismenus rolls his waters,
           Where the Dragon's teeth were sown,
 Where the Bacchanals thy daughters
           Round thee roam,
           There thy home;
 Thebes, O Bacchus, is thine own.
 
 (Ant. 1)
 Thee on the two-crested rock
           Lurid-flaming torches see;
 Where Corisian maidens flock,
           Thee the springs of Castaly.
 
 By Nysa's bastion ivy-clad,
 By shores with clustered vineyards glad,
 There to thee the hymn rings out,
 And through our streets we Thebans shout,
           All hall to thee
           Evoe, Evoe!
 
 (Str. 2)
 Oh, as thou lov'st this city best of all,
 To thee, and to thy Mother levin-stricken,
 In our dire need we call;
 Thou see'st with what a plague our townsfolk sicken.
           Thy ready help we crave,
 Whether adown Parnassian heights descending,
 Or o'er the roaring straits thy swift was wending,
           Save us, O save!
 
 (Ant. 2)
 Brightest of all the orbs that breathe forth light,
      Authentic son of Zeus, immortal king,
 Leader of all the voices of the night,
      Come, and thy train of Thyiads with thee bring,
           Thy maddened rout
 Who dance before thee all night long, and shout,
           Thy handmaids we,
           Evoe, Evoe!
 
 [Enter MESSENGER]
 
 MESSENGER
 Attend all ye who dwell beside the halls
 Of Cadmus and Amphion.  No man's life
 As of one tenor would I praise or blame,
 For Fortune with a constant ebb and rise
 Casts down and raises high and low alike,
 And none can read a mortal's horoscope.
 Take Creon; he, methought, if any man,
 Was enviable.  He had saved this land
 Of Cadmus from our enemies and attained
 A monarch's powers and ruled the state supreme,
 While a right noble issue crowned his bliss.
 Now all is gone and wasted, for a life
 Without life's joys I count a living death.
 You'll tell me he has ample store of wealth,
 The pomp and circumstance of kings; but if
 These give no pleasure, all the rest I count
 The shadow of a shade, nor would I weigh
 His wealth and power 'gainst a dram of joy.
 
 CHORUS
 What fresh woes bring'st thou to the royal house?
 
 MESSENGER
 Both dead, and they who live deserve to die.
 
 CHORUS
 Who is the slayer, who the victim? speak.
 
 MESSENGER
 Haemon; his blood shed by no stranger hand.
 
 CHORUS
 What mean ye? by his father's or his own?
 
 MESSENGER
 His own; in anger for his father's crime.
 
 CHORUS
 O prophet, what thou spakest comes to pass.
 
 MESSENGER
 So stands the case; now 'tis for you to act.
 
 CHORUS
 Lo! from the palace gates I see approaching
 Creon's unhappy wife, Eurydice.
 Comes she by chance or learning her son's fate?
 [Enter EURYDICE]
 
 EURYDICE
 Ye men of Thebes, I overheard your talk.
 As I passed out to offer up my prayer
 To Pallas, and was drawing back the bar
 To open wide the door, upon my ears
 There broke a wail that told of household woe
 Stricken with terror in my handmaids' arms
 I fell and fainted.  But repeat your tale
 To one not unacquaint with misery.
 
 MESSENGER
 Dear mistress, I was there and will relate
 The perfect truth, omitting not one word.
 Why should we gloze and flatter, to be proved
 Liars hereafter?  Truth is ever best.
 Well, in attendance on my liege, your lord,
 I crossed the plain to its utmost margin, where
 The corse of Polyneices, gnawn and mauled,
 Was lying yet.  We offered first a prayer
 To Pluto and the goddess of cross-ways,
 With contrite hearts, to deprecate their ire.
 Then laved with lustral waves the mangled corse,
 Laid it on fresh-lopped branches, lit a pyre,
 And to his memory piled a mighty mound
 Of mother earth.  Then to the caverned rock,
 The bridal chamber of the maid and Death,
 We sped, about to enter.  But a guard
 Heard from that godless shrine a far shrill wail,
 And ran back to our lord to tell the news.
 But as he nearer drew a hollow sound
 Of lamentation to the King was borne.
 He groaned and uttered then this bitter plaint:
 "Am I a prophet? miserable me!
 Is this the saddest path I ever trod?
 'Tis my son's voice that calls me.  On press on,
 My henchmen, haste with double speed to the tomb
 Where rocks down-torn have made a gap, look in
 And tell me if in truth I recognize
 The voice of Haemon or am heaven-deceived."
 So at the bidding of our distraught lord
 We looked, and in the craven's vaulted gloom
 I saw the maiden lying strangled there,
 A noose of linen twined about her neck;
 And hard beside her, clasping her cold form,
 Her lover lay bewailing his dead bride
 Death-wedded, and his father's cruelty.
 When the King saw him, with a terrible groan
 He moved towards him, crying, "O my son
 What hast thou done?  What ailed thee?  What mischance
 Has reft thee of thy reason?  O come forth,
 Come forth, my son; thy father supplicates."
 But the son glared at him with tiger eyes,
 Spat in his face, and then, without a word,
 Drew his two-hilted sword and smote, but missed
 His father flying backwards.  Then the boy,
 Wroth with himself, poor wretch, incontinent
 Fell on his sword and drove it through his side
 Home, but yet breathing clasped in his lax arms
 The maid, her pallid cheek incarnadined
 With his expiring gasps.  So there they lay
 Two corpses, one in death.  His marriage rites
 Are consummated in the halls of Death:
 A witness that of ills whate'er befall
 Mortals' unwisdom is the worst of all.
 [Exit EURYDICE]
 
 CHORUS
 What makest thou of this?  The Queen has gone
 Without a word importing good or ill.
 
 MESSENGER
 I marvel too, but entertain good hope.
 'Tis that she shrinks in public to lament
 Her son's sad ending, and in privacy
 Would with her maidens mourn a private loss.
 Trust me, she is discreet and will not err.
 
 CHORUS
 I know not, but strained silence, so I deem,
 Is no less ominous than excessive grief.
 
 MESSENGER
 Well, let us to the house and solve our doubts,
 Whether the tumult of her heart conceals
 Some fell design.  It may be thou art right:
 Unnatural silence signifies no good.
 
 CHORUS
           Lo! the King himself appears.
           Evidence he with him bears
           'Gainst himself (ah me! I quake
           'Gainst a king such charge to make)
           But all must own,
           The guilt is his and his alone.
 
 CREON
 (Str. 1)
           Woe for sin of minds perverse,
           Deadly fraught with mortal curse.
           Behold us slain and slayers, all akin.
           Woe for my counsel dire, conceived in sin.
                Alas, my son,
                Life scarce begun,
                Thou wast undone.
           The fault was mine, mine only, O my son!
 
 CHORUS
 Too late thou seemest to perceive the truth.
 
 CREON
 (Str. 2)
 By sorrow schooled.  Heavy the hand of God,
 Thorny and rough the paths my feet have trod,
 Humbled my pride, my pleasure turned to pain;
 Poor mortals, how we labor all in vain!
 [Enter SECOND MESSENGER]
 
 SECOND MESSENGER
 Sorrows are thine, my lord, and more to come,
 One lying at thy feet, another yet
 More grievous waits thee, when thou comest home.
 
 CREON
 What woe is lacking to my tale of woes?
 
 SECOND MESSENGER
 Thy wife, the mother of thy dead son here,
 Lies stricken by a fresh inflicted blow.
 
 CREON
 (Ant. 1)
      How bottomless the pit!
           Does claim me too, O Death?
           What is this word he saith,
      This woeful messenger?  Say, is it fit
      To slay anew a man already slain?
           Is Death at work again,
      Stroke upon stroke, first son, then mother slain?
 
 CHORUS
 Look for thyself.  She lies for all to view.
 
 CREON
 (Ant. 2)
 Alas! another added woe I see.
 What more remains to crown my agony?
 A minute past I clasped a lifeless son,
 And now another victim Death hath won.
 Unhappy mother, most unhappy son!
 
 SECOND MESSENGER
 Beside the altar on a keen-edged sword
 She fell and closed her eyes in night, but erst
 She mourned for Megareus who nobly died
 Long since, then for her son; with her last breath
 She cursed thee, the slayer of her child.
 
 CREON
 (Str. 3)
           I shudder with affright
 O for a two-edged sword to slay outright
           A wretch like me,
           Made one with misery.
 
 SECOND MESSENGER
 'Tis true that thou wert charged by the dead Queen
 As author of both deaths, hers and her son's.
 
 CREON
 In what wise was her self-destruction wrought?
 
 SECOND MESSENGER
 Hearing the loud lament above her son
 With her own hand she stabbed herself to the heart.
 
 CREON
 (Str. 4)
 I am the guilty cause.  I did the deed,
 Thy murderer.  Yea, I guilty plead.
 My henchmen, lead me hence, away, away,
 A cipher, less than nothing; no delay!
 
 CHORUS
 Well said, if in disaster aught is well
 His past endure demand the speediest cure.
 
 CREON
 (Ant. 3)
           Come, Fate, a friend at need,
           Come with all speed!
           Come, my best friend,
           And speed my end!
           Away, away!
 Let me not look upon another day!
 
 CHORUS
 This for the morrow; to us are present needs
 That they whom it concerns must take in hand.
 
 CREON
 I join your prayer that echoes my desire.
 
 CHORUS
 O pray not, prayers are idle; from the doom
 Of fate for mortals refuge is there none.
 
 CREON
 (Ant. 4)
 Away with me, a worthless wretch who slew
 Unwitting thee, my son, thy mother too.
 Whither to turn I know now; every way
           Leads but astray,
 And on my head I feel the heavy weight
           Of crushing Fate.
 
 CHORUS
      Of happiness the chiefest part
           Is a wise heart:
      And to defraud the gods in aught
           With peril's fraught.
      Swelling words of high-flown might
      Mightily the gods do smite.
      Chastisement for errors past
      Wisdom brings to age at last.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SOPHOKLES
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Translated by Gregory McNamee
 
 
 
 
 Originally published by Copper Canyon Press (Port Townsend,
 Washington) in 1986.
 
 Copyright (c) 1986, 1997 by Gregory McNamee
 All Rights Reserved
 
 
 
 This translation is made in loving memory of Scott Douglas
 Padraic McNamee (1963-1984)
 
 
 
 Todavia
 Estoy vivo
 En el centro
 de una herida todavia fresca.
 
 ---Octavio Paz
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 When Sophokles produced the Philoktetes in 408 B.C., three years before his death at the age of ninety, the ancient story of the tragic archer, abundantly represented in Greek literature, achieved a dramatic and psychological sophistication of a kind never before seen on the classical stage: the theater of violent action and suddenly reversed fortunes (the Oresteia, Ajax, Hippolytos) gave way, for a brilliant moment, to a strangely quiet, contemplative drama that centered not on deeds but ideas, not on actions but words.
 	Foremost among Sophokles's concerns in the play, one that demanded such thoughtful consideration, is the question of human character and its origins. Indeed, the Philoktetes might well be regarded as the first literary expression of what has been termed the "nature-nurture controversy," a debate that continues to rage in the closing days of the twentieth century. In his drama, Sophokles places himself squarely among those who hold that one's character is determined not by environment or custom but by inborn nature (physis), and that one's greatest dishonor is to act, for whatever end, in ways not consonant with that essence.
 	The tale itself, reached in medias res, is uncomplicated: Philoktetes, to whom the demigod Herakles bequeathed his magical bow, is recruited by the Achaean generals to serve in the war against Troy. On the way to the battle, Philoktetes, in the company of Odysseus and his crew, puts in at a tiny island to pray at a local temple to Apollo, the god of war. Wandering from the narrow path to the temple, Philoktetes is bitten by a sacred serpent, the warden of the holy precinct. The wound, divinely inflicted as it is and not admitting of mortal healing techniques, festers; and Philoktetes fills his companions' days with an unbearably evil stench and awful cries. His screams of agony prevent the Greeks from offering proper sacrifices to the gods (the ritual utterance eu phemeton, from which our word "euphemism" derives, means not "speak well," as it is sometimes translated, but "keep silent," in fitting attitude of respect). Finally, in desperation, Odysseus--never known as a patient man--puts in at the desert island of Lemnos and there casts Philoktetes away.
 	Ten years of savage warfare pass, whereupon a captured Trojan oracle, Helenos, reveals to the Greeks that they will not be able to overcome Troy without Philoktetes (his name means "lover of possessions") and his magical bow. Ordered to fetch the castaway and escort him to the Greek battlefield, Odysseus, in keeping with his trickster nature, commands his lieutenant, Neoptolemos, the teenaged son of the newly slain Achilles, to win Philoktetes over to the Greek cause by treachery, promising the bowman a homeward voyage, when in truth he is to be bound once again into the service of those who marooned him. Neoptolemos is surprised at this turn of events, for until then he had been promised that he alone could finish his father's work and conquer Troy. Nonetheless, he accepts the orders of Odysseus and the Atreids, Agamemnon and Menelaos.
 	Here lies the crux of the tale, for Neoptolemos learns through the course of the Philoktetes that he is simply unable, by virtue of his noble birth, to obey the roguish Odysseus's commands: his ancestry and the nature it has given him do not permit him to act deceitfully, no matter what profit might tempt him. Odysseus, on the other hand, cannot help but behave treacherously, for in Sophokles's account it is in his base, "slavelike" nature to do so. The resolution of Neoptolemos's conflict--and for all his ambivalence, the young man is the real hero of the story--forms the dramatic heart of the play.
 	Edmund Wilson, in his famous essay "The Wound and the Bow," sought to read the Philoktetes as Sophokles's universal statement on the role of the artist in society: wounded, outcast, lacking some inner quality that might permit him or her to engage in the mundane events of life. Whatever the considerable merits of Wilson's analysis, argued with great sophistication and learning, in the end to read the bowman as a suffering artist seems more an act of anachronistic self-projection than the drama will admit. Instead, it is more likely that a brace of contemporary events propelled Sophokles to create the Philoktetes. The first involves a curious lawsuit that, as some ancient accounts have it, one of Sophokles's sons filed against him, charging that the old man was incapable of managing his affairs and that his estate, therefore, should be ceded to his heir. Sophokles's defense consisted entirely of a recitation from Oedipos at Kolonos, the masterpiece he was then composing. The Athenian jury instantly dismissed the son's suit, holding that no artist of such readily apparent gifts could be judged senile. Although modern scholars doubt the authenticity of this tale, it surely helps explain the tragedian's preoccupation in his final years with the origins of character, and whether a noble parent could in fact produce ignoble offspring.
 	The second motivation may have been Sophokles's scorn for the rising generation of Athenian aristocrats, trained by a herd of eager, expensive philosophers--those whom Sokrates reviled in his Apology--in the arts of sophistry and corruption. These young men, the scions of reputedly noble families, quickly proved themselves to be willing to bring their city to ruin rather than surrender any of the privileges of their class; they argued that greatness of character was the exclusive province of the aristocracy to which they belonged, and that no common-born man (women did not enter into the question) could ever hope to be more than a vassal, brutish by nature and situation; and they governed Athens accordingly, destroying the constitutional foundations of the city and inaugurating the reign of terror of the Thirty Tyrants, under whose year-long rule some 1500 Athenian democrats, the noblest minds of a generation, were executed. For Sophokles, these actions, from which Athens was never able to recover, made it abundantly clear that one's social class had nothing whatever to do with greatness of character--quite the reverse, it must have seemed; but by the time he had crafted the Philoktetes, the humane, mature culture that Sophokles represented so well had been condemned to death by its own children.
 	Kenneth Rexroth has written that in Sophokles's work "men suffer unjustly and learn little from suffering except to answer unanswerable questions with a kind of ultimate courtesy, an Occidental Confucianism that never pretends to solution. The
 ages following Sophokles have learned from him the definition of nobility as an essential aristocratic irony which forms the intellect and sensibility." The Philoktetes stands as a splendid application of that ultimate courtesy, addressing timeless problems with a depth of emotion and tragic beauty that is unrivalled in the literature of the stage. (In particular, Sophokles's use of the chorus as the tormented inner voice of conscience is without peer.) It stands as one of the great accomplishments of the Greek mind, a striking depiction of the human soul's rising above seemingly insurmountable hardships to manifest its nobility. One of the fundamental documents in the history of the imagination, Philoktetes is alive, and it speaks to all of us.
 
 GREGORY McNAMEE
 Tucson, Arizona
 October 1986
 
 
 ACKNOWLEDGMENTS
 
 This translation is based principally upon the Greek text and notes established by T.B.L. Webster in his edition of the Philoktetes (Cambridge University Press, 1970), a model of classical scholarship in every detail.
 	I am indebted to many friends for their help in the course of preparing this version. Jean Stallings first introduced me to the play in the original Greek; with her, Timothy Winters and Richard Jensen helped guide me through the intricacies of the text. Melissa McCormick and my family, as always, offered indispensable encouragement. I am especially grateful to Scott Mahler, Stephen Cox, and above all Thomas D. Worthen for their critical readings of the manuscript in various drafts. Last, I am grateful to Sam Hamill and Tree Swenson, vortices of imagination, without whose efforts this book would not be.
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
 Odysseus
 Chorus
 Trader (Spy)
 Neoptolemos
 Philoktetes
 Herakles
 
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 This is the shore of jagged Lemnos,
 a land bound by waves, untrodden, lonely.
 Here I abandoned Poias's son,
 Philoktetes of Melos, years ago.
 Neoptolemos, child of Lord Achilles,
 the greatest by far of our Greek fighters,
 I had to cast him away here:
 our masters, the princes, commanded me to,
 for disease had conquered him, and his foot
 was eaten away by festering sores.
 We had no recourse. At our holy feasts,
 we could not reach for meat and wine.
 He would not let us sleep;
 he howled all night, wilder than a wolf.
 He blanketed our camp with evil cries,
 moaning, screaming.
 
 But there is no time to talk of such things:
 no time for long speeches and explanations.
 He might hear us coming
 and foil my scheme to take him back.
 
 Your orders are to serve me,
 to spy out the cave I found for him here---
 a two-mouthed cave, exposed to the sun
 for warmth in the cold months,
 admitting cool breezes in summer's heat;
 to the left, nearby it, a sweet-running spring,
 if it is still sweet.
 If he still lives in this cave or another place,
 then I'll reveal more of my plan.
 Listen: both of us have been charged with this.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Lord Odysseus, what you speak of is indeed nearby.
 This is his place.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Where? Above or below us? I cannot tell.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Above, and with no sound of footsteps or talking.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Go and see if he's sleeping inside.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I see an empty dwelling. There is no one within.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 And none of the things that distinguish a house?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 A pallet of trampled leaves, as if for a bed.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 And what else? Is there nothing more inside the cave?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 A wooden mug, carelessly made,
 and a few sticks of kindling.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 So this is the man's empty treasure-vault.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Look here. Rags lie drying in the sun,
 full of pieces of skin and pus from his sores.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Then clearly he still lives here.
 He can't be far off.
 Weakened as he is by long years of disease,
 he can't stray far from home.
 He is probably out scratching up a meal
 or an herb he knows will relieve his pain.
 Send a guard to keep close watch on this place
 so he doesn't take me by surprise--
 for he'd rather have me than any other Greek.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 The path will be guarded.
 Now tell me the rest.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Son of Achilles, we are here for a reason.
 You must be like your father, and not in strength alone.
 If any of this sounds strange to you,
 no matter. You must still serve those who are over you.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What must I do?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Entangle Philoktetes with clever words.
 In order to trick him, say, when he asks you,
 "I am Achilles's son"--there's no lie in that--
 say you're on your way back home,
 that you have abandoned the Greeks and all their ships,
 you hate them so.
 Speaking to him piously, as though to the gods of Olympos,
 tell him they convinced you to leave your home,
 by swearing that you alone could storm Troy.
 And when you claimed your dead father's weapons,
 as is your birthright, say they scorned you,
 called you unworthy of them, and gave them to me,
 although you had been demanding them. Say whatever you want to
 against me. Say the worst that comes to mind.
 None of it will insult me. If you do not match this task,
 you will cast endless sorrow and suffering on the Greeks.
 If we do not return with this poor man's bow,
 you will not take the holy city of Troy.
 You may wonder whether you can do this safely,
 and why he would trust you. I'll tell you why:
 you have come here willingly, without having been forced,
 and you had nothing to do with what happened before.
 I cannot say the same.
 If Philoktetes, bow in hand, should see me,
 I would be dead in an instant.
 So would you, being in my company.
 We must come up with a scheme.
 You must learn to be cunning,
 and steal away his invincible bow.
 
 I know, son, that by nature you are unsuited
 to tell such lies and work such evil.
 But the prize of victory is a sweet thing to have.
 Go through with it. The end justifies the means, they'll say.
 For a few short, shameless hours, yield to me.
 From then on you'll be hailed as the most virtuous of men.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Son of Laertes, what pains me to hear
 pains me more to do. It is not my nature, as you say,
 to take what I want by tricks and schemes.
 My father, as I hear it, was of the same mind.
 I will gladly fight Philoktetes, capture him,
 and make him our hostage, but not like this.
 How can a one-legged man, alone, win against us?
 I know I was sent to carry out these orders.
 I do not want to make things hard for you.
 But I far prefer failure, if it is honest,
 to victory earned by treachery.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 You are the son of a great and noble man.
 When I was young, I held my tongue back
 and let my hand do my work.
 Now, as you're tested by life--as men live it--
 you will see as I have that everywhere
 it is our words that win, and not our deeds.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What are your orders, apart from telling lies?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 I order you to capture him,
 to take him with trickery, however deceitful.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 And why not by persuasion
 after telling him the truth?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Persuasion is impossible. So is force.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Is he so sure of his strength?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Yes, if he carries his unswerving arrows,
 black death's escorts.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Even to meet him, then, is unsafe.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Not if you win him over by guile,
 as I have said.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 And you do not find such lying disgusting?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Not if a lie ends with our salvation.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 How could one say such things
 and keep a straight face?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 What you do is for our gain.
 He who hesitates is lost.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What good would it do me for him to come to Troy?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Only Philoktetes can conquer the city.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Then I will not take it after all,
 as I have been promised.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Not without his arrows, nor they without you.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Then I must have them, if what you say is true.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 You will bring back two prizes, if only you'll act.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What are they? If I know,
 I will not refuse the deed.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 You will be called  wise because of your trick,
 and brave for the sack of Troy.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Then let it be so. I will do what you order,
 putting aside my sense of shame.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Do you remember all the counsel I have given?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Every word of it. I will follow it all.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Stay here at the cave and wait for him.
 I will leave so he doesn't know I have been here.
 I will take the guard and go back to the ship;
 if I think you're in trouble I will send him back,
 disguised as a merchant sailor, a captain.
 Whatever story he tells you, use it to advantage.
 I am going now. The rest is up to you.
 May our guides be Hermes, who instructs us in guile,
 and Athena, goddess of victory, goddess of our cities,
 who aids me at all times.
 
 
 CHORUS
 
 I am a stranger in a foreign land.
 What shall I say to Philoktetes? What shall I hide?
 Tell me. Knowledge that surpasses all others' knowledge
 and greatest wisdom falls to him who rules
 with Zeus's divine scepter.
 To you, child, this ancient strength has come,
 all the power of your ancestors. Tell me
 what must be done to serve you well.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Look now, without any fear:
 he sleeps on the seacliff,
 so take courage.
 When he awakes it will be terrible.
 Muster up your courage, and aid me then.
 Follow my lead. Help as you can.
 
 CHORUS
 
 As you command, my lord Neoptolemos.
 My duty to you is always first in my thoughts.
 My eye is fixed on your best interests.
 Now show me the place that he inhabits,
 and where he sleeps.
 I should know this lest he take me in ambush.
 I am frightened and yet fascinated,
 as though by a snake or a scorpion's lair.
 Where does he live? Where does he sleep?
 Where does he walk?
 Is he inside or outside?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Look. You will see a cave with two mouths.
 That is his house.
 That is his rocky sleeping-place.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Where is he now, the unlucky man?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 It is clear to me that he claws his way
 to find food nearby.
 He struggles now to bring down birds with his arrows,
 to fuel this wretched way of life.
 He knows no balm to heal his wounds.
 
 CHORUS
 
 I pity him for all his woes,
 for his distress, for his loneliness,
 with no countryman at his side;
 he is accursed, always alone,
 brought down by bitter illness;
 he wanders, distraught,
 thrown off balance by simple needs.
 How can he withstand such ceaseless misfortune?
 
 O, the violent snares laid out by the gods!
 O, the unhappy human race,
 living always on the edge,
 always in excess.
 He might have been a well-born man,
 second to none of the noble Greek houses.
 Now he has no part of the good life,
 and he lies alone, apart from others,
 among spotted deer and shaggy, wild goats.
 His mind is fixed on pain and hunger.
 He groans in anguish,
 and only a babbling echo answers,
 poured out from afar,
 in answer to his lamentations.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 None of this amazes me.
 It is the work of divine Fate,
 if I understand rightly.
 Savage Chryse set these sufferings on him,
 the share of sufferings he must now endure.
 His torments are not random.
 The gods, surely, must heap them on him,
 so that he cannot bend the invincible bow
 until the right time comes, decreed by Zeus,
 and as it is promised, Troy is made to fall.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Be quiet, boy.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What is it?
 
 CHORUS
 
 A clear groan---
 the steadfast companion of one walking in pain.
 Where is it?
 Now comes a noise:
 a man writhes along his path,
 from afar comes the sigh of a burdened man---
 the cry has carried.
 
 Pay attention, boy.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 To what?
 
 CHORUS
 
 To my second explanation. He is not so far away.
 He is inside his cave. He is not walking abroad
 to his panpipe's doleful song,
 like a shepherd wandering with his flocks.
 Rather he has bumped his wounded leg and shouts
 as if to someone far away,
 as if to someone he has seen at the harbor.
 The cry he makes is terrible.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You there, you strangers:
 who are you who have landed from the sea
 on an island without houses or fair harbor?
 From what country should I think you,
 and guess it correctly? You look Greek to me.
 You wear Greek clothes, and I love to see them.
 I want to hear you speak my tongue.
 Do not shun me, amazed
 to face a man who has become so wild.
 Pity one who is damned and alone,
 wasted away by his sufferings.
 Speak. Speak, if you come as friends.
 Answer me. It is unreasonable
 not to answer each other's questions.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 We are Greeks. You wanted to know.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 O, beloved tongue! I understand you!
 That I should hear Greek words after so many years!
 Who are you, boy? Who sent you? What brought you?
 What urged you here? What lucky wind?
 Answer. Let me know who you are.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 My people are from wavebound Skyros, an island.
 I am sailing homeward.
 I am called Neoptolemos, Achilles's son.
 Now you know everything.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Son of a man whom I once loved,
 son of my beloved country,
 nursed by ancient Lykomedes---
 what business brought you here?
 Where is it that you sail from?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I sail from Troy.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 What? You sail away from Troy?
 You were not there with us at the start.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Did you take part in that misery?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Then you do not know who stands before you?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I have never seen you before. How could I know you?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You do not know my name?
 The fame my woes have given me?
 The men who brought me to my ruin?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 You see one who knows nothing of your story.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Then I am truly damned. The gods must surely hate me
 for not even a rumor to have come to Greece
 of how I live here.
 The wicked men who abandoned me
 keep their secret, then, and laugh,
 while the disease that dwells within me grows,
 and grows stronger.
 My son, child of great Achilles,
 you may yet have heard of me somehow:
 I am Philoktetes, Poias's son,
 the master of Herakles's weapons.
 Agamemnon, Menelaos, and Odysseus
 marooned me here, with no one to help me,
 as I wasted away with a savage disease,
 struck down by a viper's hideous bite.
 
 After I was bitten, we put in here
 on the way from Chryse to rejoin the fleet
 and they cast me ashore.
 After our rough passage, they were glad to see me
 fall asleep on the seacliffs, inside this cave.
 Then they went off, leaving with me
 rags and breadcrumbs, and few of each.
 May the same soon befall them.
 
 Think of it, child: how I awoke
 to find them gone and myself left alone.
 Think of how I cried, how I cursed myself,
 when I knew my ship had gone off with them,
 and not a man was left to help me
 overcome this illness.
 I could see nothing before me but grief and pain,
 and those in abundance.
 
 Time ran its course.
 I have had to make my own life,
 to be my own servant in this tiny cave.
 I seek out birds to fill my stomach,
 and shoot them down.
 After I let loose a tautly drawn bolt,
 I drag myself along on this stinking foot.
 When I had to drink the water that pours from this spring,
 in icy winter, I had to break up wood,
 crippled as I am,
 and melt the ice alone.
 I dragged myself around and did it.
 And if the fire went out, I had to sit,
 and grind stone against stone
 until a spark sprang up to save my life.
 This roof, if I have fire, at least gives me a home,
 gives me all that I need to stay alive
 except release from my anguish.
 
 Come, child, let me tell you of this island.
 No one comes here willingly.
 There is no anchorage here, nor any place
 to land, profit in trade, and be received.
 Intelligent people know not to come here,
 but sometimes they do, against their will.
 In the long time I have been here, it was bound to happen.
 When those people put in, they pitied me---
 or pretended to, at least---and gave me new clothes
 and a bit of food. But when I asked for a homeward passage,
 they would never take me with them.
 
 It is my tenth year of hunger and the ravaging illness
 that I feed with my flesh.
 The Atreids and Odysseus did this to me.
 May the Olympian gods give them pain in return.
 
 CHORUS
 
 I am like those who came here before.
 I pity you, unlucky Philoktetes.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 And I am a witness to your words.
 I know you speak truly, for I have known them,
 the evil Atreids and violent Odysseus.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Do you too have a claim
 against the all-destroying house of Atreus?
 Have they made you suffer? Is that why you are angry?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 May the anger I carry be avenged by this hand,
 so that Mycenae and Sparta, too, may know
 that mother Skyros bears brave men.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Well spoken, boy.
 What wrath have they incited in you?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Philoketetes, I will tell you everything,
 although it pains me to remember.
 When I came to Troy, they heaped dishonor on me,
 after Achilles had met his death in battle....
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Tell me no more until I am sure I've heard rightly:
 is Achilles, son of Peleus, dead?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Yes, dead, shot down by no living man,
 but by a god, so I've been told.
 He was laid low by Lord Apollo's arrows.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 The two were noble, the killer and the killed.
 I am not sure what to do now---
 to hear out your story or mourn your father.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 It seems to me that your woes are enough
 without taking on the woes of others.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You speak rightly. Now tell me more,
 what they did---that is, how they insulted you.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 They came for me in their mighty warships
 with painted prows and streaming battle flags.
 Odysseus and my father's tutor were the ones.
 They came with a story, true or a lie,
 that the gods had decreed, since my father had died,
 that I alone could storm Troy's walls.
 So they said.
 You can be sure that I lost no time
 in gathering my things and sailing with them,
 out of love for my father, whom I wanted to see
 before the earth swallowed him.
 I had never seen him alive.
 And I would be proved brave if I captured Troy.
 
 We had a good wind. In two days we made bitter Sigeion.
 A mass of soldiers raised a cheer,
 saying dead Achilles still walked among them.
 They had not yet buried him.
 I wept for my father. And then I went
 to the Atreids, my father's supposed friends,
 as was fitting, and I asked for my father's weapons
 and his other things.
 They said with feigned sorrow, "Son of Achilles,
 you may have the other things,
 but not Achilles's weapons.
 Those now belong to Laertes's son."
 I leapt up then, crying in grief and anger,
 and said, "You bastards, how dare you
 give the things that are mine to other men
 without asking me first?"
 
 Then Odysseus, who happened to be there, said, "Listen, boy.
 What they did was right. After all, I was the one
 who rescued them and your father's body."
 Enraged, I cursed him with all the curses I could think of,
 leaving nothing out, curses that would be set in motion
 if he were truly to rob me.
 Odysseus is not a quarrelsome man,
 but what I said stung him. He replied,
 "Boy, you're a newcomer. You have been at home,
 out of harm's way. You judge me too harshly.
 You cannot keep a civil tongue.
 For all that, you will not take his weapons home."
 You see, I took abuse from both sides. I lost
 the things that were mine, and I sailed home.
 Odysseus, the bastard son of bastards,
 robbed me. But I blame him less than the generals.
 They rule whole cities and a mighty army.
 Bad men become so by watching bad teachers.
 I have told you all. May he who hates the Atreids
 be as dear to the gods as he is to me.
 
 CHORUS
 
 O mountainous, all-nourishing Mother Earth,
 Mother of Zeus, our lord, himself,
 you who range the golden Paktolos,
 Mother of pain and sorrow, I begged you,
 Blessed Mother, borne by bull-slaying lions,
 on that day when the arrogant Atreids
 insulted him, when they gave away his weapons
 to the son of Laertes.
 Hail, goddess, the highest object of our awe.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You have sailed here, clearly, with a just cause of pain.
 Your share of grief almost matches mine. What you say
 harmonizes with what I know of them---
 the evil doings of the Atreids and Odysseus.
 I know that Odysseus spins out lies
 with his evil tongue, which he uses
 to create all manner of injustice;
 he brings no good to pass, I know.
 Still, it amazes me to learn
 that Ajax, seeing these things, should permit them.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 He is dead now, friend. If he lived,
 they would never have stolen the weapons from me.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 So Ajax, too, is dead.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Dead. Think of it.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 It saddens me. But the son of Tydeus, and Odysseus,
 whom Sisyphos, I have heard, sold to Laertes,
 they who merited death are still alive.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 You are right, of course. They are flourishing.
 They live in high glory among the Greeks.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 And my old friend, that honest man, Nestor of Pylos?
 Does he still live?
 He used to contain their evil with his wise counsel.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Nestor has fallen on evil times.
 His son, Antilochos, who was with him, is dead.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 O!
 You have told me of two deaths that hurt me most.
 What can I hope for, now that Ajax and Antilochos
 are dead and in the ground, while Odysseus walks,
 while he should be the one who is dead?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 That one is a clever wrestler. Still,
 even the clever stumble.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Tell me, by the gods, how was it with Patroklos,
 your father's most beloved friend?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 He was dead, too. I will tell you in a word what happened:
 War never takes a bad man on purpose,
 but good men always.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You are right. Let me ask you, then, of one who is worthless,
 but cunning and clever with the words he uses.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 You can mean only Odysseus.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 No, not him. I mean Thersites,
 who was never content to speak just once,
 although no one allowed him to speak at all.
 Is he alive?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I do not know him, but I have heard that he lives.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 He would be. No evil man has died.
 The gods, it seems, must care for them well.
 It pleases them to keep villains and traitors
 out of death's hands; but they always send
 good men out of the living world.
 How can I make sense of what goes on,
 when, praising the gods, I discover that they're evil?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 For my part, Philoktetes, I will be more cautious.
 I'll keep watch on the Atreids
 and on Troy from afar.
 I will have no part of their company,
 where the worse is stronger than the better,
 where noble men die while cowards rule.
 I shall not acquiesce to the will of such men.
 Rocky Skyros will do very well
 for the future. I'll be content to stay at home.
 
 Now I'll go to my ship. Philoktetes,
 may the gods keep you. Farewell, then,
 and may the gods lift this illness from you
 as you have long wished. Let us be off, men,
 to make ready for sailing
 when the gods permit it.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Are you leaving already?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 The weather is clearing.
 Opportunity knocks but once, you know.
 We must be provisioned and ready when it does.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I beg you by your father, by your dear mother,
 by all you have ever loved at home:
 do not leave me here
 to live on in suffering, now that you have seen me,
 and heard what others have said about me.
 I am not important to you.
 Think of me anyway.
 I know that I will be a troublesome cargo for you,
 but accept that.
 To you and your noble kind, to be cruel
 is shameful; to be decent, honorable.
 If you leave me, it will make for an awful story.
 But if you take me, you'll have the best of men's praise,
 that is, if I live to see Oeta's fields.
 Come. Your trouble will last scarcely a day.
 You can manage that.
 Take me and stow me where you want,
 in the hold, on the prow, on the stern, anywhere
 that I will least offend you.
 Swear by Zeus, lord of suppliants,
 boy, that you will take me.
 I am trying to kneel before you, a cripple,
 lame. Do not leave me in this lonely place,
 where no one passes by.
 Take me to your home,
 or to the harbor of Euboean Chalkis.
 It is a short journey from there to Oeta,
 to the ridges of Trachis and smooth-flowing Spercheios.
 Show me there to my beloved father.
 I have long feared that he is dead,
 or else he would have come for me:
 I sent prayerful messages to him through travelers
 who happened along here, begging him
 to come himself and take me home.
 He is dead, then, or more likely
 the messengers held me in little regard,
 as messengers do, and hurried along to their homes.
 In you I have a guard and a herald.
 Save me. Have pity.
 Look how dangerously we mortals live,
 experiencing good, experiencing evil.
 If you are out of harm's way, expect horrible things,
 and when you live well, take extra care
 lest you be caught napping and be destroyed.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Take pity on him, lord.
 He has told us of many horrible torments.
 May such troubles fall on none of my friends.
 If, lord, you hate the terrible Atreids,
 put their treatment of him to your advantage.
 I would carry him, as he has asked,
 away with you on your swift-running ship,
 fleeing the gods' cruel punishment.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Be sure you are not too quick to plead,
 that when you have had your fill of the company
 that his illness will provide you,
 you do not stand by your words.
 
 CHORUS
 
 No. You will not be able to reproach me with that
 and still speak truly.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Then I would be ashamed
 to be less willing than you to serve this man.
 If you are sure, let us sail quickly.
 Make the man hurry. I won't refuse him my ship.
 May the gods keep us safe in leaving this land
 and give us safe passage where we wish to sail.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 O blessed day and dearest of men,
 and you, friend sailors, how can I make it clear to you,
 how closely you have bound me in your friendship.
 Let us go, my son. But first let us bow down
 and kiss the earth in gratitude,
 the earth of my home that is no home.
 Look inside and you will see
 how brave I must be by my very nature.
 To endure even the sight of such a place
 would have been too much for most men.
 But I have had to learn to withstand its evils.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Wait, and watch!  Two men approach,
 one of our crew and a stranger to me---
 let us hear from them. Then you may go inside.
 
 TRADER
 
 Son of Achilles, I ordered this sailor,
 who was guarding your ship with two other men,
 to tell me where you were.
 I came to this island not meaning to.
 Accident drove me to this place.
 I sail as captain of a cargo vessel
 from Ilium, to a place not far away---
 Peparethos, rich in grapes and wine.
 I learned that these men are your companions
 and decided to stay until I'd spoken with you
 and received my reward.
 Perhaps you do not know your own concerns,
 the new things the Greeks have in store for you,
 no longer mere plans, but onrushing actions.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 A blessing on you for thinking of me.
 If I do not grow evil, your concern will keep you my friend.
 Tell me more of what you said:
 I want to know more of these new Greek tricks.
 
 TRADER
 
 Phoenix and Theseus's sons have sailed from Troy
 and are following you with an armed flotilla.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Do they plan to take me with violence
 or persuade me to return with them?
 
 TRADER
 
 I do not know. I tell you only what I have heard.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Are Phoenix and his friends so eager
 to jump when the Atreids tell them to?
 
 TRADER
 
 They have already jumped.
 They're not wasting a second.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 And Odysseus would not bring the message himself?
 Does some fear now act upon his spirit?
 
 TRADER
 
 When I left, he and Tydeus's son
 were off chasing down another man.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Who is the man they now pursue?
 
 TRADER
 
 He is---wait. First tell me
 who that man is, and tell me quietly.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 The man is great Philoktetes, friend.
 
 TRADER
 
 Then ask no more questions. Get out of here,
 and quickly. Run away from this place.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 What is he saying to you, boy?
 Why does he bargain in the shadows,
 hiding his words from me?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I'm not sure what he means by all this.
 But he'll have to speak openly to all of us.
 
 TRADER
 
 Son of Achilles, do not upbraid me
 before your men. I do much for them
 and get much in return,
 as a poor man must.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I am the Atreids' enemy.
 He also hates them and so is my greatest friend.
 You have come in friendship,
 and you must speak openly.
 Do not hide what you have heard.
 
 TRADER
 
 Think of what you're doing, boy.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I have been thinking.
 
 TRADER
 
 Then I will make this your responsibility.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Very well. Now speak.
 
 TRADER
 
 The two men you have heard of,
 Tydeus's son and Odysseus,
 hunt for Philoktetes.
 They are bound by oath to bring him back
 by persuasion or naked violence.
 And all the Greeks heard Odysseus swear to this,
 since he loudly boasted of sure success.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What can they hope to win, those men,
 to turn their thoughts after so many years
 to Philoktetes, whom they made an outcast?
 Do they miss him now? Or have the gods
 brought vengeance upon them, since they punish crime?
 
 TRADER
 
 I will tell you. You may not know this story.
 There was a seer from a noble family,
 one of Priam's sons, in fact, called Helenos.
 He was captured one night on a reconnaissance
 by Odysseus himself, who bears all our curses
 as a badge of dishonor.
 Odysseus tricked him, and paraded him
 before the whole Greek army.
 Helenos then poured out a flood of prophesy,
 especially about Troy, and how the Greeks
 would never take it until they were able
 to persuade Philoktetes to come to their aid,
 after he had been rescued from this place.
 The minute Odysseus heard him say this,
 he promised to fetch this man,
 either by persuasion or by force.
 If he failed, he said, they could punish him.
 Boy, now you know
 why I've urged you and those whom you care for to leave.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Ah! He swore he would persuade me
 to sail off with him, the bastard?
 He'd sooner persuade me to come back from the grave,
 when I am dead, to rise up,
 as his father did.
 
 TRADER
 
 I don't know that story. I must leave you now.
 May the gods help you all.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Isn't it shameful, boy, that Odysseus
 thinks his words are wondrous enough to persuade me
 to let him cart me back to Troy, and parade me too
 before the whole Greek army?
 I would sooner trust my enemy, the viper that bit me
 and crippled me at Chryse.
 Let him try what he will, now that I know he's coming.
 Let us go now, boy, and hope
 that a great seaswell will rise and crest
 and keep our ship from Odysseus's.
 To be quick at the right occasion, you know,
 makes for untroubled sleep when work is done.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 When the headwind dies down, we will sail.
 The powers of the air work against us now.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Whenever you flee evil men, that is good sailing.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 True, but the wind is against them as well.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 In the minds of pirates, no wind is against them
 so long as they can steal and pillage.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Let us go away, then. Fetch from your cave
 the few things you most need or want.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I do need a few things. I don't have many to choose from.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Things that we do not have on board?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I have an herb to ease my pain,
 to put it to sleep.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Get it, then. What else do you want?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Any arrows I may have left lying around.
 I cannot leave any for another man to find.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Is that your famous bow?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Yes. I have never set it aside.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 May I hold it? May I cradle it in my hands?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Only you. Hold it,
 and take whatever is useful to you.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I would love to hold it, if that is no violation,
 if it is lawful. If not, let it be.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You speak piously, child. It is lawful,
 for you alone have granted me
 the light of the sun that shines above us
 and the sight of Oeta, my beloved land,
 the sight of my father, and of my dear friends.
 You have taken me away from my enemies,
 who stood above me. Courage, boy.
 Hold this bow, then give it back to me,
 and proclaim to everyone that you alone could hold it,
 a merit won by strength of character.
 That is how I won it myself:
 for an act of kindness long ago.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I am glad I found you and became your friend.
 One who knows how to give and receive kindness
 is a friend worth more than any possession.
 Go inside.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Come inside with me. My sickness desires
 to have you alongside as its helper.
 
 CHORUS
 
 I have heard the story, although I did not see it myself,
 of the one who stole up to Zeus's bed, where Hera slept;
 how Zeus caught him and chained him to a whirring fiery wheel.
 But I have seen or heard of no other man
 whom destiny treated with such enmity
 as it did Philoktetes, who killed no one,
 nor robbed, but lived justly,
 a fair man to all who treated him fairly,
 and who fell into evils he did not deserve.
 It amazes me that he, alone,
 listening to the rushing waves pounding on the shore,
 could cling to life
 when life brought him pain, and so many tears.
 
 He was crippled and had no one near him.
 He was made to suffer, and no one could ease his burden,
 answer his cries,
 mourn with him the savage, blood-poisoning illness
 that was devouring him.
 He had no neighbor to gather soft leaves
 to staunch the bleeding, hideous sore
 that ran, suppurating, maggoty, on his foot.
 He writhed and scrawled upon the hard ground,
 crying like a motherless child,
 to wherever he might find relief
 when the spirit-killing illness attacked him.
 
 He gathered no grain sown in holy earth,
 nor the food that living men enjoy,
 except when he shot his feathered arrows
 and filled his stomach with what he took.
 In ten years, he has had no succoring wine;
 he searched for puddles and drank from them instead.
 But now fortune has come with victory for him. He has found
 the son of a great man, who will himself be great,
 when this is over. Our lord will carry him over the seas,
 after these ten years, to his father's home
 in the land of the nymphs of Malia,
 by the banks of sweet-running Spercheios,
 where Herakles the archer ascended to Olympos,
 bronze-armored, engulfed in holy fire,
 there above the hills of Oeta.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Come on, then, if you want to. Why do you stand there,
 seized by silence?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Ah! Ah! Ah!
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What is it?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Nothing to fear. Come now, boy.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Does your illness now bring you pain?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 No. I seem to be better now. O, gods!
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Why do you cry out to the gods in anguish?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I cry that they might come and soothe me.
 Ah! Ah! Ah!
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What is it? Tell me! I can see you're in pain.
 Do not keep it from me.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I am destroyed, child. I am unable
 to hide this evil from you any longer.
 Aaaah! Aaaah! It sears through my blood!
 I am destroyed! I am being devoured!
 Aaaah! Aaaah! Aaaah!
 By the gods, boy, if you have a sword,
 cut off my foot! Cut it off now! You cannot save me!
 Do it, boy.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What is this terrible thing that attacks you,
 and makes you scream in such misery?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Don't you know?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What is it?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 How can you not know? Aaaah! Aaaah!
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 It is the terrible pain the disease sets upon you.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Terrible indeed, more than words can tell. Pity me.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What should I do?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Do not be afraid. Do not leave me.
 The disease comes and goes, perhaps when it has gorged itself
 in its other wanderings.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Poor man. You have endured such miseries,
 and still you live on. Should I help you up?
 Do you want me to hold you?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Of all things, do not touch me. Take my bow instead,
 as you asked a while ago, until my pain
 diminishes. Keep the bow, keep it safe, my boy.
 Sleep overtakes me when the spell has passed;
 until then I'll have pain.
 You must let me sleep for a while.
 If my enemies come while I lie sleeping,
 I beg you, by the gods, do not give up my bow,
 willingly or unwillingly, by force or some trick.
 If you do, boy, you'll be a murderer,
 your own and mine, your suppliant.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Do not worry. I will be on my guard.
 No one but we will touch your bow.
 Give it to me now, and may the gods' fortune go with it.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Take it, boy. Pray to the gods, lest they be jealous,
 and the bow become your sorrow, as it has been mine
 and its former master's.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 O gods, grant what he asks, and grant us also
 a swift journey home on a sheltering wind,
 home, where Zeus bids us to go.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Your prayer, I'm afraid, will be in vain.
 The murderous blood is running now
 from its deep well. I expect a new attack.
 It comes. Aaaah! Aaaah! It comes!
 O, foot, you do me evil!
 You have the bow, boy. You know what is happening.
 Do not leave me! Aaaah! Aaaah!
 O, Odysseus, I wish it were you,
 I wish it were your spirit that these pains now gripped!
 Aaaah!
 Agamemnon, Menelaus, I hope it is you,
 your two bodies, generals,
 that this savage pain holds for as many years.
 
 Death, black death, how can I call on you again,
 and you not come to take me away?
 Boy, take my body and burn it away
 on a Lemnian pyre, in the volcano's heart.
 I did this for a man, a child of Zeus,
 and won the weapons you now keep safe.
 Will you do it, boy? Why don't you speak?
 Where are you, boy?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I grieve for you, sir. Your pain is mine.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 No, boy, be brave. The disease
 comes quickly and leaves me with equal speed.
 I beg you, do not leave me here.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Don't worry. We will stay here with you.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You'll stay?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Surely.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I find it unfitting to make you swear to it.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I cannot leave this place without you.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Give me your hand on that.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I give it to you, and with you it stays.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Now take me away.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What do you mean?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Up there...
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What madness is now upon you?
 Why do you look at the summit above us?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Let me go!
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Where?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Let me go.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I cannot allow it.
 
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Touch me, and you kill me.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I am letting go. You are saner now.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 O Earth, take my body from me now.
 The illness no longer allows me to stand.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Soon, I think, sleep will overcome him.
 He nods his head.
 Sweat drenches his body, and a black
 bitter flood of pus and blood has broken
 and runs from his foot.
 Let us leave him to sleep, friends.
 Let us leave him quietly.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Sleep, stranger to pain and suffering,
 descend upon us kindly now.
 Cover his eyes with your radiance,
 come down, Healer, come down.
 
 Boy, look now at where you stand,
 at where you are going, at what I hold for the future.
 Do you see him?
 He sleeps. Why are we waiting?
 The right moment decides everything
 and wins many sudden victories.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Yes, he hears nothing. But we have needlessly hunted,
 captured nothing if we take the bow, and sail without him.
 The crown of victory belongs to the one
 whom Zeus commanded that we bring back.
 A boast that cannot be carried out
 is a lie. That boast is a shameful disgrace.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Zeus will attend to such things, my boy.
 Answer me now;
 whisper softly.
 The sleep of a sick man, aware of all things,
 sees all. It is a sleep that is no sleep.
 
 Think as far ahead as you can
 of how you might secretly do as I say.
 You know of whom I am thinking now.
 If your decision is the same as his,
 then anyone with eyes can see trouble ahead.
 A fair wind is rising.
 The man is blind and helpless now,
 stretched out in the darkness---
 he is master not of hand, not of foot, not of anything.
 He is one lying down in Hades's chambers.
 Look to see if the time is right
 for what you intend:
 the best work is that which causes no fear.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Quiet, now! Have you lost your senses?
 The man's eyes are opening. He raises his head.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Blessed is the light that follows sleep,
 blessed is a friend's protection.
 These things are beyond my wildest hopes,
 that you would pity me and care for my sorrows,
 that you would remain by me and endure my woes.
 The Atreids, the noble generals, would not do this.
 They would have no tolerance for my distress.
 Your nature is truly noble, for it comes from noble parents.
 You took this burden easily, a burden heavy with howls
 and foul smells. Now I can put aside this illness.
 I can rest. Raise me up in your arms, my boy,
 put me on my feet, and let me gather my strength,
 so that we can go to your ship
 and sail off immediately.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I am glad to see you
 with open eyes, unpained, alive.
 Your symptoms seemed those of a dead man,
 when taken with your sufferings.
 Arise now. If you wish,
 these men will lift you.
 They will do all they can for you
 now that you and I are shipmates.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Thank you. But lift me up yourself,
 as you once suggested. Do not trouble the men.
 Let the stench not disturb them so early on---
 my being aboard will be bother enough.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Stand up, then. Hold on to me.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 No need. I am used to it.
 Once I am up, I can manage.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 It is time.
 What must I do?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Your words stray off course. What is it, boy?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I do not know where to turn my powerless words.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Powerless? Do not say such things.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 But I am mired in powerless thoughts.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Does this come from nausea
 at the sight of my illness?
 Does this push you not to take me?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Everything is nauseating to one who casts off his nature
 to do things that are out of character.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 It would not have been out of character
 for your father, the man who gave you your nature,
 to help a good man, both in word and in deed.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I will be shown to be evil.
 The very thought of it frightens me.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 The things you do now are not ignoble.
 The words you speak, though, give me pause.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Zeus, what will I do?  Will I twice be proven evil,
 hiding what I should not, saying the worst?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 If I am not a poor judge, it seems to me
 that this man will abandon me, and sail away.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I will not abandon you. It's the trip you'll be making
 that will be ample cause for grief.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I do not follow you. What are you saying?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I won't keep it from you any longer. You must sail to Troy,
 to the Achaeans, to the armies of the Atreids.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Ah! What are you saying?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Do not groan until you learn.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 What must I learn?
 What are you planning to do with me?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 First, to cure you of this misery. Then
 you and I will destroy the Trojan nation.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Is this the truth? Is this what you wanted?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 A great need forces these things upon us.
 Quell your anger.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I am destroyed. I am betrayed.
 Why, stranger, have you done these things?
 Give me back my bow.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I cannot. Duty and my own ambition
 force me to obey those men who command me.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 O fire, o utter terror, o terrible craftsman
 of all wickedness, the things you have done to me!
 How you have betrayed me! Are you not ashamed
 to look down on me, who have kneeled to you,
 the suppliant, you bitter ones?
 
 You have taken away my life with my bow.
 Return it. I beg you, boy, return it now.
 By your ancestral gods, do not take my life.
 
 He does not speak. He merely turns away,
 as though he will never give it back.
 
 Caves, promontories, hordes of wild beasts,
 rocky headlands, I speak to you now,
 for there is no one else to whom I can speak.
 You have always been at my side and heard me.
 Hear what Achilles's son has done!
 He promised to take me home. Instead
 he will take me to Troy. He gave me his hand
 and then robbed me of my holy bow,
 Herakles's bow, the son of Zeus's,
 to hold it up to the Greeks and boast
 that he had taken it from a strong opponent,
 that he had taken it from his prisoner.
 He is killing someone who is already dead,
 a corpse, a smoky shadow, a ghost. Were I strong
 he would not have won. Even so,
 he had to trick me to get it away.
 I have been tricked, and I am destroyed.
 What is left for me to do?
 
 Return my bow. Recall your nature. No?
 You are silent, and I am nothing.
 
 Double-doored rock, I come back to you
 unarmed, unable to capture my sustenance.
 Within that cave I will wither, unable
 to bring down birds or beasts from the mountains
 with my bow. Now I will be the food of those who fed me.
 Those I hunted once will hunt me now.
 I will repay with my life the lives I took
 because of the hypocrite I took into my trust,
 a boy who seemed to know no evil.
 
 A curse upon you. No, not until I know
 if you'll change your mind.
 If you will not, may you die in all misery.
 
 CHORUS
 
 What will we do now? Shall we sail away,
 or do what he asks us? It is in your hands.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 A terrible pity comes over me.
 I have felt it all along.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 By the gods, do take pity.
 Do not put on the mantle of infamy
 for having deceived me.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What will I do? I wish I had never left Skyros.
 I hate the things that are happening here.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You are not a bad man. By watching others
 who are bad you have learned these terrible tricks.
 Leave evil to them. Let us sail away.
 Return my weapons to me, boy.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What will we do now?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 You coward, what are you thinking of doing?
 Are you not going to give me the bow?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Who is that? Is that Odysseus's voice I hear?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Odysseus's, yes. Now you can see me clearly.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I am truly betrayed, truly destroyed.
 It is all becoming clear to me:
 It was he who tricked me and robbed me of my weapons.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 None other. I proclaim it to you now.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Give me my bow. Give it to me now, boy.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 He could not do that even if he wanted to.
 You must come with the bow, too, or these men will take you.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Your evil nature is beyond belief.
 Will they take me off against my will?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 If you don't crawl along on your own, they will.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 O land of Lemnos and the all-powerful fire,
 created by Hephaistos in the great volcano,
 must I submit to this?
 Must I let him force me to go with them?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Zeus rules this island. Zeus has ordered this.
 I am his servant. I obey his commands.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 O despicable man, the lies you spin! You call on the gods
 and you make the gods liars.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 The gods speak truly. This course must be followed.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I say no.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 And I say yes. You must obey.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Clearly we are slaves, and not freeborn men.
 This is what our fathers brought us up to be.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 No, as equals of the noblest men, with whom
 you must storm Troy's walls
 and demolish the city, as destiny proclaims.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 No, I'll do anything but that, Odysseus.
 I still have my seacliff.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 What did you have in mind?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 To throw myself from the rocks above
 and break myself on the rocks below.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Take him! Keep him from jumping!
 
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 O hands, what you suffer for lack of a bowstring,
 the prey of that man!
 
 You whose thoughts are sick and slavelike,
 how you have hunted me!
 How you tricked me, how you stole up
 with this boy as a shield, unknown to me.
 He deserved a better master than you.
 He is at a loss to do anything but what he's told,
 and he suffers now for his mischief
 and the things he has brought upon my head.
 Your evil, harmful soul has taught him
 to be a wily criminal,
 unwilling and unsuited though he was for that.
 Now you have bound me and plan to take me
 off from this place where you had cast me away,
 friendless, homeless, a living corpse.
 
 I curse you. I have cursed you many times before,
 but the gods have granted me nothing I want,
 and so you live happily, while I live in this pain,
 and you and the Atreids mock my anguish,
 those two generals, for whom you perform this deed.
 You were yoked to the cause by deceit and force,
 while I willingly went with my seven ships,
 willingly to dishonor and my own destruction,
 to being cast away on this lonely shore.
 You say they did it, and they blame you.
 
 Why must you take me?
 I am nothing. For you, I've been dead for years.
 Blasphemous man, could it be I don't stink now;
 am I no longer a cripple? If I sail with you,
 how can you offer burnt sacrifices?
 How can you pour your libations to the gods?
 That was your reason for abandoning me.
 
 May a horrible death overtake you.
 It will for your crimes against me, if the gods
 still care for justice. I know they do,
 for you would not have come for my sake alone;
 the gods' urging must have brought you here.
 Ancestral land and you gods who look on mortal crimes,
 take vengeance on these men when the time is right,
 take vengeance on them all, if you pity me.
 If I could see them die, then I could also dream
 that the sickness within me has fled my body.
 
 CHORUS
 
 He is bitter, this stranger; his words are, too,
 for they do not bend to suffering.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 There is no time to say the things I should,
 and there are many things I could say to him.
 Just this: I am a man who responds to occasion
 and adapts himself to the situation.
 In times of crisis among good and just men,
 I can be the noblest-minded of all.
 To win is my overarching wish---
 except against you. For you I will stand aside.
 
 Let him go. We don't need him.
 Let him stay in this place. We have his bow.
 Teuker is with us, and he is skillful,
 and I can master those weapons too.
 I aim straight as well. Why would we need you?
 Goodbye. Goodbye to Lemnos.
 Let's go. Perhaps soon I'll win
 the prize and fame that belong to you.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Oh, what will I do? Will you stand before the Greeks
 cloaked in the glory of my weapons?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Don't speak to me. We are leaving now.
 
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You have nothing to say to me, son of Achilles?
 Will you leave without a word?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Come along now, boy. Don't look at him,
 even though your spirit prompts you to.
 That may destroy the advantage we have won.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You sailors, will you leave me?
 Do you have no pity?
 
 CHORUS
 
 The young lord is our master. His words are ours.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Odysseus will chide me for pitying him.
 You men stay here until the other sailors make ready
 and we have prayed to the gods of this place.
 Philoktetes may think better of us.
 Let us go, Odysseus. You men, come quickly
 as soon as we call for you.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Rock hollow, cave, sunny, icy,
 It is true that I was not meant to leave you.
 You will be a witness to my life and death.
 Rock walls, filled with my cries of anguish,
 what will my daily ration be now?
 What hope have I of dealing with my fate,
 now that the birds that fled from me above
 will come down through the winds to destroy me?
 I have no strength left.
 
 CHORUS
 
 You brought this on yourself, unbending man.
 You could have found a way out
 when it was possible to make a sensible choice,
 but you took the worse over the better fate.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Sorrow and sadness are mine. I am broken
 by suffering, and now I must live alone;
 I will live and die in this place.
 I cannot feed myself by my winged arrows
 or my strong hands. Unexpectedly,
 his tricky words overtook my judgment.
 I wish the one who set this trap
 were given pains to match my own.
 
 CHORUS
 
 The gods' will brought you down, not guile,
 not tricks in which I have had a hand.
 Let loose your hatred, set aside your curses.
 I have only the fear that you'll refuse my friendship.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 He sits laughing on the shores of the wine-dark sea.
 He holds in his hands the bow that sustained me,
 which no mortal but I had ever touched.
 Beloved bow, made by caring hands,
 the prize of Herakles, who'll never use you again,
 if you could see, you would pity me.
 You have a new master, a guileful man.
 He will bend you now.
 You will know treachery, know my hated enemy,
 and know countless evils rising from his deceit.
 
 CHORUS
 
 One should take care to say what is just,
 and having said it, keep his tongue from ire.
 Odysseus follows the orders of many,
 and he has done this in obedience to his friends.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 O birds, o beasts that feed upon the hills,
 you no longer need run away from my cave.
 I no longer have my killing weapons.
 Come down. The time is right for you to feed
 on my ravaged, quivering body;
 I will soon die. How can I keep myself alive?
 Who can live on breezes and not earthly food?
 
 CHORUS
 
 By the gods, if you still hold the gods in respect,
 come to a stranger who approaches with good heart.
 Think closely of what you are doing.
 It is up to you to flee your destruction.
 To feed fate with your flesh is pitiful.
 Your body will never learn to endure the pains,
 the ten thousand pains of the sickness possessing you.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You pour salt on old wounds. Still, you are better
 than any of those who came to me before.
 Why have you also wounded me?
 
 CHORUS
 
 What do you mean?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You wanted to take me to hateful Troy.
 
 CHORUS
 
 I think that is best.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Then leave me, and now.
 
 CHORUS
 
 That is good news indeed.
 I'll willingly obey your command.
 Let us go, men, back to our stations.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 No, strangers, by the gods, stay here!
 I beg you!
 
 CHORUS
 
 Be still.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I beg you, stay with me.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Why do you beseech us now?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I am destroyed.
 My foot, what will I do with you
 for what remains of my life?
 Come back to me, friends.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Come back to do what? Have you changed your mind?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 It is not just to be angry
 when a man driven mad by stormy anguish
 speaks thoughtlessly.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Come with us, poor man, as we have asked.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Never. Not even if the lord of lightning
 devours me in thunderous fire!
 Let Troy be ruined and all those before its walls
 who cast me away here in my lameness!
 Friends, grant me one last request.
 
 CHORUS
 
 What is it?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 If you have a sword, or an axe, or a knife,
 then bring it to me.
 
 CHORUS
 
 What will you do with it?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I will cut off my head, cut off my foot,
 cut myself apart with my own hand.
 My mind wants nothing but death.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Why?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I want to find my father.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Where?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 In Hades. Surely he no longer stands in light.
 Ancestral city, I wish I could see you,
 I who deserted your holy waters
 to help the Greeks, my enemies.
 I am nothing now.
 
 CHORUS
 
 I should have been back to the ship by now.
 Here comes Odysseus
 with the son of Achilles.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Why are you returning so quickly, boy?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I hurry to undo the evil I have done.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 You speak strangely. What evil is that?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I was wrong to obey you and the generals.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 What did we order you to do that was wrong?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I worked guile and deceit, and successfully.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 What more do you want now?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Nothing new. I have Philoktetes's bow.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 And what will you do with it? I am afraid to ask.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I am giving it back to its rightful owner.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 You mean you'll return it?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Yes. I got it by shameful tricks.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Do you really mean it?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I am telling the truth.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 What are you saying, son of Achilles?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Must we go over the same ground twice?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 I wish we had not gone over it the first time.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 You have heard everything now.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Someone will keep you from doing it.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Who?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 The whole Greek army, and I among them.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 You are clever, Odysseus, but what you say is not.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Neither your words nor your acts are clever.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 But they are just. That is better.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 How can it be just to give away
 what you have won with my counsel?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I have committed injustice and strayed off course.
 I must undo all that.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 And you have no fear of what the Greeks will do?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I am not afraid of any of you, since I act
 with justice. You will not force me.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Then we will fight not Troy, but you.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 So be it.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 Do you see my hand drawing out this sword?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 You'll see me do the same, and right away.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 I will leave you to it, then.
 I'll return to Troy and tell the Greeks,
 and they will come here to punish you.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 It is a cautious thing you do. Remain as cautious,
 and perhaps you'll keep clear of future danger.
 
 Philoktetes, son of Poias,
 come out of your cave. I call on you.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 What do you want? Why do you call me?
 It bodes ill. Some new trouble is at hand,
 some new grief to heap on my miseries.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Be calm. I simply ask that you listen.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I listened to you once, and you spoke well then.
 My troubles came from sweet words, when I believed them.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Is it not possible, then, to apologize?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You spoke as smoothly as you do now when you stole my bow,
 trustworthy on the surface, but treacherous below.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 That is not the case now. Are you resolved
 to stay here as before, or will you come with us?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Stop. Your words will be wasted on me.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Are you resolved?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 More resolved than words can say.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I wish that I could make you change your mind.
 But if my words are pointless, then I am finished.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Your words are useless. You will never win me
 with words to your friendship. You have destroyed me
 with deceitful talk, and then you come to make speeches,
 bastard son of a noble father. A curse on you,
 on the Atreids and Odysseus, but especially on you.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Curse no more. Take your bow.
 I give it back to you now, Philoktetes.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Is this yet another of your tricks?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 No. I swear it by almighty Zeus.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Your words are good, if they are true.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 They are. Reach out, and take the bow.
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 I forbid you, as the gods are my witnesses,
 in the name of the Atreids and all their armies.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Boy, whose voice is that? Odysseus's?
 
 ODYSSEUS
 
 None other, and very near you now.
 I will bring you to wide Troy myself,
 against your will, whether or not the boy approves.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You will suffer for your words
 if this arrow flies true.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Don't shoot, by the gods!
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Let go of my hand now, boy.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 No. I will not let go.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Why do you keep me from killing my enemy?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 It would not be a brave act for you or me.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 The lords of the army, the false heralds of the Greeks,
 are cowards in battle, however brave their words.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 That may well be. You have your bow.
 You have no further cause to be angry with me.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 No. You have shown your true, nobly bred nature.
 You are the son of Achilles, not Sisyphos.
 Your father, when he lived, was the most famous man of all,
 and now he is most the famous of the dead.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 It pleases me to hear you speak kindly of my father,
 and of me. Now listen to what I want from you.
 The gods' will is given to us mortals, and we
 must bear that will of necessity.
 And those who choose to clutch their miseries
 and not release them deserve no pity.
 You have become a savage through your anger;
 you refuse good advice and hate him who offers it,
 as though he were your enemy.
 
 I will speak freely. May Zeus, god of vows, be my witness.
 Listen to me; let my words be engraved in your mind:
 you are diseased, and your pain has been sent by the gods
 because you came close to the guardian of Chryse,
 the viper who silently watches over
 her roofless temple to keep invaders out.
 Your pain will have no relief in this place,
 where this sun rises, and this sun sets:
 you must first go willingly with us to Troy
 and there be taken by the Asklepiades,
 who will relieve your disease. And then, beside me,
 you must take your bow and conquer Troy.
 
 I know that it must be this way.
 A Trojan man was taken prisoner. His name
 is Helenos, and he is a trustworthy prophet.
 He told us of how this year it would pass,
 how it was fated that Troy would fall to the Greeks.
 If he was wrong, he said, then we should kill him.
 You know it all now. Yield, and obey.
 You will get much more than you asked for:
 you will be healed by knowing hands, and then
 you will gain the greatest glory of our people,
 becoming the most famous of us all, conquering
 Troy, the city that has drained us of blood and tears.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Hateful life, why should I still live and see?
 Why have I not descended into darkness?
 What will I do? How can I mistrust
 the one who gives me this kindly advice?
 Must I give in? If I do, how shall I go
 into the light? An outcast, mistreated,
 to whom should I talk?
 My eyes, can you bear to see me
 living alongside those who tried to kill me,
 the Atreids and that bastard Odysseus?
 I worry not about the evils they have done,
 but the evils they will do as these things unfold.
 Once men have learned to hatch evil crimes,
 they cannot help but be criminals again.
 
 I wonder, and I keep on wondering.
 You should not be going off to Troy,
 and you should keep me from going there.
 Those men have wronged you, robbed you
 of your father's weapons. Will you still help them,
 and make me do the same?
 No. Take me home as you have promised,
 and then stay in Skyros.
 Let these men die badly, as they deserve.
 Your father and I will be grateful to you,
 for by helping the wicked
 you become like them.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Your words have merit. Still, you must trust
 the gods, and my word, and come as my friend.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Come to the bitter plains of Troy,
 to the accursed Atreids with my foot like this?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 No, not to enemies, but to those who can help,
 who can save you and your foot from this savage disease.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 What you urge is terrible.
 Can I believe what you tell me?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 It will be to our mutual benefit.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Are you not ashamed to talk so, in full sight of the gods?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Why should I feel shame to do acts of good?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Acts of good for me, or the Atreids?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 I am your friend. My words are of friendship.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 How will you betray me to my enemies?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 You must learn to extract yourself from this anguish.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Your words are clear. You intend to destroy me.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 No. You have not understood.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Is it not true that the Atreids marooned me here?
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Once they marooned you. Let us see if they'll save you.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Not if salvation means going to Troy.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What will we do, then, since I cannot convince you?
 It is better, it seems, that I stop talking,
 and you go on living without hope of a cure.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Let me suffer the things I must.
 But what you promised, touching my hand,
 you must do. Take me home without delay.
 Forget Troy.
 I am tired of lamenting here.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 All right. Let us sail.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 You speak nobly.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Plant your feet firmly, and arise.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I will do so, as firmly as I am able.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 How will I avoid the scorn of the Greeks?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Pay it no mind.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 And what if they come in war against my country?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I will be with you.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What kind of help could you give me?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 The help of Herakles's bow.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 What do you mean?
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 I will drive them out of your fatherland.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 If you will do this, then come
 and kiss this ground, and we will go.
 
 HERAKLES
 
 Not yet. Not until you have heard me, Philoktetes.
 Know that I am the voice of Herakles;
 you hear it with your ears and you see my body.
 I have come from the dead to give you my help.
 I come to reveal Zeus's plans to you, and to stop
 the journey which you now intend.
 Listen to me.
 
 Let me tell you first of my own fate,
 tell you of the hardships and sufferings that were mine,
 and of the undying fame that I later won.
 I gained immortality, as you can see. So will you,
 after all this misery you will have endless glory.
 Go with this child to the plains of Troy.
 
 There you will have a cure for your disease,
 and win fame as the best of the Greek warriors.
 You will kill Paris Alexander, who started it all;
 you will kill him with your bow, once mine.
 You will conquer Troy.
 You will win the prize of glory from the armies
 and spoils of war that you will take home
 to Poias your father, and Oeta your country.
 Take some of those spoils and make an offering
 on a pyre in commemoration of my bow.
 
 Son of Achilles, hear me too.
 You alone are not strong enough to conquer Troy,
 not without this man, nor he without you.
 You must act like two lions in a pride,
 guarding each other as you hunt.
 I will send Asklepios to Troy to heal his disease.
 Troy will fall twice before my bow.
 Remember this, though: when you go to sack Troy,
 stay holy. Zeus puts everything else below that.
 Piety does not die with men;
 whether they live or die, piety remains.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Voice that moves me, long-gone body,
 I will not disobey you.
 
 NEOPTOLEMOS
 
 Nor will I.
 
 HERAKLES
 
 Do not delay, then.
 The time is right, and the tides are calling.
 
 PHILOKTETES
 
 Hear me, hated Lemnos.
 Farewell, cave that shared my watch,
 nymphs of the water-meadows, farewell,
 thundering beat of waves on the headland,
 that wetted my head with spray on the cliffs,
 and the volcano that groaned in echo to my voice
 when I was tossed by storms.
 Springs and the well of Lykeios, I leave you.
 I had lost all hope of doing so.
 Farewell, Lemnos, bound by waves,
 give me no further cause to mourn, but send me
 off on fair seas to win my glory
 where fate now carries me, to the judgment of friends
 and the all-governing spirit that rules these events.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Let us all go now,
 after we have prayed to the nymphs of the sea
 to grant us safe passage over the waters.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
